For Xie Yanyi it was not the physical abuse that was the hardest to endure - although his list of the deliberate cruelties inflicted upon him is long. He was kept in a stress position, crouched on a low stool, from 06:00 in the morning until 22:00 at night. After 15 days like this, he tells me, his legs went numb and he had difficulty urinating. At times he was denied food and was subjected to gruelling interrogations for "dozens of hours" on end. He was beaten. And he was watched while he slept, with his guards insisting that he kept the same sleeping position all night. But harder to bear than all of this, Mr Xie insists, was the time spent in solitary confinement. "I was kept alone in a small room and saw no daylight for half a year. I had nothing to read, nothing to do but to sit on that low stool." "People could go mad in that situation. I was isolated from the world. This is torture - the isolation is more painful than being beaten." Although impossible to verify, his account tallies with other reports of the suffering endured under the so-called "war on law", launched during the Chinese Leader Xi Jinping's first five years in office. Only in Mr Xie's case it is a rare, first-hand account. Like the other lawyers involved, Mr Xie was, upon his release, warned not to speak to the foreign media but it is a prohibition he has chosen to ignore. "It might be risky to do this interview," he tells me. "But I feel it's my responsibility to speak out. I have no choice. I can't accept a society that arrests people for what they think and what they say." The crackdown on China's already beleaguered human rights field began in mid 2015, halfway through Xi Jinping's first term. Now, anointed in office for a second term by the Communist Party Congress that ended this week, it stands as one of his most gloomy legacies. In total, more than 300 lawyers, legal assistants and activists have been brought in for questioning, with more than two dozen pursued as formal investigations. Two years on, some have been given long jail terms, others still await sentence and at least one appears to have disappeared completely. Xie Yanyi, like the others targeted by the campaign, has spent much of his legal career representing clients involved in sensitive cases - victims of official corruption, police violence or religious persecution - and harassment and abuse have always been part of the job. He was also a bold advocate for peaceful democratic reform, once having filed a lawsuit against the former Chinese Leader Jiang Zemin for refusing to step down from the Central Military Commission at the end of his presidency. But it is under China's current president that things have taken a dramatic turn for the worse. Shortly after Xi Jinping came to power, at the last Communist Party Congress in 2012, a leaked document began circulating online that outlined seven key ideological concepts that posed a threat to Communist Party rule and forbade the promotion of them in China's universities or in the media. Issued by an office close to the senior Communist Party leadership, the list of forbidden ideologies included "Western constitutional democracy", "universal values" and "civil society". In hindsight, the document now appears to have set the tone for much of what has followed. Mr Xi has presided over a narrowing of the room for public discussion, tighter control over the media, new restrictions on foreign organisations and charities, a clampdown on the internet, and of course, the campaign against the human rights lawyers. It was never meant to be this way. For decades, the mantra in the West was that ever increasing trade with China would bring political reform in its wake. "Economic freedom creates the habits of liberty," former US President George W Bush once said in a speech on the subject of engagement with China. And there was a time when that promise appeared to be bearing fruit. Ahead of the 2007 Party Congress, the meeting at which Xi Jinping first emerged as a likely future leader, state media were openly, if tentatively, discussing incremental political change. Even around the 2012 Congress - by which time any glimpses of optimism had already begun fading - open letters and petitions were being published calling for democratic reform in the shape of an independent judiciary and a bill of rights. It would be a brave academic, journalist or lawyer who would put their signature to such a manifesto today. Chinese state run media has dismissed at least one of the accounts of the torture of the human rights lawyers as "fake news" and has accused the foreign media, in its coverage of such cases, as being "great enthusiasts" for negative stories. But even foreign observers can find themselves dazzled by China's skyscrapers, high-speed railways and its rising middle class millions. The plight of a few lawyers and activists can seem to be a diversion from what really matters. But Xie Yanyi's account of torture, and others like it, ought to tell us something very important. As China grows in power, influence and confidence, it is determined to do so without any of the political freedoms that conventional wisdom had once thought of as a prerequisite to becoming a world leading, prosperous economy. The message sent to 1.4 billion citizens has been clear: think very carefully before daring to challenge the authority of the Communist Party, even in the country's own, Communist Party-run courts. Xie Yanyi was released on bail after a total of 18 months in detention. But he is not yet free of surveillance and intimidation. Shortly after we recorded our interview with him in late August, he was visited by the authorities and warned again. This time it was more specific: don't do anything that might upset the preparations for Communism's largest and most sacrosanct political gathering. Out of concern for his safety we agreed to a delay and have waited until after the Party Congress to publish this story. Even the recording itself - as viewers of the video on this page will see - was overshadowed by an ominous presence - a group of around a dozen men who surrounded Mr Xie's apartment. As we watched them out of the window, I asked him if, as a father with three children, it might be better for him to keep a low profile and to stay quiet for a bit? "I am always quiet," came the reply. "My family is kind to everyone. We are always sensible and peaceful." "We are lawful citizens. We are using our lawful rights. We hope all people can live with dignity, respect each other and abide by the rule of law." As the BBC team left, the men surrounded our car, banging on the window and angrily demanding we open the doors. We refused to get out until, eventually, the police arrived. After an hour or so we were told we were free to go. It's a luxury that Xi Jinping's government does not afford to human rights lawyers and their families. Or for that matter, anyone who dares to stand in its way.
Wim Wenders became a major film-maker when, in the 1970s, German cinema became cool around the world. His hits included The American Friend and Paris, Texas. But Wenders was privately experimenting with one of the most straightforward of visual technologies - the Polaroid stills camera. Thousands of those shots were thrown away - but now a selection of surviving images has gone on display in London. Wenders says when he started taking Polaroid pictures in the mid-1960s it had nothing to do with art. "It was just part of my life. I would photograph things to do with movies I was making, or when I travelled. It was useful and fun - which I think is what Polaroids were for most people." Instant photography - doing away with a separate and lengthy process of developing film outside the camera - arrived commercially in 1948. It was the creation of Polaroid's founder Edwin Land. In the early years the images were black and white. The big step forward was the arrival of the Polaroid sx-70 camera in the early 1970s. "It was science fiction and nobody had seen anything like it. You pointed the camera and took the picture and then it came out - an empty, blank bit of white paper. "And before your eyes it slowly turned into the image you had shot a few moments before. It was exhilarating in its colours and brightness. "You have to remember that at this time people didn't have even VHS tape - we were in a simpler, analogue world. So to be able to create and record a visual image almost immediately seemed extraordinary." Now some 200 of the images are on display in London, under the title Instant Stories. Some of them show well-known people the director worked with such as the actor Dennis Hopper. Others are landscapes or pictures of odd corners in places Wenders visited such as New York or Sydney. There are also close-up images of a TV set showing the 1956 film The Girl Can't Help It, with appearances from Eddie Cochrane and Gene Vincent. "It's still my favourite rock and roll movie. And suddenly with a Polaroid you could photograph something you enjoyed and you had it in front of you to hold, almost at once. At the time it was extraordinary. "The other great thing is that if friends were in the image you could give it to them - and that's what happened to many of the pictures I took. "I'd had traditional cameras since I was six or so and I enjoyed using them. But there was a whole new spontaneity with the Polaroid which I think some people are now starting to rediscover the way they've rediscovered music on vinyl. "Everyone says, 'oh the kids aren't interested in physical objects any more: they don't want a book or a newspaper or a CD.' "But the kids will regret it when they're older: if you're 25 you have to realise that the phone which seems so great now will one day be yesterday's technology and lots of the digital images we all have will be hard or even impossible to look at." But doesn't a modern smartphone produce images far more sophisticated than any Polaroid camera did 40 years ago? Wenders says the basic character of the technology was part of the appeal. "I think people who look at the images will find a sort of beauty here. The colours the process produced are great, though the monochrome images are attractive too." The director points out a particular black and white picture. "It's the Hoboken Terminal in New York and I was shooting a film 30 years ago there called Lightning Over Water. These places are mainly gone." For a long time the pictures just went up on Wenders' refrigerator and then were stored away in cigar boxes. "But they remain unique: they only existed once and there's no negative and you can't duplicate it. Forty years later they seem quite precious." Wenders remembers that at the time a new Polaroid model or a big technical development was the equivalent of an Apple launch today. "So when the sx-70 came out we were delighted to get hold of it early to use in the film Alice in the Cities (1974)." The new show in London plays on a loop the scene from The American Friend in which, says Wenders, "Dennis Hopper invents the selfie with a Polaroid camera." There was also a use behind the camera. "So at this time there's no video playout and you only see your rushes three days later. The Polaroid camera can be a real help setting up a shot." But in the 1980s Wenders abandoned Polaroids entirely. "I was starting to take stills photography more seriously and I started to use large-size cameras". But he retained one of his old Polaroid cameras and only recently gave it to Patti Smith to replace one she was having problems with. Wenders thinks digital photography is now so problem-free and so cheap that a lot of the creativity has gone. "It's so easy for a professional photographer to take hundreds or even thousands of pictures of a particular face or of a scene and of course a few of them will be good and the rest are wiped. It can be an impersonal, industrial process. "The Polaroid was instant but it was still connected to the original idea of photography. There was always something sacred about the act of stealing an image from the world." Instant Stories: Wim Wenders' Polaroids is at the Photographers' Gallery in London until 11 February 2018. Follow us on Facebook, on Twitter @BBCNewsEnts, or on Instagram at bbcnewsents. If you have a story suggestion email entertainment.news@bbc.co.uk.
BBC News looks at what we know and don't know about the Earth's changing climate. The planet's climate has constantly been changing over geological time. The global average temperature today is about 15C, though geological evidence suggests it has been much higher and lower in the past. However, the current period of warming is occurring more rapidly than many past events. Scientists are concerned that the natural fluctuation, or variability, is being overtaken by a rapid human-induced warming that has serious implications for the stability of the planet's climate. The greenhouse effect refers to the way the Earth's atmosphere traps some of the energy from the Sun. Solar energy radiating back out to space from the Earth's surface is absorbed by atmospheric greenhouse gases and re-emitted in all directions. The energy that radiates back down to the planet heats both the lower atmosphere and the surface. Without this effect, the Earth would be about 30C colder, making our planet hostile to life. Scientists believe we are adding to the natural greenhouse effect with gases released from industry and agriculture (known as emissions), trapping more energy and increasing the temperature. This is commonly referred to as global warming or climate change. The most important of these greenhouse gases in terms of its contribution to warming is water vapour, but concentrations show little change and it persists in the atmosphere for only a few days. On the other hand, carbon dioxide (CO2) persists for much longer (it would take hundreds of years for it to return to pre-industrial levels). In addition, there is only so much CO2 that can be soaked up by natural reservoirs such as the oceans. Most man-made emissions of CO2 are through the burning of fossil fuels, as well as through cutting down carbon-absorbing forests. Other greenhouse gases such as methane and nitrous oxide are also released through human activities, but their overall abundance is small compared with carbon dioxide. Since the industrial revolution began in 1750, CO2 levels have risen by more than 30% and methane levels have risen more than 140%. The concentration of CO2 in the atmosphere is now higher than at any time in at least 800,000 years. Temperature records going back to the late 19th Century show that the average temperature of the Earth's surface has increased by about 0.8C (1.4F) in the last 100 years. About 0.6C (1.0F) of this warming occurred in the last three decades. Satellite data shows an average increase in global sea levels of some 3mm per year in recent decades. A large proportion of the change in sea level is accounted for by the thermal expansion of seawater. As seawater warms up, the molecules become less densely packed, causing an increase in the volume of the ocean. But the melting of mountain glaciers and the retreat of polar ice sheets are also important contributors. Most glaciers in temperate regions of the world and along the Antarctic Peninsula are in retreat. Since 1979, satellite records show a dramatic decline in Arctic sea-ice extent, at an annual rate of 4% per decade. In 2012, the ice extent reached a record minimum that was 50% lower than the 1979-2000 average. The Greenland Ice Sheet has experienced record melting in recent years; if the entire 2.8 million cu km sheet were to melt, it would raise sea levels by 6m. Satellite data shows the West Antarctic Ice Sheet is also losing mass, and a recent study indicated that East Antarctica, which had displayed no clear warming or cooling trend, may also have started to lose mass in the last few years. But scientists are not expecting dramatic changes. In some places, mass may actually increase as warming temperatures drive the production of more snows. The effects of a changing climate can also be seen in vegetation and land animals. These include earlier flowering and fruiting times for plants and changes in the territories (or ranges) occupied by animals. In the last few years, there has been a lot of talk about a pause in global warming. Commentators argued that since 1998, there had been no significant global warming despite ever increasing amounts of carbon dioxide being emitted. Scientists have tried to explain this in a number of ways. These include: But there has been no general consensus on the precise mechanism behind the pause. And it would now seem that the hiatus has come to an abrupt halt: the years 2014, 2015 and 2016 were the three hottest years on record. In fact, a study published in Science journal in June 2015 doubted there had been a warming hiatus in the first place. In its 2013 assessment, the Intergovernmental Panel on Climate Change (IPCC) forecast a range of possible scenarios based on computer modelling. But most simulations indicate that global surface temperature change by the end of the 21st Century is likely to exceed 1.5C, relative to 1850. A threshold of 2C is generally regarded as the gateway to dangerous warming. Even if we cut greenhouse gas emissions dramatically now, scientists say the effects will continue because parts of the climate system, particularly large bodies of water and ice, can take hundreds of years to respond to changes in temperature. It also takes greenhouse gases decades to be removed from the atmosphere. The scale of potential impacts is uncertain. The changes could drive freshwater shortages, bring sweeping changes in food production conditions, and increase the number of deaths from floods, storms, heat waves and droughts. This is because climate change is expected to increase the frequency of extreme weather events - though linking any single event to global warming is complicated. Scientists forecast more rainfall overall, but say the risk of drought in inland areas during hot summers will increase. More flooding is expected from storms and rising sea levels. There are, however, likely to be very strong regional variations in these patterns. Poorer countries, which are least equipped to deal with rapid change, could suffer the most. Plant and animal extinctions are predicted as habitats change faster than species can adapt, and the World Health Organization (WHO) has warned that the health of millions could be threatened by increases in malaria, water-borne disease and malnutrition. As an increased amount of CO2 is released into the atmosphere, there is increased uptake of CO2 by the oceans, and this leads to them becoming more acidic. This ongoing process of acidification could pose major problems for the world's coral reefs, as the changes in chemistry prevent corals from forming a calcified skeleton, which is essential for their survival. Computer models are used to study the dynamics of the Earth's climate and make projections about future temperature change. But these climate models differ on "climate sensitivity" - the amount of warming or cooling that occurs as a particular factor, such as CO2. goes up or down. Models also differ in the way that they express "climate feedbacks". Global warming will cause some changes that look likely to create further heating, such as the release of large quantities of the greenhouse gas methane as permafrost (permanently frozen soil found mainly in the Arctic) melts. This is known as a positive climate feedback. But negative feedbacks exist that could offset warming. Various "reservoirs" on Earth absorb CO2 as part of the carbon cycle - the process through which carbon is exchanged between, for example, the oceans and the land. The question is: how will these balance out? More: BBC News climate change special report
پاکستانی کرکٹ ٹیم کے آف سپنر محمد حفیظ کے بولنگ ایکشن کا بائیو مکنیک ٹیسٹ یکم نومبر کو انگلینڈ کی لفبرا یونیورسٹی میں ہو گا۔ محمد حفیظ تیس اکتوبر کو انگلینڈ روانہ ہوں گے۔ یاد رہے کہ محمد حفیظ کے بولنگ ایکشن کے مشکوک ہونے کے بارے میں پاکستان اور سری لنکا کے درمیان ابوظہبی میں کھیلے گئے تیسرے ون ڈے انٹرنیشنل کے امپائرز نے رپورٹ کی تھی۔ محمد حفیظ کا بولنگ ایکشن ایک بار پھر مشکوک قرار نوجوان ٹیم کا بڑا کارنامہ اگلے ورلڈ کپ کی ٹرافی بھی بعید نہیں ہے پاکستان کا نو سال بعد ون ڈے سیریز میں کلین سویپ نامہ نگار عبدالرشید شکور کے مطابق آئی سی سی کے قواعد وضوابط کے مطابق محمد حفیظ کو اپنے بولنگ ایکشن کی درستگی کے لیے 14 روز دیے گئے ہیں۔ محمد حفیظ اس سے قبل دسمبر 2014 میں مشکوک بولنگ ایکشن کی زد میں آئے تھے اور بولنگ ایکشن کی درستگی کے بعد انہیں اپریل 2015 میں دوبارہ بولنگ کی اجازت مل گئی تھی۔ لیکن اسی سال جون میں پاکستان اور سری لنکا کے درمیان گال میں کھیلے گئے ٹیسٹ کے امپائرز نے ان کے بولنگ ایکشن کے بارے میں دوبارہ رپورٹ دی تھی چونکہ وہ ایک سال کے عرصے میں دوبارہ مشکوک بولنگ ایکشن کی زد میں آئے لہٰذا قوانین کے تحت ان پر ایک سال کے لیے بولنگ کرنے پر پابندی عائد کر دی گئی تھی۔ نومبر 2016 میں محمد حفیظ نے نیشنل کرکٹ سینٹر برسبین میں اپنا بائیو مکینک ٹیسٹ دیا تھا جس کی رپورٹ کی روشنی میں وہ دوبارہ بولنگ کے اہل قرار دے دیے گئے تھے۔
Two lorry drivers have denied a string of charges following a crash on the M1 that left eight people dead. Six men and two women died in the crash involving two lorries and a minibus near Newport Pagnell on 26 August. Ryszard Masierak, 31, of Evesham, Worcestershire, and David Wagstaff, 53, of Stoke-on-Trent, each deny eight counts of causing death by dangerous driving. A trial has been set for 26 February at Aylesbury Crown Court. Mr Masierak was remanded in custody, while Mr Wagstaff was given bail. Four minibus passengers were also seriously hurt in the crash on the southbound carriageway. Both defendants denied four counts of causing serious injury by dangerous driving. Mr Wagstaff pleaded guilty to eight counts of death by careless driving, and to careless driving. Peter Shaw, prosecuting, said these pleas were not accepted by the Crown. He called for Mr Wagstaff to stand trial on the more serious charge of death by dangerous driving. The eight people who died were part of a group of Catholics from Nottingham's Malayali community, originating from Kerala in southern India. They were on their way to catch the Eurostar to France when the crash happened. The minibus was being driven from Nottingham to London by Cyriac Joseph, 52, a father-of-two, who died in the crash. The other victims were Tamilmani Arachelvan, 50; Lavanyalakshmi Seetharaman, 32; Panneerselvam Annamalai, 63; Subramaniyan Arachelvan, 58; Rishi Rajeev Kumar, 27; Vivek Bhaskaran, 26; and Karthikeyan Pugalur Ramasubramanian, 33. Mano Ranjan Panneerselvam, an IT worker with Nottingham-based company Wipro, was critically injured. A five-year-old girl, a woman in her 30s and a woman in her 50s were also hurt.
BBC News environment correspondent Richard Black traces key milestones, scientific discoveries, technical innovations and political action. 1712 - British ironmonger Thomas Newcomen invents the first widely used steam engine, paving the way for the Industrial Revolution and industrial scale use of coal. 1800 - World population reaches one billion. 1824 - French physicist Joseph Fourier describes the Earth's natural "greenhouse effect". He writes: "The temperature [of the Earth] can be augmented by the interposition of the atmosphere, because heat in the state of light finds less resistance in penetrating the air, than in re-passing into the air when converted into non-luminous heat." 1861 - Irish physicist John Tyndall shows that water vapour and certain other gases create the greenhouse effect. "This aqueous vapour is a blanket more necessary to the vegetable life of England than clothing is to man," he concludes. More than a century later, he is honoured by having a prominent UK climate research organisation - the Tyndall Centre - named after him. 1886 - Karl Benz unveils the Motorwagen, often regarded as the first true automobile. 1896 - Swedish chemist Svante Arrhenius concludes that industrial-age coal burning will enhance the natural greenhouse effect. He suggests this might be beneficial for future generations. His conclusions on the likely size of the "man-made greenhouse" are in the same ballpark - a few degrees Celsius for a doubling of CO2 - as modern-day climate models. 1900 - Another Swede, Knut Angstrom, discovers that even at the tiny concentrations found in the atmosphere, CO2 strongly absorbs parts of the infrared spectrum. Although he does not realise the significance, Angstrom has shown that a trace gas can produce greenhouse warming. 1927 - Carbon emissions from fossil fuel burning and industry reach one billion tonnes per year. 1930 - Human population reaches two billion. 1938 - Using records from 147 weather stations around the world, British engineer Guy Callendar shows that temperatures had risen over the previous century. He also shows that CO2 concentrations had increased over the same period, and suggests this caused the warming. The "Callendar effect" is widely dismissed by meteorologists. 1955 - Using a new generation of equipment including early computers, US researcher Gilbert Plass analyses in detail the infrared absorption of various gases. He concludes that doubling CO2 concentrations would increase temperatures by 3-4C. 1957 - US oceanographer Roger Revelle and chemist Hans Suess show that seawater will not absorb all the additional CO2 entering the atmosphere, as many had assumed. Revelle writes: "Human beings are now carrying out a large scale geophysical experiment..." 1958 - Using equipment he had developed himself, Charles David (Dave) Keeling begins systematic measurements of atmospheric CO2 at Mauna Loa in Hawaii and in Antarctica. Within four years, the project - which continues today - provides the first unequivocal proof that CO2 concentrations are rising. 1960 - Human population reaches three billion. 1965 - A US President's Advisory Committee panel warns that the greenhouse effect is a matter of "real concern". 1972 - First UN environment conference, in Stockholm. Climate change hardly registers on the agenda, which centres on issues such as chemical pollution, atomic bomb testing and whaling. The United Nations Environment Programme (Unep) is formed as a result. 1975 - Human population reaches four billion. 1975 - US scientist Wallace Broecker puts the term "global warming" into the public domain in the title of a scientific paper. 1987 - Human population reaches five billion 1987 - Montreal Protocol agreed, restricting chemicals that damage the ozone layer. Although not established with climate change in mind, it has had a greater impact on greenhouse gas emissions than the Kyoto Protocol. 1988 - Intergovernmental Panel on Climate Change (IPCC) formed to collate and assess evidence on climate change. 1989 - UK Prime Minister Margaret Thatcher - possessor of a chemistry degree - warns in a speech to the UN that "We are seeing a vast increase in the amount of carbon dioxide reaching the atmosphere... The result is that change in future is likely to be more fundamental and more widespread than anything we have known hitherto." She calls for a global treaty on climate change. 1989 - Carbon emissions from fossil fuel burning and industry reach six billion tonnes per year. 1990 - IPCC produces First Assessment Report. It concludes that temperatures have risen by 0.3-0.6C over the last century, that humanity's emissions are adding to the atmosphere's natural complement of greenhouse gases, and that the addition would be expected to result in warming. 1992 - At the Earth Summit in Rio de Janeiro, governments agree the United Framework Convention on Climate Change. Its key objective is "stabilization of greenhouse gas concentrations in the atmosphere at a level that would prevent dangerous anthropogenic interference with the climate system". Developed countries agree to return their emissions to 1990 levels. 1995 - IPCC Second Assessment Report concludes that the balance of evidence suggests "a discernible human influence" on the Earth's climate. This has been called the first definitive statement that humans are responsible for climate change. 1997 - Kyoto Protocol agreed. Developed nations pledge to reduce emissions by an average of 5% by the period 2008-12, with wide variations on targets for individual countries. US Senate immediately declares it will not ratify the treaty. 1998 - Strong El Nino conditions combine with global warming to produce the warmest year on record. The average global temperature reached 0.52C above the mean for the period 1961-90 (a commonly used baseline). 1998 - Publication of the controversial "hockey stick" graph indicating that modern-day temperature rise in the northern hemisphere is unusual compared with the last 1,000 years. The work would later be the subject of two enquiries instigated by the US Congress. 1999 - Human population reaches six billion. 2001 - President George W Bush removes the US from the Kyoto process. 2001 - IPCC Third Assessment Report finds "new and stronger evidence" that humanity's emissions of greenhouse gases are the main cause of the warming seen in the second half of the 20th Century. 2005 - The Kyoto Protocol becomes international law for those countries still inside it. 2005 - UK Prime Minister Tony Blair selects climate change as a priority for his terms as chair of the G8 and president of the EU. 2006 - The Stern Review concludes that climate change could damage global GDP by up to 20% if left unchecked - but curbing it would cost about 1% of global GDP. 2006 - Carbon emissions from fossil fuel burning and industry reach eight billion tonnes per year. 2007 - The IPCC's Fourth Assessment Report concludes it is more than 90% likely that humanity's emissions of greenhouse gases are responsible for modern-day climate change. 2007 - The IPCC and former US vice-president Al Gore receive the Nobel Peace Prize "for their efforts to build up and disseminate greater knowledge about man-made climate change, and to lay the foundations for the measures that are needed to counteract such change". 2007 - At UN negotiations in Bali, governments agree the two-year "Bali roadmap" aimed at hammering out a new global treaty by the end of 2009. 2008 - Half a century after beginning observations at Mauna Loa, the Keeling project shows that CO2 concentrations have risen from 315 parts per million (ppm) in 1958 to 380ppm in 2008. 2008 - Two months before taking office, incoming US president Barack Obama pledges to "engage vigorously" with the rest of the world on climate change. 2009 - China overtakes the US as the world's biggest greenhouse gas emitter - although the US remains well ahead on a per-capita basis. 2009 - Computer hackers download a huge tranche of emails from a server at the University of East Anglia's Climatic Research Unit and release some on the internet, leading to the "ClimateGate" affair. 2009 - 192 governments convene for the UN climate summit in Copenhagen with expectations of a new global agreement high; but they leave only with a controversial political declaration, the Copenhagen Accord. 2010 - Developed countries begin contributing to a $30bn, three-year deal on "Fast Start Finance" to help them "green" their economies and adapt to climate impacts. 2010 - A series of reviews into "ClimateGate" and the IPCC ask for more openness, but clear scientists of malpractice. 2010 - The UN summit in Mexico does not collapse, as had been feared, but ends with agreements on a number of issues. 2011 - A new analysis of the Earth's temperature record by scientists concerned over the "ClimateGate" allegations proves the planet's land surface really has warmed over the last century. 2011 - Human population reaches seven billion. 2011 - Data shows concentrations of greenhouse gases are rising faster than in previous years. 2012 - Arctic sea ice reaches a minimum extent of 3.41 million sq km (1.32 million sq mi), a record for the lowest summer cover since satellite measurements began in 1979. 2013 - The Mauna Loa Observatory on Hawaii reports that the daily mean concentration of CO2 in the atmosphere has surpassed 400 parts per million (ppm) for the first time since measurements began in 1958. 2013 - The first part of the IPCC's fifth assessment report says scientists are 95% certain that humans are the "dominant cause" of global warming since the 1950s.
The UK says it wants to be China's best friend in the West, and will be laying out the red carpet for the country's new strongman, President Xi Jinping, when he begins a state visit on Monday. But what kind of person is he? I tried to find out by visiting the cave where he lived for seven years in his youth. I was looking forward to seeing the cave where China's president grew up but as our van skimmed along behind the sleek black sedan, I was nervous too. The man from the propaganda department already had an anxious sheen about him. I foresaw trouble. President Xi is building a personality cult. The last thing the strongman with the perfect creation myth needs is the BBC puncturing it. So pity that local propaganda chief in the car ahead. In general the president's spin doctors do a very slick job of presenting him as a man of the people. He tours leaky back alley homes, ducking through washing lines and wearing no face mask - the message that this is a leader prepared to breathe the same polluted air as you. He talks to his public in earthy prose, telling students that life is like a shirt with buttons where you have to get the first few right or the rest will all go wrong. He queues up in an ordinary dumpling shop for lunch and pays for his own meal. Message - he is neither greedy nor showy. It's all clever political signalling of course. Behind the smile, Xi Jinping is a ruthless operator. You don't rise to the top of the Chinese communist party without being a consummate political player and Mr Xi has spent a lifetime playing. But the Sedan in front was now stopping at a police barrier. We'd arrived at the heart of the president's creation myth. Nearly five decades ago, the 15-year-old Xi fled from the chaos of the capital to this bleak and breathtaking landscape of yellow canyons, caves and mountains. The contrast with life in Beijing must have been even more extreme in those days. Listen to From Our Own Correspondent for insight and analysis from BBC journalists, correspondents and writers from around the world Broadcast on Radio 4 on Thursdays at 11:00 and Saturdays at 11:30 and on BBC World Service Listen to the programme Download the programme Especially for Xi himself. He had actually lived two lives by the age of 15. In the first his father was a hero of the communist revolution so Xi spent his early years as a so called red princeling, enjoying a privileged upbringing. But all of that was shattered by the civil war that an increasingly paranoid and vengeful Chairman Mao inflicted on the party elite in the 1960s. Xi's father was jailed, his family humiliated. One of his sisters died. Without parents or friends to protect him from the murderous red guards dispensing summary justice on the streets, the teenage Xi lived his second Beijing life, dodging death threats and detention… until he came to this village. Millions of Chinese city kids were doing the same thing. Chairman Mao had decreed they should spend time in the countryside, learning from the hard life of the peasants, and Xi Jinping says he did learn. The spin doctors have turned his teenage trauma into triumph. This village has become a shrine to its most famous son, a vital part of the president's image. I left my heart in Liangjiahe. Liangjiahe made me, he likes to claim. There aren't many 21st Century leaders of whom you can say that they lived in a cave and made it as a farmer before clawing their way to the political summit. But in control-conscious China, those facts could not possibly be allowed to speak for themselves. So I was marched round a museum extolling the good deeds that Xi did for his fellow villagers, and whenever my attention flagged a gushing guide stepped forward to fill in narrative gaps, and I soon realised that what I'd mistaken for phalanxes of communist party pilgrims were actually propaganda officials. Also keeping an eye on me rather than the museum exhibits, a liberal sprinkling of plainclothes police. Why the paranoia? Why does the history have to be sanitised, all trace of real personality expunged? I wasn't looking for revelations of youthful depravity or character flaws. But everywhere I turned the memories were so carefully crafted it was hard to work out whether any of them were real. And all the while, the propaganda chief's glassy pallor worsened. Eventually he asked me to sign a document promising that every word the BBC said about President Xi would be positive. He blanched when I said I couldn't. It might be his job to burnish the presidential image, but it certainly wasn't mine. The great irony of Xi Jinping's personality cult is that under Chairman Mao he and his family suffered from strongman politics. And after the tragedy of the cultural revolution the communist party resolved it would never make the same mistake again. Grey faceless committees ran China for the next 40 years. But now the strongman is back. And perhaps also the danger that those who forget history are doomed to repeat it. For us it was time to leave the caves. The propaganda chief had started threatening to confiscate our recordings. President Xi may have left his heart in Liangjiahe but I didn't want to leave all the material I'd gathered there. That night we made a sudden bolt, driving 200 miles (320km) to an airport from which we could get our work out of China. Strange exploits when you consider that the cave years are possibly the most positive chapter of Xi Jinping's life even without persuasion and threats from the propaganda department. BBC History How to listen to From Our Own Correspondent: BBC Radio 4: Thursdays at 11:00 and Saturdays at 11:30 Listen online or download the podcast. BBC World Service: At weekends - see World Service programme schedule or listen online. You can watch Carrie Gracie's film for Panorama, The Xi Factor, on BBC1 on Monday at 20.30 Subscribe to the BBC News Magazine's email newsletter to get articles sent to your inbox.
The Kremlin's international media operation appears to be going from strength to strength with two recent high-profile launches and more in the pipeline. But it is also coming under increased scrutiny over its lack of editorial balance and accusations that it is deliberately using disinformation to counter and divide the West. In a spanking new press centre in Moscow on 10 November, controversial TV news anchor Dmitry Kiselev, who is also head of the Rossiya Segodnya (Russia Today) news agency, unveiled Sputnik - the Kremlin's latest foray into the international news arena. With its planned network of media hubs in 30 cities, Sputnik is the new brand for the radio station Voice of Russia and the foreign-language operations of the RIA Novosti news service, which were taken over by Rossiya Segodnya when it was launched last December. Kiselev said the new project was aimed at a global audience "tired of aggressive propaganda promoting a unipolar world and who want a different perspective". But with his own relentless denunciation of the West and demonisation of Ukrainians as fascists on state TV, there can hardly be a more practised purveyor of "aggressive propaganda" than Kiselev himself. The Sputnik launch came less than a fortnight after the Kremlin's international TV channel RT (formerly known as Russia Today) unveiled a dedicated news service for viewers in the UK. Editor-in-Chief Margarita Simonyan (who holds the same position at Rossiya Segodnya) said that RT UK would seek to "promote debate and new ways of thinking about British issues". RT's funding is set to rise in 2015 to over $330m (£210m; €264m). It is said to be planning to add French and German operations to its existing services in English, Spanish and Arabic. But RT UK's debut was greeted with a barrage of criticism in the British press. Writing in the Observer, Nick Cohen accused the channel of spreading conspiracy theories and being a "prostitution of journalism". Meanwhile, in The Times, Oliver Kamm called on broadcast regulator Ofcom to act against this "den of deceivers". Oliver Kamm did not have long to wait. On 10 November, Ofcom found RT guilty of violating the broadcasting code's "due impartiality" rules in its coverage of the Ukraine crisis in early March. It rejected RT's contention that as a station that challenges the "established" view in the UK it was somehow exempt from the normal broadcast requirements. In view of past violations, it put the channel on notice that future breaches may result in a "statutory sanction", which could include fines, or even the suspension or revocation of RT's broadcast licence. For President Putin, RT is spearheading Russia's bid to challenge the "Anglo-Saxon monopoly" on global news. But, according to a recent report by US journalist Michael Weiss and UK-based writer and TV producer Peter Pomerantsev, it is part of a strategy of disinformation aimed at countering and dividing the West. Entitled "The menace of unreality: How the Kremlin weaponises information, culture and money", the report was produced under the aegis of the US-based Institute of Modern Russia (IMR), which is part-funded by members of the family of former oil tycoon and Putin opponent Mikhail Khodorkovsky.. Adapting techniques inherited from the old KGB, say the authors, RT makes extensive use of conspiracy theories that serve to undermine a "reality-based discourse". This, they argue, then creates the conditions in which the Kremlin can advance its own disinformation to "confuse situations at critical junctures". They give as examples a spurious RT report about Jews fleeing Ukraine over anti-Semitism, equally bogus insinuations that a US think tank was advising Ukrainian President Poroshenko to carry out ethnic cleansing, and the spreading of conspiracy theories concerning the downing of Malaysian airliner MH17 over east Ukraine in July. According to Weiss and Pomerantsev, this kind of media manipulation amounts to a "weaponisation of information", a phrase also used in relation to Russia by Mark Galeotti, a professor of global affairs at New York University. But Ms Simonyan insists that RT is not very different from other major news broadcasters. Responding to the Ofcom ruling, she said the BBC was also guilty of "bias" in its reporting of Ukraine, as well as its coverage of other issues. In a statement posted on RT's website, she said other broadcasters would also have to change the way they operate, "if double standards are to be avoided". Weiss and Pomerantsev, meanwhile, came under fire in an anonymous article on the pro-Kremlin English-language website Russia Insider. Part political critique, part personalised attack, the article accuses them of being members of a "Russophobic hack pack" that also includes Edward Lucas of The Economist and US journalist Anne Applebaum. Ordinary Russians appear to hold similar views. A poll published on 12 November by the independent Levada Centre indicated that 88% of the population believe the USA and other Western countries are waging an information war against Russia. Just 4% dissented from this view. BBC Monitoring reports and analyses news from TV, radio, web and print media around the world. You can follow BBC Monitoring on Twitter and Facebook.
Antes de que acabe la semana, te planteamos un nuevo desafío mental. Escapa de este laberinto y de la rutina, y de paso pon a funcionar esas neuronas. Al caminar por este laberinto debes decidir en cada intersección qué dirección tomar, y solo tienes dos alternativas: el camino de la derecha o el de la izquierda. Si sigues la ruta de escape correcta, pasarás por seis intersecciones. ¿Cuál es la probabilidad de que escojas el camino correcto? Baja para descubrir la respuesta La respuesta La probabilidad es 1 de 64. Detalles de una de las posibles soluciones a este problema: 2 x 2 x 2 x 2 x 2 x 2 = 64 Es decir, hay una posibilidad en 64 de que tomes la ruta correcta. Acertijo vía el programa Todayde Radio 4 de la BBC y proporcionado por el Dr. Steve Humble, director de Educación de la Universidad de Newcastle.
A new vaccine that could prevent up to nine-in-10 cases of typhoid fever has been recommended by the World Health Organization. Experts say it could have a "huge impact" on the 22 million cases, and 220,000 deaths, from typhoid each year. Crucially it works in children, who are at high-risk of the infection, unlike other typhoid vaccines. It is hoped the vaccine could eventually help countries eliminate typhoid. Typhoid fever is caused by Salmonella Typhi bacteria and patients have: The bacteria are highly contagious and spread through contaminated food or water. The infection is most common in countries with poor sanitation and a lack of clean water, particularly in south Asia and sub-Saharan Africa. Two typhoid vaccines already approved to help reduce the number of cases, but none are licensed for children under the age of two. The decision to recommend the new conjugate typhoid vaccine was made by the WHO's Strategic Advisory Group of Experts on Immunization (Sage). Prof Alejandro Cravioto, the chairman of Sage, said: "For the first time I think we do have a very effective vaccine." Sage recommended the vaccine should be given to children aged six-months old and said catch-up campaigns focusing on children up to 15 years old should also take place. Prof Cravioto said the vaccine was vital as the world was "reaching the limit" of current treatments due to the "crazy amount" of antibiotic resistance the typhoid bacterium had acquired. Data from a clinical trial of the vaccine, carried out by the University of Oxford, was published just last month in the Lancet medical journal. The "challenge study" gave the vaccine to 112 people and then deliberately infected (challenged) them with typhoid-causing bacteria. Such an approach gives a clear picture of a vaccine's effectiveness without having to immunise thousands of people. It showed the vaccine was up to 87% effective. Prof Andrew Pollard, who ran those trials, told the BBC News website: "It could have a huge impact. "If it can be rolled out in all communities, it must be possible to prevent the majority of cases and if it also interrupts transmission, which hasn't been shown yet, then it could be eliminated from those regions." Gavi, the global body that pays for vaccines in 68 low and middle-income countries, is now considering whether to add the typhoid vaccine. Dr Seth Berkley, the chief executive of Gavi, said: "Not only could this vaccine save lives, it could also prove to be a valuable weapon in the fight against antimicrobial resistance." Before antibiotics, typhoid killed one-in-five people infected. Now there is growing levels of typhoid that is resistant to drugs. Follow James on Twitter.
It must have seemed like a good idea. As a taster for a big announcement about Oculus VR on Wednesday, send Mark Zuckerberg on a little virtual reality trip, including a stop in Puerto Rico. But the reviews are in - and they are not good. The sight of Mr Zuckerberg using VR to survey the devastation of an island still struggling to recover from Hurricane Maria may have been meant to convey Facebook's empathy with the victims. The fact that he was there in the form of a cartoon seemed to many the perfect visual metaphor for the gulf in understanding between Silicon Valley and the real world. Sure, he was talking about all the activities which his company had initiated to help the island, from helping people tell their families they were ok using Safety Check to sending Facebook employees to help restore connectivity. But cartoon Zuck showing us a 360 degree view of a flooded street before zipping back to a virtual California just seemed a little, well, crass. Is Facebook really concerned about the plight of Puerto Rico, or is it merely a handy backdrop to promote Oculus, whose sales have so far proved disappointing? It is not the first time the young tycoon has misread the public mood. Back in November following the US elections, he said it was "crazy" to suggest that fake news on Facebook had played any part in deciding the results. Since then, as ever more detail has emerged about Russian use of his platform to try to influence voters, Zuckerberg has been on a journey towards understanding and acknowledging the power he has. He's also been on a literal journey, with a mission to visit every US state this year. As he's been pictured at the dinner table with farmers in the mid-west or mused about religion, revealing he is no longer an atheist, some have seen another motive behind this odyssey. Could this be preparation for Zuckerberg 2020, a run at the White House? Meanwhile, back at Mountain View headquarters problems are piling up in the CEO's in-tray, with politicians from left and right asking tricky questions. Is he doing enough to stop terrorists using WhatsApp? Did Facebook promote fake news around the Las Vegas shootings? Is billionaire Peter Thiel, with his connections to the alt-right, a fit and proper person to serve on Facebook's board? Like many a tech leader, Mark Zuckerberg has assumed that what is good for his company is good for the world, but now the world is not so sure. As I was writing this, a reminder popped up on Facebook of a day in 2008 when I interviewed its founder during a trip to London. Back then he seemed impossibly young, not very articulate - but very focused on building his business and ignoring the sceptics who kept telling him to sell up before the bubble burst. Since then his vision of a company connecting the world has come true, and his business brain has out-thought all of his rivals and detractors. It's his political brain which still needs a bit of work. Maybe it is time to retire the cartoon Zuckerberg and for the real one to spend a little more time out of the spotlight, reflecting on the impact his immensely powerful empire has on our lives. UPDATE 20:25 Mark Zuckerberg has obviously been taken aback by the reaction to his virtual reality visit to Puerto Rico. He has posted this on Facebook in response to negative comments below his original post and video. "One of the most powerful features of VR is empathy. My goal here was to show how VR can raise awareness and help us see what's happening in different parts of the world. I also wanted to share the news of our partnership with the Red Cross to help with the recovery. Reading some of the comments, I realize this wasn't clear, and I'm sorry to anyone this offended."
An ancient human skull discovered in Papua New Guinea is likely to have belonged to the world's oldest-known tsunami victim, scientists say. The skull was discovered in 1929 near the town of Aitape and incorrectly attributed to the Homo erectus species, an ancestor of modern humans. However, scientists now say the area was once a coastal lagoon that was hit by a tsunami about 6,000 years ago. They believe the skull belonged to a person who died in the tsunami. The discovery came after the international team compared sediments from the area with soil from a nearby region hit by a devastating tsunami in 1998. "While the bones had been well studied, little attention had previously been paid to the sediments where they were unearthed," said first author Prof James Goff, from the University of New South Wales. The "geographical similarities" in the sediments showed that humans had experienced tsunamis in the area for thousands of years, he said. "We conclude that this person who died there so long ago is probably the oldest-known tsunami victim in the world," said Prof Goff. The scientists said it was also possible that the person had died and been buried just before the tsunami happened. The research involved studying the grain size and composition of the sediments. Among them were microscopic organisms from the ocean, similar to ones found after the 1998 tsunami which killed more than 2,000 people. The team also performed radiocarbon dating, a method used to accurately determine the age of artefacts. Researchers said the findings, published in the journal PLOS One, raise questions about whether other archaeological discoveries in coastal areas should be re-evaluated.
پاکستان کی دو بار آسکر انعام یافتہ فلم ساز شرمین عبید چنائے کی حال میں کی گئی پوسٹس کے بعد سوشل میڈیا پر بحث کا پینڈورا باکس کھل گیا ہے کہ آیا فیس بک پر فرینڈ ریکویسٹ بھیجنا ہراساں کرنے کے زمرے میں آتا ہے یا نہیں۔ چند روز قبل شرمین عبید چنائے نے ٹوئٹر اور فیس بک پر پوسٹ شئیر کی تھی جہاں انھوں نے اپنی بہن کے ساتھ کراچی کے معروف آغاخان ہسپتال میں ہونے والے واقعے کا ذکر کیا تھا۔ شرمین عبید چنائے کے لیے ایک اور ایوارڈ 'اس نے کہا میں جنسی طور پر تم پر فدا ہوں' شرمین عبید کے مطابق ان کی بہن ہسپتال میں اپنے طبی معائنے کے لیے گئی تھیں جہاں ان کے ڈاکٹر نے بعد میں انھیں فیس بک دوست بننے کی پیشکش بھیج دی۔ شرمین عبید کی پوسٹ شائع ہونے کے بعد اطلاعات کے مطابق ہسپتال نے اس ڈاکٹر کو نوکری سے برخاست کر دیا۔ There are zero boundaries in #pakistan! Last night my sister went to AKU emergency & the doctor who tended to her tried 2 add her on FB 1/2 @sharmeenochinoy کی ٹوئٹر پر پوسٹ سے آگے جائیں آغا خان ہسپتال کے ترجمان کے مطابق 'ہسپتال رازداری کا بھرپور خیال رکھتا ہے اور وہ ڈاکٹر اور مریض کے بارے میں کسی بھی قسم کی معلومات دینے سےگریزاں ہے' لیکن ترجمان نے مزید کہا کہ انفرادی طور پر ڈاکٹر اور مریض اگر معلومات فراہم کرنا چاہیں تو وہ ایسا کر سکتے ہیں۔ I don't quite understand how doctor tending 2 emergency patients thinks it's ok to take a female patient info & add her on FB! 2/2 unethical @sharmeenochinoy کی ٹوئٹر پر 2 پوسٹ سے آگے جائیں چند دن قبل ہونے والے واقعے کے بعد شرمین عبید نے پوسٹ میں اپنے غصے کا اظہار کرتے ہوئے کہا تھا کہ 'یہ میری سمجھ سے باہر ہے کہ کس طرح ایک ڈاکٹر جو ایمرجنسی میں مریضوں کے علاج کے لیے متعین ہے وہ ان کی تفصیلات لینے کے بعد انھیں فیس بک پر فرینڈز ریکوسٹ بھیج سکتا ہے۔' Unfortunately the doctor messed with the wrong women in the wrong family and I will definitely report him! Harassment has 2 stop! @sharmeenochinoy کی ٹوئٹر پر 3 پوسٹ سے آگے جائیں شرمین عبید نے مزید لکھا: 'ایسا کرنا انتہائی غیر اخلاقی ہے اور اس ڈاکٹر نے غلط خاندان کی عورت کے ساتھ ایسا کیا ہے اور میں اس کی شکایت کروں گی۔ ہراساں کرنے کو روکنا ضروری ہے۔'
Republican presidential hopeful Donald Trump has sparked anger by attacking the military record of Senator John McCain, a former prisoner of war. The billionaire and reality TV star said Mr McCain was only considered a hero because he was a prisoner of war. He then added: "I like people who weren't captured." The comments prompted strong criticism across the party. Rival contender Rick Perry said the remarks were a "new low" in US politics. Mr Trump later sought to clarify his remarks, although he did not apologise. "If a person is captured, they're a hero as far as I'm concerned," he said. "I don't like the job John McCain is doing in the Senate because he is not taking care of our veterans.'' The two have clashed before, with Mr McCain accusing Mr Trump of having "fired up the crazies" with his attacks on Mexican immigrants. Mr McCain was held for five-and-a-half years after his plane was shot down in the Vietnam war. Mr Trump avoided service through student and medical deferments. The 2008 presidential candidate is yet to respond to Mr Trump's remarks, although his daughter Meghan tweeted she was "disgusted". Many of Mr Trump's rivals for the nomination lined up to attack him. There are currently 15 people running to be the Republican presidential candidate. Mr Trump has led in some early polls, although analysts have predicted his appeal is likely to wane as the contest develops.
It was doing a favour for his mother that gave entrepreneur Matt Barrie the idea for setting up a business that is now worth more than A$400m ($300m; £243m). His company and website Freelancer has a simple concept - it connects people who have work they need doing with others who compete to do the task by submitting the fee they would charge. Founded just eight years ago in Sydney, today the website has more than 22.5 million users around the world, both freelance workers and those seeking their services. Jobs advertised on Freelancer include everything from help with building a mobile phone app, to writing a company report, designing a tattoo, and help with gaining publicity for something. US space agency Nasa has even used the website since 2015, allowing people to bid to help design items for the International Space Station, including a new robotic arm. It is a pretty good success story for a 43-year-old who admits that when he came up with the idea for Freelancer he was "a broken man". In 2006 Mr Barrie had walked out of his first start-up - a Sydney-based firm called Sensory Networks that made computer chips for security equipment. He was not feeling good. "People used the product but everything was wrong with how we sold it," he says. Despite a blaze of publicity and the support of venture capitalists (VCs), the marketing proved too tough, and the company was struggling. So Mr Barrie quit. "You feel you have let your VCs down, the board, your friends that you hired, your family," he says. Sensory Networks went on to survive without Mr Barrie, and was eventually bought by chip giant Intel in 2013 for $20m, but he says that back in 2006 he "really felt like a failure". After a few months of "decompressing", Mr Barrie was beginning to think about his next move when the 2007 global financial crisis swept in. "The whole world was collapsing. Businesses weren't getting funded anymore. I thought, 'what am I going to do with myself?'" he recalls. He decided to take advantage of the enforced downtime to build a website for his mother, a wholesale art and craft supplier. He wanted to include a directory of the stores she supplied, thinking it might encourage others to want to be included. The first Excel spreadsheet had 1,000 rows. Faced with that, Mr Barrie decided to outsource the data entry side of things to local kids. But even offering A$2,000 overall, nobody came running. "I looked around, asked a few people, and they'd say, 'oh it's boring.' I'd reply, 'I know it's boring! That's why I want you to do it.'" After four months Mr Barrie started searching online in desperation for cheap data entry, and stumbled upon a site based in Sweden called Getafreelancer. "It was the ugliest site you have ever seen in your life. I eventually figured out how to post a job," he says. "I went to get lunch, and came back to 74 emails from people saying you're offering A$2,000, I'll do it for A$1,000, A$500 and so on… I thought it was a scam." He eventually hired a team in India who did the job in three days for A$100. "I thought was incredible, a whole army of people out there, many from emerging markets. I looked at all the projects on the website. It was like an ebay for jobs. I thought wow. Mr Barrie was so impressed by the concept that he decided to set up his own version. The VCs who had flocked to his first start-up were far more cautious this time round, and banks were unwilling to loan to a web-based business with no physical, recoverable assets in the event of failure. In the end a friend who had sold his own firm stumped up the money, and Mr Barrie first secured workers via Getafreelancer, before then buying that business. Freelancer, whose entire operation is cloud-based using Amazon Web Services, has since gone on to buy up 18 other rival sites. Its directly employed workforce now totals 570 people. Sites like Freelancer have faced criticism for driving down prices for professionals trying to sell their services, but Mr Barrie counters that the company has had a huge, positive impact on millions of people in developing countries. "You can be somewhere where your average wage is A$2 a day," he says. "The average project [on Freelancer] pays A$200. "You can make your month's salary in a few days. It's the ultimate meritocracy. It's up to you to figure out what you want to do." And it is also not necessarily the lowest bidder who wins the job - Freelancer says that 47% of the projects on its site are awarded to "the median bidder or higher". Entrepreneur Emma Sinclair, co-founder of human resources software business Enterprise Jungle, says firms are increasingly looking to hire non-staff to complete projects rather than carry out the work in-house. "Nearly 35% of today's total workforce is comprised of non-employee workers and this is set to continue to grow," she says "Sites like Freelancer are therefore very well-placed to service both the growing on-demand labour force looking for work, as well as the corporates who are hiring them. "It is an invaluable marketplace for talent, with an all-important rating system to weed out the poor or unreliable performers." On a day-to-day basis Mr Barrie is, by his own admission, a workaholic. "I live this, I breathe it. I get up in the morning and start work. I'm often in the office until 10pm. "I've had several offers to sell - one formal. I had a good think, and said I couldn't think of doing anything else."
කලකට පෙර පැපුවා නිව්ගිනියාවෙන් සොයාගත් හිස්කබලක්, මෙතෙක් සුනාමියකින් මියගිය බවට තක්සේරු කළ හැකි පැරණිතම මිනිසාගේ විය හැකි බව විද්‍යාඥයෝ පවසති. මෙම හිස්කබල සොයාගනු ලැබුවේ 1922 වසරේදී ය. එය 'හෝමෝ ඉරෙක්ටස්' ආදී මානවයාට අයත් හිස් කබලක් ලෙස මුලින් හඳුන්වා තිබුණි. කෙසේ නමුත් දැන් විද්‍යාඥයන් පවසන්නේ මෙම හිස්කබල සොයාගත් ප්‍රදේශය මීට වසර 6000කට පෙර සුනාමියකට හසුවී ඇති බව ය. ඒ අනුව මෙම හිස්කබල එම සුනාමියෙන් මිය ගිය පුද්ගලයෙකුට අයිති එකක් විය හැකි බවට ඔවුහු විශ්වාස කරති. මෑතකදී ජාත්‍යන්තර විද්‍යාඥයන්ගෙන් සමන්විත කණ්ඩායමක් විසින් එම ප්‍රදේශය පුරා කරන ලද ගවේෂණයකින් අනතුරුව මෙම නිගමනයට පැමිණ තිබේ. පැපුවා නිව්ගිනියාවේ 'අයිටපේ' නගරයට නුදුරින්, හිස්කබල හමුවූ ප්‍රදේශයේ පවතින අවසාදිත පාෂාණ සහ 1998 දී සුනාමියකට හසුවූ එම කලාපයට අයත් වෙනත් ප්‍රදේශයක පාෂාණ මෙම විද්‍යාඥයෝ සංසන්දනය කළහ. එහිදී තහවුරු කරගනු ලැබූ "භූගෝලීය සමානකම්" මත එම ප්‍රදේශයේ ජීවත් වූ මිනිසා වසර දහස් ගණනක් තිස්සේ සුනාමි උවදුරුවලට මුහුණ දී ඇති බව තීරණය කළ හැකියැයි එම පර්යේෂණ කණ්ඩායමේ මහාචාර්ය ජේම්ස් ගොෆ් පවසයි. "මේ හිස්කබල අයිති, ඉතා ඈත අතීතයේ ජීවත් වූ මිනිසා දැනට අප දන්නා පරිදි සුනාමියකින් මිය ගිය පැරණිතම මිනිසා කියල අපි නිගමනය කළා." ඔහු ප්‍රකාශ කළේය. අවසාදිත පාෂාණ පරීක්ෂා කිරීමේ දී එහි සංයුතිය සහ පාෂාණ වෛරමක ඇති ඝනකම පිළිබඳව අධ්‍යයනය කෙරෙන අතර එම පාෂාණ අතර සොයා ගත හැකි ක්ෂුද්‍ර ජීවී අවශේෂ පිළිබඳවද සොයා බලනු ලැබේ. ඉහත කී හිස් කබල හමුවූ පැපුවා නිව්ගිනියාවේ 'අයිටපේ' ප්‍රදේශයේ පාෂාණ අතර තිබී සොයා ගත් මුහුදු ක්ෂුද්‍ර ජීවී අවශේෂවලට සමාන නියැදි, 1998 දී සුනාමියට හසුවූ එම කලාපයේ වෙනත් ස්ථානයක පාෂාණ අතර ද තිබී ඇත. 1998 සුනාමියට ගොදුරු වී 2000කට අධික පිරිසක් මිය ගියහ. සියලු නියැදි කුමන කාලයකට අයිති දැයි නිශ්චිතව තහවුරු කර ගැනීම සඳහා 'රේඩියෝ කාබන්' පරීක්ෂාව සිදු කර තිබේ.
Сирийское правительство несет ответственность за применение химического оружия в Хан-Шейхуне в сирийской провинции Идлиб 4 апреля 2017 года, говорится в отчете ООН. Авторы отчета уверены, что при нападении было использовано нервно-паралитическое вещество зарин. В результате химической атаки тогда погибло более 80 человек. "Сегодняшний отчет подтверждает то, что мы уже давно считаем правдой", - заявила представитель США в ООН Никки Хейли. Президент Сирии Башар Асад и поддерживающий его Владимир Путин неоднократно заявляли, что ситуация с Хан-Шейхуном сфабрикована. По словам Асада, Сирия уничтожила запасы своего химического оружия в рамках специального соглашения, однако в этом году министр обороны США заявил, что Дамаск уничтожил не все запасы. В сентябре Совет по правам человека ООН возложил ответственность за применение химического оружия в сирийском городе на правительственные силы, придя к выводу, что в нападении участвовал самолет сирийских ВВС. Таким образом, версия России о том, что самолет обычным образом разбомбил химический завод повстанцев, была отвергнута. Совместный механизм ООН и Организации по запрещению химического оружия (ОЗХО) также сообщил, что по результатам расследования был сделан вывод о применении отравляющего вещества иприт 16 сентября 2016 года в сирийском Умм-Хоше. По данным комиссии, за атакой стоит экстремистская группировка "Исламское государство" (запрещена в России и ряде стран). Ранее Россия наложила вето на резолюцию Совета безопасности ООН о продлении мандата миссии по расследованию химических атак в Сирии. Совместный механизм ООН и ОЗХО был утвержден в 2015 году с целью выявления сторон конфликта, применявших химическое оружие. Только у совместной миссии ООН и ОЗХО есть официальные полномочия по расследованию химических атак в Сирии. Предполагалось, что полученные выводы помогут привлечь виновных к ответственности.
The Bloodhound Super Sonic Car has conducted its first public runs. Using just the thrust of its jet engine, the vehicle raced to 210mph (340km/h) down the runway at Newquay Airport in southwest England. Ultimately, Bloodhound will be fitted with a rocket motor as well so that it can go 1,000mph (1,610km/h). That will not happen for two to three years, but the Newquay tests have given the team confidence that the car can achieve its designed performance. Driven by RAF Wing Commander Andy Green, Bloodhound SSC made two trips down Newquay's 1.7-mile (2.7km) runway. Climb inside Andy Green's cockpit More than 3,000 VIPs and supporters club members were in attendance to see the Eurofighter EJ200 jet engine take the vehicle from a standing start to 200mph in about eight seconds. As well as the ear-splitting noise, the crowd was treated to the bright glare of the engine on reheat. "We did two back-to-back 200mph runs in a five-tonne car. It felt like about eight seconds, which was what we were expecting," Wing Commander Green said on stepping out of the cockpit. "It was a real hard work-out for the brakes. Probably up to somewhere close to a thousand degrees, the front brakes were smoking furiously after the second run. They just started to flicker with flame - very sort of Formula One, but in a proper high-speed car. And that was exactly what we were hoping for," he told BBC News. These "slow-speed" trials are really at the limit of what can be done here in the UK. To go faster, Bloodhound will have to head abroad. Next year, it hopes to be on Hakskeen Pan in Northern Cape, South Africa. This dried-out lake bed is super-flat and extends for 12 miles (19km), providing ample space to get up to some very high speeds and then slow and stop safely. Testing in Newquay these past few weeks makes the team believe the car can attain 650mph (1,050km/h) with just the EJ200. That is not enough to break the world land speed record (763mph/1,227km/h), but it would take the vehicle into a performance region where engineers would learn a lot more about its capabilities. At over 400mph, the wheels can no longer turn as fast as the car moves and act more like the rudders on a boat. And at 650mph, some of the airflows over Bloodhound's body would approach the sound barrier. This is all knowledge needed to go 800mph in 2019, and then up to 1,000mph in 2020 - when the rocket technology becomes available. This is currently being developed by the Norwegian aerospace and defence company Nammo. The Scandinavian firm expects to have two versions available for Bloodhound. The first - a so-called monopropellant motor - should provide sufficient additional thrust to set a new land speed record. The second - what is termed a hybrid motor - will be even more powerful and will be incorporated into Bloodhound following some aerodynamic upgrades to its rear end. "The total thrust we think we need is about 20 tonnes. So that's a thrust-to-weight ratio of about two-and-a-half. The car when we're breaking records will weigh about eight tonnes," said Bloodhound technical director, Mark Chapman. One other significant change to the car by then could be the introduction of a major electric component. The rocket will need oxidiser pushed through it and at the moment the motor destined to drive the pump is a V8 from a Jaguar sports car. But such have been the advances in batteries and capacitors in recent years, the team now thinks these technologies could take over the role of the internal combustion engine. The swap might also give more flexibility to engineers as they look to redistribute weight around the car as it targets higher and higher speeds. Two more days of public running lie ahead. One is on Saturday, for which a few tickets remain. The other is on Monday, organised with Cornwall County Council and aimed at local secondary schools. Education is a primary motivation for the Bloodhound project - to inspire children in their study of STEM subjects. Jess Herbert is a product of this initiative. She won an apprenticeship with Rolls-Royce after Bloodhound got her interested in engineering, and even acts now as one of the project's education ambassadors. "The outreach team - they go out to schools and do workshops and presentations," she explained. "Recently at Rolls-Royce, we ran a 'bring your daughter to work day', where we built rocket-powered cars inspired by Bloodhound. And it was incredible; they loved it." Jonathan.Amos-INTERNET@bbc.co.uk and follow me on Twitter: @BBCAmos
Staff at the Northern Ireland Assembly may be forced to seek work elsewhere if the political stalemate continues, a public service union has warned. Some Stormont staff have been working for the Scottish Parliament, Welsh Assembly and the Irish government in Dublin, NIPSA's Tony McMullan revealed. He said staff are worried about their jobs and morale is "not good". About 150 Northern Ireland Assembly workers are being redeployed to other jobs in the public sector. Parliament Buildings has not been operating fully since the Northern Ireland Executive collapsed in January in a row between the Democratic Unionist Party and Sinn Féin. Several rounds of talks between the parties to restore power-sharing at Stormont have failed and an agreement soon appears to be unlikely, according to the UK and Irish governments. Mr McMullan said staff need to have a sense of "stability" about their careers. "Staff are ordinary citizens like everyone else, they have their mortgages to pay, they have their bills coming in every week," said Mr McMullan. "Long term, if the assembly isn't meeting some staff will have to consider their futures and try and seek alternative employment elsewhere." "Nobody knows how long the assembly will limp on for and in that situation staff are very anxious." Some workers have moved to executive departments while others have taken up roles in libraries and at the College of Agriculture, Food and Rural Enterprise at Greenmount in County Antrim. About 150 staff are being retained at Stormont to perform functions including processing MLAs' pay and expenses. The Assembly Commission, which controls the day-to-day running of the assembly, said the redeployment of staff is continually being reviewed. "A number of Assembly Commission staff have assisted and are continuing to assist other publicly funded bodies, including other legislatures across the UK and Ireland," a spokesperson said. The commission said that it "prioritises the welfare and wellbeing of its staff". "For that reason it is doing everything possible to ensure that staff are provided with the appropriate levels of support during this uncertain time," it added.
Moray-based brewer WooHa is set to increase its exports to the USA, after securing £700,000 of funding. The company, which specialises in "100% natural, vegan-friendly beers", plans a five-fold increase in production following the purchase of a new site in Kinloss. It is also hiring another four employees, bringing the staff headcount to 10. The company's growth plans have been supported by HSBC. WooHa, which started exporting to the US in January, is aiming to increase its brewing capacity to 2.5 million litres per year in 2019. Founder and owner Heather McDonald said: "We have seen an increased demand from the American market for our Scottish beer - so much so that we forecast that next year, 80% of our business will be from exports, with the US the main market." Susan Rowand, HSBC head of business banking in Scotland, added: "We're seeing an increase in demand for Scottish food and drink products abroad and the USA, in particular, offers a huge opportunity."
Luo Yanli is worried about the bad smell from the electric car factory over the road and what the fumes might be doing to her baby and toddler. Mr Yu is worried that millions of workers the Chinese government plans to lay off from failing state owned companies will be "abandoned" like he says he was 15 years ago. Mark Weinberger is worried about China's mountain of national debt, the possibility of bankruptcies and - ultimately - what it might mean for the thousands his multinational firm employs in China. All three tell me they support reforms to overhaul China's mammoth economy; but their stories, from three very different parts of China, reveal the consequences and anxieties associated with the changes. The early autumn nights are still warm and humid in Shenzhen where Yanli lives in the south of China. But she doesn't open the windows in her apartment because of the strong smell from the sprawling BYD electric car factory. "Before we bought the apartment the developer told us the plant would move elsewhere" she says. "After we moved here little seems to have changed." The factory was inspected last year after protests. Airtight seals were installed to contain the fumes. When we visited locals told us some production had been moved to another site. With her baby boy on her lap and her daughter playing with a plastic fork beside her, Yanli says: "The smell is very strong and it has severely affected out lives". They don't know if it's dangerous but, like most of their neighbours, they have plants in their apartment in the hope they'll absorb the smell seeping in. The complex is home to the world's biggest manufacturer of electric cars. BYD is a global leader in a technology that China hopes it can dominate; electric vehicles, and specifically the batteries that power them. The big push towards electric isn't just about industrial strategy, it's about trying to tackle China's immense pollution problems - the most obvious of which is dirty air. With incentives for infrastructure and aggressive quota demands for, mostly foreign, manufacturers, this is part and parcel of Beijing's effort to make China's economy less focused on government investment and cheap exports - and instead to one that is technologically advanced, with a sustainable base and driven by consumer spending. So is a bad smell and worries about fumes a price worth paying for this progress, I ask Yanli? Yes it is, she intimates. The windows are firmly shut, though. Almost 3,000km (1,800 miles) away in Shenyang, taxi driver Mr Yu points to where the lead smelting plant used to stand, where he worked. It's long gone, replaced by car dealerships and apartment blocks. You can buy a Cadillac where he used to walk through the now demolished main gate. It's 15 years since he was laid off in the wave of liberalising economic reforms with compensation of just over a year's salary - about $5,000 (£3,700). Despite the years he gets visibly emotional when I ask if there's any part of the city that's still recognisable from his time as a steel worker. He says he was "abandoned" by the government. There was no training for a new job, no support aside from the pay-off. But two children and a taxi licence later he's a believer in reforms that bring competition to the market place. "I think the rule 'survival of the fittest' should apply", he says as we drive around, "baggage should be cast aside" he adds. But there is also this, "isn't it true that the people should be properly settled?" They know a lot about "settling" workers in Shenyang. It's the capital city in China's weakest performing province. Liaoning was once the manufacturing heartland. Now it's trying to rescue the towns and cities around the coal mines and steel plants that help make up this country's "rust belt" and is about to get its first privately owned bank, called the "revitalisation" bank. Away from car dealerships and the mega malls we go to Linsheng on Shenyang's outskirts. Food and rubbish is dumped in piles on its main street. One ground floor apartment in a housing estate has a home-made pigeon coop in a bay window. Parts of the building are decaying. It's home for the workers at the nearby coal mine. As China tries to tackle chronic over-capacity in its traditional industries it's also moving away from dirty coal to heat homes and power its economy. Many mines are being mothballed. A bus driver outside Linsheng's pink-painted community hospital tells me he used to do 17 trips to the mine every day, now it's just seven. "A lot of people have retired but the company is not able to hire new employees - nobody wants to come because the salary is low." As the sun goes down a woman who runs a fruit stall says her business had taken a 30% hit in the last two years, which she puts down to workers' salaries falling. The market boss claims people are buying pork and making it last for two or three days instead of buying daily. A retired miner, who like most of the people we talk to in Linsheng doesn't want to go in front of a microphone, says income for some is down 50%. So what of taxi driver Mr Yu's call for "survival of the fittest"? President Xi Jinping shows little sign of going that far. It looks like his government's early pledge to enhance market forces - giving them a "decisive role" has remained just that, a pledge. Thousands of factories have been closed but that's as much about their polluting effect than their productive inefficiency. There have been consolidations in various sectors of the myriad state-owned enterprises. The (almost all state-owned) banks have come in with debt for equity deals - something close to a bail out - for the most troubled companies. But there hasn't been a wave of bankruptcies. Preserving social stability is likely to be the main reason for this. A wave of concentrated unemployment could see protests that could threaten order. Indeed 2016 actually saw increased cheap credit and a boost in government spending. Rather than an assault on inefficient state-owned entities, many going, only with increased - and cheaper - debt. Still, the world's second largest economy continues to grow, at rates many in the developed world would envy; 6.7% last year, but the rate of growth is slowing, a plateau is approaching. Debt and risk are the two things that some think will combine to produce an economic catastrophe in China - but not Mark Weinberger, the CEO of EY, one of the big four accountancy firms. "I don't see an impending catastrophe," he says, when we met in Shanghai: "The growth is still there to be able to pay off debt". Such optimism is perhaps not surprising from a man who advises the mayor of China's second city. But Mr Weinberger warns nobody should be complacent: "When the debt gets so large it crowds out growth because of the cost of that debt - that becomes a problem". And China's debt is huge; it is currently about 260% of annual economic output and is predicted to rise. What makes it particularly worrisome is that the bulk of this is held by state-owned corporate entities. Risky practice has been growing too, particularly around the so called "shadow banking" sector. So much so that Beijing cracked down on the insurance market in particular, and went after some of China's best known private firms who were deemed too risky in the way they raised money. Firms who owned or had stakes in New York's Waldorf Astoria, Deutsche Bank, Club Med and Wolves FC were all targeted. It's steadied the boat, but that appears all. Other far more significant reforms have not yet happened; financial market reforms, substantial rural land reform, changes to the internal passport-like hukou welfare system. One thing that is happening though is a deepening of the role of "the party" at the top of China's state firms. There were reports this summer that foreign owned firms or joint ventures have been asked to give the Communist Party equal say over their major corporate decisions. Xi Jinping faces a multitude of challenges in his country's economy as he embarks on his second term at the top. Strengthening the party's hold on the means of production is one of Beijing's responses.
Iraq's prime minister has rejected an offer from the Kurdistan Region to "freeze" the result of last month's independence referendum and hold talks. "We won't accept anything but its cancellation and the respect of the constitution," Haider al-Abadi said. The Arab-led central government insists the vote, in which people decisively backed secession, was illegal. The Kurdish offer came after Mr Abadi ordered the Iraqi military to retake disputed territory held by the Kurds. The operation - which also involved police, special forces and the Popular Mobilisation, a paramilitary force dominated by Iranian-backed Shia militias - sparked clashes that left dozens of people dead and many more injured. On Tuesday night, the Kurdistan Regional Government (KRG) called for an immediate ceasefire to prevent further bloodshed. The KRG said it was prepared to "freeze the result of the referendum" and "start an open dialogue" with the government in Baghdad "on the basis of the constitution". The United States, which along with most of the international community criticised the Kurdish authorities for holding the referendum, welcomed the offer. But an MP close to Mr Abadi, Ali al-Alaq, warned that agreeing to "freeze" the referendum result and not annul it would create a "time bomb" that the KRG "could throw at the central government whenever it wishes". The oil-rich areas retaken by pro-government forces since 16 October are claimed by both Baghdad and the Kurds. Kurdish Peshmerga forces moved into the areas in 2014, when Islamic State (IS) militants swept across northern Iraq and the Iraqi army collapsed. On Thursday, Iraqi pro-government forces advanced on Peshmerga positions in the Zummar area, near the Syrian border in northern Nineveh province. An Iraqi security source told the BBC that the forces shelled Peshmerga fighters who attempted to resist the advance, adding that there had been clashes in the villages of Bardiya, Mahmoudiya and Sahila. The Popular Mobilisation said its fighters were trying to take control of Fish Khabur. The town lies just inside the administrative boundary of the Kurdistan Region, but it is close to the strategically important point where the borders with Iraq, Turkey and Syria meet. An oil pipeline linking Kirkuk province to Turkey also passes through it. The Kurdistan Region Security Council condemned the "unprovoked, four-pronged assault" by Iraqi army und Popular Mobilisation units, who it said were using US-made weapons and vehicles intended for the campaign against IS. "The international community must denounce Iraq's reckless behaviour in the last two weeks. It has destabilised some of the country's safest areas, displaced over 150,000 individuals and created dangerous security vacuums," it said. Last week, Mr Abadi rejected a call from US Secretary of State Rex Tillerson to send "home" Popular Mobilisation fighters not battling IS, calling them "patriots".
Iraqi government forces have entered central Kirkuk after taking key installations outside the disputed city from Kurdish fighters. Thousands of people fled the city ahead of the Iraqi advance. The Iraqi military moved into Kirkuk three weeks after the Kurdistan Region held a controversial independence referendum. They are aiming to retake areas under Kurdish control since Islamic State militants swept through the region. Residents of Kurdish-controlled areas, including Kirkuk, overwhelmingly backed secession from Iraq in a 25 September vote. While Kirkuk is outside Iraqi Kurdistan, people in the city were allowed to take part. Iraq's prime minister, Haider al-Abadi, had denounced the vote as unconstitutional. But the Kurdistan Regional Government (KRG) insisted it was legitimate. US officials said they were "engaged with all parties in Iraq to de-escalate tension", while President Donald Trump said they were "not taking sides". "We don't like the fact that they're clashing," he added. #BREAKING: Iraqi forces are inside the office of Najmaldin Karim, governor of #Kirkuk city. #KurdistanBlockade pic.twitter.com/p3YPLFMIML End of Twitter post by @RudawEnglish Mr Abadi said in a statement on Monday that the operation in Kirkuk was necessary to "protect the unity of the country, which was in danger of partition" because of the referendum. "We call upon all citizens to co-operate with our heroic armed forces, which are committed to our strict directives to protect civilians in the first place, and to impose security and order, and to protect state installations and institutions," he added. On Monday, the Iraqi military said its units had taken control of the K1 military base, the Baba Gurgur oil and gas field, and a state-owned oil company's offices. The government in Baghdad said the Peshmerga had withdrawn "without fighting". However, clashes were reported to the south, and the sound of gunfire was caught by a BBC cameraman as a team filmed near a checkpoint. By the afternoon, as thousands of people fled the city fearing impending clashes between the two sides, Iraqi military vehicles were rolling into the heart of Kirkuk. A picture shared on social media appeared to show Iraqi forces sitting in the governor's office. Forces pulled down the Kurdish flag which had been flying alongside the national flag, according to Reuters. Mr Abadi had ordered the flag to fly over all disputed territories. The speed with which Iraqi forces reached the centre of the city has led the two main armed Kurdish parties to accuse each other of "betrayal". The Peshmerga General Command, which is led by President Massoud Barzani of the ruling Kurdistan Democratic Party (KDP), accused officials from the Patriotic Union of Kurdistan (PUK) of aiding "the plot against the people of Kurdistan". The PUK denied being part of ordering any withdrawal, saying dozens of their fighters had been killed and hurt, but noted "not even one KDP Peshmerga has been martyred as of yet in the fighting in Kirkuk". Meanwhile Turkey, which fears Kurdish independence in Iraq could lead to similar calls from its own Kurdish minority, praised Baghdad, saying it was "ready for any form of co-operation with the Iraqi government in order to end the PKK presence in Iraqi territory". The PKK - or Kurdistan Workers' Party - is a Turkish-Kurdish rebel group which has been fighting for autonomy since the 1980s. It is considered a terrorist group by Turkey as well as by the EU and US. Kirkuk is an oil-rich province claimed by both the Kurds and the central government. It is thought to have a Kurdish majority, but its provincial capital has large Arab and Turkmen populations. Kurdish Peshmerga forces took control of much of the province in 2014, when Islamic State (IS) militants swept across northern Iraq and the Iraq army collapsed. The Iraqi parliament asked Mr Abadi to deploy troops to Kirkuk and other disputed areas after the referendum result was announced, but he said last week that he would accept them being governed by a "joint administration" and that he did not want an armed confrontation. On Sunday, his cabinet accused the KRG of deploying non-Peshmerga fighters in Kirkuk, including members of the PKK, which it said was tantamount to a "declaration of war". But KRG officials denied this.
Fueron dos de las sentencias de compensación más abultadas de la historia, cuando en casos separados se ordenó a la gigante farmacéutica Johnson & Johnson pagar sumas millonarias a mujeres que denunciaron haber desarrollado cáncer ovárico por usar el talco de la empresa de forma regular. Ahora ambos veredictos fueron revocados después de que jueces de una instancia superior decidieron que no había suficiente evidencia de que el talco de Johnson & Johnson fuera responsable de la enfermedad. En agosto pasado un tribunal de Los Ángeles condenó a la empresa a pagar US$417 millones a Eva Echeverría, entonces de 63 años, a la que se le diagnosticó cáncer de ovario en 2007. La mujer denunció a la empresa porque, dijo, no advirtió adecuadamente del riesgo de cáncer asociado al uso de productos con talco, que ella había utilizado durante décadas. En su denuncia la mujer indicó que había desarrollado cáncer ovárico "como causa próxima de la naturaleza inaceptablemente peligrosa y defectuosa del talco". El viernes, la jueza de la Corte Superior de Los Ángeles, Maren E. Nelson, revocó la sentencia. En su dictamen la jueza citó "insuficiencia de evidencia", dijo que la compensación otorgada era "excesiva", y aceptó la moción de Johnson & Johnson para un nuevo juicio. La señora Echeverría ya murió pero su abogado, Mark P. Robinson Jr. indicó en una declaración que planeaba presentar una apelación "de inmediato". "Seguiremos luchando en nombre de todas las mujeres que se han visto impactadas por este peligroso producto", declaró Robinson. No es la única victoria de la gigante farmacéutica. El martes, una corte de apelaciones en Missouri, anuló el fallo del jurado de recompensar con US$72 millones a la familia de una mujer de Alabama, Jacqueline Fox, de 62 años, que murió por cáncer ovárico en 2015. Fox había demandado a Johnson & Johnson por haber contraído la enfermedad después de usar durante más de 20 años el talco de la compañía. La corte de Missouri dictaminó que el estado no era la jurisdicción adecuada para llevar a cabo el juicio. No son las únicas demandas que ha enfrentado Johnson & Johnson por este producto. Según la agencia Reuters, Johnson & Johnson enfrenta 4.800 litigios en el país por alegatos vinculados al talco. Sobre el veredicto de Los Ángeles, Johnson & Johnson dijo el viernes que estaba "complacida". La portavoz de la compañía, Carol Goodrich, declaró: "El cáncer ovárico es una enfermedad devastadora, pero no es causada por el talco de grado cosmético que hemos usado en el Polvo para Bebé de Johnson durante décadas". "La ciencia es clara y continuaremos defendiendo la seguridad del Polvo para Bebé de Johnson a medida que nos preparamos para nuevos juicios en Estados Unidos", agregó. Los riesgos potenciales del talco han sido tema de amplio debate dentro de la comunidad médica debido, en parte, a que la evidencia varía. La Agencia Internacional de Investigación sobre Cáncer clasifica el talco cosmético utilizado en la zona genital como "posible carcinógeno" debido a la evidencia mixta. Los estudios arrojan resultados contradictorios y varias organizaciones especializadas mantienen que el vínculo entre el talco y el cáncer de ovarios no ha sido probado científicamente. La organización de apoyo a la investigación contra el cáncer de Reino Unido, Cancer Research, cree que la evidencia de un vínculo entre el uso del talco y el cáncer de ovarios es "todavía incierta". "Incluso si hay un riesgo, es probable que sea bastante pequeño", mantiene la organización. Otra organización británica centrada en cáncer ovárico, Ovacome, explica que las causas de esta enfermedad todavía se desconocen, pero son probablemente una "combinación de muchos factores genéticos y ambientales, no de uno solo como el talco". Ovacome dice que en 2003, los resultados de 16 estudios con 12.000 mujeres mostraron que usar talco aumenta el riesgo de sufrir cáncer de ovario alrededor de un tercio, y que una revisión de estudios hechos en Estados Unidos con 18.000 mujeres obtuvo resultados similares para el uso genital, no general, de polvos de talco. Sin embargo, explica que este tipos de estudios pueden "tener sesgos" y que persisten dudas sobre los resultados.
On Tech Tent this week, we reflect on what Google's new products say about its desire to be a hardware giant. We learn about the browser software that could mean your computer is secretly making money for someone else. And we meet the man who's turned the tables on the online scammers. Google has become one of the most powerful companies in the world on the back of software - from search to Gmail, from the Chrome browser and Android operating system to YouTube. Its attempts to become a big name in hardware have been somewhat less successful - but it keeps on trying. This week saw the company unveil a range of new devices, including new Pixel smartphones and Google Home smart speakers. The message at the launch was that by combining its skills in artificial intelligence, software and hardware it could build compelling products. Rick Osterloh, who heads up Google's devices division, was surely right when he says that innovation in smartphone hardware had just about reached its limits. "It's going to be tougher and tougher for people to develop exciting new products each year," he told the audience in California, insisting that software and AI were now the key differentiators. Crispin Lowery, head of hardware for Google Europe, tells Tech Tent more about the hardware strategy: "We're building devices that lead the way in customer experience," he says, explaining that the seamless integration of Google software on its own brand products should give it an edge. But the jury is out on whether customers are going to be so impressed by the AI services provided by the Google Assistant or its Photos app that they rush out to buy new Pixel phones or Google Home speakers. My hunch is that right now it is a brand with a track record that really matters - and most people will think of Samsung for smartphones or Amazon for smart speakers ahead of Google. The boom in the value of Bitcoin and other cryptocurrencies is having all sorts of interesting knock-on effects. We report this week on the hidden software that may mean your computer or smartphone is earning money for someone else without your knowledge. What happens is that a website wanting to earn extra cash, perhaps to find an alternative to advertising, installs a script that means visitors' computers are employed to mine cryptocurrencies - in other words, solve increasingly complex maths problems that generate new coins. In many cases the sites are open about this, but sometimes users are left in the dark. There is also growing evidence that criminals are infecting sites with this software and thereby capturing thousands of computers or smartphones to act as unconscious mineworkers. "The more computing power that's out there, the better for you as a criminal," explains Rik Ferguson of the security firm Trend Micro. It's quite hard to know if your computer has been hijacked in this way, although if the fan comes on and everything slows down that is a clue. Look out for more on this story here on the BBC News website from Mark Ward - his investigation will be published next week. I don't know about you but I get a lot of scam calls - people pretending my computer has a problem, or wanting to advise me on how to claim money for an accident I've apparently suffered. And quite often I take pleasure in keeping them on the phone, stringing them along as they try to defraud me. One caller from the "Windows Computer Service Centre" was so incensed when I finally revealed that I did not have a Windows computer that he shouted: "You've been wasting my time!" It seems I am not alone in this pursuit. There is a rebellion against these fraudsters and it is called scam-baiting, providing a valuable service by wasting their time. Wayne - not his real name - from the website Scam Survivors tells us that he started by responding to scam emails telling him that he had won some money. Then he graduated to romance scams, where people are fooled into handing over money in the belief that they have found their true love. Now he helps out people who come to the site to report that they or their relatives have been blackmailed, scamming the criminals into revealing more about their identity. Wayne says thousands of people are visiting his website every day looking for help. The internet has enabled all sorts of new forms of fraud but it is also helping people to fight back against the criminals.
A man accused of sexual assault charges sent threatening texts to his alleged victim in which he urged the woman to drop the charges, a court has heard. Alan Ness, 39, of Inverness, also made threatening phone calls. Ness was cleared of sexual assault and rape charges following proceedings at the High Court in Edinburgh last month. However, was convicted of sending offensive and threatening texts and has been sentenced to carry out 300 hours community service. Ness will also be supervised by the authorities for a period of two years. He was convicted of breaching the 2003 Communications Act by sending the woman a text message on 17 February 2015 which contained private images. Ness was also convicted of breaching the act on a second occasion by sending text messages on 8 March 2015 which were grossly offensive. Jurors also convicted Ness of attempting to pervert the course of justice by sending threatening texts and making phone calls on 19 and 20 August 2015 to the woman. In the messages he threatened to shoot the woman. He sent picture messages of a firearm to her in a bid to get her to drop the charges. On Thursday, at the High Court in Edinburgh, judge Lady Carmichael ordered Ness to carry out community service for his actions. Defence counsel Shelagh McCall QC said her client was addressing a drink problem.
Quê Sơn Đông và từng dạy học tại Thượng Hải, nhà lý luận của Đảng Cộng sản Trung Quốc, ông Vương Hộ Ninh, vừa vào Ban Thường vụ Bộ Chính trị. Biết tiếng Pháp, Anh và từng dự học ở các Đại học Iowa, Michigan và UC Berkeley, Hoa Kỳ nhưng ông Vương, 62 tuổi, hoàn toàn không mến mộ mô hình chính trị Âu Mỹ. Một tác phẩm của ông được báo chí quốc tế nói đến nhiều là cuốn "Nước Mỹ chống lại nước Mỹ" (Meiguo fandui Meiguo - America Against Amercia), phê phán hệ thống chính trị xã hội Hoa Kỳ. Bàn tròn Thứ Năm: Tập tái cử, Trump sắp thăm VN Tập Cận Bình 'dẫn đầu và ở lại còn lâu' Tập Cận Bình thành 'hạt nhân của Đảng' Tập Cận Bình: 'TQ đã bước vào thời đại mới' Nhưng một số bạn cũ tại Đại học Phục Đán, Thượng Hải cũng nhận xét ông Vương, người từng ký thư phản đối phong trào sinh viên 1989, không bao giờ bày tỏ quan điểm riêng, và ứng xử "như kỳ nhông", đổi màu khi cần. Đây cũng là lý do ông lên cao trong bộ máy Đảng và được lòng cả ba đời lãnh đạo Đảng từ đầu thập niên 2000 đến nay. Học Đại học Sư phạm Thượng Hải, ông Vương Hộ Ninh (sinh năm 1955), đã vào Đảng Cộng sản và làm việc tại các cơ quan ở thành phố duyên hải có tiếp xúc nhiều nhất với Phương Tây, từ thời Dân quốc cho đến thời Khai phóng. Học ngành Pháp văn, có ngoại ngữ nên ông làm cán bộ Sở Ngoại vụ của thành phố, và tiếp tục làm bằng cấp lên cao. Năm 1981, ông làm phó Giáo sư, rồi sau lên Giáo sư Đại học Phục Đán và hoạt động mạnh trong khối lý luận, ủng hộ cách cầm quyền tập trung nhưng đồng ý để cấp dưới mở rộng dần dân chủ có kiểm soát. Các bài lý luận Marxist và chuyên đề về lãnh đạo Đảng thời Khai phóng của ông đã đến được tai Giang Trạch Dân, Tăng Khánh Hồng, Ngô Bang Quốc ở Thượng Hải. Không chỉ tập trung vào các vấn đề của Đảng, ông còn viết về chính sách đối ngoại. Năm 1993, ông xuất bản trên báo trường Phục Đán bài viết về quyền lực mềm (ruan quanli) cho rằng nó phải trở thành một phần văn hóa củng cố "sức mạnh quốc gia" của Trung Quốc đối với bên ngoài. TQ: 'Đảng đã phá tan âm mưu soán đoạt' Lãnh đạo TQ đi lên từ Quý Châu nghèo khó? 5 điều cần biết về hội nghị G20 ở Hamburg Sang năm 1995, ông được Giang Trạch Dân chọn làm phụ tá và cũng chính ông Giang cử ông vào làm việc ở Văn phòng Nghiên cứu Chính sách thuộc Trung ương Đảng. Dù biết ngoại ngữ và từng du học ở Phương Tây, ông không phải là nhân vật ủng hộ tự do chính trị. Điều này khiến ông bị một số bạn học cũ, nay định cư tại Hoa Kỳ, cho là người "sẵn sàng uốn nắn lập trường để phục vụ cho ai đang nắm quyền". Năm 2002, ông Vương vào Ban Chấp hành Trung ương Đảng, đánh dấu thời kỳ Ban lãnh đạo Trung Quốc cần hệ thống lý luận cải thiện nhanh để quản lý trên 80 triệu đảng viên và đặt ra đường hướng cho quốc gia. Quả vậy, ông Vương Hộ Ninh là người soạn ra thuyết Ba Đại diện cho TBT Giang Trạch Dân, chủ yếu nhằm mở đường về lý luận để Đảng CSTQ sử dụng tốt hơn giới doanh nghiệp trong sự nghiệp Mở cửa và Hiện đại hóa. Sau đó, ông cũng là người chấp bút để TBT Hồ Cẩm Đào nêu ra lý luận Phát triển Khoa học, Hài hòa. Về cơ bản, dù vẫn dùng ngôn từ Marxist truyền thống, ông Vương đặt các vấn đề của Trung Quốc vào bối cảnh "đặc thù Trung Hoa" và vì thế, cần các giải pháp cũng đặc thù như "chính trị tập trung" trong hoàn cảnh "kinh tế tăng trưởng nhanh chóng". Ông cũng phân tích mô hình Anh Quốc thời David Cameron, Singapore thời Lý Quang Diệu và các ví dụ Đông Á để đi đến kết luận rằng "tập trung quyền lực" sẽ tốt hơn cho việc tái phân bổ lợi tức xã hội. Tuy thế, sang thời Tập Cận Bình, khi nhu cầu chính trị về việc nhất thể hóa càng lên cao, ông Vương không gọi đó là mô hình "tập trung quyền lực" (centralised power), mà đổi thấy "thống nhất quyền lực' (unified power), đưa mọi nhánh về một mối. Nhưng không chỉ lo về lý luận, ông Vương còn đóng vai trò ngày càng quan trọng trong đối ngoại của Đảng Cộng sản Trung Quốc. Báo chí nước ngoài gọi ông là "cố vấn chính về đối ngoại" (chief foreign policy adviser) cho Tập Cận Bình và xuất hiện trong các chuyến đi nước ngoài cùng ông Tập mà lần gần nhất đây là Hội nghị G20 ở Hamburg, Đức. Báo Mỹ còn gọi ông Vương là "Kissinger của Trung Quốc", hàm ý không chỉ giúp ông Tập về lý luận, ông còn lập ra chiến lược đối ngoại cho Trung Quốc. Nhưng khác với Henry Kissinger là người ham vui, ông Vương bị chê là "lạnh lùng", kín tiếng và không bày tỏ thái độ thân thiện với báo chí khi công du nước ngoài. Trên thực tế, từ năm năm qua, ông Vương đã điều hành các công việc của Bộ Chính trị trong vai trò ở Ban Bí thư và giúp ông Tập lập ra các nét chính của công cuộc cải cách. Báo Hàn Quốc viết rằng ông Vương là người đề xuất việc lập ra "vùng lợi ích cốt lõi" của Trung Quốc ở Đông Á, nhằm dùng ảnh hưởng của Trung Quốc để chống lại Hoa Kỳ. Bên cạnh hai nhân vật khác là Vương Nghị và Dương Khiết Trì, ông Vương Hộ Ninh là nhà chiến lược trong đối phó với Bắc Hàn, theo báo Hàn Quốc. Nay, cùng sự rời ghế Ban Thường vụ Bộ Chính trị của Lưu Vân Sơn, người từng phụ trách mảng Đông Bắc Á và là lãnh đạo cao nhất cuối cùng của Trung Quốc gặp Kim Jong-un năm 2015, ông Vương Hộ Ninh có thể sẽ điều phối cả đối ngoại trong những hồ sơ chiến lược như vấn đề nguyên tử của Bình Nhưỡng.
Porto Alegre e Florianópolis registraram casos de leishmaniose visceral humana pela primeira vez na história. Por trás do avanço da doença, cuja prevenção pode envolver a eutanásia de cães, estão questões de vulnerabilidade social, migração, mudanças climáticas e até de ocupação irregular de áreas de mata. Caracterizada por sintomas pouco específicos, como febre de longa duração e perda de peso, a leishmaniose visceral nem era considerada nos protocolos de saúde do sul do Brasil, tanto que os primeiros casos em Porto Alegre começaram a ser tratados como suspeitos de leucemia. A doença é causada por protozoários do gênero Leishmania, transmitidos por mosquitos. Em estágio mais avançado, a doença causa inchaço do fígado e do baço, comprometendo o correto funcionamento do sistema hematológico, e pode atingir também a medula óssea. Se não tratada, a leishmaniose pode levar à morte em 90% dos casos, segundo o Ministério da Saúde. A primeira morte na capital gaúcha foi registrada em setembro de 2016. Nos meses seguintes, foram detectados quatro novos casos em Porto Alegre. Três pessoas morreram. Em agosto passado, Florianópolis registrou a primeira contaminação humana. Atualmente, dois pacientes são monitorados na capital catarinense. O que chama atenção é que não foi identificado na região o vetor tradicional de transmissão presente nas demais áreas urbanas do país, o mosquito-palha (Lutzomyia longipalpis). Por isso, os cientistas acreditam que o inseto responsável pela transmissão da doença no sul é de hábitos silvestres, presente em regiões de mata. Uma pesquisa do Ministério da Saúde em parceria com a Universidade Federal de Santa Catarina (UFSC) tenta identificar exatamente quais espécies de mosquitos estão envolvidas na transmissão da doença em Florianópolis. "A espécie que atua como vetor na região sul é de baixa resistência em áreas urbanas, por isso acreditamos que há um potencial menor de transmissão", diz o coordenador substituto de Doenças Transmissíveis do Ministério da Saúde, Francisco de Lima Júnior. Segundo Mariana Teixeira, doutora em Ciências Veterinárias com ênfase em Parasitologia na Universidade Federal do Rio Grande do Sul (UFRGS), a expansão desordenada das cidades, assim como mudanças climáticas também podem estar relacionadas ao aparecimento da doença nas regiões metropolitanas gaúcha e catarinense. "O vetor silvestre da leishmaniose se adapta à zona urbana à medida que as cidades avançam para a mata. Além disso, uma das proteções que a região sul tinha contra a expansão do mosquito era o inverno, e ultimamente as estações do ano já não são mais tão bem definidas", explica. Para os pesquisadores, a transmissão do protozoário pelo mosquito silvestre, ainda menos adaptado às áreas urbanas, explicaria a expansão lenta da leishmaniose para humanos na região. Mas casos em animais domésticos já ocorrem desde 2008 - os primeiros foram registrados em São Borja, na fronteira do Rio Grande do Sul com a Argentina. Por isso, quem tem cães em casa está sendo orientado a examiná-los para detectar protozoário leishmania infantum e, em caso positivo após dois testes, a eutanásia é recomendada. A orientação segue protocolos do Ministério da Saúde e da Organização Pan-americana de Saúde (Opas), mas levanta polêmica. Em Porto Alegre, uma decisão judicial obrigou a prefeitura a suspender a eutanásia de 12 cães, após protestos de ativistas. Pela convivência no ambiente doméstico, os cães são vistos como intermediários importantes da transmissão da leishmaniose visceral para humanos: o mosquito pica um animal contaminado e passa adiante o protozoário causador da doença ao picar outro animal ou uma pessoa. "O fluxo migratório urbano favorece a dispersão geográfica da doença, pois as pessoas transportam seus cães de áreas endêmicas para outras áreas, muitas vezes sem saber que o animal está contaminado", aponta Lima Júnior. Perda de peso, aparecimento de feridas ou descamações de pele, queda anormal de pelos, inchaço das pernas e sangramento do nariz são efeitos da leishmaniose visceral em cachorros. No entanto, a doença pode ser assintomática em muitos casos. Mesmo que o cão não apresente os sintomas típicos da leishmaniose, ele pode ser um intermediário da transmissão apenas pela presença do protozoário no organismo. Segundo Cíntia Petroscky, bióloga do Centro de Controle de Zoonoses de Florianópolis, já havia registros de leishmaniose visceral canina na cidade desde 2010. De lá para cá, mais de 11 mil cães foram testados, sendo quase 400 positivos. Os primeiros casos de contaminação em cães foram identificados no entorno da Lagoa da Conceição, área de grande circulação turística, que mescla residências de alto padrão com moradias simples, onde a população mais pobre vive em condições precárias de saneamento e higiene. Diferentemente do mosquito Aedes egypti, vetor da dengue, que se reproduz em água limpa, o mosquito que transmite a leishmaniose prefere ambientes úmidos com farto material orgânico. No caso de Porto Alegre, todas as vítimas da leishmaniose visceral humana residiam no Morro Santana, área de mata que vem sendo ocupada de maneira irregular nos últimos anos. São da mesma área os 12 cães contaminados, que foram recolhidos pela prefeitura e passariam por eutanásia. Os animais seguem isolados em um canil municipal. Em Florianópolis, os responsáveis por cães doentes que não queiram seguir a recomendação da eutanásia devem assinar um termo de responsabilidade. De acordo com Fábio Indá, membro da Comissão de Saúde Pública do Conselho Regional de Medicina Veterinária de Santa Catarina, o termo foi criado como instrumento de segurança, pois o proprietário do animal deve assumir os riscos de manter um cão contaminado em casa. "É uma questão cultural que envolve uma relação afetiva delicada, porque hoje o cachorro é um membro da família, mas no caso da leishmaniose há um risco coletivo que não pode ser ignorado", assinala o veterinário, mestre em Biotecnologia pela UFSC. Há apenas um medicamento liberado pelo Ministério da Agricultura para o tratamento da leishmaniose visceral canina, porém ele não é considerado 100% eficaz. Embora reduza os sintomas no cão, o medicamento não elimina totalmente o protozoário, de forma que o animal continua sendo um repositório da doença. "Para cães particulares, o uso do medicamento é uma opção, desde que associado a outras medidas, como usar coleiras repelentes e manter o cachorro segregado de áreas de mata", destaca Anderson de Lima, diretor da Coordenadoria-geral de Vigilância em Saúde de Porto Alegre. Como medida de saúde pública, no entanto, Lima considera o medicamento inviável devido ao alto custo, que pode passar de R$ 2 mil por ciclo de aplicação - o medicamento exige reforço a cada quatro meses - e ainda seria necessário acompanhamento periódico de um médico veterinário para monitorar os níveis de carga parasitária no organismo. O Ministério da Saúde está conduzindo pesquisas para avaliar a relação custo-efetividade do uso de coleiras repelentes como medida de controle. A vacina preventiva, que pode ser aplicada somente em cães saudáveis, não entrou nas políticas do governo porque os estudos de eficácia foram considerados insuficientes. A primeira vacina é aplicada em três doses, depois são necessários reforços anuais de aplicação única. Apesar de ser grave, a leishmaniose visceral em humanos tem tratamento com medicação, mas não vacina. O combate à doença passa pelo controle da proliferação do mosquito. A limpeza de material orgânico de jardins e a destinação correta do lixo são fundamentais. O uso de inseticidas e repelentes, bem como de telas milimetradas em portas e janelas também são recomendados. Para a bióloga Cíntia Petroscky, o caso da leishmaniose é similar ao da dengue, da zika e da chikungunya, que teriam seu risco significativamente reduzido com medidas básicas de higiene e melhores condições de saneamento. "Essas são chamadas doenças negligenciadas pela Organização Mundial da Saúde. A leishmaniose é negligenciada mesmo, porque quase nem se fala sobre ela", conclui.
What kind of reality do we want to live in - a virtual or augmented world? Two of the most powerful men in the technology world disagreed this week on whether VR or AR was the answer. On Tech Tent we discuss which technology is winning. We also hear from teenage tech award winners with an optimistic view of women's place in the technology industry, and we meet the founder of Evernote who tells us why the world has fallen out of love with Silicon Valley. Over the past couple of years, huge sums have been invested in virtual reality, with the promise that this time the technology is ready to enter the mainstream. But while the likes of Oculus, Samsung, Sony and HTC have all launched headsets, sales have so far failed to match the hype. This week Mark Zuckerberg unveiled plans for a new, cheaper Oculus headset - Facebook bought the business back in 2014 - and insisted that virtual reality was going to be huge: "The future is built by the people who believe it can be better," he declared. At almost exactly the same moment Apple's Tim Cook was being interviewed at Oxford University and told a student that AR - augmented reality where virtual objects are imposed on the real world - was the future because it allowed a more human connection. "I've never been a fan of VR because it does the opposite," he said. "There are clearly some cool, nichey things for VR but it's not profound - AR is profound." One of those cool "nichey" VR things could be its use by businesses to help train people. We visited London firm Immerse which is developing products for the new Oculus Business division and is already working with companies like DHL and Inmarsat. I strapped on a headset, picked up two handheld controllers and found myself in the middle of a desert being taught to assemble a satellite dish by a trainer who was in the next room but could have been thousands of miles away. Justin Parry of Immerse says there is growing enthusiasm among businesses for the way virtual reality can cut the costs of training a global workforce, among other applications. And surprise, surprise, he rejects Tim Cook's view that augmented reality is superior: "AR can't take you to other places in the way VR can, it can't create the same degree of impossible that VR can." "The truth is it's not that big and important a place in the scheme of things." That is what Phil Libin tells us about Silicon Valley. The founder of Evernote, who is now running an incubator focused on artificial intelligence, is one of the more thoughtful tech entrepreneurs. When I talked to him about the change of mood towards Silicon Valley, with mounting criticism of its culture, he felt that it had always had an exaggerated sense of its own importance. But Mr Libin says that lots of places have many of the things you need to build great technology - he gives Mexico City as one example - but haven't created a Facebook or a Google. What they lack, he explains, is the venture capitalists, the lawyers, the regulations that nurture small business: "We have this talent in Silicon Valley for making small companies. We've exported that idea and somehow we got the whole world to believe that the real thing you have to do is make small companies" Until very recently, it seemed that politicians in particular were in awe of the global tech capital, convinced that it had constructed some kind of innovation utopia, that its entrepreneurs were uniquely gifted and wise. Now they are often seen as elitist and out of touch. Mark Zuckerberg's ill-fated virtual reality trip to Puerto Rico this week was just one example of that. Mr Libin thinks other places could now learn how to find better ways of creating exciting new products. But don't bet against Silicon Valley - for 60 years it has shown it can adapt to changing economic and cultural trends. Last Tuesday was Ada Lovelace day - named after the woman now recognised as the first software programmer. It's an annual celebration of women who've achieved great things in technology. But around the world there's concern that too few girls are seeing a career in science or technology as an attractive option. This week in London I found some cause for optimism - at Buckingham Palace of all places. The Teentech Awards encourage schools from across the UK and now several other European countries to build projects showing off their tech expertise, The winners went to the Palace to collect their awards - and more than half of those getting their certificates from the Duke of York were girls. But speaking to some of them about their view of technology, we found some stereotypes hard to shift: "Maybe because they are more into make-up, drama, all that kind of stuff," said Molly from Glan-y-Mor school when I asked her why there were fewer women going into tech jobs. Mind you, she and her fellow winners told me they did not believe science subjects were just for "nerdy" boys, and many of them were hopeful that they could have a future in the technology industry. What they seemed to be missing was a role model. None of them could name a famous woman in science or technology. Ada Lovelace day gets bigger each year and its organisers do an excellent job - but there's plenty more to be done.
මියන්මාර් යුද හමුදා භටයන් එරට 'රෝහින්ග්‍යා' මුස්ලිම් ප්‍රජාවට එරෙහිව අපචාර සිදු කරන බවට එල්ලවෙමින් ඇති චෝදනා සම්බන්ධයෙන් විභාග කිරීම සඳහා කරුණු විපරම් කිරීමේ දූත මණ්ඩලයක් එහි යැවීමට මානව හිමිකම් භාර එක්සත් ජාතීන්ගේ ආයතනය තීන්දු කර ඇත. මියන්මාර් ආරක්ෂක හමුදා භටයන් විසින් සිදු කරනු ලබන සමූහ දූෂණ සහ සමූහ ඝාතන නිසා දස දහස් ගණනක් රෝහින්ග්‍යා මුස්ලිම් වැසියන්ට අසල්වැසි බංග්ලාදේශයට පළා යාමට සිදු වූ බව පසුගිය මාසයේ නිකුත් කරන ලද එක්සත් ජාතීන්ගේ වාර්තාවක් මගින් චෝදනා කර තිබුණි. එම අපචාර සිදුකරනු ලබන අපරාධකරුවන් අත්අඩංගුවට ගන්නා ලෙසත් එක්සත් ජාතීන්ගේ නව යෝජනාව මගින් ඉල්ලීමක් කරනු ලැබ ඇත. එහෙත් එම නිර්දේශයන් භාර ගැනීමට නොහැකි බව මියන්මාරය පවසයි. මියන්මාරයේ ජීවත්වෙන රෝහින්ග්‍යා මුස්ලිම් ප්‍රජාව දීර්ඝ කාලයක පටන් වධ හිංසාවන්ට සහ අගතියට මුහුණ පා සිටිති. දේශසීමා මුරපොලවලට එල්ල කෙරුණ ප්‍රහාරවලින් අනතුරුව මියන්මාර් හමුදාව එම ජනයාට එරෙහිව ප්‍රහාර එල්ල කළහ.
افتتحت في المغرب المرحلة الأولي من محطة هائلة للطاقة الشمسية تنوي السلطات أن تجعلها الأكبر في العالم في هذا المجال. وستولد المحطة 500 ميجاوات من الكهرباء عندما تصل إلى أقصى طاقتها، وهو ما يعادل إنتاج مفاعل نووي من الطاقة. وتضم المحطة حتى الآن نصف مليون مرآة لتوليد الطاقة في منطقة تحتاج ساعتين من السير للدوران حولها. وتقوم تلك المرايا بتركيز الحرارة اللازمة لتزويد التوربينات بالبخار اللازم لتشغيلها. ويأتي المشروع كجزء من خطة الدولة لدعم انتاجها من الطاقة النظيفة. وقال المسؤولون عن المشروع في بيان لهم إن "محطة الطاقة الشمسية تمثل اهتمام الدولة بخفض الاعتماد على النفط، وسعيها نحو استخدام مصادر الطاقة المتجددة، وإلى تطوير التنمية التي تنتج قدرا أقل من الكربون." وستخفض المحطة انبعاثات الكربون في المغرب بمقدار 760 الف طن في العام. وبدأت المغرب في بناء المحطة عام 2013، وتضم ثلاث مراحل أخرى تالية من المتوقع اكتمالها خلال عامين. وعند اكتمال جميع مراحل المحطة ستكون الأكبر في العالم من نوعها وستوفر الطاقة اللازمة لمليون مواطن مغربي عند استكمالها عام 2018. وكانت المغرب قد عرضت مشروع انشاء المحطة وفازت به مجموعة من الشركاء على رأسهم شركة سعودية هي التي قامت ببناء المحطة. ويشارك بنك التنمية الافريقي وبنك الاستثمار الأوروبي والبنك الدولي في تمويل المشروع. كما بدأت المغرب العام الماضي في توليد الكهرباء من أكبر محطة في افريقيا لتوليد الطاقة من الرياح وهي في منطقة طارفاية.
Radiohead have teamed up with composer Hans Zimmer to work on the soundtrack to the BBC's forthcoming natural history series, Blue Planet II. Inspired by the sounds of the sea, the band have recorded an orchestral version of the song Bloom, from their 2011 album The King Of Limbs. Called (ocean) bloom, the piece will be featured in a five-minute prequel, released on 27 September. It features new vocals from Thom Yorke alongside the BBC Concert Orchestra. "Bloom was inspired by the original Blue Planet series so it's great to be able to come full circle with the song and reimagine it for this incredible landmark's sequel," said Yorke in a press release. "Hans is a prodigious composer who effortlessly straddles several musical genres so it was liberating for us all to work with such a talent and see how he wove the sound of the series and Bloom together." The prequel - which will be released globally - features "some of the most awe-inspiring shots and highlights from the new series," said the BBC, as well as exclusive scenes that will not feature in any the televised episodes. Sir David Attenborough returns to narrate the prequel as well as the series, which was filmed over four years. The BBC says it will include footage of newly discovered and never-before filmed creatures. Among them is a new species of crab with a hairy chest - nicknamed the "Hoff crab" after Baywatch star David Hasselhoff. The documentary's executive producer, James Honeyborne, said Radiohead's new song was "an incredibly powerful companion to the scenes we've spent years capturing." Follow us on Facebook, on Twitter @BBCNewsEnts, or on Instagram at bbcnewsents. If you have a story suggestion email entertainment.news@bbc.co.uk.
Facebook, Twitter ve YouTube gibi sosyal medya kanallarında sıkı takip altına alınan cihatçı hesapların, propaganda için Instagram'a yöneldiği belirtiliyor. İngiliz Times gazetesinde yer alan habere göre, Instagram'da 50 binden fazla Irak Şam İslam Devleti (IŞİD) örgütü yanlısı hesap keşfedildi. Cihat propagandası yapan hesapların, örgütün tanıtımını yapmak için uygulamadaki stories (hikayeler) özelliğini kullandığı da ifade ediliyor. Facebook'un 2012'de satın aldığı Instagram'ın bir yıl önce başlattığı hikayeler özelliğinde, paylaşılan bir içerik, 24 saat içinde siliniyor. Örgütün bu özelliği kullandığı paylaşımlarından ikisinde, IŞİD bayrağı sallayan bir bebek ile kafası kesilmiş bir cesedin bulunduğu aktarıldı. Hikayeler özelliğini kullanan propaganda hesapları, hayatın normal akışını gösteren paylaşımlarda da bulunuluyor. Hasat yapan çiftçiler, yol tamiri gibi paylaşımlarla da "işleyen bir devlet" izlenimi verilmeye çalışıldığı düşünülüyor. Yapılan araştırmalar, Instagram'daki en az 10 bin hesabın örgütle "çok sıkı bağı" olduğunu ortaya koydu. Times'ta yer alan habere göre, bu hesapların paylaşımlarının yüzde 30'u örgütsel içerikten oluşuyor. Uzmanlar, IŞİD'in propaganda birimlerinin ana akım sosyal medya kanallarını eskisi kadar kullanmadığı uyarısını da yapıyor. Örgütün bunlar yerine, kısa ömürlü mecralar olarak bilinen platformlara yöneldiği belirtiliyor. Bir foto mesajlaşma uygulaması olan Snapchat'in de örgüt tarafından Batılı ülkelerden üye kazanmak için kullanıldığı yönünde bulgular elde edildi. Bir örgüt üyesi ile takipçileri arasında geçen ve kendisini artık Snapchat'ten izlemelerini istediği bir konuşmada, IŞİD üyesinin "Çünkü Facebook öldü" dediği aktarılıyor. Örgütün Telegram ve WhatsApp gibi mesajlaşma kanallarının da propaganda amacıyla kullanıldığı aktarılıyor. Policy Exchange isimli düşünce kuruluşunun elde ettiği verilere göre, internet ortamında yayımlanan cihat propagandası en fazla etkileşimi İngiltere'de elde ediyor. Instagram'dan yapılan açıklamada, "Teröristlerin, terör propagandasının veya terör övücü içeriklerin Instagram'da yeri yoktur. Bu tür içerikleri ve hesapları tespit eder etmez kaldırıyoruz" denildi. Snapchat de benzer bir açıklama ile bu tür içeriklere ve hesaplara göz yumulmadığını açıkladı. Kurucuları Rus olan Telegram mesajlaşma uygulamasının ise iletişim kurma taleplerine yanıt vermediği haberde yer aldı.
Chile es un país sufridor en términos futbolísticos. Nunca ha ganado nada con su selección y el nivel de expectativa de sus aficionados varía tan drásticamente cada vez que juega que se podría medir en un barómetro tan largo como su propio territorio. La Roja ha tenido grandes jugadores a lo largo de su historia, generaciones que han ilusionado a todo el país, pero nunca ha podido combinar las variables para conseguir el tan ansiado trofeo que termine de confirmar su creencia de ser la "cuarta" potencia del fútbol sudamericano. Lea: Resultados y tablas de la Copa América 2015 La única razón tangible de este convencimiento popular es que fue uno de los cuatro países fundadores del Campeonato Sudamericano de Naciones hace 99 años, pero la diferencia con las otras tres selecciones es abismal: Uruguay ha conseguido 15 títulos, Argentina 14 y Brasil 8. Cuando salga este miércoles a la cancha del estadio Nacional en el primer partido de los cuartos de final de la Copa América que juega como local, Chile no sólo tendrá enfrente a Uruguay, sino que también a la historia y a la ansiedad de toda una afición que sueña con que su selección, La Roja de sus amores, consiga, ahora sí, su primer título continental. Chile, junto a Ecuador y Venezuela, son los únicos países que jamás ha podido alzar una Copa América. Peor aún, jamás ha salido campeón en un torneo de fútbol continental, en ninguna de sus categorías, ni infantil, ni juvenil, ni femenino. Las razones son varias, desde el desorden interno hasta la falta de una generación excepcional en todos los sectores del campo. Nunca pudo sacar provecho a su condición de local y las escasas oportunidades en las que llegó a una final terminó perdiéndola: frente a Argentina en 1955, contra Paraguay en 1979 (en partido extra de definición en cancha neutral) y ante Uruguay en 1987, en la Copa América de Argentina. "Es algo que sólo se puede explicar desde la mente. Ni la suerte ni la categoría han sido factores para justificar esas derrotas", explica Elías Figueroa, uno de los mejores defensas de la historia. La mente es algo que precisamente parece haber cambiado la actual generación de futbolistas. Son jugadores que están triunfando en el fútbol internacional y reciben elogios en cualquier rincón del planeta. Alexis Sánchez y Arturo Vidal son los referentes de un grupo que ha crecido ilusionando un país, desde aquel agónico empate contra Brasil en el sudamericano sub20 de Paraguay en 2007, el tercer puesto mundialista en Canadá ese año y las clasificaciones a las Copas del Mundo de Sudáfrica y Brasil. Si juntamos al hecho de que juegan en su casa y con un sorteo favorable -líderes en un grupo asequible y todos sus partidos en Santiago- el equipo dirigido por el argentino Jorge Sampaoli podría estar tal vez ante la mejor oportunidad de romper el maleficio. El problema es que Chile ya vivió una situación similar y fue el desenlace de aquel torneo lo que marcó para siempre su fútbol. "Sólo una vez antes en su historia Chile llegó a una Copa América con tanta esperanza y estuvo tan cerca de ganar el torneo", recordó en BBC Mundo el reconocido periodista deportivo Aldo Schiappacasse, quien realizó un trabajo de investigación sobre lo que pasó hace 60 años. "Fue el 30 de marzo de 1955 cuando, con una de las mejores delanteras de todos los tiempos, la selección chilena llegó al partido final contra la Argentina de Labruna con la ventaja del empate. La euforia que generó ese equipo y el sueño de ganar el Sudamericano terminaron en tragedia", contó Schiappacasse. El periodista enumeró a los protagonistas de aquel equipo dirigido por Luis Tirado. "La Roja tenía un virtuoso centrocampista, Enrique Hormazábal (apodado "el Cuá Cuá") que abastecía a un habilidoso puntero, Manuel Muñoz, y a dos temibles goleadores, René Orlando Meléndez y Jorge Robledo" "Con juego ofensivo y espectacular, el equipo no sólo goleó a Ecuador, Perú y Paraguay, sino que tras empatar con Uruguay se perfiló con el favorito para el pleito final". Pero la ilusión de todo el país se apagó en pocos minutos. "Miles llegaron hasta el estadio Nacional de Santiago para ver el duelo. Presionando para ingresar, los aficionados se exaltaron cuando por los altoparlantes se informó que ya no quedaban entradas a la venta y corrieron despavoridos cuando la policía hizo debutar el flamante carro lanza-agua recién adquirido. El resultado fue desastroso: siete personas muertas aplastadas contras las rejas y decenas de heridos de gravedad". "Las autoridades decidieron jugar igual la final, que ganó Argentina por uno a cero con gol de Michelli. La tristeza de la derrota fue inmensa, pero no podía compararse con la devastación que provocaron las muertes de los aficionados, en lo que hasta hoy es la peor tragedia ocurrida en un estadio de fútbol en el país". Ese hecho marcaría a fuego la historia de la selección chilena en los torneos continentales, donde transitó siempre entre la ilusión desbordada y el desencanto profundo. Esta misma escuadra –reforzada con el debutante puntero izquierdo Leonel Sánchez- compartiría el segundo lugar al año siguiente en el Sudamericano de Montevideo. Una generación brillante que se disolvería en 1957, cuando en Lima incurrió en actos de indisciplina que significaron sanciones para varios jugadores, lo que mermó las posibilidades del equipo en las clasificatorias para el Mundial de Suecia. Lea: Arturo Vidal y un nuevo escándalo de indisciplina que hunde la ilusión en Chile La crisis fue necesaria para enmendar rumbos, ya que a partir de ese momento comenzó el proceso encabezado por Fernando Riera que culminaría con el tercer lugar en el Mundial de 1962, jugado en canchas chilenas. Sin embargo, el fútbol chileno no pudo aprovechar ese resultado para conseguir una regularidad y títulos internacionales. Desde entonces han surgido grandes jugadores como Elías Figueroa, Carlos Caszely, Patricio Yáñez, Iván Zamorano o Marcelo Salas, pero cada vez que se han acercado a la cima del fútbol sudamericano han vuelto a caer estrepitosamente. El denominador común en la mayoría de los casos ha sido la falta de disciplina. Ocurrió tras los subcampeonatos de la Copa América en 1979 y 1987 y tras la clasificación al Mundial de 1998. En 2002 Chile llegó a ubicarse en el puesto 84 de la clasificación de la FIFA y no fue hasta la aparición de la actual generación de jugadores que pudo ascender y permanecer en la élite del fútbol. De los últimos siete años, la Roja se ha ubicado en seis entre la 20 mejores selecciones del mundo, gracias primero al trabajo de Marcelo Bielsa y ahora de Sampaoli, quien ha administrado la herencia de su compatriota. El técnico declaró antes del inicio del torneo que "Chile jugará esta Copa América con 11 kamikazes. 11 fanáticos que se jugarán la vida por la camiseta" en un discurso discordante con su intención de no generar expectativas desmesuradas. Entre la afición nadie parece dispuesto a moderar el sueño de la Copa América, aun sabiendo el peso que eso significa en los hombros de unos jugadores a quienes sólo les vale ganar y dejar atrás un siglo de frustraciones y derrotas dolorosas. "No creo que todavía pueda ser considerada la mejor generación. Cuando ganas algo es que puedes ser considerada la mejor", declaró a la BBC Figueroa. "En el 62 fuimos terceros. Ellos todavía tienen algo que probar. Es una generación con muy buenos jugadores, todos juegan en Europa, pero deben ganar algo. Yo dejé un legado para todos ya que fui elegido tres veces el mejor jugador en Sudamérica. Si ellos ganan algo, perfecto". El siguiente obstáculo para alcanzar el objetivo es Uruguay, el verdugo en la final de 1987, el que ha eliminado a cuatro países anfitriones en los últimos 11 torneos y al que Chile no le ha podido ganar en 32 años en el campeonato sudamericano. Esta vez, la promesa es que Chile contará con 11 kamikazes para lograr no sólo el triunfo contra la Celeste, sino su primer título continental.
Over the last week, Iraqi Security Forces (ISF) have redeployed into the capital and oilfields of Iraq's Kirkuk province for the first time since the invasion by so-called Islamic State in 2014. But the ISF did not liberate Kirkuk from the jihadist group: rather they forced their way past Kurdish Peshmerga checkpoints to re-enter the combustible ethnic melting pot of Kirkuk city and its environs, which has been garrisoned solely by the Kurds since 2014. A number of Peshmerga and ISF troops were reportedly killed in short clashes on Monday. The incident is a reminder that below the surface of the struggle against IS, there are also many "wars within the war", focused on post-IS control of territory within Iraq. Though the ISF operation only began early Friday morning, Iraq-time, the struggle to control Kirkuk has spanned six decades. Iraq's oil-rich province of Kirkuk has been the subject of contending claims by different ethnic groups for almost 60 years. It contains a blend of Kurds, Arabs, Turkmen and Assyrians, and successive Iraqi governments launched persecution and displacement campaigns against Kurds and Turkmen from the 1960s onwards. Kirkuk is also home to some of Iraq's oldest oilfields, resources that Britain used to sustain its war effort in World War Two. The province now produces just over 450,000 barrels per day of crude. Kirkuk is positioned at the narrowest point of the Kurdistan Region of Iraq (KRI), astride the main road between the western part - controlled by the Kurdistan Democratic Party (KDP) of regional President Massoud Barzani - and the eastern part - under the Patriotic Union of Kurdistan (PUK) of the late Iraqi President Jalal Talabani and other parties. This has led successive Iraqi governments to build up major military garrisons in Kirkuk in order to present a threat to the Kurds, placing Iraqi tanks only a short distance from the Kurdish capital of Irbil or the region's second city, Sulaimaniya. When Saddam Hussein's regime fell after a US-led invasion in 2003, the Iraqi Kurds sought to prevent Kirkuk from ever again being used as launchpad for attacks on its region. Though the US-built Iraqi army was present in the province, the Kurds ensured it was not allowed to enter Kirkuk city. The Kurds assumed more and more control as the Iraqi military weakened in the aftermath of US withdrawal from Iraq in 2011. After the IS assault, the Kurds took full control of Kirkuk's oilfields and have been operating them and selling around 90% of Kirkuk crude oil exports ever since. Kirkuk has lived in a strange "grey zone" - not quite a part of federal Iraq, but not fully part of the KRI. For instance, the Kurdistan Region has provided frontline security for the province, which bordered areas infested with Islamic State militants, but Baghdad has paid the vast majority of civilian salaries, amounting to about $135m (£110m) per month. The 25 September independence referendum held by the Kurds in areas under their control, including disputed Kirkuk, prompted Baghdad to change the post-2014 arrangement. Officials from Baghdad, Iran, Turkey, the UN and the US-led coalition lobbied hard to have Kirkuk excluded from the referendum, or to have the referendum postponed in all areas. The Kurdistan Region's refusal to agree to these terms seems to have kick-started planning for an ISF redeployment to Kirkuk. Increased momentum in the anti-IS campaign was also a factor, with Iraqi forces clearing areas like Tal Afar and Hawija in less time and with fewer casualties than expected. The ISF is very confident at the moment, and its elite US-trained units - the Counter-Terrorism Service and the 9th Armoured Division - achieved rapid success in seizing Kirkuk city. There was also a hidden factor in the rapid collapse of the Kurdish defence in Kirkuk, related to disagreements within the Kurdish factions over whether to resist the ISF or strike a deal with Prime Minister Haider al-Abadi. Speculation is rife that Iran, the US or both supported the return of ISF units to Kirkuk. The PUK defenders of Kirkuk city and its military bases gave way to the ISF advance and are now negotiating with Baghdad over a shared "temporary joint administration" of Kirkuk. The KDP appears to have entirely withdrawn from Kirkuk province and even its vital oilfields. The future of Kirkuk province will now be negotiated between the PUK and Baghdad. It may include joint security forces and a PUK-Baghdad revenue-sharing deal. Oil will probably keep flowing out of Kirkuk via the Kurdistan Region and Turkey for now. In the coming year, Iraq and Turkey may cut a new deal with the Kurds on shared oil export schemes. The longer-term back-up plan may be to export Kirkuk crude via Iraq's southern ports, Jordan and Iran. The gravest uncertainty relates to the future of the Kurdistan Region. Relations between the KDP and PUK could sink to historic lows in the aftermath of the controversial events in Kirkuk. The political and economic viability of the region is in question if negotiations with Iraq and Turkey do not yield positive results. For instance, lacking Kirkuk crude or Turkish backing, the economic situation in the region is now dire and humanitarian suffering could escalate, both for Kurds and for the million-plus internally displaced persons and refugees sheltering there. The war against IS may also suffer: already in Dibis, one of the areas from which KDP Peshmerga withdrew, there has been a loss of control that seems to have allowed scores - some reports say hundreds - of security detainees to escape from jails, many of them IS militants. Dr Michael Knights is the Lafer Fellow at the Washington Institute for Near East Policy. He has worked in all of Iraq's provinces, and spent time embedded with the Iraqi security forces. His recent report on post-battle stabilisation of Mosul is available via the Washington Institute website. Follow him on Twitter at @mikeknightsiraq
Nos arredores da cidade de Aix-en-Provence, na região de Provença (França), o monte Ste-Victoire se ergue por mais de mil metros sobre uma planície de vinhedos, vilarejos com casas de telhados avermelhados, bosques e córregos. Conforme eu percorria Aix e seus arredores, não me cansava de ver seu pico pontiagudo despontando - uma constante presença enquanto eu bebia um expresso em cafés de pequenos vilarejos, caminhava por trilhas com cheiro de ervas e admirava a mudança de sua paleta de cores a partir de vistas impressionantes. Em um dado momento, eu simplesmente a vi brilhar a partir da janela do meu hotel em uma casa do século 18, Le Pigonnet. Alguns podem pensar que a importância do pico está na antiga batalha que aconteceu em sua base. De fato, os romanos conquistaram a primeira vitória significativa de seu império nesse exato local, derrotando os povos bárbaros germânicos cimbros e teutões, em 102 a.C.. Diz a lenda que o nome monte Ste-Victoire (Monte da Vitória Santa em francês) é em memória disso (o "santo" foi acrescentado por cristãos medievais). Mas a contribuição desse pico rochoso para o planeta vai muito além disso graças ao artista e revolucionário nativo da região Paul Cézanne. Cézanne, nascido em 1839, sempre amou a montanha. "Quando criança, ele e seus amigos Émile Zola e Jean-Baptistin Baille o observavam à distância durante suas escapadas, correndo, escalando e caçando pelos campos em sua base", diz o neto e especialista em arte moderna aposentado Philippe Cézanne. O artista passou um tempo em Paris, onde ficou amigo de outros artistas, como Camille Pissarro, Edouard Manet, Claude Monet e Pierre-Auguste Renoir. Pissarro o influenciou a clarear sua paleta de cores e a pintar de uma maneira mais impressionista, mas o mais próximo que chegou disso foi no quadro Casa do Homem Enforcado, Auvers-sur-Oise (1873), com cores pálidas e pinceladas quebradas. Ainda assim, naquela pintura, você pode ver como ele estava rompendo com regras artísticas da época, ao dar profundidade de campo ao primeiro plano e com as imprecisões deliberadas de perspectiva (um caminho leva para a esquerda, um declive cai para a direita em um ângulo que parece estranho). Os trabalhos de Cézanne dividiram críticos e, sendo um cara do interior, ele percebeu que não pertencia a Paris, e sim a seu lar, na Provença. E, apesar de também ter morado em L'Estaque, perto de Marselha, e na Suíça e em Paris, Aix continuou sendo o lugar de seu coração, onde ficou cada vez mais ligado ao monte St-Victorie como seu principal tema. "No começo, Cézanne pintou o monte Ste-Victoire à distância, a partir do parque de Jas de Bouffan, a casa da família [em Aix]", disse Philippe. Apenas mais tarde em sua vida, aliás, Cézanne começou a focar intencionalmente na montanha, pintando-a de diferentes ângulos, com pinceladas mais precisas e remendos de cores. Mas por que ele ficou tão obcecado? "O pintor era apaixonado pela geologia e arquitetura da natureza do seu local de origem", diz Philippe. "Ele tinha visto a montanha mudar com o passar das horas, das estações, então, com o tempo, ele passou a conhecer a montanha de cor." Cézanne estava decidido a pintar sua permanência, chegando às formas mais simples de uma maneira quase arquitetônica. Ele fez a mesma coisa com outros temas, é claro, incluindo modelos vivos nas suas séries monumentais de banhistas. Mas nada como sua querida montanha. No total, começando em 1870, Cézanne a pintou 87 vezes e, quanto mais a pintava, ela se tornava mais plana, fragmentada e menos realista, com formas geométricas de cor. "Eu preferiria quebrar minha tela em vez de inventar ou imaginar um detalhe", disse ele certa vez ao amigo, escritor e crítico de arte Joaquin Gasquet. Seus locais preferidos de onde pintar ficavam na parte mais ao sul da montanha, nas vilas de Le Tholonet e Gardanne. Aqui, a montanha rochosa se eleva sobre um campo cheio de verdes, marrons e laranjas de vales e pinheiros. Na colina Frères em Gardanne, com vista para a montanha, foram colocadas reproduções de suas pinturas e foi aqui onde eu mais senti a genialidade do artista. Ele não apenas pintava a montanha, mas também o vilarejo - e eu fiquei ali, impressionada, comparando a cidade em forma de pirâmide à minha frente com sua série de caixinhas que antecedeu o movimento cubista. Cézanne alugou uma cabana na pedreira de Bibemus para focar nas rochas talhadas à mão, onde pintava suas formas e cores terrosas, muitas vezes com a montanha ao fundo. E suas últimas obras - sem dúvida as mais famosas - foram feitas a partir de um local na Chemin de la Marguerite na colina de Lauves, a uma curta caminhada de distância de seu estúdio em Aix. Quando visitei o estúdio (uma experiência recomendável, seu equipamentos de pintura continuam lá como se ele tivesse se ausentado por um curto momento), segui os passos de Cézanne na colina até seu lugar preferido para pintar. Fiquei desapontada com as construções e novos desenvolvimentos urbanos na região, mas perdi o fôlego quando vi, entre as árvores, o pico despontando à distância em toda a glória cézannesca. Parado ali, eu pensei na última vez em que Cézanne veio aqui, quando, aos 67 anos, foi pego de surpresa por uma tempestade, mas continuou a pintar. "Eu prometi que morreria pintando", disse ele ao seu amigo mais jovem Émile Bernard apenas um mês antes. Em uma semana ele morreu de pneumonia. Mas o lugar mais cativante da montanha, sem dúvida, é a parte de trás, na cidade de Vauvenargues, onde um castelo fortificado, construído entre os séculos 13 e 17, se insere em um vale. O mais intrigante é que um de seus proprietários foi o pintor Pablo Picasso, grande admirador de Cézanne. Tanto que teria comprado o castelo em 1958 com sua pintura de Ste-Victorie para honrar "a verdadeira [montanha]). "Picasso era um maluco em 1900", disse Denis Coutagne, um membro da Société Paul Cézanne e ex-diretor do Museu Granet d'Aix-en-Provence, "devorando os pintores que estavam buscando uma renovação artística, inclusive Toulouse-Lautrec, Derain, Matisse e Rouault. Então ele se apaixonou por Cézanne e, pela primeira vez, Picasso foi confrontado com um grande mestre". "[Picasso] me disse um dia que Cézanne era seu Deus", diz Philippe. E então Picasso - e outros, incluindo Matisse, Braque and Metzinger - escrutinava as pinturas de Cézanne do Monte Ste-Victoire e seus outros temas, direcionando-se para o cubismo e, essencialmente, a arte moderna do século 20. "Os pintores do século 20 entraram pela brecha aberta por Cézanne", diz Coutagne. "Mas cada escola [cubismo, fauvismo] levou em consideração apenas um elemento, seja em composição, espaço, cor ou perspectiva. Cézanne fez melhor. Ele juntou tudo. Ele continua à frente". É por isso que as famosas palavras de Picasso continuam ecoando: "Cézanne foi o pai de todos nós". E sobre todos eles, suas amadas montanhas.
يمكنك أن تجد الكثير من النصائح على شبكة الإنترنت حول تحسين قدرتك على التركيز وسط عدد هائل من مصادر التشويش. لكن العديد من هذه النصائح قد يكون غير واقعي إلى حد بعيد، ولا يحقق النتائج المرجوة. والسؤال الآن هو: كم منا يستطيع "دائما أن يجد ما يفعله ملهما وممتعا"، أو يكون مرتاحا عندما يغلق وسائل التواصل الاجتماعي ويقضي اليوم أو يعمل دون اتصال أجهزته الإلكترونية بالإنترنت؟ ومع ذلك، ربما يكون الشيء الأهم هو أن العديد من هذه النصائح لا يتعلق كثيرا بما يكتشفه علماء النفس حول الطريقة التي يعمل بها العقل البشري. فالعديد من الأشياء التي نعتقد أنه يجب فعلها لمساعدتنا على التركيز تعمل في الواقع بعكس الطريقة التي يعمل بها دماغنا بشكل طبيعي. إذن، ما الذي يمكن أن نتعلمه من علم التركيز لتحقيق إنجاز أكبر، وهل تنجح أي من النصائح العامة بالفعل؟ نستعرض هنا خمسة طرق لتحسين قدرة الشخص على التركيز. قد يبدو الأمر منافيا للمنطق، ولكن السماح لذهنك بالشرود قد يكون أحد أفضل الأساليب إن كنت تسعى لتحسين قدرتك على التركيز. هناك تصور متزايد في أوساط علماء النفس بأننا نقضي الكثير من الوقت في أحلام اليقظة - ما يقرب من 50 في المئة من الوقت وفقا لبعض التقديرات. وقد حدا ذلك ببعض علماء النفس إلى تأييد فكرة أن شرود الذهن لا يمثل مشكلة كبيرة، وإنما هو جزء رئيسي من النظام نفسه الذي يمكن أن يساعد أدمغتنا على القيام بوظائفها. ويتطلب التركيز شبكة من مناطق الدماغ بما فيها القشرة الأمامية المسؤولة عن مقاومة التشويش والسيطرة على دوافعنا الطبيعية لفعل شيء أكثر متعة. ويتطلب الحفاظ على أداء هذه الشبكة طاقة أكبر من مجموعة مناطق الدماغ التي تنشط عندما لا نفكر في شيء محدد. وحتما، في وقت ما خلال اليوم، نشعر بالإنهاك وهنا يبدأ العقل في الشرود. وإذا كان هذا سيحدث حتما، فلماذا لا نخصص وقتا مناسبا لذلك؟ يفرق بول سيلي، عالم النفس في جامعة هارفارد، بين شرود الذهن المتعمد والعرضي، ويقول إن النوع العرضي فقط هو الذي له تأثير سلبي على المهام التي نريد القيام بها. يقول سيلي: "إذا كانت المهمة سهلة، فإن الشرود الذهني المتعمد لن يؤثر على الأداء على الأرجح، لكن يجب أن يتيح للناس فرصة لجني فوائد شرود الذهن، مثل القدرة على حل المشاكل والتخطيط". ويشير هذا إلى أن ترك عقلك يشرد عمدا بين الفينة والأخرى قد يكون مفيدا. ويقول سيلي: "فكر في شيء لا علاقة له بالمهمة التي تريد إنجازها، مثل حل مشكلة أخرى تدور في خلدك، ثم عد إلى مهمتك الأساسية". غالبا ما يُنظر إلى مقاطع الفيديو التي تعرض مواقف مضحكة للقطط على أنها قمة الإلهاء، إلا أن بعض علماء النفس يعتقدون أنها يمكن أن تساعد في الحقيقة على وضعنا في الحالة الذهنية الصحيحة للمضي قدما في عملنا. ويعود هذا إلى أن إبقاء التركيز على شيء ما أمر صعب، بغض النظر عن مدى حبك لعملك، ويتطلب قوة إرادة. وحسب دراسة حديثة، فإن إحدى الطرق لتعزيز قوة الإرادة هي الضحك. ومن خلال التجارب، وجد أن الناس الذين شاهدوا مقطع فيديو مضحك بذلوا جهدا أكبر من الأشخاص الذين شاهدوا مقطع فيديو يحقق الارتياح ولكن ليس مضحكا. وخلصت الدراسة إلى أن الفكاهة تساهم في زيادة قوة الإرادة بشكل فعال بحيث يتعين على أماكن العمل أن تشجع ثقافة أكثر "مرحا". ويقول ديفيد تشينغ، باحث في مجال القيادة بجامعة أستراليا الوطنية في كانبيرا: "خلق ثقافة من المرح لدى فريقك سيساعد على تعزيز إنتاجية العمل". ويضيف تشينغ الذي قاد البحث: "بالطبع، هذا ليس ترخيصا لمشاهدة مقاطع فيديو عن القطط طوال اليوم، لكن الحصول على فترات راحة في بعض الأحيان ومشاهدة مقاطع فيديو فكاهية يكون مفيدا، خاصة عندما تشعر بالإرهاق". حتى تتمكن من التركيز بشكل صحيح يتعين عليك أن تتخلص من كل أنواع التشويش الخارجي، أليس كذلك؟ في الواقع، ووفقا لإحدى نظريات الانتباه المؤثرة، العكس هو الصحيح. توصلت نيللي لافي، عالمة نفس في كلية لندن الجامعية، إلى ما اطلقت عليه اسم "نظرية التحميل" في عام 1995. وتكمن الفكرة في أن هناك حدا لكمية المعلومات من العالم الخارجي التي يمكن لأدمغتنا معالجتها في أي وقت مرة واحدة، وعند امتلاء جميع "أماكن" المعالجة في الدماغ، فإن نظام الانتباه في الدماغ يتدخل لاتخاذ قرار بشأن ما يركز عليه. وتشير تجارب لافي إلى أنه قد يكون من الأفضل العمل في محيطات ليست مرتبة وصامتة، بل في محيطات فوضوية ومربكة. وتنجح هذه الطريقة لأنه عند إشغال جميع أماكن الإدراك الحسي، يتعين على الدماغ صب كل طاقاته للتركيز على المهمة الأكثر أهمية بعد غربلة مصادر الإلهاء بكل بساطة. لكن المشكلة في ممارسة ذلك تكمن في إيجاد النوع المناسب من الإلهاء والحفاظ عليه على الجانب المناسب كي لا يصل إلى حد الانجراف. وهناك عدد قليل من التطبيقات، مثل ommwriter أو focus@will، التي تضيف أنواعا من الإلهاء البصري أو الموسيقي إلى النظام، ولكن حتى الآن لم يختبر أي منها في دراسات علمية وربما لن تكون أفضل من تشغيل المذياع. والأمر المهم هو أن تعطي عقلك ما يكفي للقيام به، حتى لا تعطيه الفرصة للبحث في مكان آخر للتحفيز. ثمة أدلة على أن التوقف عن العمل لبعض الوقت يساعدك على تحقيق قدر أكبر من الإنجاز بعد استئناف العمل. لكن التحدي يكمن في معرفة متى تأخذ الاستراحة ومدتها وماذا ستفعل بفترة التوقف عن العمل. تشير بعض الدراسات التي أجريت في تسعينيات القرن الماضي إلى أنه نظرا للتغيرات الطبيعية في دورة الانتباه لدينا، لا يمكننا التركيز لأكثر من 90 دقيقة قبل الحاجة إلى استراحة لمدة 15 دقيقة. فيما توصلت دراسات أخرى إلى أنه حتى الاستراحة القصيرة لمدة بضع ثوان ستكفي، شريطة أن ينفصل الشخص نهائيا عن العمل من الناحية الذهنية خلال تلك الاستراحة. ومن الجيد أن تقوم ببعض التمرينات الرياضية في فترة استراحتك، لأنها تعيد تشغيل الدماغ على ما يبدو، وتجعله في حالة أفضل للتركيز على العمل، خاصة إذا أتبعتها بمشروب يحتوي على الكافايين. وتشير دراسة إلى أن ممارسة التمارين في الهواء الطلق وخاصة وسط الطبيعة، يحسن قدرة الشخص على التركيز. ويعد التأمل خيارا آخر، فهناك أدلة متزايدة على أن ممارسي التأمل لديهم سيطرة أفضل على موارد انتباههم، كما أنهم أفضل بكثير في ملاحظة الوقت الذي يتعين فيه الحصول على استراحة. وإذا كان يبدو أن ذلك يستغرق وقتا طويلا بعض الشيء، فالخبر السار هو أن أخذ جرعة سريعة من الكافايين، مع ممارسة التمرين أو بدونها، يحسن الذاكرة ومدة رد الفعل والانتباه على المدى القصير. وفقا لدراسات أجراها جو ديغوتيس ومايك إسترمان في مختبر بوسطن للانتباه والتعلم في ماساتشوسيتس، من خلال تجارب تصوير الدماغ، فإن الاستراتيجية الأكثر نجاحا للمحافظة على التركيز هي التركيز لفترة معينة من الوقت ثم أخذ استراحة قصيرة قبل العودة إلى التركيز مجددا. فالناس الذين حاولوا البقاء مركزين طوال الوقت ارتكبوا أخطاء أكثر بشكل عام. ولذا، عندما تحتاج إلى التركيز لفترات طويلة، فإن الاستراحة القصيرة من وقت لآخر، تعني تركيزا لفترة أطول. وبالمثل، توصلت دراسة أجراها كريستشين أوليفرز من الجامعة الحرة بأمستردام، إلى أن موارد انتباه الناس توسعت أكثر عندما طلب منهم ببساطة التراجع عن العمل والتفكير في شيء آخر بدلا من التركيز بشكل كامل. قد تكون هذه هي النتيجة الأكثر فائدة التي توصلت إليها جميع البحوث المتعلقة بالتركيز. وكلما عرفنا أكثر عن الدماغ، عرفنا أن الإجهاد هو عدو التركيز بصورة أكثر وضوحا. لذا، خذ الوقت الكافي لفعل كل ما يلزم لتشعر بأنك أكثر هدوءا.‬ يمكنك قراءة الموضوع الأصلي على موقع BBC Capital.
කාන්තාවන්ගේ ඇඳුම් පැළඳුම් පිළිබඳ ලොව පුරා විවිධ සමාජ තුළ ස්ථාපිත ආදර්ශ පවතී. විශේෂයෙන් රැකියා ස්ථානය තුළදී සහ පොදු ප්‍රවාහන සේවාවල ගමන් ගන්නා කාන්තාවන් සහ තරුණියන් ඇඟලිය යුතු ඇඳුම් සම්බන්ධයෙන් නොනිල මට්ටමේ සීමා පැනවීම් සමාජය තුළ දැකිය හැක. මහමග දී වචනයෙන්, අභිනයෙන් සහ ශාරීරිකව ලිංගික හිංසනවලට ගොදුරු වන කාන්තාවන්ම ඇතැම් විට වරදකරුවන් බවට පත් කරනු ලබන්නේ ඔවුන්ගේ ඇඳුම් පැළඳුම්වල ස්වභාවය දෙසට ඇඟිල්ල දිගු කරමිනි. ලොව ඕනෑම තැනැත්තෙකුට තමන් අඳින පළඳින ආකාරය ගැන තීරණය කිරීමේ නිදහස තිබිය යුතු බව ශ්‍රී ලංකා ක්‍රිකට් කණ්ඩායමේ හිටපු නායක මහේල ජයවර්ධන පසුගියදා අවධාරණය කර තිබිණි. මේ අතර කොට කලිසමක් ඇඟලීම නිසා පුරුෂයෙකු විසින් තරුණියකට පහර දෙනු ලැබූ සිදුවීමක් උද්ඝෝෂණයක් දක්වා වර්ධනය වීමේ පුවතක් තුර්කියෙන් වාර්තා විය. අසේනා මෙලිසා හිංසනයට ලක් වී ඇත්තේ ඉස්තාම්බුල් නුවර බස් රථයක ගමන් කරමින් සිටියදීය. ඇය කොට කලිසමක් ඇඟලා සිටීම පිළිබඳ කිපුණු පුරුෂයෙකු ඒ සම්බන්ධයෙන් ඇය හා තර්ක කර තිබේ. "ඔහු මගේ කම්මුලට ගැහුවා. ඇඳුම ගැන තර්කය අවසන් වෙලා මම ඔහුට පිටුපා සිටියේ මට කිසිම සුදානමක් තිබුණේ නැහැ" යනුවෙන් ඇය සිය අත්දැකීම විස්තර කළාය. "මට පිළිකුලක් දැනුණා. මම බස් එකේ බිම වාඩි වෙලා කෑ ගසමින් ඇඬුවා" ප්‍රහාරය CCTV කැමරාවේ සටහන්ව ඇති අතර එම දර්ශන සමාජ ජාල ඔස්සේ විශාල වශයෙන් හුවමාරු වීමත් සමග ඒ පිළිබඳ සමාජය තුළ සංවාදයක් ආරම්භ විය. පසුව එය උද්ඝෝෂණයක් දක්වා වර්ධනය විය. පහර දුන් බව පැවසෙන පුද්ගලයා දින කිහිපයකට පසු රැඳවුම් භාරයට ගනු ලැබූ අතර මාස දෙකකට පසු ඔහු ඇප මත මුදා හරිනු ලැබීය. "ඔහුව නිදහස් කලාට පසු මගේ මුළු ලෝකෙම අනෙක් පැත්ත පෙරලුනා. ඊළඟට මොකක් වෙයිද මම මගෙන්ම ඇහුව" "මට ඔහු මුණ ගැසේවිද මම මොකද කරන්නේ මට බයක් වගේම අසරණකමක් දැනුණා" යනුවෙන් අසේනා මෙලිසා පැවසුවද ඇය දැඩි ස්ථාවරයක පසුවන්නීය. තවදුරටත් බස් රථ තුළ ගමන් ගන්නා ඇය දැඩි ස්වරයෙන් කියා සිටියේ "මට පීඩනයක් දැනෙනවා. නමුත් මාව සීමාවලට ලක් කරන්න බැහැ. මම මට ඕනි විදිහට අඳිනවා. අපි බය විය යුතු නැහැ. අපි බය වුණාම ඔවුන්ගේ බලය වැඩි වෙනවා" යනුවෙනි. සබැඳි යොමු: ඔබත් මෙවැනි අත්දැකීමකට මුහුණ දුන් තැනැත්තියක්ද? ඔබේ අත්දැකීම අපට කියා ඔබ වැනිම වූ සොයුරින් සමග බෙදා ගන්න. දුරකතන : +44 (0) 20 36144039 + 44 (0)20 36140556 + 44 (0)20 36140555 + 44 (0)20 36140554 + 44(0) 20 36140551 + 44(0) 20 36140552 Facebook (ෆේස්බුක්) : පිවිසෙන්න ඊමේල් : sinhala@bbc.co.uk
‘Chia sẻ’ cho phép bạn chia sẻ nội dung từ trang BBC Mobile với người khác qua email hoặc qua truyền thông xã hội. ‘Chia sẻ qua email’ là gì? Chia sẻ cho phép bạn gửi nội dung của trang BBC Mobile cho người khác qua tài khoản email mà bạn đã cài đặt trên điện thoại. Nếu bạn muốn chia sẻ một trang trên BBC Mobile cho người khác, hãy nhấp vào biểu tượng email ở chỗ Chia sẻ nằm ở cuối trang. Phần mềm email cài đặt trên điện thoại sẽ mở ra, và bạn có thể dễ dàng truy cập danh sách các địa chỉ email rồi viết tin nhắn, mời họ tới xem nội dung trang bạn định chia sẻ. Bạn cần cài đặt email trên điện thoại rồi mới dùng được dịch vụ Chia sẻ qua email. Nếu không rõ cần cài đặt thế nào, hãy xem tài liệu hướng dẫn cách điện thoại di động của bạn. BBC không thu bất kỳ khoản nào khi bạn dùng dịch vụ Chia sẻ qua email. Tuy nhiên, công ty dịch vụ mạng của bạn có thể tính tiền dựa trên lượng dữ liệu bạn sử dụng. Nếu không rõ mức phí ra sao, hãy liên hệ với công ty cung cấp dịch vụ mạng của bạn. Không. Do bạn dùng địa chỉ email riêng của mình, chúng tôi sẽ không tiếp cận vào bất kỳ thông tin cá nhân hay tin nhắn nào của bạn. Dịch vụ này cho phép bạn chia sẻ nội dung trang BBC Mobile thông qua các trang truyền thông xã hội khác nhau như Facebook, Twitter hay Google+. Nếu bạn muốn chia sẻ một trang của BBC Mobile cho người khác, hãy nhấp vào biểu tượng của trang mạng xã hội thích hợp ở chỗ Chia sẻ nằm ở cuối trang. Bạn sẽ được chuyển tới trang mạng đó để đăng nhập vào tài khoản của mình. Bạn có thể viết thêm tin nhắn, và một hình ảnh cũng sẽ được tải lên theo. Trên một số điện thoại di động, các thông tin đăng nhập được các trang mạng xã hội lưu trữ, khiến người dùng không cần đăng nhập mỗi khi muốn lên trang cá nhân của mình. Không. Bạn sẽ rời khỏi trang BBC và đăng nhập vào tài khoản riêng trên trang mạng xã hội, và chúng tôi không tiếp cận bất kỳ thông tin đăng nhập riêng tư hay nội dung tin nhắn nào của bạn.
پاکستان کے سیکریٹری دفاع لیفٹیننٹ جنرل ریٹائرڈ ضمیرالحسن نے کہا ہے کہ کالعدم جماعت الاحرار کے سربراہ عمر خالد خراسانی کے ڈرون حملے میں مارے جانے کی 'اطلاعات کی تصدیق نہیں ہوئی ہے۔‘ ایوان بالا کی قائمہ کمیٹی برائے دفاع کے اجلاس کے دوران بریفنگ دیتے ہوئے ملک کے سیکریٹری دفاع نے کہا کہ میڈیا میں سامنے آنے والی تصویر عمر خالد خراسانی کی نہیں۔ ان کے مطابق یہ تصویر 'طارق گیدڑ گروپ کے عمر نارائے کی تھی جو ماضی میں ایک ڈرون حملے میں ہلاک ہوا تھا'۔ * جماعت الاحرار کی عمر خراسانی کی ہلاکت کی تصدیق * ’طالبان تخریب کاری کے لیے اسرائیل کی مدد بھی لے سکتے ہیں‘ واضح رہے کہ عمرخالد خراسانی کی ہلاکت کی خبریں مقامی ذرائع ابلاغ میں اس وقت سامنے آئی تھیں جب رواں ماہ کرم ایجنسی کے قریب پاکستان افغان سرحدی علاقے میں تین امریکی ڈرون حملوں میں 30 سے زائد افراد ہلاک ہوئے تھے جن میں سے بیشتر مشتبہ شدت پسند تھے۔ پاکستانی فوج نے ایک بیان میں کہا تھا کہ یہ ڈرون حملہ افغانستان کی سرحد کے اندر کیا گیا تھا۔ تاہم بیان میں عمر خالد خراسانی یا کسی اور کی ہلاکت کا ذکر نہیں کیا گیا تھا۔ نامہ نگار فرحت جاوید کے مطابق سیکریٹری دفاع نے یہ بھی کہا کہ 'ہمارے اپنے ذرائع نے بھی خراسانی کی ہلاکت کی تصدیق نہیں کی ہے۔‘ انھوں نے کمیٹی اجلاس کے دوران کہا کہ حالیہ دنوں میں پاکستان میں کوئی ڈرون حملہ نہیں ہوا ہے۔ اس سے پہلے خود کو جماعت الاحرار کے ترجمان کے طور پر ظاہر کرنے والے اسد منصور نے ملکی اور بین الاقوامی میڈیا کو ہلاکت کی تصدیق کرتے ہوئے بتایا تھا کہ ڈرون حملے میں نو دیگر شدت پسند بھی ہلاک ہوئے ہیں۔ تاہم افغانستان میں میڈیا نے جماعت الاحرار کے ذرائع سے ہلاکت کی تردید کی تھی۔ اس سے پہلے سنہ 2015 میں خراسانی مشرقی افغانستان میں نیٹو فورسز کی ایک فضائی کارروائی کے دوران زخمی ہوئے تھے۔ پاکستان میں حالیہ برسوں میں ہونے والے دہشت گردی کے متعدد حملوں میں ملوث ہونے کا الزام لگاتے ہوئے اس تنظیم کے خلاف کارروائی کا مطالبہ کرتا رہا ہے۔ گذشتہ سال صوبہ پنجاب کے دارالحکومت لاہور کے گلشن اقبال پارک میں دھماکے میں کم از کم 70 افراد ہلاک ہوئے جن میں 29 بچے شامل تھے۔ جماعت الاحرار نے اس دھماکے کی ذمہ داری قبول کی تھی۔ اس تنظیم نے کوئٹہ میں ایک ہسپتال کے قریب دھماکے کی ذمہ داری بھی قبول کی تھی جس میں 74 افراد ہلاک ہوئے تھے۔ یاد رہے کہ اس سے قبل عمر خراسانی کی ہلاکت کی غیرمصدقہ اطلاعات سامنے آ چکی ہیں۔ ماضی میں جماعت الاحرار خود کو تحریک طالبان پاکستان کی ذیلی جماعت کے طور پر بھی بیان کر چکی ہے۔ جماعت الحرار کا آغاز پاکستان کے قبائلی علاقوں خصوصاً مہمند ایجنسی سے ہوا تھا۔ جماعت الحرار نے اس سال فروری میں ملک میں کارروائیوں کے ایک نئے سلسلے 'غازی آپریشن' کے آغاز کا اعلان کیا تھا۔ لال مسجد اسلام آباد میں 2007 میں فوجی کارروائی میں ہلاک ہونے والے عبدالرشید غازی کا نام اس کارروائی کے لیے استعمال کیا تھا جس پر بعد میں لال مسجد نے اعتراض بھی کیا تھا۔ جماعت الحرار کے سابق ترجمان احسان اللہ احسان نے گذشتہ دنوں شدت پسند کارروائیاں ترک کرتے ہوئے اپنے آپ کو فوج کے حوالے کر دیا تھا۔اس سال جولائی میں سلامتی کونسل نے جماعت الحرار پر پابندیوں کا اعلان کیا تھا۔
Taiuva, 27 de janeiro de 2003. Na pequena cidade no interior de São Paulo, o estudante Edmar Aparecido Freitas, de 18 anos, volta ao colégio onde concluiu o ensino médio, Coronel Benedito Ortiz, cumprimenta a zeladora e se dirige para o pátio. Lá, bem na hora do recreio, saca um revólver calibre 38 e começa a efetuar disparos. Após ferir nove pessoas, entre alunos, professores e funcionários, se mata com um tiro na cabeça. O caso de Taiuva, a 363 km da capital paulista, é o primeiro que se tem notícia de bullying que termina em morte no Brasil - Edmar sofria de obesidade e, mesmo depois de perder 30 quilos, continuou a ser ridicularizado pelos colegas. De lá para cá, pelo menos três outros episódios deixaram um saldo de 16 mortos e 16 feridos. A tragédia mais recente a reacender o debate sobre bullying aconteceu em Goiânia na semana passada, quando um estudante de 14 anos disparou contra colegas, matando dois e ferindo outros quatro. Testemunhas disseram que o aluno sofria com gozações dos colegas, mas os pais e a direção da escola afirmaram não ter conhecimento disso. Ainda se investiga se foi isso o que detonou o episódio. Nesta terça-feira, um boletim hospitalar informou que uma das adolescentes baleadas no caso teve uma lesão na medula e ficou paraplégica. Casos de bullying no ambiente escolar são mais comuns do que se pensa. Segundo dados da Pesquisa Nacional de Saúde do Escolar (PeNSE), 7,4% dos 2,6 milhões de estudantes que cursaram o 9º ano do ensino fundamental em 2015 - algo em torno de 195 mil alunos - afirmaram ter sofrido bullying por parte dos colegas. Entre os que se sentiram humilhados, os principais motivos de chacota foram a aparência do corpo (15,6%) e do rosto (10,9%). O índice de alunos que admitiram já ter chantageado o colega, espalhado boatos ou criado apelidos pejorativos consegue ser ainda maior: 19,8% - ou 520 mil estudantes. Desses, 24,2% são meninos e 15,6%, meninas. "As consequências são as mais variadas e dependem muito de cada indivíduo. No entanto, todas as vítimas, em maior ou menor proporção, sofrem com os ataques", afirma a psiquiatra Ana Beatriz Barbosa Silva, autora do livro Bullying: Mentes Perigosas nas Escolas. "Muitas delas levarão marcas profundas para a vida adulta e precisarão de apoio para superar o problema." O estrago mais evidente é no próprio rendimento escolar dos alunos que sofrem ou praticam esse tipo de agressão física ou psicológica. Essa é uma das conclusões a que chegou a mais recente edição do Programa Internacional de Avaliação de Estudantes (PISA, na sigla em inglês), de 2015. De acordo com o estudo, que avaliou o desempenho escolar de 540 mil estudantes de 72 países, escolas com alta incidência de bullying tendem a apresentar notas mais baixas do que aquelas que procuram combater essa prática dentro e fora de sala de aula. "O bullying traz sérias consequências tanto para o agressor quanto para a vítima", alerta Andreas Schleicher, diretor de Educação da Organização para Cooperação e Desenvolvimento Econômico (OCDE), responsável pela aplicação do PISA. "Tanto aqueles que praticam bullying quanto os que sofrem estão mais sujeitos a tirar notas baixas, faltar às aulas e a largar os estudos que aqueles que não têm relação conflituosa com os colegas." A longo prazo, o impacto pode ser notado não apenas no desempenho escolar do aluno, mas também em sua saúde física e mental. É o que dizem dois estudos - um americano e outro britânico. O primeiro deles, do Hospital Infantil de Boston, nos EUA, revela que quanto mais longo o período em que uma criança ou adolescente sofre ameaça, xingamento ou intimidação, mais grave e duradouro será o impacto sobre a saúde da vítima. Para chegar a essa conclusão, a pediatra Laura Bogart e sua equipe monitoraram a saúde de 4,2 mil estudantes do quinto ao 10º ano. E descobriram que, não importa a idade, sofrer bullying pode causar desde baixa autoestima até quadros de estresse, ansiedade e depressão. O outro estudo é da universidade King's College London, na Inglaterra. A psicóloga Louise Arseneault investigou o histórico médico de mais de 7 mil britânicos desde a época em que tinham entre sete e 11 anos e ainda frequentavam o colégio até a quinta década de vida. E o resultado foi preocupante: indivíduos que sofreram maus-tratos na infância tinham mais propensão que os demais a desenvolver doenças psicossomáticas na vida adulta. "Há uma máxima na medicina que diz: quanto mais cedo você diagnosticar um problema e começar a tratá-lo, melhor será o prognóstico. Esse raciocínio se aplica também ao bullying", alerta o psiquiatra Ricardo Krause, vice-presidente da Associação Brasileira de Neurologia, Psiquiatria Infantil e Profissões Afins (ABENEPI). "Quanto mais cedo você identificar um caso de bullying e começar a combatê-lo, menor será o estrago que ele vai causar na vida tanto da vítima quanto do agressor." Mas, será assim tão fácil identificar um caso de bullying? Especialistas garantem que sim. Para tanto, a agressão deve reunir quatro características: a intenção do autor em ferir o alvo, a repetição da agressão, a presença de um público espectador e a concordância do alvo com relação à ofensa. Em outras palavras: discussões ou brigas pontuais entre alunos não são bullying. Conflitos entre aluno e professor também não. E mais: o bullying físico, aquele que engloba violência como socos, chutes e empurrões, é o de mais fácil identificação. Mas existem outros sete tipos: psicológico, moral, verbal, sexual, social, material e virtual. Meninos praticam (e sofrem) mais bullying físico. Meninas, moral. Quem sofre bullying, não importa o tipo, tende a apresentar um comportamento típico: no recreio, permanece isolado do resto do grupo ou próximo a adultos que podem protegê-lo das investidas do agressor. Em sala de aula, fala pouco, falta muito e tira notas baixas. Nas atividades em grupo, é sempre o último a ser escolhido. Em casa, quando está perto da hora de ir para a escola, costuma se queixar de dor de cabeça, enjoo ou tontura. Por que será? "Em geral, as crianças não relatam seu sofrimento por medo ou vergonha. Por essa razão, a identificação precoce por pais ou professores é de suma importância", avalia Barbosa Silva. Vigora no país desde o dia 9 de fevereiro de 2016 uma lei que obriga as escolas a combater o bullying. O Programa de Combate à Intimidação Sistemática determina que equipes pedagógicas sejam capacitadas para desenvolver ações de prevenção e solução do problema, e que pais e familiares sejam orientados para identificar vítimas e agressores. Estabelece também que sejam realizadas campanhas educativas e fornecida assistência psicológica, social e jurídica a todos os envolvidos. "Na prática, o combate ao bullying não melhorou em nada. O que as escolas fazem é dar palestras para os alunos, passar redação sobre o tema e ponto final. A capacitação dos educadores continua muito fraca e, sem ela, nada vai mudar", avalia a psicóloga Valéria Rezende da Silva, autora do livro Bullying Não É Brincadeira. Mas não basta capacitar os professores. A maioria deles já sabe distinguir entre brincadeira e perseguição, zoeira e ameaça, trolagem e intimidação. É preciso também engajar os pais e responsáveis na vida escolar de seus filhos, na opinião da psicopedagoga Maria Irene Maluf, diretora da Associação Brasileira de Psicopedagogia (ABPp). "Precisamos desfazer a ideia de que o bullying é um problema para os professores resolverem. Na maioria das vezes, ele começa fora dos muros escolares", ressalta Maluf. Soluções para o problema existem, afirma a pedagoga Cléo Fante, autora de Fenômeno Bullying: Como Prevenir a Violência nas Escolas e Educar para a Paz. O mais famoso programa antibullying do mundo talvez seja o finlandês KiVa - acrônimo de "Kiusaamista Vastaan", que significa "Contra o Bullying", em livre tradução. Diferentemente de outras metodologias, que focam o combate e a prevenção na figura da vítima e do agressor, o KiVa parte da premissa que, quando não faz nada, o espectador endossa a ação do agressor. "Em vez de apoiarem os praticantes de bullying ou de se omitirem de ajudar as vítimas, as testemunhas são orientadas a intervir, melhorando o convívio escolar", explica Fante. O KiVa foi criado em 2009 depois que um estudante de 18 anos invadiu sua escola na cidade de Jokela, em Tuusula, e matou oito pessoas. Segundo levantamento com 30 mil alunos de 7 a 15 anos, o modelo pedagógico, desenvolvido por pesquisadores da Universidade de Turku, chegou a erradicar o bullying em até 80% das escolas e a reduzir sua prática em outras 20%. Não por acaso, já foi exportado para mais de 20 países da Europa e América do Sul.
අප්‍රිකාවේ අලි ඇතුන් දඩයම අඛණ්ඩව පස්වෙනි වසරටත් පහළ ගොස් ඇති අතර ලොව පුරා ඇත් දළ තොග අල්ලා ගැනීම් පසුගිය වසර තුළ වාර්තාගත මට්ටමකට ළඟා වී ඇති බව වාර්තාවක් පෙන්වා දෙයි. වඳ වීමේ තර්ජනයට ලක්ව සිටින සත්ත්ව විශේෂ වෙළෙඳාම සම්බන්ධයෙන් කටයුතු කරන Cites ආයතනයේ වාර්තාවකට අනුව ජාවාරම් කරන ලද ඇත් දළ ටොන් 40 සොයා ගෙන ඇත. පසුගිය දශකය තුළ අප්‍රිකානු අලි ඇතුන් 111,000 දඩයමට ලක්ව ඇති අතර එසේ දඩයමට ලක් වීමේ වේගය කලාප ගණනාවක් තුළ ඒකාකාර මට්ටමකට ළඟා වී තිබේ. එම තත්ත්වය සතුටුදායක නමුත් අලි ඇතුන්ගේ ආරක්ෂාව සම්බන්ධයෙන් Cites ආයතනය තවදුරටත් අනතුරු අඟවයි. "ගෝලීය වශයෙන් දියත් කර තිබෙන සාමූහික ප්‍රයත්නයේ ප්‍රතිඵල ලැබෙන්න පටන් ගෙන තිබෙනවා. නමුත් නිසැකවම අප තවමත් අවශ්‍ය තැනට ළඟා වී නැහැ" යනුවෙන් එම ආයතනයේ මහ ලේකම් ජෝන් ස්කැන්ලන් පැවසීය. අදාළ වාර්තාව ප්‍රකාශයට පත් කරනු ලැබුවේ ආසියාව වෙත දළ තොග වශයෙන් අපනයනය නොකර ඒවා යොදා ගනිමින් ආභරණ නිර්මාණය කිරීම අප්‍රිකාව තුළ ඉහළ යමින් පවතින තත්ත්වයක් තුළදීය. තොග වශයෙන් ජාවාරම් කෙරෙන ඇත් දළ අල්ලා ගැනීම පහසුය. පසුගිය දශකය තුළ බරපතළ ලෙස අලි ඇතුන් දඩයමට ලක් වූ නැගෙනහිර අප්‍රිකාව විශේෂ ප්‍රගතියක් ලබා ඇති බව ජෝන් ස්කැන්ලන් සඳහන් කළේය. "දඩයම ඉහළම මට්ටමට ළඟා වූ 2011සිට ස්ථීර පහළ යාමක් දක්නට තිබෙනවා. දඩයමට ලක් වීමේ නැඹුරුව සමස්තයක් වශයෙන් 2008 වසරේ තිබූ මට්ටම දක්වා පහළ ගොස් ඇති බව 2016 වසරේ විශ්ලේෂණ මගින් නිගමනය කළ හැකියි" යනුවෙන් ඔහු වැඩිදුරටත් කියා සිටියේය. පසුගිය දශකයක කාලය ඇතුළත බොට්ස්වානා, දකුණු අප්‍රිකාව සහ නැමීබියාවේ අලි ඇතුන් සම්බන්ධයෙන් සෑහීමකට පත් විය හැකි වුවත් මධ්‍යම අප්‍රිකාවේ අලි ගහනයේ විශාල පහළ යාමක් දැකිය හැකි බව පරිසරවේදීහු පෙන්වා දෙති. එම කලාපය තුළ නීති විරෝධී අලි දඩයම ඉහළ මට්ටමක පවතින බවත් ඔවුහු පවසති. ශ්‍රී ලංකා රේගුව භාරයේ වසර තුනකට අධික කාලයක් පැවති ඇත් දළ තොගයක් 2016 වසරේ ජනවාරි මාසයේ දී කොළඹ ගාලු මුවදොර පිටියේදී ප්‍රසිද්ධියේ විනාශ කෙරිණි. දළ ලබා ගැනීමට මරා දැමුණු සතුන් වෙනුවෙන් සර්වාගමික නායකයන් පැවැත්වූ ආගමික වතාවත්වලින් අනතුරුව එසේ එම දළ විනාශ කෙරිණි. රුපියල් මිලියන 400 ක් පමණ වටිනා එම ඇත් දළ තොගය කොළඹ වාරයේදී අත්අඩංගුවට ගැනුණේ 2012 මැයි මස 12 වෙනිදා ය. මේ අතර ශ්‍රී ලංකාව තුළ වසරකට අලි ඇතුන් 200 ආසන්න සංඛ්‍යාවක් මරණයට පත් වේ බීබීසී සිංහල සේවය වෙත අදහස් දක්වමින් වනජීවී භාරයේ අධ්‍යක්ෂ සී.සී හිදැල්ලආරච්චි කියා සිටියේ ශ්‍රී ලංකාව තුළ අලි ඇතුන් මූලික වශයෙන් මරණයට පත් වන්නේ අලි මිනිස් ගැටුමට මැදිවීමෙන් බවය. සංස්කෘතිමය කරුණු මත ශ්‍රී ලංකාව තුළ අලි ඇතුන්ට සුවිශේෂී ස්ථානයක් පවතින බැවින් ඔවුන් දඩයම් කිරීම ඉතාමත් පහළ මට්ටමක පවතින බව කී වනජීවී භාරයේ අධ්‍යක්ෂවරයා අප්‍රිකානු අලින්ගෙන් 99% දළ පිහිටියත් ශ්‍රී ලංකාවේ අලි අතරින් දළ පිහිටා ඇත්තේ 5% අඩු ප්‍රමාණයකට බව පෙන්වා දුණි. යටත් විජිත පාලන සමයේ දළ ලබා ගැනීම පිණිස ඇතුන් විශාල වශයෙන් දඩයම් කිරීම ද ශ්‍රී ලංකාවේ ඇත් ගහනය පහළ යාමට හේතු වූ බව ඔහු සඳහන් කළේය. "ඇත් දළ වෙළෙඳාම සඳහා අපේ ඇතුන් අල්ලලා මරලා, විශේෂයෙන්ම යුරෝපයට අරන් ගියා. ඇතුන්ගේ වඳ වීමේ ස්වභාවයට එය අද බලපා තිබෙනවා" ඇත් ගහනය අල්ප බැවින් ශ්‍රී ලංකාවේ කැලෑ තුළ වෙසෙන ඇතුන් නිශ්චිත වශයෙන් හඳුනා ගැනීමට වනජීවී නිලධාරීන්ට හැකියාව ලැබී ඇති බව කී වනජීවී භාරයේ අධ්‍යක්ෂවරයා "ඇතෙකු අඩු වුනොත් මොකද වුනේ කියලා මිනිස්සු හොයනවා. ඒ නිසා මරණ ප්‍රමාණය අඩු වෙලා තිබෙනවා" යනුවෙන් සඳහන් කළේය. ශ්‍රී ලංකාව තුළ අලි අතුන් 7000 ආසන්න සංඛ්‍යාවක් වෙසෙන බව පරිසරවේදීන්ගේ මතය වී තිබේ. පසුගිය දශක තුන ඇතුළත කාලය හා බැලීමේ දී අලි ගහනයේ යම් අඩුවක් දක්නට ඇති බව කී වනජීවී භාරයේ අධ්‍යක්ෂ සී.සී හිදැල්ලආරච්චි වනජීවී අමාත්‍යංශය ලබන වසරේ ජනවාරි මාසයේ දී අලි ගහනය පිළිබඳ සමීක්ෂණයක් ආරම්භ කිරීමට සැලසුම් කර ඇති බව සඳහන් කළේය. සබැඳි යොමු:
Se los puede ver encapuchados por las calles de La Paz y El Alto como si estuvieran haciendo algo fuera de la ley. Pero no, los limpiabotas de ambas ciudades bolivianas se cubren el rostro y no están haciendo nada necesariamente ilegal. "Estos son los únicos trabajadores callejeros que se tapan la cara. Se cubren por discriminación, porque hay un estigma social, es un trabajo de baja calidad, a los que recurren porque no hay otra opción", dijo a BBC Mundo el sociólogo boliviano Óscar Rocabado, experto en temas de desarrollo y calidad de empleo. "Algunos dicen bromeando que lo hacen (taparse la cara) por el olor de los pies, pero yo creo que es básicamente por el estigma social. Ellos mismos lo reconocen", agrega Rocabado. En La Paz y El Alto hay entre 3.000 y 3.500 limpiabotas, desde niños hasta personas de la tercera edad, según cálculos de distintas federaciones y fundaciones relacionadas con el oficio. El fotógrafo uruguayo Federico Estol retrató a algunos de ellos y a su trabajo para el proyecto "Héroes del brillo", para alejarlos del estigma que pesa sobre este oficio. La serie fue realizada entre 2015 y 2017 en colaboración con la ONG Hormigón Armado, dedicada a ayudar a los "lustracalzados". Estol contó a BBC Mundo que estos trabajadores son discriminados "por la gente que los conoce, de su entorno, su barrio y su familia". "Es como el trabajo más bajo de la sociedad boliviana", agrega el autor del proyecto. Además, según el sociólogo Rocabado, hay gente que piensa que se drogan con "clefa" o pegamento para zapatos. Entonces los limpiabotas se cubren el rostro para no ser asociados con los que sí lo hacen. El limpiabotas Manuel Castillo, de 28 años, dijo a BBC Mundo que se tapa la cara "porque se ve fuera de lo común" y porque "es algo distintivo de La Paz". Pero también porque trata de "matar el estigma y la discriminación". Castillo limpia zapatos hace 20 años y al inicio no ocultaba su identidad. "Pero empecé a sentir la discriminación, incluso en mi propia familia. En el colegio, cuando se enteraron de que lustraba, empezaron a ocultarme las cosas, me dejaron de hablar, me señalaron...", asegura. Debido a esta situación de discriminación, el autor del proyecto quiso mostrar a los lustrabotas de manera diferente. "Como ocultan su identidad, tienen sus herramientas y cumplen un bien social, ayudan a la gente, tienen todos los elementos de un superhéroe. Entonces usamos todo lo que tiene el cómic para crear una serie de fotos que los mostrara mágicos, como una fantasía", relata Estol. "No los muestro lustrando, si no con una luz saliendo de ellos y a los zapatos los muestro casi como una obra de magia", explica el fotógrafo. Ahora los lustrabotas están vendiendo estas fotos como postales, según Estol, y en noviembre se publicará un libro con las imágenes con el fin de recaudar fondos para que estos trabajadores puedan acceder a un seguro de salud. .
What do Beyonce, the Rolling Stones, U2, AC/DC and Lady Gaga have in common? They all use one London-based specialist logistics firm to move their equipment round the globe. Last year, when Beyonce came to the UK with her Formation world tour it took seven Boeing 747 air freighters and a fleet of more than 70 trucks to get her stage set and other gear to the venues. And that didn't include the backstage staff, musicians, performers - or Beyonce herself. "It was the biggest move we've ever done," says Martin Corr, the managing director of rock and roll transport firm Sound Moves. More firms are choosing to use air freight to get their goods to market, from diamonds to car parts, even though it is six times more expensive than sending them by sea - and rock superstars depend on it too. While air freight makes up just 1% of UK imports and exports in terms of tonnage shipped, it accounts for 40% of imports and exports in terms of their value. In the UK, Heathrow Airport is the dominant player in this trade with £101bn worth of goods passing through in a year. That's more than the value of goods passing through the country's biggest container ports, Felixstowe and Southampton, combined. Despite air cargo's expense, using planes instead of ships cuts down dramatically on the time it takes to get goods to market. "We use Heathrow for most of our air freight. It is close to London, has great road connections, frequent flights and capacity," says Martin Corr. Sound Moves - based in west London close to Heathrow's cargo terminal - is one of the biggest logistics firms in the music industry with an annual turnover of £17m. Over the past 20 years they have worked with everyone from David Bowie and the Rolling Stones to Lady Gaga and now Beyonce. "I left school with little or no qualifications, and was living with my parents lying on the sofa when my mum told me to go out and get a job," says Martin. "Living in west London, Heathrow airport was the obvious place." After working with a general freight company learning his trade, he then moved into the specialised business of moving rock groups and their equipment. In 1996 he started Sound Moves with two colleagues. Martin himself is an AC/DC fan, and an Angus Young Gibson guitar signed by all the members of the band takes pride of place in his office. "But no I don't play it, I never wanted to be a musician," he says. "I am a freight-forwarder through and through - it's what I do." Inside his warehouse, he points out the pallets of sound equipment and music merchandise ready to be shipped anywhere in the world. "You can be in London on a Monday and doing a show in Los Angeles on a Wednesday or Thursday. "We used to have a very seasonal business that was busy up to Christmas, and then from Easter to September with the summer festivals, but now artists tour 12 months a year." Touring is what brings in the merchandise and ticket sales, he says, "and that gets the guys on the road and that's where we come in, we support them on the road". More stories from the BBC's global trade series looking at trade from an international perspective: The country losing out in the breakfast juice battle Why a $1.6bn car plant has been left to decay 'You don't have to be a squillionaire to buy art' The slimming pills that put me in hospital How Scottish salmon conquered the world Read more global trade series here. When Beyonce arrived last year, Sound Moves had to use Doncaster and Prestwick airports rather than Heathrow due to the London airport's lack of flexibility. "It was a rush to get the aircraft unloaded. There's lots of draws on an artist's time. They still want to be seen by the public but in the shortest possible time," he says. The fact that Sound Moves couldn't use Heathrow for Beyonce's tour is significant, says Nick Platts, head of cargo at Heathrow Airport. "I remember having chats with Martin over several days working out how we could help him, but we couldn't offer him the flexibility he needed." The airport is working at almost maximum capacity and he says there is little room for further growth in cargo traffic. "We are pushing traffic away from us. "We need to expand and build a third runway just to satisfy the pent-up demand that is out there, let alone cope with future growth," he says. Both Heathrow and Gatwick are seeing an increase in the amount of air freight they handle - but Gatwick's growth rate is significantly higher. "Our booming long-haul routes have driven a huge cargo increase," says Gatwick Airport's chief executive officer, Stewart Wingate. Perhaps surprisingly only a fraction of air cargo is actually carried in specialised air freighters. Most of it - 95% at Heathrow - is carried in the bellies of passenger aircraft and that can boost an airline's revenues between 5-20%. "Take that away and the route may not be viable," says Heathrow's Nick Platts. "The reason Heathrow is successful is not because we are moving people - it is because we are moving car parts, Scottish salmon, blood plasma products and other medicines, jewellery and precious stones. That is what air freight is good for," he says. Back at Sound Moves, Martin Corr is getting ready for U2's Joshua Tree tour. "It's all planned and organised, they'll be coming into the UK by air over one weekend in July - it's a very tight schedule." He's keen to dispel any idea that his industry is glamorous. "We don't get to hang out at backstage parties or fly on private jets, that's not what we do. "For us there is no day off until the tour is over." Mind you, he does keep one bottle of champagne in his office fridge. "Well it wouldn't be rock and roll without champagne, would it?" he laughs. Follow Tim Bowler on Twitter @timbowlerbbc
Giselle Cycowicz (born Friedman) remembers her father, Wolf, as a warm, kind and religious man. "He was a scholar," she says, "he always had a book open, studying Talmud [compendium of Jewish law], but he was also a businessman and he looked after his family." Before the war, the Friedmans lived a happy, comfortable life in Khust, a Czechoslovak town with a large Jewish population on the fringes of Hungary. All that changed after 1939, when pro-Nazi Hungarian troops, and later Nazi Germany, invaded, and all the town's Jews were deported to Auschwitz. Giselle last saw her father, "strong and healthy", hours after the family arrived at the Birkenau section of the death camp. Wolf had been selected for a workforce but a fellow prisoner under orders would not let her go to him. "That would have been my chance to maybe kiss him the last time," Giselle, now 89, says, her voice cracking with emotion. Giselle, her mother and a sister survived, somehow, five months in "the hell" of Auschwitz. She later learned that in October 1944 "a skeletal man" had passed by the women's camp and relayed a message to anyone alive in there from Khust. "Tell them just now 200 men were brought back from the coal mine. Tell them that tomorrow we won't be here anymore." The man was Wolf Friedman. He was gassed the next day. Six million Jews were murdered by the Nazis and their accomplices during World War Two. In many cases entire towns' Jewish populations were wiped out, with no survivors to bear witness - part of the Nazis' plan for the total annihilation of European Jewry. Since 1954, Israel's Holocaust memorial, Yad Vashem ("A Memorial and a Name"), has been working to recover the names of all the victims, and to date has managed to identify some 4.7 million. "Every name is very important to us," says Dr Alexander Avram, director of Yad Vashem's Hall of Names and the Central Database of Shoah [Holocaust] Victims' Names. "Every new name we can add to our database is a victory against the Nazis, against the intent of the Nazis to wipe out the Jewish people. Every new name is a small victory against oblivion." The institution, a sprawling complex of buildings, trees and gardens on the western slopes of Mount Herzl, gathers details about the victims in two ways: through information from those with knowledge of the deceased, and archive sources, ranging from Nazi deportation lists to Jewish school yearbooks. Today Giselle has come to dedicate her father's name, nearly 73 years after he was killed, a small piece in a vast jigsaw. She is helped by trained staff through the process of recording Wolf's details on a Page of Testimony, a one-page form for documenting biographical information about the deceased, such as where they lived before the War, their occupation and the members of their family, and, if available, a photograph. "Only two-thirds of the way down do we ask where they were during the war and what happened to them," Cynthia Wroclawski, deputy director of Yad Vashem's Archives Division, points out. "We're interested in seeing a person as a person and who they were before they became a victim." It is, the institution says, a kind of paper tombstone. So far Yad Vashem has collected 2.7m Pages of Testimony. Each is stored in black boxes, each containing 300 pages - 9,000 boxes in all. They are kept in climate-controlled conditions on shelves surrounding a central installation, a 30ft-high conical lined with the faces of men, women and children who were murdered, rising up towards the sky. Here in the Hall of Names groups of visitors pass through in quiet contemplation. There is space on the shelves for 11,000 more boxes - or 6m names in all. With the last survivors dying out, Yad Vashem is facing a race against time to prevent more than a million unidentified victims disappearing without a trace. This is apparent in the decreasing number of Pages of Testimony it receives - down from at least 2,000 per month five years ago to about 1,600 per month currently. The memorial is trying to raise awareness, including among Holocaust survivors who have not yet come forward. For decades, for many of them the experience was still too painful to talk about. "It's quite a common occurrence, not only in Holocaust survivors but survivors of prolonged and extreme trauma in childhood," says Dr Martin Auerbach, Clinical Director at Amcha, a support service in Jerusalem for Holocaust survivors. That began to change, he says, after about 30 or 40 years, when many survivors started talking about what happened, not with their children but with their inquisitive grandchildren. Dr Auerbach sees the Names Recovery Project as a valuable part of the healing process. "Filling out this page of information saying this was my father, mother, grandfather, nephews and nieces - you cannot bury your relatives who perished but you can remember them in a way that will commemorate them forever, so this is very important and also therapeutic for many survivors." While Yad Vashem has made great strides in identifying victims from Western and Central Europe - about 95% have now been named - far fewer names have been uncovered in Nazi-occupied areas of Eastern Europe, where about 4.5m Jews were murdered. This is because while there was an organised, official process of arrest and deportation further west, in the east whole communities were marched off and massacred without any such formalities. An estimated 1.5m Jews alone were shot to death by the Einsatzgruppen (mobile killing squads) in what has become known as the Holocaust by Bullets, after Nazi Germany invaded the Soviet Union in June 1941. In Babi Yar, in Ukraine, for instance, of the 33,000 Jews from Kiev and its surroundings who were slaughtered in a ravine in September 1941 in the largest massacre of its kind, about half are yet to be identified. Others not murdered by the Einsatzgruppen died, without a trace, from starvation or exhaustion in ghettos and labour camps, or were killed in nearby extermination camps, where they had been herded without any kind of processing. Yad Vashem is working with Jewish organisations in those countries to try to reach remaining survivors in the former Soviet Union, where the Holocaust was not officially commemorated, and who may have little awareness of the memorial's existence. It is a massive and often complex task. The memorial holds some 205m Holocaust-related documents, which are examined meticulously in the search for names. "There is a lot of documentation where there are names that are very scattered," says Dr Avram. "Names mentioned in a letter here or a report there. This can be very labour intensive. Sometimes you have to go through thousands and thousands of pages just to retrieve a few dozen names." The difficulty is compounded by the fact that sources can be in 30-40 different languages, most are handwritten and can be in different scripts, such as Latin, Hebrew and Cyrillic. "Our staff not only need to be linguists but they need to know calligraphy," says Dr Avram, himself a language expert. One of the biggest gaps is with children, of whom some 1.5 million were murdered in the Holocaust. Only about half have been identified. "It's one of the saddest things," says Dr Avram. "We have reports where parents are named with say three or four children, unnamed. They were little children and people just don't remember." The aim is to turn them from anonymous statistics into human beings again, like seven-year-old Edward-Edik Tonkonogi, from Satanov in Ukraine. His childish innocence and sweetness of character come across in a letter he wrote in 1941 to his parents who were travelling with a Russian theatre troupe: Edik was murdered after the Nazis entered the town that same year. His name was later memorialised in a Page of Testimony by a relative. As time moves on, the task of finding missing names is getting harder in some respects but easier in others. The availability of source material is greater than ever and advances in technology mean it can be a less arduous task to gather information and manipulate the data. However, the fewer the names left to uncover, the more activity it takes to find them. The digital age also means there are more tools at researchers' disposal than ever before. The department searching for names recently took to social media, including Facebook, in a push to reach untapped survivors. The campaign generated many new Pages of Testimony. "When you're talking about social media you have the younger generation now understanding that those names are not in our database and trying to find out the information from their family members," says Sara Berkowitz, manager of the Names Recovery Project. There is another significant, sometimes life-changing, outcome of the growth of the names database, which has been available online since 2004. It has led to emotional reunions of survivors who had lived their lives not knowing there was anyone else from their family left alive. Last year two sets of families belonging to two sisters, each of whom thought the other had perished in the Holocaust, were united after a chance discovery through the Pages of Testimony. It transpired the sisters had lived out their lives just 25 minutes away from each other in northern Israel, but passed away without ever being aware. In 2015 a pair of half-siblings who did not know the other was alive were reunited as a result of searching the database, while in 2006 a brother and sister, one living in Canada and the other in Israel, were reunited 65 years after becoming separated in their hometown in Romania. The project has also brought to light other, unfortunate findings. Argentinean-born Claudia de Levie, whose parents fled Germany in the 1930s, believed she had lost four or five relatives in the Holocaust. A search of the database to help with her daughter's homework revealed in fact 180 family members had been killed. Further research however revealed through a signature on a Page of Testimony the existence of cousins of her husband, living in Hamburg. The families now speak to each other each week on Skype. Ironically, a chief architect of the Holocaust, Adolf Eichmann, lived as a fugitive in the same neighbourhood as Claudia when she was a child in Argentina, as she would later learn. The importance of the mission to recover victims' names received global recognition in 2013 when the United Nations cultural agency, Unesco, included the collection in its Memory of the World register. The agency lauded it as "unprecedented in human history", pointing out that the project had given rise to similar efforts in other places of genocide, such as Rwanda and Cambodia. Despite the millions of names recorded so far, there is still a long way to go if all six million are ever to be recovered, but those behind the project remain determined. "I personally would like that we do reach that goal, that at least among those who perished there won't be a person who remains unknown. It's our moral imperative," says Sara Berkowitz. "Until I sit in the office and days will pass by and I won't have work to do, I'll know that we've more or less raked the universe to try to get to every name and there is no more there."
حذر أطباء من أن حياة توأم فلسطيني ملتصق في خطر، ما لم يتم نقلهما للعلاج خارج قطاع غزة. وقال الدكتور علام أبو حامدة من مستشفى الشفاء في غزة إن "الحالة المعقدة" للطفلتين الملتصقتين تجعل من الصعب على الكادر الطبي في القطاع الخاضع للحصار من إسرائيل ومصر علاجهما. وأضاف أنه يأمل في نقلهما إلى الخارج لإجراء عملية فصلهما. وتلتصق الطفلتان في منطقة البطن والأجزاء السفلى من جسميهما. وقد ولدتا السبت الماضي. وأفاد الأطباء أن إحداهما أضعف من الأخرى. ويمتلك التوأم رجلا مشتركة، ولكن لكل منهما قلب ورئتان. وعادة ما تكون حظوظ العيش بالنسبة التوائم الملتصقة المشتركة في أعضاء رئيسية في الجسم أقل من التوائم الأخرى. ونقلت صحيفة "تايمز أوف إسرائيل" عن أبو حامدة قوله "إن حياتهما في خطر وحالتهما معقدة". وأضاف أن حالة إحدى الطفلتين الصحية جيدة لكن الأخرى تعاني من مشكلات تنفسية. وأكمل أن "فرص انقاذهما تزداد كلما أسرعنا بنقلهما الى الخارج". وقالت الهيئة العسكرية الاسرائيلية المسؤولة عن تنسيق الدخول والخروج من قطاع غزة إنها لم تتلق أي طلب لخروج التوأم من القطاع. وأوضح أبو حامدة أن خيارات العلاج تشمل إسرائيل والولايات المتحدة والمملكة العربية السعودية. وقد ولد توأم ملتصق آخر في غزة في نوفمبر/تشرين الثاني 2016 ، لكن توفي في وقت لاحق. وتواصل إسرائيل ومصر فرض حصار بري وبحري على القطاع لنحو عقد وتبرران ذلك بمحاولة منع هجمات يشنها مسلحون انطلاقا منه. وقادت هذه التقييدات ودورة النزاعات المسلحة والانقسام السياسي الفلسطيني وتخفيضات في الميزانية إلى تدهور خطير في الخدمات الصحية في القطاع، بحسب الأمم المتحدة. وقد أجبر الشح الحاد في الطاقة في وقت سابق هذا العام المستشفيات على تأجيل إجراء عمليات جراحية مقررة وإخراج مرضى قبيل إكمال علاجهم، وتخفيض اجراءات التنظيف والعناية في المنشآت الطبية. اضغط هنا لتنزيل تطبيق بي بي سي عربي الخاص بمستخدمي نظام أندرويد
İngiltere'nin piyasadaki rekabet koşullarını araştıran kurumu Rekabet ve Piyasalar Kurumu (CMA), otel rezervasyonu sitelerinin müşterileri yanıltıp yanıltmadığını görmek için bir soruşturma başlattı. Kurum, bu sitelerin müşterilere yardım etmek yerine işlerini daha da zorlaştırdığından kuşkulandığını açıkladı. CMA, yaptığı açıklamada bu sitelerin verdiği bilgilerin 'açık, doğru ve iyi bir şekilde sunulduğundan' emin olmak amacı taşıdıklarını belirtti. Expedia ve Booking.com ülkenin önde gelen otel rezervasyonu sitelerinden. Türkiye'de de Booking.com'un faaliyetleri, Türkiye Seyahat Acentaları Birliği'nin (TÜRSAB) açtığı dava üzerine haksız rekabete neden olduğu gerekçesiyle 29 Mart'ta durdurulmuştu. Çoğunluğuna Expedia'nın sahip olduğu Trivago, yaptığı açıklamada CMA ile işbirliği yapacaklarını söyledi. Booking.com ise şimdilik bir yorumda bulunmayacaklarını söyledi. CMA'ya göre otel rezervasyonu yapan kişilerin yüzde 70'i internet arama sitelerini kullanıyor. CMA'nın üst düzey yöneticilerinden Nisha Arora, bu sitelerin ortaya çıkardığı otel sıralamasının sadece müştelerin girdiği tercihlerle belirlenmediğini, ticari kaygıların da sıralamada rol oynadığını belirtti. CMA, aynı zamanda otellerde kaç odanın kaldığının nasıl gösterildiğine dair da bir araştırma yapacak. Sitelerin bu bilgileri nasıl topladığı belirlenerek bu verilerin 'satış baskısı' yaratmak için kullanılıp kullanılmadığına bakılacak. İngiliz Konukseverlik Birliği (BHA) ise bazı üyelerinin online rezervasyon sitelerinin gücünden ötürü kaygı duyduğunu belirtti. Yüksek komisyon ücretleri, bilgilerin yanlış sunulması, satış için baskı kurulması ve şeffaf olmamaları yöneltilen eleştiriler arasında. BHA aynı zamanda müşterilerin bir odaya ödemesi gerekenden daha çok ödediğini de belirtti.
پاکستان کے میڈیم فاسٹ بولر حسن علی ایک روزہ کرکٹ کی عالمی درجہ بندی میں پہلے نمبر پر پہنچ گئے ہیں۔ عالمی کرکٹ کونسل کی جانب سے جمعے کو جاری کی گئی تازہ ترین فہرست کے مطابق حسن علی 743 پوائنٹس کے ساتھ سرفہرست ہیں۔ بولنگ کا حساب دان حسن علی کوچ کے پلان پر عمل کیا، فرق سب کے سامنے ہے: حسن علی گذشتہ فہرست میں وہ ساتویں پوزیشن پر تھے اور حالیہ میچوں میں ان کی شاندار کارکردگی کی بدولت ان کی درجہ بندی میں چھ درجوں کی بہتری آئی ہے۔ وہ اس سال پہلی پوزیشن حاصل کرنے والے پانچویں بولر بن گئے ہیں، اس سے قبل سرفہرست بولروں میں ٹرینٹ بولٹ، عمران طاہر، کاگیسو ربادا اور جوش ہیزل ووڈ شامل ہیں۔ پاکستان کی سری لنکا کے خلاف حالیہ ایک روزہ سیریز میں بھی حسن علی کی کارکردگی متاثر کن رہی ہے۔ 23 سالہ حسن علی سری لنکا کے خلاف جاری ایک روزہ سیریز میں اب تک نو وکٹیں حاصل کر چکے ہیں۔ انھوں نے سری لنکا کے خلاف ابوظہبی میں ہونے والے تیسرے ون ڈے انٹرنیشنل میں بیک وقت تین اہم سنگ میل بھی عبور کیے ہیں۔ اس میچ میں انھوں نے نہ صرف اپنے کریئر کی بہترین بولنگ کرتے ہوئے پانچ وکٹیں لی تھیں بلکہ وہ اس سال ون ڈے انٹرنیشنل میچوں میں سب سے زیادہ وکٹیں حاصل کرنے والے بولر بھی بن گئے ہیں۔ اس کے ساتھ انھوں نے سب سے کم ون ڈے میچوں میں وکٹوں کی نصف سنچری مکمل کرنے والے پاکستانی بولر ہونے کا اعزاز بھی حاصل کیا۔ حسن علی نے اس میچ میں 34 رنز دے کر پانچ وکٹیں حاصل کیں اس طرح اس سال ان کی 16 ون ڈے میچوں میں وکٹوں کی تعداد 40 ہوگئی ہے اس طرح وہ افغانستان کے راشد خان اور انگلینڈ کے لیئم پلنکٹ سے آگے نکل گئے ہیں۔ حسن علی کی 34 رنز کے عوض پانچ وکٹوں کی یہ کارکردگی ان کے کریئر کی بہترین بولنگ بھی ہے۔ اس سے قبل ان کی سب سے بہترین بولنگ 38 رنز کے عوض پانچ وکٹ تھی جو انہوں نے اس سال ویسٹ انڈیز کے خلاف دکھائی تھی۔ حسن علی نے اپنے 24 ویں ون ڈے انٹرنیشنل میں وکٹوں کی نصف سنچری مکمل کی اور یوں انھوں نے وقاریونس کا 27 ون ڈے میچوں میں پچاس وکٹیں مکمل کرنے کا پاکستانی ریکارڈ بھی توڑا۔ حسن علی نے اپنے ایک روزہ کریئر کا آغاز اگست 2016 میں آئرلینڈ کے خلاف ڈبلن میں کیا تھا اور وہ اب تک 24 میچوں میں 51 وکٹیں حاصل کر چکے ہیں۔ دوسری جانب آل راؤنڈرز کی فہرست میں پاکستانی آل راؤنڈر محمد حفیظ نے بنگلہ دیش کے شکیب الحسن کو پیچھے چھوڑتے ہوئے پہلی پوزیشن حاصل کر لی ہے۔ محمد حفیظ نے پہلی بار یہ اعزاز جنوری 2013 میں حاصل کیا تھا اور نو بار انھیں نمبر ایک آل راؤنڈر قرار دیا جا چکا ہے۔ اس کے علاوہ پاکستانی بلے باز بابر اعظم کی درجہ بندی میں بھی بہتری آئی ہے اور وہ اب چوتھے نمبر پر ہیں۔
A stables worker has died after being injured at Kempton Park racecourse. It is thought the groom, who has been named by his employer as Ken Dooley, was kicked by a horse. Surrey Police said it had been reported a man in his 50s sustained a serious injury to the head while tending to a horse in the stables. Mr Dooley had worked at the West Sussex yard of horse trainer Amanda Perrett, who said he had been with the close-knit family business for seven years. In a statement, Ms Perrett said: "It is with huge sadness that I can confirm we lost our friend and colleague Ken Dooley after an incident in the stable yard at Kempton last night. "He was an excellent employee, very experienced with racehorses having worked all of his life with them as a jockey, trainer and jockey coach around the world." Police were called to the Sunbury-on-Thames venue at 21:20 BST, and doctors at the course also attended. Saturday's fixture was abandoned with two races remaining as emergency teams responded to the accident. A police spokeswoman confirmed the death was not being treated as suspicious and also said the man's family had been informed. She said police would be working with the coroner and local authority to establish the circumstances surrounding Mr Dooley's death. Jockey Martin Dwyer, who was riding at the course, told Racing UK there was a "sombre mood" and shock as the news emerged. He said: "Unfortunately, horses do kick out and I believe that's what happened. "They have metal shoes on and if you get a kick from a horse it can be very serious." Staff as well as jockeys at Chepstow and Goodwood are wearing black armbands on Sunday as a mark of respect. In a statement, the Racecourse Association said: "Racecourses do everything they can to provide a safe working environment in all areas and are equipped to provide the highest level of medical care and attention whenever it is required. "This tragic accident is a reminder of the dangerous nature of the work stable staff do day in day out, and our thoughts are very much with everybody affected." Chief executive of the British Horseracing Authority Nick Rust said: "The entire industry will join in mourning over this tragedy. "We owe so much in our sport to the racing grooms who provide such first-class care and attention to our horses. "The love and attention that they give to their mounts is unconditional and comes with that small but ever-present level of risk that exists when working with large animals." Organisers at Kempton Park - one of the UK's best known racecourses - announced Saturday's cancellation on social media. Steve Parlett, general manager at the racecourse, said: "All the team here are shocked and upset by the sad loss of a training stables employee last night. "Our thoughts and deepest condolences are very much with his family, friends and colleagues."
Twitter is banning two of Russia's biggest media outlets from buying advertising amid fears they attempted to interfere with the 2016 US election. The ban on advertising from Russia Today (RT) and Sputnik, and all linked accounts, was "effective immediately". US authorities say both act as "a platform for Kremlin messaging". The social media giant will donate an estimated $1.9m (£1.4m) made from the outlets into research on Twitter's use in "civic engagement and elections". Twitter said the decision "was based on the retrospective work we've been doing around the 2016 US election and the US intelligence community's conclusion that both RT and Sputnik attempted to interfere with the election on behalf of the Russian government". The statement, published on the social media platform's blog, continued: "We did not come to this decision lightly, and are taking this step now as part of our ongoing commitment to help protect the integrity of the user experience on Twitter." The decision has provoked an angry response in Russia, with the country's foreign ministry accusing Twitter of bowing to pressure from the US intelligence services, saying the move was "another aggressive step" aimed at blocking Russian media in the US. It added "retaliatory measures" would follow, according to RIA Novosti news agency [in Russian], Meanwhile, responding to the allegations, RT's deputy editor-in-chief Kirill Karnovich-Valua said the outlet "has never been involved in any illegal activity online, and that it never pursued an agenda of influencing the US election through any platforms". His comments followed those of RT editor-in-chief Margarita Simonyan, who used Twitter's own platform to accuse the social network of pushing them to "spend big" during the election. Twitter did not comment when asked about the accusation, Reuters news agency said. Sputnik told news agency AFP it "has never used advertising on Twitter". Twitter is one of a number of companies keen to show they can self-regulate after it was found that Russian-backed groups were exploiting its ad platform. Its lawyers are due to appear before public hearings of the Senate and House intelligence committees to discuss possible interference on 1 November. Russia has repeatedly denied claims that it interfered in the 2016 elections. US intelligence services accuse the country of trying to sway the vote in Donald Trump's favour in various ways, including by spreading fake news and hacking the Democratic National Committee (DNC) networks in order to undermine rival Hillary Clinton. The allegations have sparked an investigation into possible links between Russia and Mr Trump, led by special counsel Rob Mueller, a former FBI director. Mr Trump denies there was any collusion.
The UK and the EU must agree on a Brexit transition deal by Christmas or risk banks triggering their contingency plans, the Bank of England has warned. Deputy governor Sam Woods said that while the UK is committed to an implementation period, the EU's position "is not yet clear". If no deal is reached, banks will begin a potentially disorderly shift of operations overseas. He said that would mean banks becoming more complex and harder to supervise. Speaking at the annual Mansion House City banquet in London, Mr Woods said: "If we get to Christmas and the negotiations have not reached any agreement on this topic, diminishing marginal returns will kick in." He said: "Contingency planning is a sliding scale of increased commitment, investment and momentum through time. It is much more prudent and prosaic than hovering over the relocate button or rushing to the exit door." While he said that the first phase of banks' contingency plans would have a relatively modest impact on jobs, "re-structuring by firms will in general increase their complexity". "I struggle to see an outcome in which banks and insurers do not get harder to supervise and harder to resolve for all involved," said Mr Woods, who heads the Prudential Regulatory Authority, which oversees large lenders in the UK. In her speech in Florence last month, Prime Minister Theresa May said there should be a transition period of "about" two years after Brexit.
قررت شركة فورد أن تهدي ناشطة سعودية السيارة التي تحلم بها، وذلك بعد قرار تاريخي سمح للمرأة بقيادة السيارة في المملكة. وكتبت شركة فورد للشرق الأوسط على تويتر أن لديها سيارة موستانغ صفراء ستمنحها هدية لسحر ناصف، الناشطة السعودية في مجال حقوق المرأة، والتي اعلنت عن إعجابها بالسيارة في مقابلة بعيد إصدار القرار بالسماح للمرأة بقيادة السيارة. وقالت فورد للشرق الأوسط في تغريدة موجهة لناصف "نود أن نهديك سيارة أحلامك". وألحقتها بتغريدة تقول "سيارتك الموستانغ في انتظارك"، وارفقت معها صورة سيارة تنطلق مسرعة داخل نفق، ومعها هاشتاغ "موستانغ سحر". وكانت السعودية أعلنت الثلاثاء الماضي أنها ستسمح للنساء بقيادة السيارة بدءا من يونيو/حزيران 2018، منهية بذلك السياسة التي كانت تحد على مدى أعوام من قدرة المرأة على الحركة. وفتح القرار سوقا مربحة للسيارات، إذ كثفت كثير من الشركات جهودها لجذب زبونات جديدات. وفي الأعوام القليلة الماضية كانت الناشطات السعوديات يعتقلن لمجرد جلوسهن خلف عجلة القيادة في السيارة. وفي احتجاج نادر في السعودية، شكلت 47 امرأة موكبا وقدن سياراتهن في العاصمة الرياض عام 1990 للتظاهر ضد منعهن من القيادة. واحتجزت الناشطات ولم يطلق سراحهن إلا بعد تعهد أوصياؤهن الرجال بألا يكررن الأمر. وما زالت السعودية تطبق أشد ، إذ لا يسمح للمرأة بالدراسة أو السفر أو غيرها من الأنشطة دون موافقة محرم.
"We'll see" - with two words President Donald Trump has shovelled grist into Washington DC's rumour mill, which is filled with chatter that White House chief strategist Steve Bannon is a marked man. The so-called Trump whisperer has proved himself one of the administration's great survivors - so far. Steve Bannon, the chief White House strategist, is Death warmed up. By that I mean the characterisation of him by the US comedy circuit - literally as "Death" - is in stark contrast to the persona he projects when you meet him privately. He's full of surprises, and he has an infectious laugh. I've spoken with him on a number of occasions over the past few months. We've chatted about Nigel Farage, who led the Brexit campaign in the UK, and a variety of other topics: he doesn't drink, as I learned. He likes English tea ("a cuppa," he says). Still, he has a wicked reputation - and has frequently been cast as a malevolent force in the West Wing by those outside of the administration and by insiders, too. The anti-Bannon contingent includes Rupert Murdoch, the Fox News founder who's repeatedly lobbied the president, according to the New York Times, for the strategist to be sacked. At a news conference in New York on Tuesday, President Trump was asked whether he had confidence in Mr Bannon. And his tepid answer can't have been very reassuring to the White House chief strategist. "I like him," said the president. "He's a good man, he's not a racist, I can tell you that. "He's a good person. He actually gets a very unfair press in that regard. "But we'll see what happens with Mr Bannon." Other White House officials are watching as closely as everyone else. One of the president's aides has previously told me in a despairing tone that Mr Bannon supported the "deconstruction of the administrative state". The aide looked at me as if to say: how do you work with someone like that? Mr Bannon pushed hard for the dismantling of the system and the trashing of the elites. He argued that this unconventional approach was the best way to improve economic conditions and employment prospects for ordinary working people in the US, the voters who helped propel Mr Trump into the White House. Mr Bannon sees the world in stark terms. He has been a strong proponent of the America First agenda, along with stricter border and immigration policies. The power structure at the White House has been constantly changing, but Mr Bannon was a key player in the administration from the beginning and has influenced the president on these policies in a significant manner. Mr Bannon has apparently been at odds with so-called moderates in the administration, a group that includes the president's son-in-law, Jared Kushner, a senior adviser, and Gary Cohn, the director of the national economic council, both of whom want to take a more measured approach to changing the government. In contrast, Mr Bannon has pushed for upheaval. He kept a whiteboard in his West Wing office, covered in scribbled-out goals such as "Suspend immigration from terror prone regions". He was known for the way that he trashed the press, telling reporters they had been "humiliated" by the Democratic defeat in the autumn, and he encouraged the president to demonise the media. He's also been accused of encouraging or at least tolerating racist, nationalist views among those who make up the president's base of support. Mr Bannon's ideological leanings are nothing new. He supported radical political reform while he was the head of Breitbart News, a website he described as a "platform for the alt-right", a movement that included the Ku Klux Klan and other white nationalist groups. He pushed for the same agenda while he was working on Mr Trump's presidential campaign. Mr Bannon has millions of admirers, people who see the world in the way he does and also want to wreak havoc on the Washington establishment. One of the most important ones is Rebekah Mercer. The daughter of a New York investor, Robert Mercer, she has known Mr Bannon for years and helped to fund his enterprises. Robert Mercer, as the New Yorker's Jane Mayer has documented, is an enigmatic libertarian and a key force behind Mr Trump's victory. Mr Bannon revelled in the populist uprising of Mr Trump and continued to stir things up after he won. At a rally for the president in Melbourne, Florida, in February, Mr Bannon looked on the crowd with a smile. He is polite (he's from the South) and charismatic, and White House aides have invariably tended to gravitate towards him. Reince Priebus, the former White House chief of staff, used to bound up to Mr Bannon in a crowd, as if he were afraid he might miss something. A bear of a man, Mr Bannon looked rumpled when he travelled with the president, and he'd often smooth down his hair with his hand, trying to make himself more presentable. Still his hair always looked messy. Once we were supposed to meet in the West Wing at night. It was after 10pm on a Friday, and I waited outside the building. The place was quiet, and the lights from the building cast strange shadows on the ground. As it turned out, he worked late into the night ("still grinding," he texted me) and then, House-of-Cards style, disappeared into the darkness. It's not clear whether Mr Bannon will ever be sacked. It's also not certain what the impact of his departure would be on the administration. He could marshal the dark forces of the internet and his Breitbart audience, swinging a wrecking ball at the Trump presidency. Some analysts believe the president will keep Mr Bannon at the White House because he's afraid that he'd do too much damage if he were thrown out. But there are other possibilities: if he left the White House on good terms, Mr Bannon could go back to Breitbart and push for policy changes in the administration from a strong position in the conservative media. Or he could simply disappear into the night, as I've seen him do in the past.
Former Presidents Barack Obama and George W Bush have voiced concern about the current political climate in the US, in comments seen as a veiled rebuke of Donald Trump's leadership. Mr Obama urged Americans to reject the politics of "division" and "fear", while Mr Bush criticised "bullying and prejudice" in public life. They were speaking separately. Neither mentioned President Trump by name. Mr Trump, who has been critical of his two predecessors, is yet to comment. Ex-presidents traditionally shy away from commenting publicly on their successors, and Mr Obama said on leaving office he would extend that courtesy for a time to Mr Trump, as George W Bush had to him. He has broken his silence since to issue statements on Mr Trump's efforts to dismantle Obamacare, as well as his controversial "Muslim ban" and decision to abandon the Paris climate accord. Speaking at a Democratic campaign event in Newark, New Jersey, Mr Obama said Americans should "send a message to the world that we are rejecting a politics of division, we are rejecting a politics of fear". He added: "What we can't have is the same old politics of division that we have seen so many times before that dates back centuries. "Some of the politics we see now, we thought we put that to bed. That's folks looking 50 years back. It's the 21st Century, not the 19th Century. Come on!" He touched on similar themes at another event later in Richmond, Virginia, saying: "We've got folks who are deliberately trying to make folks angry, to demonise people who have different ideas, to get the base all riled up because it provides a short-term tactical advantage." Speaking just hours earlier in New York, Mr Bush said: "Bigotry seems emboldened. Our politics seems more vulnerable to conspiracy theories and outright fabrication. "There are some signs that the intensity of support for democracy itself has waned - especially among the young." Americans, he said, have "seen our discourse degraded by casual cruelty". "At times it can seem like the forces pulling us apart are stronger than the forces binding us together. "We've seen nationalism distorted into nativism, forgotten the dynamism that immigration has always brought to America." Both former presidents have until now largely avoided commenting publicly on Mr Trump's policies. Before his election last year, Mr Trump was highly critical of both Mr Obama and Mr Bush, describing each of them at one time or another as "perhaps the worst president in the history" of the US. Since his inauguration in January, Mr Trump's combative style and direct public comments on a number of key issues have caused controversy both among Democrats and Republicans. He has regularly blamed the media, which he says do not focus on his achievements and instead choose to concentrate on what he describes as "fake news". Analysis by Gary O'Donoghue in Richmond, Virginia President Barack Obama still knows how to draw a crowd - and they queued round the block for hours to see him speak. If they were hoping for head-on attacks on Donald Trump, they were to be disappointed. However, the criticisms when they came were scarcely veiled - with talk of pandering to the extremes and sowing divisiveness. The speech followed a much more full-frontal attack on the current political situation by former Republican President George W Bush. He talked about bigotry and falsehood threatening American democracy - while celebrating immigration and arguing for a more open trade policy. These attacks certainly aren't co-ordinated - but they do demonstrate just how widely concerns about the current president are shared.
A schoolboy footballer is making regular 320-mile round trips from his home in the Western Isles to play for Greenock Morton FC's under-11s. Matthew Davidson, 10, travels from the Isle of Barra for training sessions and matches with the Scottish Championship club as often as twice a week. The midfielder played for Barra's Castlebay Community School before being spotted at a trials session. Airline Loganair is helping Matthew with his travel arrangements. Loganair operates flights from Barra's beach runway to Glasgow, from where Matthew can travel to Greenock. Greenock Morton chief executive Warren Hawke said: "In recent years we have seen a number of players, such as Rothesay's Jim McAlister and Dunoon's Lewis Strapp, overcome geographic challenges to become professional footballers at Greenock Morton. "None of those were quite on the same scale as young Matthew Davidson though, who travels all the way from his home on the Isle of Barra in the Outer Hebrides to train and turn out for our academy's under-11s side." The football academy's Ross Gourdie added: "He definitely has a lot of raw talent, standing out during the trial sessions. "Matthew combines speed with an incredible control of the ball for a young lad of his age, really impressive when you consider he has just been playing school football. "Geography is obviously a bit of an issue but we're doing our best to help him train at home and he is still impressing us during matches every weekend." Matthew, a Celtic and Real Madrid fan, recently scored a hat-trick against a St Mirren youth team. His signing of a contract with Greenock Morton last year was described as "absolutely brilliant" by his local football club, Barra FC.
تعلم لغة جديدة، البحث عن سكن، العمل والاستقلال المادي، البحث عن شريك حياة، أو إنهاء زواج مدمّر، جميعها تحديات قد تواجه المرأة المهاجرة، فكيف لو كانت عربية وتحمل معها تقاليد اجتماعية قد لا تسهل عليها عملية الاندماج في مجتمع غربي؟ في نهاية موسم 100 امرأة الذي أحيته بي بي سي، سنسلط الضوء على تجارب ناجحة لبعض النساء العربيات اللواتي جئن إلى بريطانيا لبدء حياة جديدة. لست بحاجة إلى أن أتبع تياراً أو حزباً أو زعيماً سياسياً معيناً لأنجح هنا كما قد يحصل في بلدي استطاعت مريم أن تحول فاجعة أصابت عائلتها إلى نجاح ما زالت تحصد ثماره إلى اليوم. هي الآن شاعرة وكاتبة روائية وأستاذة لغة عربية في SOAS - كلية الدراسات الشرقية والإفريقية التابعة لجامعة لندن - منذ أكثر من عشر سنوات.. رصيدها روايتان، وعدة مجموعات شعرية بالإضافة لمقالات في صحف عربية.‬‬‬‬ لم تكن أي من هذه الانجازات في بال مريم في بداية مشوارها في بريطانيا. وحين سألتها عن سبب مجيئها إلى لندن أجابت: "لم أكن أريد سوى تكوين أسرة. فأنا ترعرعت في لبنان خلال فترة الحرب الأهلية. ودرست الأدب العربي في الجامعة، وكتبت الشعر، وتزوجت. لكني أردت مكاناً أكثر أماناً لأبدأ فيه تأسيس عائلتي". كتبت مريم عن ذكرياتها في الحرب الأهلية اللبنانية والقذائف التي تجنبتها في طفولتها، لكنها لم تكن أشد ما آلمها. ففي بريطانيا، أنجبت ابنها الأول "انطوني". لكنه أصيب بالسرطان ومات عندما كان عمره خمس سنوات. مشتتة بين حزنها على ابنها وحروب الوطن العربي وقطار الحياة السريع في لندن، عادت مريم إلى الكتابة، لأن "الكتابة علاج نفسي من كل خيبة". وتقول مريم: "كانت قضيتي ابني. حملته معي في كل كتاباتي. ولاقت هذه القضية اهتمام جمهور عربي في بريطانيا لأننا كعرب ننجذب للقضايا الحزينة...للأسف الحزن أصبح من أهم مقومات نجاح قضية ما. تلقيت دعماً من عدة مراكز ثقافية عربية هنا ومن الجاليات العربية أيضاً. ومن ثم حضر الإعلام، وحتى جامعة "سواس" ساعدتني كثيراً". انفعلت مريم وأكملت الحديث: "القيم الإنسانية عالية في لندن. هذه المدينة أصبحت بالنسبة لي مدينة للإنسان المبدع. لست بحاجة لأن آتي من خلفية سياسية معيّنة لأنجح في عملي ومجتمعي، ولا حتى أن أتبع تيارا أو حزبا أو زعيما سياسيا كما قد يحصل في وطني الأم أو في أي بلد عربي آخر. هنا، يكفي أن يجتهد الإنسان ليجني ثمار تعبه. وبالنسبة للمرأة تحديداً، فإن العالم العربي يقلل من شأن المرأة وقدراتها. حتى مناصبها السياسة هي شكلية فقط، ولا يستطيعون مزج المرأة الحسنة المظهر مع الموهبة. فأبسط مثال التعليقات التي تأتيني أحياناً على صفحتي على الفيس بوك التي تلقبني بـ"نانسي عجرم الكتابة"، وكأن على كل امرأة ناجحة أو موهوبة أن تكون رثة المظهر." هل ستعود مريم لتستقر في لبنان يوماً ما؟ لا، لأنها اعتادت على العيش في مجتمع يحترم المرأة وحقوقها ولا يحكم على الإنسان من لونه وشكله ودينه وعرقه. لكن حبها لوطنها ما زال يسري في عروقها وستستمر بزيارة لبنان كلما سنحت لها الفرصة. سآخذ إجازة مطولة، لأكتشف نفسي من جديد في الصومال عاشت منى مغتربة منذ نعومة أظفارها. وُلدت لأبوين صوماليين امتهنا الطب وبحثا عن حياة آمنة في اليمن بعيداً عن مخاطر الحرب في الصومال. لحقت بهم الحرب إلى اليمن فانتقلوا إلى الهند ثم ليبيا ومن بعدها إلى توغو. ورغم اعتيادها على العيش في بلدان مختلفة، واجهت منى صعوبة عندما حان وقت التحاقها بالجامعة في بلجيكا. افترقت عن عائلتها وبدأت حياة جديدة بمفردها، واضافت: "لم أتوقع أن لون بشرتي سيكون أكبر مشاكلي. كان علي إثبات نفسي في أجواء العنصرية التي سادت بلجيكا آنذاك وكادت أن تقسم البلد إلى نصفين. قررت أن أفرض نفسي وأتقرب من البلجيكيين، عبر الخروج والحوار معهم وتعريفهم على نفسي". اعتقدت منى أنها أصبحت جاهزة للانخراط في المجتمع الغربي، لكنها اكتشفت عكس ذلك بعدما انتقلت للعيش في بريطانيا مع عائلتها. وقالت: "عشت هنا 9 سنوات واحتجت إلى 6 سنوات لإيجاد توازن بين الثقافة التي تربيت عليها والثقافة السائدة في البلد. الصراع الداخلي أتعبني. بالرغم من أن والديّ مثقفان ومنفتحان، كان لذلك حدود. لم يتقبلوا تناولي المشروبات الكحولية، أو بناء علاقة عاطفية مع شاب من ثقافة أخرى." ثم ضحكت وأضافت: "كانوا يسمحون لي بالسهر...لكن للساعة الثامنة مساء فقط. اضطررت لإخفاء الكثير من نشاطاتي عنهم." وتقول: "أنا الآن في الثامنة والعشرين من عمري، وأعمل في لندن في مجال الهندسة النفطية وانفق علي نفسي. لكن والداي يدفعان بي للزواج...من شاب صومالي حصراً. أنا أكره الشعور بأنه واجب عليّ ارضاءهم والتقيّد بثقافتهم بالرغم من كل الصعوبات التي تخطيتها كي أصبح المرأة التي أنا هي اليوم. خاضت أختي التجربة وتزوجت من رجل صيني. هي سعيدة الآن. لكن أبي قطع علاقته بها لمدة سنتين، ولم يعاود الاتصال بها إلى حين أنجبت أول طفلة. ربما علي الابتعاد عنهم وإعادة اكتشاف نفسي: طلبت إجازة مطولة من عملي، وسأعود إلى الصومال في بداية العام الجديد لأتعرف على هذا البلد الذي لم أعرفه سوى من خلال عائلتي..." في السودان كنت مدللة، ولم اكتشف مواطن القوة في شخصيتي إلا في الغربة جدية عثمان وجه إعلامي معروف من السودان وسيدة أعمال وزوجة. من يشاهدها وهي تقدم برامجها عبر شاشة التلفزيون يلمس شخصية قوية وواثقة من نفسها. لكنها كانت "هشّة" - حسب وصفها - خلال نشأتها في بلدها الأم السودان. رؤية جدية وهي تمشي في شوارع لندن باتجاهي بكامل أناقتها وثقتها لم يوحِ لي أنها كانت في يوم من الأيام امرأة تخاف أن تمشي بمفردها، لأداء ابسط اعمالها اليومية مثل زيارة الدكانة. وتقول: "النجاح يختلف من شخص إلى آخر باختلاف المهنة والبيئة التي تربى فيها. أنا تربيت في السودان، والمجتمع السوداني يعتبر محافظاً نوعاً ما. فهناك الفتاة تكاد تكون مدللة. يندهش الآخر عندما يسمع كلمة مدللة لكنها كذلك لأنها محاطة بالذكور. "تجربتي الشخصية ترجع لأكثر من عشرين سنة ولا ادري إن اختلف الوضع اليوم عن الوضع الذي تربيت فيه. لكن عندما كنت شابة لا أذكر أني ذهبت إلى دكان في الحارة أو إلى السوق إلا وكنت بصحبة أخ أو أب أو عم. يجب أن يكونوا معك. نحن لم نحرم من حقوقنا كنساء لكن الخوف فُرض علينا، لا أدري مماذا ولا أدري ممن...في النتيجة دفعت شخصيتي ضريبة هذا الخوف، وأصبحت شخصاً هشاً نوعاً ما". بدأت جدية مشوارها الإعلامي من محطة تلفزيون سودانية. بعدما تزوجت، انتقلت مع زوجها إلى البحرين. رغم أنها لم تبتعد عن الثقافة العربية هناك، إلا أنها لأول مرة كانت بعيدة عن أقربائها الذكور. ومع انشغال زوجها في العمل، كان عليها التنقل بمفردها. وتقول: "كنت أعمل مذيعة في تلفزيون البحرين وبطبيعة الحال كان راتبي يحوَّل إلى حساب بنكي. أنا كنت أخاف أن أذهب إلى الصراف الآلي لأسحب النقود من حسابي الخاص. لم أكن أشعر بتلك الشجاعة وتلك القوة لأذهب لوحدي...وهي من أبسط الأمور! أعتدت أن أكون محاطة بالأخ أو العم أو الأب أو الخال وعلى حرصهم علي لأني امرأة". ربما شاء القدر أن تنتقل جدية إلى البحرين كمحطة تمهيدية قبل انتقالها إلى بلد أوروبي واحتكاكها بثقافة مغايرة تماماً عما ألفته. وتضيف: "تجربتي في بريطانيا كانت مختلفة. هنا اكتشفت مواطن القوة في شخصيتي وأهمها الجرأة. أول خطوة اتخذتها كانت تعلم اللغة الانكليزية كي استطيع التواصل مع هذا المجتمع الكبير والمتعدد الثقافات. لكن كان علي الكثير من الأعباء مثل الحفاظ على هويتي وثقافتي السودانية". رغم الانتقادات التي تعرضت لها جدية مثل عدم التزامها باللباس التقليدي السوداني عندما تطل عبر الشاشة من لندن، إلا أنها تشعر الآن أنها حققت التوازن بين ثقافتها الأم وثقافة الغرب، وطموحها لن يتوقف. أنا رسامة لكن الطبخ كان وسيلتي للنجاح في لندن لم تكن تتوقع شيرين أن تستبدل فرشاة رسمها بفرشاة لدهن البيض على الطعام حينما جاءت إلى بريطانيا. بعد التحاقها بمعهد خاص للفنون في دمشق عملت على تسويق أعمالها الفنية وتحويلها إلى مصدر دخل لها. حرصت على اتباع شغفها في الفن بالرغم من اعتراض زوجها في البداية، وانتقالهم إلى مصر بعد سنتين من بدء الحرب في سورية. وتقول شيرين: "وصلت إلى بريطانيا آملة أن أجد من هو على استعداد لاقتناء القطع الفنية التي أصنعها. لكن فور وصولي لم يشجعني أحد، وبالأخص السوريين الذين عرفتهم. قالوا لي أنه لا يوجد طلب على قطع فنية يدوية الصنع هنا. وتبين لي بعد فترة أن الكثير من المغتربين العرب القدماء لا يحبون الاختلاط مع المغتربين الجدد. شعرت بإحباط شديد. وفي هذه الفترة ذاتها كان علي دفع نفسي لتحسين مستوى لغتي الانكليزية والتأقلم مع العيش في بيئة مختلفة تماماً عن التي كنت فيها". وتضيف (في لهجتها المحكية): "يلي مو متعوّد عالأهرمة ما بينبسط" - أي أن الشخص الذي لم يتعود على بذل جهد والتعب في حياته اليومية لن يكون سعيداً في بريطانيا. "المواصلات على سبيل المثال: في سورية كنت أقود سيارتي، أما هنا فعلي المشي من محطة الباص إلى محطة القطار واجراء عدة تبديلات، ومعي أطفالي والحقائب التي أحملها". وفي يوم من الأيام، دعت شيرين بضعة صديقات إلى منزلها لتناول الطعام التي حضرته بنفسها، وإذ بإحدى المدعوات تتفاجأ بالطعام الشهي وتقترح على شيرين الطبخ وبيع مأكولاتها الشرقية. أعجبتها الفكرة، وبدأت بتأسيس المشروع بمساعدة زوجها الذي اهتم بالجانب المالي. كانت تطبخ في منزلها، وتعتمد على شبكة معارفها للدعاية لمشروعها الجديد بالإضافة لتحميل صور مأكولاتها على الفيس بوك. واحتراماً لتقاليدها ورغبة زوجها تقول: "لم أرغب في محادثة الغرباء. لم يرني أحد منهم إذ كنت أطلب من أطفالي تسليم المأكولات عند باب المنزل". افتتحت شيرين مطبخاً تجارياً منذ شهرين وتقول: "الحمد لله إن العمل يسير بشكل جيد رغم بعض المصاعب التي واجهتنا. ما زلت أشتاق للرسم، وأشعر أن هذه مرحلة مؤقتة ريثما أقف على قدميّ. أنا الآن متحمسة للعمل على قالب حلوى طُلب مني من أجل زفاف. سأعتبره لوحة فنية وأفرغ كل طاقتي فيه".
Ahead of its exit from the European Union, the UK is currently negotiating to secure free trade agreements with several countries, but what does this kind of deal actually mean? When two countries agree to a free trade agreement, that does not normally mean the complete free movement of goods and services between their economies, with no taxes, quotas or barriers of any kind. If you think about it that is pretty obvious, for instance in agriculture countries have subsidies for farmers, environmental rules, food standards and a dozen other policies. To ensure free trade of agricultural products all those policies would have to be coordinated, if not exactly the same. This is why the issue of chlorinated chicken is suddenly in the headlines; we don't allow it, the Americans do. It is a barrier to free trade and if we cannot agree on a compromise then any free trade deal between the US and UK will not fully cover trade in chickens. The same can be said about genetically-modified (GM) crops, where America thinks the EU approvals process is far too complicated. And what about agricultural subsidies for farmers? You can be pretty sure farmers on both sides of any free trade deal will argue about whether the other side subsidises its farmers unfairly, well, until the cows come home. It is not just agriculture that is affected, removing tariffs on manufactured goods is normally considered the easy part of any trade deal, but what about chemical regulations, car safety and drug testing, to name just three examples? The reason that free trade deals involve years of talks, dozens of expert negotiators, and endless meetings on technical details is because such issues are very complicated and involve a host of issues. In the end they tend to come down to a trade off. The proposed free trade deal between the EU and Japan has, for example, been described as a "cars for cheese" deal. It's an over simplification, but the fact is a major part of the deal is that the EU will allow cars made in Japan to be sold in the EU more easily, and the Japanese will reduce tariffs on European cheeses (and other dairy products). That doesn't sound like much but it is important. Many Japanese carmakers have plants in Europe precisely because it used to be difficult for them to sell Japanese built cars there, as they had to pay a 10% tariff. Meanwhile, the Japanese government has had some of the highest agricultural subsides, tariffs and other barriers, because it has long sought to protect its inefficient farmers. Both sides will win easier access to each others markets, but it is still not totally free trade. For instance some cheeses will be covered by quotas (a limit on how much can be exported to Japan), and car tariffs will take years to totally come down. More from the BBC's series taking an international perspective on trade: Is time up for plain vanilla flavour ice creams? What makes this Kate Spade bag unusual? Where's hot? This summer's most popular holiday spots Read more global trade series here. Also non-tariff barriers are still an important factor in limiting trade. So Japan and the UK, for instance, have different legal systems, educational qualifications, insurance rules, banking regulation and a thousand other differences. As you will have spotted, many of the differences are not to do with manufactured goods, which can be relatively easy to sell in other markets and changed if necessary to comply with local rules, but they do hinder free trade in services. In the UK services make up 80% of the economy so agreeing a free trade deal on services is very important. It is however rather difficult for it to be total. British lawyers are just not going to be allowed to work in Brazilian courts if they haven't passed local exams and speak Portuguese, for example. Things such as insurance contracts have to abide by local laws and rules, while British plumbers may not get much work in China if their qualifications are not recognised. But on top of that there are nearly always politically important sectors which can lobby national governments to continue to protect them. India's army of small retailers are well protected by politicians from foreign competition, or governments can demand the politically impossible. As part of a future free trade deal, India would probably want the UK to open up immigration from India especially for students; something the government is unlikely to do as reducing immigration is one of its principle post Brexit policies. It all means that free trade agreements do not necessarily cover everything. Also although many economists believe such agreements encourage and increase trade between countries, improve efficiency and investment and help economies grow; others think they have serious downsides including driving out smaller local companies, reducing tax revenue and undercutting working conditions. Whoever is right free trade agreements do not do what they say on the tin. They do not make all trade free and frictionless; maybe they should be called "freer trade agreements"?
Question: How often does President Trump talk about IQ? Answer: All the time. When Mr Trump recently boasted that his IQ was higher than Secretary of State Rex Tillerson's, it was part of a pattern. In 2013, he tweeted that his IQ was "much higher" than Barack Obama and George W Bush. He has also claimed a higher IQ than comedian Jon Stewart and British star of The Apprentice, Lord Sugar. Despite this, Mr Trump has never revealed his own IQ. So can we work it out? "@gharo34: @realDonaldTrump Not only is your IQ somewhere between Barack Obama and G.W.Bush...but you're entertaining!"Much higher than both End of Twitter post by @realDonaldTrump An Intelligence Quotient is a score given to someone after taking an intelligence test. There is no single "IQ test" - Mensa accepts results from more than 200 tests, including its own. Some tests last an hour, while some have no time limit. Dr Frank Lawlis, the supervisory psychologist of American Mensa, says they usually test spatial, quantitative, and verbal skills. Broadly, spatial questions are about shape and measurement; quantitative questions are mathematical; and verbal questions are about words - for example, how one word is similar to another. Mensa accepts those who score in the top 2%. That equates - very roughly - to an IQ of 130. MORE, PAIRS, ETCHERS, ZIPPER *Answers are shown below "I don't recall ever coming across a list of presidents and their IQs," says Dr Barbara A Perry, director of presidential studies at the University of Virginia's Miller Center. "But you can easily find a list of presidents inducted into Phi Beta Kappa in their universities." Founded in 1776, Phi Beta Kappa honours "the best and brightest liberal arts and sciences undergraduates from 286 top schools across the nation". Of the 44 presidents, 17 have been Phi Beta Kappa members. Bill Clinton, George H W Bush, and Jimmy Carter were the most recent. Dr Perry puts forward, among others, Herbert Hoover ("a very, very bright scientist, a geologist"), Woodrow Wilson ("our only PhD president"), and William H Taft ("a brilliant lawyer"). And, although a president's IQ has never been confirmed, in 2006 the University of California estimated that John Quincy Adams was the most intelligent of all presidents. Dr Perry also says some presidents have undeserved reputations. "Gerald Ford was viewed as being a klutz, because he would trip in public, but that was so unfair. "He had an undergraduate degree from the University of Michigan, where he was from, he was an Eagle Scout, he went to Yale Law School, and he was a star footballer on top of that." She also says that intelligence is only part of what makes a good president. "It was the Supreme Court justice Oliver Wendell Holmes who famously said Franklin Delano Roosevelt had 'a second class intellect but a first class temperament'. "Roosevelt was re-elected in '36 by two-thirds of the electorate." "I would put Warren Harding in that category," says Dr Perry. "He was a journalist by training." This is awkward... "Some of my best friends are journalists!" says Dr Perry, laughing. "And my brother is. But my point is, he wasn't from Harvard or Yale, and he wasn't a brilliant lawyer who ended up on the supreme court." "If he ever releases his IQ, I just have a feeling - especially since he is daring Tillerson to release his - that it's higher than people would presume," says Dr Perry. "People who don't like him say 'oh he's such an idiot, oh he's so stupid'. But I bet you it's higher than we might realise." Professor Fred I Greenstein, professor of politics emeritus at Princeton University, lists six qualities that bear on presidential performance. They are: public communication, organisational capacity, political skill, vision, cognitive style, and emotional intelligence. "Trump scores low on emotional intelligence, cognitive style, vision, and organisational capacity," says Dr Perry. "Where he has been superb, in order to win the presidency, is public communication and political skill." *Answers are shown below Dr Perry also points out Mr Trump's business career - "he obviously had a certain native intelligence to be successful, such as he was" - and his degree from The Wharton School at the University of Pennsylvania. But - whether Mr Trump's IQ is high or low - Dr Lawlis from Mensa says it doesn't tell you everything. "If you take someone we consider to be a genius like Einstein, he would probably not do well on an IQ test, because he thinks outside the box," he says. "He could probably think of a dozen answers to one question." Either way, the time for talking may soon be over - Mensa has offered to test both Mr Trump and Mr Tillerson's IQ. If only there was an organization known for measuring IQ... 🤔 https://t.co/xbOKnW63ta End of Twitter post by @AmericanMensa Get news from the BBC in your inbox, each weekday morning
At some point during the campaign last year, most Republicans came to the conclusion that Donald Trump was like nuclear energy. His was a force that, if properly harnessed, could power their party for a generation. And so the party embraced Mr Trump. Republican functionaries like Reince Priebus and Sean Spicer joined the White House team. The nuclear dragon would be tamed. But after nearly seven months the depth of their miscalculation may be growing too obvious to ignore. Without adequate controls, everything Mr Trump touches could end up radioactive. "I think his ability to effectively govern is dwindling by the hour," CNN Jim Acosta quotes a Republican leadership source as saying. Veteran reporter Carl Bernstein says that high-level Republican, conservative, and military officials are privately saying that Mr Trump is "unfit to be president". As party officials stare at the glowing crater left from the president's latest meltdown, they are left wondering. What now? What next? At least so far, many Republicans have opted for the path of least resistance. They make stern condemnations of white supremacists and the hate that motivated the violence in Charlottesville - in carefully worded statements and tweets - hoping it will provide political shelter from the ongoing storm. When it comes to taking aim at the president himself, however, Mr Trump is He Who Must Not Be Named. Their criticism is oblique and the condemnation implied. They may whisper uncomfortable views in private, but publicly they watch their words. Speaker of the House Paul Ryan - who had plenty of experience distancing himself from Mr Trump during the campaign - provides a standard example of the manoeuvre. "We must be clear," he tweets. "White supremacy is repulsive. This bigotry is counter to all this country stands for. There can be no moral ambiguity." He then returned to tweeting about Republican tax policy. Contrast that to Virginia congressman Scott Taylor's words. "Today's statements by President Trump at his press conference were disappointing and a failure of leadership, which starts at the top, with him," he said in a press release. "I hope the president will focus on bringing people together and to challenge hate in the strongest unequivocal terms moving forward. There is no home for hate here in Virginia or America." Or Arizona Senator John McCain. "There's no moral equivalency between racists and Americans standing up to defy hate and bigotry," he tweeted. "The president of the United States should say so." Others are caught in a political whipsaw, alternating criticism and praise for a president who, once again, seems to change his administration's position based on pique or whim. South Carolina Senator Lindsey Graham, for instance, called on Mr Trump to condemn white nationalists after his tepid response on Saturday and lauded his Monday scripted remarks by tweeting: "Well done Mr President". On Tuesday it was back to blasting. According to a count by the liberal website ThinkProgress, just 14 other Republicans in Congress, out of 292, have made similarly explicit condemnations of the president so far. Those who haven't put out any kind of statement, however, risk getting pressed by reporters for their take. When one journalist asked Wisconsin Senator Ron Johnson what the president should say about the Charlottesville violence, he responded: "You tell me", adding that he wanted to move on. That's a sentiment most Republicans probably share, but thanks to the president's combative press conference on Tuesday, "moving on" seems unlikely at least for now. Within the administration officials are treading even more carefully. Chief of Staff John Kelly may have been caught by cameras repeatedly wincing during Tuesday's press conference, but he's back on the job today. Gary Cohn - the president's top economic advisor who stood nearby as the president issued his remarks in Trump Tower - reportedly told friends he was "disgusted" and "upset" by the president's actions - but not so much that he would speak on the record. Perhaps the reason why many Republicans are watching their words when it comes to the president is they have seen this film before. During his presidential campaign, Mr Trump said undocumented Mexican migrants were criminals and rapists, he belittled Mr McCain's Vietnam War record, he insulted the parents of a Muslim US soldier killed in Iraq, he mocked a Hispanic beauty pageant contestant's weight, and a decade-old recorded emerged in which he boasted about using his celebrity status to sexually harass women. After each of these episodes - and many more - Republicans eyed each other nervously and prepared to bolt for the exits, but Mr Trump eventually recovered. The storm passed, and in the end he prevailed. "This too shall pass" isn't always a balm for the distraught. Sometimes it's a warning. It's a stern message for those who would doubt or abandon the president. A HuffPost/YouGov poll conducted after the Charlottesville unrest (but before Mr Trump's Tuesday press conference) could also give clues as to why conservatives are taking pause. Fully 77% of Trump voters think the president "did enough" to condemn white nationalist violence in Charlottesville. Two-thirds of them had no problem with the president's delay in mentioning neo-Nazis and white supremacists by name. Perhaps most remarkably, 48% of Trump voters think the Charlottesville white nationalists either "have a point" (37%) or were "mostly right" (11%). And 68% of Trump voters see "a lot of discrimination" against white people in the US. Why draw the ire of a president known to keep close tabs on his friends and foes, Republicans may think, when the party's core voters largely still stand by his side, even through this latest political furore. It's a calculation, however, that Mr Trump's corporate chieftans didn't have to make. After they abandoned the White House in growing numbers, the president was forced to announce his economic advisory boards were being shuttered. Neither is political expediency a concern for much of the conservative media, which is showing growing signs of tiring of the presidential drama. While some - like The National Review - have largely remained in the #neverTrump camp, the Federalist had often come to the president's defence. Until now. "I don't think Trump is going to resign any time soon," says Robert Tracinski, a senior writer for the website. "But he needs to be left hanging out there all on his own without support from anyone in his party (or from anyone in the right-leaning media). He is a vortex of destruction, and the only way to survive is to get everything we love as far away from him as possible." Mr Trump is a survivor. He outlasted all of his political opponents and bested many of his critics and naysayers. But a day of reckoning for Republicans could be fast approaching. Follow Anthony Zurcher on Twitter.
Thieves who broke into a football stadium and stole giant TVs raided fridges to stage a food fight with frozen cheesecakes. Police said the break-ins at Ipswich Town Football Club's Portman Road ground took place overnight on Saturday and in the early hours of Wednesday. During the first raid, the intruders partied on wine and food, the BBC understands. A club spokesman said they have increased the stadium's security. It is understood the thieves got into hospitality boxes - one next to chairman Marcus Evans' personal box - and helped themselves to "expensive vintage" wine and food. They then took the lift down to the kitchens beneath the stands to raid the fridges. The same gang of at least four people carried out the raids on both occasions, it is understood. Suffolk Police said officers were called to the ground at 07:50 BST on Sunday and at 06:00 on Wednesday. A number of plasma television information screens from public areas around the ground were stolen on the gang's second visit, it is understood. Police said no arrests have been made and inquiries are ongoing. An Ipswich Town spokesperson said: "We can confirm there have been two incidents over the last week of intrusion at the stadium. "The police are aware and are investigating. We have increased our security as a matter of course."
Será que a grande tragédia do século 20 ocorreu exatos cem anos atrás? Sei que há muitos candidatos para esse título e que os feitos nazistas são difíceis de serem superados nesse quesito. Mas, com a sua mistura de ciência moderna e crenças medievais, os nazistas sempre deixaram claro a ruindade de seu projeto. A Revolução Russa é diferente. Pode-se pensar o que quiser sobre os ideais revolucionários, mas não há dúvida de que, na cabeça deles, pelo menos no início do processo, eles realmente acreditavam que estavam servindo a grande causa da libertação humana. A tragédia fica no abismo entre o sonho e a triste, sangrenta, totalitária realidade em que se transformou a União Soviética nas décadas seguintes. Um dos primeiros a cair no abismo foi um brasileiro: Antonio Bernardo Canellas foi delegado no 4º Congresso da Internacional Comunista, em 1922, tornando-se o primeiro brasileiro a visitar a Rússia após a revolução. De Niterói, mas ativo politicamente no Nordeste, Canellas, com 24 anos, era o mais jovem entre os quase 400 delegados. Ele não parece ter sido uma figura fácil. Falava quando precisava ouvir. Tinha um ego enorme. Brigava com facilidade. E esquecia que, na verdade, não representava quase ninguém. Estava lá como homem do Partido Comunista do Brasil (PCB), organização na época em formação que pleiteava o direito de ser reconhecida pela Internacional. Mas já estava fora do país havia mais de dois anos, desatualizado quanto aos desdobramentos em curso no Brasil. Mas Canellas ganhou o direito de votar no Congresso. E, num ambiente em que as decisões eram sempre aprovadas por unanimidade, ele ousou quebrar o protocolo e votar contra. E justamente em um voto crucial: sobre o direito da Internacional (ou seja, dos russos) de intervir (na prática, mandar) nos partidos comunistas no mundo todo. Até Lênin, debilitado e quase na fim da vida, via o equívoco de uma organização "inteiramente russa, permeada do espírito russo", quando "a experiência dos camaradas estrangeiros deve diferir da experiência russa". A história mostra que Canellas tinha razão em votar contra. Mas o seu espírito de independência não seria perdoado. Em consequência de seu voto, o PCB não foi aprovado pela Internacional, e, na volta para o Brasil, Canellas virou alvo de protestos dos outros membros. Seus colegas rapidamente viraram seus inimigos. Ele acabou rompendo com o partido, que publicou um manifesto a seu respeito, chamando-o de "traidor, indigno e vil... É necessário dissecar este cadáver. É preciso desnudá-lo, rasgar-lhe o couro mau, desfibrar-lhe as carnes ruins, pôr-lhe as vísceras ao sol, espremer-lhe o figado esgorgitado de torpeza". Isso em junho de 1924, menos de sete anos depois da revolução. O sonho da emancipação da humanidade já começava a virar um terror, que na União Soviética de Stálin transformou-se em pesadelo prolongado. Como foi que tudo ruiu tão rapidamente em uma farsa mortal? Me parece que passou batida uma observação da pensadora alemã Hannah Arendt: "Os revolucionários não fazem a revolução. Mas eles sabem onde pegar o poder quando está lá no chão". Isso se aplica muito bem aos eventos de cem anos atrás. Porque, depois da revolução, os comunistas russos andavam que nem pavões, as grandes estrelas do movimento. Tem uma ironia deliciosa aqui: em abril de 1917, quando Lênin voltou para o país com um projeto de liderar uma revolução comunista, muito deles eram contra. E mesmo depois de convencidos, não foram eles que fizeram a revolução. Uma sociedade arcaica despencou sobre as necessidades de lutar uma guerra moderna. Tem quem argumente que o que aconteceu cem anos atrás foi mais para um golpe de soldados do que uma revolução no sentido pleno da palavra. A ideia original de Lênin e Tróstki foi se aproveitar justamente dessa fraqueza para iniciar uma revolução que logo se espalhasse aos países mais avançados. Não rolou. Ter um Estado comunista somente na Rússia era impensável. Mas acabou acontecendo. E a Internacional Comunista virou um veículo para impor um modelo russo em cima de todos os partidos do mundo. E esse modelo russo foi altamente autoritário - por necessidade. O novo regime estava lutando uma guerra civil a partir de uma posição muito fraca. Se as dificuldades externas eram grandes, as internas eram mais ainda, algo não previsto pelos articuladores originais de comunismo. No fim da vida, Friedrich Engels via com otimismo o progresso possível pelo processo democrático. Décadas antes, em 1848, Karl Marx havia escrito sobre a necessidade na revolução de um curto período de ditadura do proletariado. Mas isso numa sociedade onde a classe operária urbana era grande maioria. Na Rússia atrasada, entretanto, eles fizeram parte de uma minoria pequena de uma sociedade de camponeses. A ditadura do proletariado russo, então, implicou enganar os camponeses - milhares de pessoas - com promessas de terra até o regime novo fosse forte suficiente para os destruir como força independente, os obrigando a virar funcionários de fazendas coletivas. Com custos altíssimos de vida. O modelo de partido russo - centralizado e autoritário - mostrou-se totalmente inadequado para outras sociedades. Durante décadas, a Internacional Comunista só acumulou fracassos e até facilitou a ascensão nazista na Alemanha. Antonio Bernardo Canellas não previu tudo isso. Mas, mesmo com a impetuosidade da juventude e seus excessos de ego, enxergou e entendeu os perigos da ausência de debate. No centenário da revolução, merece ser lembrado. *Tim Vickery é colunista da BBC Brasil e formado em História e Política pela Universidade de Warwick.
قطر د بهرنیو کاګرو اړوند قانون کې د داسې سمون را وستلو ژمنه کړې چې له مخې یې دغو کارګرو ته د دغه هېواد په تاریخ کې اول ځل تر ټولو ډېره کمه ورځانه(ورځ مزدوري) ور کول کېږي. تراوسه روښانه نه ده چې دا سمون به کله پلی کېږي. د قطر دا ګام د کارګرو نړیوالې ټولنې له ناستې یوه ورځ مخکې دی. دې ادارې وار د مخه هم له بهرنیو کارګرو سره د چلند له امله پر قطر نیوکې کړې دي. دا په داسې مهال ده چې قطر پر ۲۰۲۲ کال د فوټبال نړیوال جام کوربتوب لپاره د ډېرو بهرنیو کارګرو کوربه دی. خو د کارګرو نړیوالې ټولنې د دې کارګرو سره د کار او استونګې له شرایطو اندېښنه ښودلې ده. د ملګرو ملتونو د کارګرو نړیوالې ټولنې قطر ته د بهرنیو کارګرو د حالت ښه کولو لپاره تر نومبر وخت ور کړی دی او ویلي یې دي چې له دوی سره د ناسم چلند له امله به څېړنې پیل کړي. قطر له څه مهال راهیسې د بهرنیو کارګرو لپاره د کفاله نظام هم رامنځ ته کړی، چې له مخې یې د خپلې کمپنۍ له اجازې پرته کوم کارګر خپله دنده بدلولی نه شي. په دې نظام کې دا هم راغلي چې کوم کارګر د اړوند کمنپۍ له اجازې پرته کار پرېږدي یا بدلوي، نو له قطر اېستل کېږي او بیا دوه کاله دغه هېواد ته ستنېدلی نه شي. قطري چارواکو د ۲۰۱۶ کال ډيسمبر کې د کفاله نظام پر ځای د بهرنیانو د تګ را تګ په هکله نوی قانون پیل کړ، خو بیا هم د بښنې نړیوالې ټولنې او نورو انساني حقونو ادارو پرې نیوکې وکړې او ویې ویل له بدلون سره سره دغه نظام پر خپل ځای پاتې دی. د یوې شمېرې له مخې قطر کې تر ۱۵ لکو بهرني کارګر شته چې ډېری یې د اسیايي هېوادونو دي او ودانیزو چارو کې بوخت دي. د کارګرو نړیواله ټولنه د ۲۰۱۳ کال رپوټ کې وايي، د ۲۰۲۲ کال فوټبال نړیوال جام په ودانیزو چارو کې بوخت ۱۲ سوه کارګر مړه شوي دي. د دې شمېرو باوري کول ستونزمن دي، خو د بي بي سي د ۲۰۱۵ کال د یوې شننې له مخې دا شمېر زیاتېدلی شي او ممکن له دې وروسته نور هم ډېر شي.
Lengua nueva, vida nueva. Eso podría decir Nyan htoo, un enorme oso en Birmania que tenía hasta hace poco una lengua tan hinchada que pesaba tres kilos y la tenía que arrastrar por el piso. Nyan htoo vive bajo el cuidado de unos monjes en un monasterio en Birmania. Él y su hermano fueron rescatados cuando oseznos, después de que habían sido separados de su madre para ser comercializados en China. Desde el mismo momento en que el oso pisó el suelo del monasterio notaron que tenía una anomalía desconocida en su lengua: permanecía hinchada la mayor parte del tiempo. Esto no le permitía alimentarse ni hidratarse de forma adecuada, por lo que los monjes comenzaron a buscar ayuda para mejorarle su calidad de vida. En 2016, un equipo de veterinarios logró intervenir la lengua del animal, pero no logró curar la deformación. Para junio de este año, la afección ya era grave: aunque seguía jugando con su hermano, el oso arrastraba la lengua por el piso y tenía dificultades para moverse. Fue entonces cuando un equipo de la escuela de veterinaria de la Universidad de Edimburgo, de Escocia, viajó hasta Birmania para realizar un procedimiento quirúrgico por el que removieron gran parte de la lengua de Nyan htoo. "Realmente se trató de una condición médica inusual, nunca lo habíamos visto en otros osos. Pero no nos rendimos con Nyan htoo", escribió Heather Bacon, la veterinaria que lideró el procedimiento, en un documento enviado a BBC Mundo. "Ahora el oso va a poder comer de manera mucho más confortable, dormir en una posición normal y moverse sin tener que arrastrar su lengua", agregó.
قرر يوتيوب استثناء مقاطع الفيديو لرقصة البوص بممكلة سوازيلاند، التي تصور النساء عرايا الصدر، من قيود الموقع المفروضة على التسجيلات المصورة التي تحتوي على عُري. وقال متحدث باسم منصة تبادل ملفات الفيديو، لبي بي سي، إن يوتيوب يسمح بالعُري عندما "يتعلق بالثقافة أو يأتي في سياق مناسب". وغضب مستخدمون، رفعوا مقاطع لرقصة البوص على الموقع، عندما صنفت ملفاتهم كمحتويات مقيدة بالفئة العمرية. ونفى يوتيوب اتهامه بالعنصرية، وقال إنه حريص على التعامل بحذر شديد مع الملفات الثقافية. وجاءت الخطوة ردا على حملة قادها لازي دلاميني، مدير "تلفزيون يابنتو"، وهي شركة لإنتاج مقاطع الفيديو على الإنترنت، لتصوير "أفضل ثقافة... كما يراها ويسجلها الأفارقة أنفسهم". وكانت قناة الشركة على يوتيوب، التي تأسست في 2016، تجذب أربعة آلاف مشترك جديد شهريا حتى بدأت شركة يوتيوب في تصنيف ملفاتها كمحتويات غير مناسبة، بحسب صحيفة "ميل آند غارديان" الجنوب أفريقية. كما وضع يوتيوب شارة على القناة تنصح المعلنين بأن محتوياتها "لا تتناسب مع غالبية المعلنين". وقال دلاميني إنه تواصل مع غوغل، الشركة الأم ليوتيوب، ليقول إن شركة "تلفزيون يابنتو" تعكس ببساطة قيم ثقافة مجتمعه، لكن غوغل اعتبرت أن المحتوى انتهك معايير يوتيوب. وذكرت صحيفة "ميل آند غارديان" أن دلاميني تعاون مع أكثر من 200 تجمع ثقافي من سوازيلاند لتنظيم سلسلة من الاحتجاجات، أولها في مدينة دوربان بجنوب أفريقيا المجاورة. وشارك في الاحتجاج عشرات النساء، اللاتي كانوا عرايا الصدر، ويحملن لافتات تتهم غوغل بالعنصرية. وكتب على إحدى اللافتات، "صدري ليس عيبا"، بحسب "ميل آند غارديان". وبعد نشر تقرير الصحيفة، قال متحدث باسم يوتيوب لبي بي سي إن فيديوهات رقصة البوص لا تخالف سياستهم، وإنهم سعداء لتلافي الخطأ والاعتذار. ويواجه موقع يوتيوب انتقادات بسبب كيفية مراقبة محتوياته. وفي وقت سابق من العام، تعهد الموقع ببذل مزيد من الجهد لمنع المحتويات المرتبطة بالإرهاب على وجه الخصوص. ويجري رفع أكثر من 400 ساعة على موقع يوتيوب في الدقيقة الواحدة. وفي غالبية الحالات، يعتمد يوتيوب في تصنيف المحتويات غير الملائمة على بلاغات المستخدمين، قبل أن يبدأ التحقق من محتوى هذه الفيديوهات.
This week's presidential election re-run in Kenya has implications not only for the country but also for much of the continent, says the BBC's new Africa editor, Fergal Keane. The last days have passed in a swirl of chanting crowds, arguments in the courts, and meetings between powerful politicians and election commissioners. The tension ahead of the polls crackles like static on the streets of Nairobi. At the Githurai junction on the city's outskirts, several thousand people gathered to cheer President Uhuru Kenyatta. Passing cars were surrounded and plastered with party stickers. Briefly enmity flared. A man leaned out of a passing coach and drew his finger across his throat, shouting abuse at the President's supporters. They surged forward but bus and man were quickly gone. The days tremble with rumours. The election may happen. Or it may not. The Independent Election Boundaries Commission has warned it can't guarantee a credible poll in the prevailing circumstances. Old friends I have spoken with express alarm at the rise in ethnic antagonism. International diplomats seem in a quandary - fearful of election day violence while acknowledging that the fresh poll was ordered by the country's highest court. When I first reported from Africa, back in the Cold War days of the 1980s, there were only very occasional elections, usually resulting in the return of the incumbent with 90% or more of the vote. So when Kenya had its first democratic election in 1992, it was easy to be carried along by enthusiasm for the new age. After all, President Daniel arap Moi had been in power for 14 years, during which time there had been a long spree of looting of state assets, worth billions, by an entrenched elite connected to the ruling party. Political enemies were locked up and worse. But Moi was elected - twice. He knew how to manipulate tribal rivalries to his advantage - and his party machine had very deep pockets. Still there was now at least the possibility of democratic change. Across Africa it seemed as if a new order of accountability was coming. The great kleptocrat Mobutu Sese Seko had been swept from power in the Democratic Republic of Congo. The apartheid state in South Africa was transformed into a multi-racial democracy. I had met Mobutu and Moi and the leaders of the apartheid regime in South Africa and witnessed the brutality and bribery through which power was maintained in much of the continent. I had also listened to diplomats, among them representatives of Her Majesty's government, tell me that President Moi at least guaranteed stability in Kenya. He kept the tribes from tearing each other asunder. The French would have told you the same thing about any of the despots they supported in Francophone Africa. It was an attitude of mind rooted in deeply patronising attitudes towards Africans, and it ignored the role of foreign interests in creating much of the mess. But Africans were hungry for change. The Cold War had ended and with it the sorry history of support for despotic regimes by both the West and the Soviet bloc. Some of the new leaders came to power through war, but in those heady days of the late 1990s all the talk was of democratising. The most remarkable movement in the continent's post-colonial history was not led by warlords or tribal chiefs but by a generation of Africans who believed their destiny would be shaped by their own actions. From Accra to Johannesburg to Nairobi, and thousands of points in-between, civil society began to mobilise. I watched the Kenyan campaigner John Githongo forensically detail the corruption of the ruling elite and publish his results. In the remote Congolese village of Kachanga I met a women's association treating victims of mass rape and gathering evidence against the perpetrators. The idealistic and energetic also mobilised around issues like the environment, economy, health and free media. The pace and dynamics of change were dictated by the internal realities of each state. But an overarching theme became apparent - the one-party state was becoming the exception. The essential change was psychological. Young Africans saw themselves becoming agents of change much as their forebears had done in the years around, and just after, the end of colonialism. Two decades ago I could not have imagined the recent peaceful elections in Liberia, a state written off as irredeemably "failed". But in a large swathe of the continent - central, eastern and much of southern Africa - I underestimated how efficiently the elites would take control of the machinery of modern democracy. In different places they used different tactics - some buying up media outlets to promote their cause, others bribing enemies so that they became friends or manipulating ethnic antagonism into a weapon to be used on the campaign trail, and still more changing the law to extend presidential terms or silence outspoken opponents. Some members of the new governments merely continued the corrupt practices of the old, siphoning off millions as the moribund economies of one-party states made the transition to a free market. In South Africa it gave rise to a new class - the so called "tenderpreneurs" - whose connections to the powerful guaranteed lucrative government contracts. Across much of this region - from the Democratic Republic of Congo, to Uganda, Rwanda, Eritrea and others - authoritarianism is on the rise. Elections are postponed, independent media are silenced, presidential term limits are expanded and opposition figures locked up. It is in this regional context that Kenya's Chief Justice, David Maraga, emerges for many - if not for President Kenyatta's supporters - as a man of great courage. The Supreme Court's decision to annul the elections because of irregularities in the electoral process, told the world that this Kenyan court would not accept a second-class democracy. Across Africa there was a sense of pride in this singular decision. Maraga was seen as speaking for the many who still stand for and demand accountable rulers and an independent civil service. Since the Supreme Court decision tension has steadily risen. Elections are set for Thursday, but the opposition leader Raila Odinga refuses to take part. It is possible to simultaneously take heart from the courage of the chief justice and the changed Africa he represents, and to be deeply worried about the escalating tension gripping the country in the wake of the court's decision. For Kenyans know that political violence often goes unpunished, particularly when the instigators are powerful people. So, often, does brazen corruption. The long struggle is not between political elites at the polling booth. It is a fight waged by a still resourceful civil society, independent judges and honest political campaigners to demand accountability. The conduct of these elections and what happens in their aftermath matters hugely to Kenyans, millions of other Africans and the broader international community. An unstable Kenya has serious implications for the fight against terrorism in Somalia and, potentially, for the aid operations in South Sudan. A peaceful resolution to this democratic crisis would be an example to the continent. Mr Githongo told me that "democracy is entering a dark tunnel but there might just be light at the other side". The struggle to protect the gains made by honest men and women across this region is entering a critical phase.
The BBC should have challenged the views of climate sceptic Lord Lawson in an interview in August, the complaints unit for the corporation has ruled. The ex-chancellor claimed in an interview with the Today programme that "official figures" showed average world temperatures had "slightly declined". This view, shown to be false by the Met Office, was not challenged on air. The BBC admitted it had breached its "guidelines on accuracy and impartiality". Conservative peer Lord Lawson's appearance on Radio 4's flagship Today programme sparked a number of complaints from listeners. He had been invited on to discuss the latest film on climate change by former US Vice President Al Gore. During the interview, Lord Lawson said "official figures" showed that "during this past 10 years, if anything... average world temperature has slightly declined". He also claimed the UN's Intergovernmental Panel on Climate Change (IPCC) had confirmed there had not been an increase in extreme weather events for the last 10 years. Dr Peter Stott, of the Met Office, came on the programme the following day to confirm that Lord Lawson's statistics, which he did not cite at the time, were incorrect. Dr Stott also said the IPCC has clearly indicated an increase in extreme weather events across the globe were linked to human use of fossil fuels. The Global Warming Policy Foundation, a campaign group chaired by Lord Lawson, later confirmed his statistics were "erroneous". The BBC's media editor Amol Rajan said the Today programme had a remit to offer dissenting opinions, aimed at challenging lazy thinking and consensus views. But he said the BBC's complaints department ruled that a lack of scrutiny of Lord Lawson's claims meant the interview fell short of editorial standards. It ruled that the peer's statements "were, at the least, contestable and should have been challenged". A paper by Skeptical Science claims that 97% of scientists across the globe believe climate change is caused by humans. In 2014 the BBC Trust stated the corporation has "a duty to reflect the weight of scientific agreement but it should also reflect the existence of critical views appropriately".
Once the centre of the Islamic Caliphate, Syria covers an area that has seen invasions and occupations over the ages, from Romans and Mongols to Crusaders and Turks. A country of fertile plains, high mountains and deserts, it is home to diverse ethnic and religious groups, including Kurds, Armenians, Assyrians, Christians, Druze, Alawite Shia and Arab Sunnis, the last of whom make up a majority of the Muslim population. Modern Syria gained its independence from France in 1946, but has lived through periods of political instability driven by the conflicting interests of these various groups. Since 2011 political power, long held by a small mainly Alawite elite, has been contested in a bitter civil conflict initially sparked by the Arab Spring that turned into a complex war involving regional and international powers. Population 21.1 million Area 185,180 sq km (71,498 sq miles) Major language Arabic Major religion Islam, Christianity Life expectancy 74 years (men), 78 years (women) Currency Syrian pound President: Bashar al-Assad In power since succeeding his father in 2000, Bashar al-Assad is fighting for control of his country after protests against his rule turned into a full-scale war. He inherited a tightly controlled and repressive political structure from long-time dictator Hafez al-Assad, with an inner circle dominated by members of the Assad family's minority Alawite Shia community. But cracks began to appear in early 2011, in the wake of the "Arab Spring" wave of popular dissent that swept across North Africa and the Middle East. The Syrian uprising has left a fractured media environment, split between areas controlled by the government, Islamic State militants and other armed groups. Scores of journalists and citizen journalists have been killed since the start of the revolt in 2011. Syria was the world's deadliest country for journalists in 2014, says Reporters Without Borders. Islamic State jihadists "enforce an information dictatorship" in the areas they control. Some key dates in Syria's history: 1918 October - Arab troops led by Emir Feisal, and supported by British forces, capture Damascus, ending 400 years of Ottoman rule. 1920 - San Remo conference splits up newly-created Arab kingdom by placing Syria-Lebanon under a French mandate, and Palestine under British control. 1946 - Independence. 1958-61 - Short-lived union of Syria with Egypt as the United Arab Republic. 1967 - Egypt, Jordan, and Syria are defeated in the Six-Day War with Israel. Israel seizes the Golan Heights. 1970 - Hafez al-Assad comes to power in a coup. His rule is characterised by repression and a major arms build-up. 1973 - Egypt and Syria launch surprise attack on Israel in October to try reverse defeats of 1967. 1976 - Syria intervenes in the Lebanese civil war. It maintains military presence there for next three decades and exerts significant influence on Lebanese politics. 1982 - Muslim Brotherhood uprising in the city of Hama is suppressed in a month-long siege by the military, who kill tens of thousands of civilians. 2000 - President Assad dies and is succeeded by his son Bashar. 2005 - Syrian forces withdraw from Lebanon under international pressure following assassination of Lebanese premier Rafiq al-Hariri. 2011 - Unrest inspired by "Arab Spring" uprisings. Confrontation between government and opposition soon develops into civil war that draws in world powers and triggers refugee crisis.
Российский вертолет, на борту которого находились трое пассажиров и пятеро членов экипажа, упал в море недалеко от архипелага Шпицберген, сообщила спасательная служба Северной Норвегии. Российские власти подтвердили информацию, поиски продолжаются. "Вертолет направлялся из [российского] поселка Пирамида в Баренцбург. Он пропал с радаров около 15:35 по местному времени (16:35 мск), в 15:45 было подтверждено крушение", - говорилось в первом сообщении службы в "Твиттере". Шпицберген - норвежский архипелаг, но там уже почти 100 лет живут и работают российские шахтеры. Вертолет Ми-8 потерпел крушение в нескольких километрах от российского населенного пункта Баренцбург. Как сообщил агентству Рейтер руководитель спасательной операции Туре Хонгсет, в поисках участвуют два вертолета и несколько катеров. В зоне поиска сильные волны, идет снег, добавил он. Спустя полтора часа после катастрофы Ми-8 не был обнаружен, сказал телеканалу TV2 представитель спасательной службы, уточнив, что на борту вертолета находились пять членов экипажа и трое пассажиров с "русскими фамилиями". В МЧС России позже подтвердили, что все восемь человек - граждане России. Трое пассажиров - сотрудники петербургского НИИ Арктики и Антарктики, сообщили РИА Новости в пресс-службе минэнерго России. Шахтеров на обратном рейсе из поселка Пирамида не было, сказал генконсул России в Баренцбурге Вячеслав Николаев. "Никто не знает, где он упал. Может, он еще и не упал, а совершил аварийную посадку", - допустил дипломат. Вертолет принадлежал "Конверс Авиа". "Вертолет наш. Связь с ним потеряна", - подтвердил РИА Новости представитель авиакомпании. "Вертолет новый, хороший, проверенный", - сказал РБК диспетчер авиакомпании. Вертолет находился в лизинге у "Арктикуголя", уточнил представитель минэнерго России. Компания "Конверс Авиа" осуществляет авиационное обеспечение ледоколов и морских судов, а также обслуживает российские организации на Шпицбергене. МЧС России готовит к вылету на Шпицберген самолет Ил-76 со спасателями, в состав группы войдут более 20 водолазов. Следственный комитет России возбудил уголовное дело по статье о нарушении правил безопасности движения и эксплуатации воздушного транспорта, повлекшее наступление смерти более двух лиц. Часть хозяйственной деятельности на архипелаге согласно его особому статусу осуществляет Россия, в основном это добыча угля. Баренцбург - второй по величине населенный пункт на архипелаге Шпицберген. Население Баренцбурга и поселка Пирамида составляет около 500 человек. Архипелаг был открыт голландским мореплавателем Виллемом Баренцем в 1596 году. С конца XIX века здесь стали добывать уголь. В 1920 году был подписан международный договор, который позволил России осуществлять деятельность на Шпицбергене. К началу 1930-х на Шпицбергене возникли три советских шахтерских поселка - Пирамида, Грумант и Баренцбург, они были выкуплены у голландских и шведских фирм госкомпанией "Арктикуголь". Россия остается единственной, кроме Норвегии, страной, которая продолжает добывать уголь на Шпицбергене.
චීනය විදෙස් රටවල ආධාර මත යැපෙන්නකු බවට පත්ව සිටියේ වැඩි ඈතක නොවේ. නමුත් සිය ප්‍රතිවාදීන් වූ, ලෝකයේ විශාලතම ආධාර සපයන්නන්ගෙන් කෙනෙකු වන අමෙරිකා එක්සත් ජනපදය ද චීනයේ සම්ප්‍රදායික සංවර්ධන ආධාර හෝ මුල්‍ය ණය ලාභියකු වී සිටී. වෙනත් රටවලට චීනයේ මුදල් ගලායන ආකාරය පිළිබඳ පුළුල් සවිස්තර දත්ත ගබඩාවක් මුල්වරට ගොඩනැගීමට චීනයෙන් බාහිර පර්යේෂකයින් කණ්ඩායමක් සමත්වූහ. රටවල් 140 ක ව්‍යාපෘති 5,000ක් කෙරෙහි අවධානය යොමු කෙරෙන එයින්, අනෙකුත් රටවලට කොපමණ ප්‍රමාණයක් ආධාර සපයන්නේද යන්න අරභයා චීනය හා ඇමෙරිකාව අතර තරගය හෙළිදරව් කර ඇත. කෙසේවෙතත්, "ඔවුන් මේ අරමුදල් යොදවන්නේ අතිශය වෙනස් ආකාරවලින්. විවිධ සංයුතිවලින් යුතු එම ආධාර වර්ගීකරණ පුළුල්ව පැතිරගිය ප්‍රතිවිපාකවලින් සමන්විතයි." යැයි ව්‍යාපෘතියේ ප්‍රධාන පර්යේෂක බ්‍රැඩ් පාර්ක්ස් පවසයි. ඇමෙරිකාවේ වර්ජිනියා හි පිහිටි විලියම් සහ මේරි විද්‍යාලයේ (College of William & Mary) AidData research lab හි ප්‍රධානියා වන ඔහු මෙම පර්යේෂණය සම්පූර්ණ කරනු ලැබුවේ හාවර්ඩ් විශ්ව විද්‍යාලයේ හා ජර්මනියේ හෙයිඩ්ල්බර්ග් විශ්ව විද්‍යාලයේ පර්යේෂකයින් සමග එක්වීමෙනි. චීන ආණ්ඩුව පිළිතුරු නොදුන් ප්‍රශ්නවලට පිළිතුරු දීම සඳහා තමන්ගේම ක්‍රමවේදයක් සකසා ගැනීමට AidData කණ්ඩායමට සිදුවිය. ප්‍රවෘත්ති වාර්තා, නිල තානාපති ලේඛන මෙන්ම චීනය සමග ගනුදෙනුවලට එක්වූ පාර්ශ්වවල ආධාර හා ණය තොරතුරු උපයෝගී කරගනිමින් චීනයෙන් අදාළ රටවලට මුදල් ගලායාම නිරීක්ෂණය කෙරිණි. කොටසින් කොටස එක්කෙරුණු එම තොරතුරුවලින් ගොඩනැගුනු සාපේක්ෂ වශයෙන් සම්පුර්ණ චිත්‍රයෙන් චීනයේ ආධාර යොමුවන්නේ කොයිබට ද යන්න සහ එහි ඇති බලපෑම කෙබඳුද යන්න පෙන්නුම් කළේය. "මා හිතන්නේ මේ ක්‍රමවේදය නිසා අප දන්නා මෙන්ම දැනගත හැකි තොරතුරු විසල් ප්‍රමාණයක් හෙළිවුණා." යැයි පවසන බ්‍රැඩ් පාර්ක්ස්, "චීන ආණ්ඩුවට සැබවින්ම යමක් සඟවන්නට වුවමනා උනානම්, අපට ඒක හසුකරගන්න බැරිවෙන්න පුළුවන්. නමුත් කිසියම් රටකට චීනයෙන් සැලකිය යුතු තරමේ මුදලක් යොමුවෙනවානම් එය හමුවෙනවා. " අධ්‍යයනයෙන් හෙළිවූ ප්‍රධාන කරුණක් වන්නේ, අදාළ දත්ත සමුදායට අයත් වසරවලදී චීනය හා ඇමෙරිකාව සමාන මුදල් ප්‍රමාණයක් මුදා හැරීමය. නමුත් එය සිදුවී තිබෙන්නේ අතිශයින්ම වෙනස් ආකාරයෙනි. ඇමෙරිකාවේ මුල්‍යාධාරවලින් අති බහුතරය (93%) බටහිර ලෝකයේ කාර්මික රටවල පිළිගැනීමට අනුව ගැනෙන්නේ ආධාර පිළිබඳ සම්ප්‍රදායික රාමුවටය. ආධාර ලබන රටවල ආර්ථික සංවර්ධනය සහ සුබ සාධනය මුලික ඉලක්කය කොටගෙන එම ආධාර සැපයේ. එම මුදලින් අවම තරමින් හතරෙන් එකක් නැවත ගෙවිය යුතු ණයක් නොවන, ඍජු ප්‍රදානයක් නියෝජනය කෙරේ. ඊට ඉඳුරාම වෙනස්ව යමින්, චීනය අනෙකුත් රටවලට සපයන ආධාරවලින් කුඩා ප්‍රමාණයක් (21%) සම්ප්‍රදායික ආධාර ගණයෙහි ලා සැලකේ. එසේනම්, ඉතිරි මුදල් ප්‍රමාණය ? වාණිජ ණය ලෙස දෙන එම ණය ප්‍රමාණය පොලිය ද සමග යළි බෙයිජිං වෙත ගෙවිය යුතුය. "සිය ප්‍රාග්ධනය වෙනුවෙන් ආකර්ශනීය ආර්ථික ප්‍රතිලාභයක් ලබාගැනීමට චීනයට අවශ්‍යයි" බ්‍රැඩ් පාර්ක්ස් කියා සිටී. කණ්ඩායමේ අනෙක් ප්‍රධාන සොයාගැනීම : චීනය සම්ප්‍රදායික ආධාර සපයන විට එම ආධාර ලබන රටවල් සිත්ගන්නා සුලු ආර්ථික වාසි අත්කර ගනී. චීනයේ ආධාර ව්‍යාපෘති හුදෙක් චීනයට ප්‍රතිලාභ සැලසෙන අයුරින් සකසා ඇති බවට දීර්ඝ කාලයක් පුරා සැක කෙරිණි; යටිතල පහසුකම් ව්‍යාපෘති ඉදිකෙරුනේ ගෙන්වාගන්නා ලද චීන ශ්‍රමිකයින්ගෙනි. උදාහරණයක් ලෙස, මේ නිසා රට තුළ පුද්ගලයින්ගේ ජීවිතවලට සැලකිය යුතු තරමේ දෙයක් එක් නොවීය. කෙසේවෙතත්, බටහිර ලෝකයේ ආධාර දෙන රටවල් මෙන් චීනය ද සංවර්ධන ආධාර ව්‍යාපෘති කළමනාකරණයට සමත්කම් දක්වන බව මේ පර්යේෂණයෙන් පෙනීගොස් ඇත. ඩො.බි.362 චීන විදේශ ආධාර හා ණය එකතුව චීන ආධාරවලින් ණය හැරුණුවිට ප්‍රදාන සේ සැලකෙන ප්‍රමාණය 21% අදාළ කාලය තුළ සමස්ත ඇමෙරිකානු ආධාර හා ණය ප්‍රමාණය ඩො.බි.399 සමස්ත ඇමෙරිකානු ආධාරවලින්,ආර්ථික සංවර්ධන හා සුබසාධනය ඉලක්කගත සම්ප්‍රදායික ආධාර ප්‍රමාණය 93% වසර 2000 සිට චීනය සපයන ආධාර සහ ණයවලින් විශාල පංගුවක් අප්‍රිකානු රටවල් විසින් හිමිකරගනු ලැබ ඇත. කෙසේවෙතත්, සෙනෙගාලයේ රෝහල් ව්‍යාපෘතිවල සිට පාකිස්තානයේ හා ශ්‍රී ලංකාවේ වරාය දක්වා ලෝක ව්‍යාප්තව චීනයේ ධනය බෙදා හැර තිබේ. AidData පර්යේෂණයට ලක්වූ ඉතා ආසන්නම වසර වූ 2014 දී එම ආධාර ලබන රටවල් ලැයිස්තුවේ ඉහළට ම පැමිණ තිබුනේ රුසියාව ය. පාකිස්තානය හා නයිජීරියාව ඒ පසුපසින් සිටී. ඇමෙරිකාව හා චීනය සිය මුදල් යෙදවීම තීරණය කිරීමේදී දේශපාලනය ප්‍රධාන භූමිකාවක් ඉටු කරයි. පොලිය ද සමග සිය ණය ලබාගැනීමට චීනයට අවශ්‍යවන විට චීන අපනයන හෝ වෙළෙඳපොල ණය අනුපාත ප්‍රවර්ධනය කෙරෙහි චීනය නිතරම අවධානය යොමු කරන බව AidData පර්යේෂකයින් විසින් හඳුනාගනු ලැබ ඇත. උතුරු කොරියාවේ සෙලවෙන ආර්ථිකයට ආධාර දෙනු ලබන ප්‍රධානම මූලාශ්‍රය චීනය බව නිතරම පෙනෙන්නට තිබේ. එහෙත් AidData පර්යේෂකයින් පෙන්වා දෙන පරිදි වසර 14ක් පුරා උතුරු කොරියාවේ පැවතියේ චීන ව්‍යාපෘති 17 වන අතර එහි මුළු එකතුව ඩොලර් මිලියන 210ක් තරම් නොවැදගත් වටිනාකමකි. "තොරතුරු සම්බන්ධයෙන් කලු සිදුරක්" ලෙස හඳුන්වා දෙන බ්‍රැඩ් පාර්ක්ස්, උතුරු කොරියාව පර්යේෂකයන් මග හැර ගිය එකම ආධාර ලබන රට බව පිළිගනී. චීනය උතුරු කොරියාවට දෙනු ලබන්නේ යැයි විශ්වාස කෙරෙන අති විශාල මුදල් සම්භාරය හා අනෙකුත් ආධාර තිබෙන්නේ ගෝලීය මුල්‍ය පද්ධතියෙන් පරිබාහිරවය. 1960 ගණන්වල සිට 1990 දශකය දක්වා බටහිර ලෝකයේ රටවලින් සංවර්ධනය වෙමින් පවතින රටවලට ලැබුනේ ඉහළ පොලියෙන් යුතු වෙළෙඳපොළ අනුපාතයේ ණය වේ. එහෙත් මේ තත්ත්වය ණය දෙන රටවලට අයහපත් ලෙස බලපෑවේ එම ණය ගන්නා රටවලට තමන් එසේ ගත් ණයවල පොලිය යළි ගෙවා ගත නොහැකිවන්නට පටන්ගත් විටය. ඒ අනුව බටහිර ආධාර ආකෘතිය යළි සකසන්නට යෙදුණි. "සංවර්ධනය වෙමින් පවතින රටවලට වෙළෙඳපොළ අනුපාත ණය පිරිනැමීමෙන් වැළකීමේ පොදු ප්‍රතිපත්තියක් තිබුණා." බ්‍රැඩ් පාර්ක්ස් පවසයි. "මෙන්න දැන් චීනය එතනට ඇවිත්. ඔවුන් එම සන්ධානයේ හවුල්කරුවන් නොවේ. එම ප්‍රතිපත්තියේ නොයෙදුණු ඔවුන් බොහොම ඕනෑකමින් වෙළෙඳපොල අනුපාතයට ආසන්න හෝ එම අනුපාතයට ණය සපයනවා." "සහනයක් ඕනෑ වූ අවස්ථාවලදී ජාත්‍යන්තර මුල්‍ය අරමුදල හමුවට නොයා ඒ වෙනුවට චීනය වෙත රටවල් යොමුවීම වැඩිවෙමින් තිබෙනවා." මේ දක්වා දත්ත වලින් පෙන්වා දෙන්නේ චීනයෙන් වෙළෙඳපොල අනුපාතයට ණය ලබාගන්නා රටවල් ආර්ථිකමය වශයෙන් අසීරුතාවකට පත්නොවුවත් ආර්ථික වර්ධනයක් ද නොලබන බවය. බෙයිජිං වෙත ගෙවීමට ඇති ණය යළි ගෙවාගත නොහැකි වීම නිසා රටවල් ණය බර ඉහළ යාමෙන් ඉදිරි වසර 10 හෝ 15 තුළදී මේ තත්ත්වය වෙනස් වේ යැයි පර්යේෂකයෝ බිය පළ කරති. ඒ අවස්ථාවේදී චීනයට වෙනස් ආකාරයකට සිතන්නට සිදුවනු ඇත. "ඔවුන් හොඳ තැනක ඉන්නවා වෙන්නට පුළුවන්, නමුත් තව අවුරුදු 10 න් හෝ 15 කින් දුන් ණය ආපසු නොලැබෙන විට බටහිර ණය දෙන්නන් මුහුණ දුන් ආකාරයේ ප්‍රශ්නවලට ඔවුන්ටත් මුහුණ දෙන්න සිදුවේවි." බ්‍රැඩ් පාර්ක්ස් පැහැදිලි කළේය. "එය සිදුවීමට පටන්ගත්විට එම ණය යළි සකසන්නේ කොහොමද යන්න ගැන සමහර විට බෙයිජිං පාලනය සිතා බලන්නට පටන් ගනීවි." බ්‍රිටිෂ් කොලොම්බියා විශ්ව විද්‍යාලයේ පර්යේෂක සියාජුන් ලි පවසන්නේ ණය දීමේ ප්‍රවේශයේ වෙනස්කමක් කිරීමට චීනය පෙළඹීමේ ලකුණු දැනටමත් පර්යේෂකයින් විසින් සොයාගනු ලැබ ඇති බවය. ලෝක බැංකුවට පිළිතුරු සපයමින්, ආසියානු යටිතල පහසුකම් ආයෝජන බැංකුව වැනි බහුජාතික ආයතන හරහා චීනය ණය දීම වැඩි කර තිබේ. ණය ලබන රටවලට කොන්දේසි විශාල ප්‍රමාණයක් යෙදවීම නතර කිරීම සඳහා සම්ප්‍රදයික ණය දෙන්නන්ට බලපෑම් කරමින්, සමස්ත ගෝලීය ණය දීමේ පද්ධතියට බලපෑමක් කිරීමට තරම් චීනයේ පාලනයකින් තොර ණය දීමේ ක්‍රමයට හැකියාවක් ලැබී නැති බව සාක්ෂිවලින් පෙනී ගොස් ඇත. AidData දත්ත පදනම උපයෝගී කරගන්නා ආර්ථික විද්‍යාඥ ඩියෙගෝ හර්නැන්ඩස් හෙළිකරන්නේ ප්‍රධාන ණය සපයන්නෙකු ලෙස චීනයේ භූමිකාව සම්ප්‍රදායික ණය දෙන්නන් අතර තරගය වැඩි කිරීමට හේතුවී ඇති බවය. "අප්‍රිකානු රටක් ද චීනයේ සහය ලබන විට," යැයි පවසමින් ඉදිරියට යන හර්නැන්ඩස්, "තමන්ගේ ණයවලට අදාළව ලෝක බැංකුව අඩු කොදේසි ප්‍රමාණයක් පනවනවා" චීන ආධාරවල සෑම 1%ක වර්ධනයක් වනවිට ලෝක බැංකුව විසින් සාමාන්‍යයෙන් පනවනු ලබන වෙළෙඳපොල නිදහස හෝ ආර්ථික පාරදෘශ්‍ය බව වැනි කොන්දේසි 15%න් අඩු කරන බව හර්නැන්ඩස් හඳුනා ගත්තේය. චීනයේ "දළ ආධාර" ඇතැම් රටවලට ප්‍රජාතන්ත්‍රවාදී ප්‍රතිසංස්කරණවලින් ඉවත්ව සිටීමට ඉඩකඩ සලසා ඇතැයි දිගු කාලයක සිට විචාරකයින්ගේ දෝෂ දර්ශනයට ලක්ව තිබේ. සම්ප්‍රදායික බටහිර ණය දෙන රටවල සුපරීක්ෂණයෙන් ගැලවී ඉතා පහසුවෙන් චීන ආධාර වෙත යොමු වීමට එම රටවලට හැකිවීම මීට හේතුව බව ඔවුහු පවසති. කාම්බෝජය මීට දැක්විය හැකි ආසන්නතම නිදසුන ය. සාධාරණ මැතිවරණයක් පවත්වන ලෙසට වොෂිංටන් පරිපාලනය කරන ඉල්ලීම මගහැර යමින් චීනය සමග සබඳතා තරකර ගැනීමට කාම්බෝජ නායකයින් පියවර ගනිද්දී ස්වාධීන පුවත්පත් මෙන්ම බටහිර රාජ්‍ය නොවන සංවිධානවලට ද ඉඩකඩ ඇහිරිණි. චීන ආධාර අප්‍රිකානු රටවල් වෙනසකට භාජනය කර ඇත්තේ කෙසේදැයි අධ්‍යයනය කළ සියාඔජින් ලි, චීන ආධාර දෙසට යොමුවීම හරහා බටහිර ණය දෙන රටවල කොන්දේසි මග හැර යා හැකි යැයි සංවර්ධනය වෙමින් පවතින රටවල් නිගමනය කිරීමෙන් ප්‍රජාතන්ත්‍රවාදී ප්‍රතිසංස්කරණ මන්දගාමී වී ඇති බවට තර්කයක් මතු කරයි. "ආධාර සම්බන්ධයෙන් චීනයේ ප්‍රවේශය සම්ප්‍රදායික ණය දෙන රටවල විවේචනයට ලක්වෙලා" යැයි පවසන ඔහු, එහෙත් "බොහෝ අප්‍රිකානු රටවල් බෙයිජිං සහාය වැළඳ ගන්නවා, එහෙමත් නැතිනම් අඩුම තරමින් වෙනත් විකල්ප කරා යන්න කැමැත්තක් දක්වනවා" යැයි ද පවසයි. (සෙලියා හැටන්, බීබීසී ප්‍රවෘත්ති වෙනුවෙන් සැකසූ වාර්තාවක් ඇසුරිණි)
Aleppo, Syria's second city, was once the country's commercial and industrial hub, as well as a major regional tourist destination. But four years of war have left large parts of the Old City - designated by Unesco as a World Heritage site - in ruins. As the evacuation of the rebel-held eastern areas nears completion and government forces take full control of the city, pictures have begun to emerge of the devastation. The 13th century Citadel of Aleppo is one of the city's most iconic landmarks, but the war has left it badly damaged inside and out. Syrian government soldiers used the citadel as a defensive stronghold and, as a result, it frequently came under fire from rebel fighters. Just to the west of the citadel, the Great or Umayyad Mosque - built between the 8th and 13th centuries - has been left almost in ruins. Its 45m (150ft) 11th century minaret was toppled three years ago. The 12th Century al-Shibani School, just to the south of the mosque, had become a venue for hosting cultural events and exhibitions after a major renovation. Now the centre is deserted, in need of major building work. Hammam al-Nahasin, also just south of the mosque, is situated in the heart of Aleppo's ancient souk and dates back to the 13th Century. The male-only bathhouse was another popular tourist destination before the civil war. It isn't just the old city that has been damaged. The fighting has also closed the Shabha Mall - one of the largest shopping centres in Aleppo. The mall was for a while reportedly used by so-called Islamic State as a prison before being taken over by the rival jihadist group, al-Nusra Front. All images courtesy of Reuters. .
Billions of euros of British taxpayers' money could remain locked into an EU bank for more than thirty years after Brexit, the UK has been warned. Alexander Stubb, vice president of the European Investment Bank - in which the UK is a 16% shareholder - said it would not be fully repaid until 2054. He described Brexit as a "travesty" but denied the move was a punishment. "The EIB has leveraged the economy of the UK many, many fold over the years," he told BBC Radio 4's Today. The UK has 3.5bn euros (£3.1bn) of capital at the bank and a House of Lords report said the UK's investment could be worth 10.1bn (£8.9bn) euros taking into account reserves and profits. Established in 1958, the EIB uses capital provided by EU countries to make loans at low rates, often for major infrastructure projects. All 28 EU nations are shareholders in the Luxembourg-based bank, with the UK being the largest alongside Germany, France and Italy. Mr Stubb, a former prime minister of Finland, told the BBC that the UK's money could be tied up for decades in after it leaves the EU in 2019. "Everyone on both sides of the negotiating table agree that we have to pay back the 3.5 billion euro, basically in cash, and that will happen over a long period, up until 2054, because that's when the loans are amortised." He insisted that no-one in the bank wanted to "punish" the UK for leaving and actually wanted to "alleviate the pain" of Brexit. "I have a British heart pumping, I am married to a Brit, my children have dual nationality and I think Brexit is one of the biggest travesties that we have seen in the modern era," he said. "So I will do everything in my power to alleviate the pain, but the economic facts are just such that there are no winners in Brexit - apart from perhaps a few lawyers. Unfortunately, we will see this in the coming years." The BBC's Ross Hawkins said Today had heard how delays in authorising new loans while the UK remains part of the EU could see fewer social homes built. One housing association, Stonewater, said it may build around 300 fewer homes because its application for £100m to build new properties had ground to a halt. Its executive director John Bruton told the programme: "The Bank has been waiting for assurances from the UK government before the application can be progressed."
It's the weekly news quiz - have you been paying attention to what's been going on in the world over the past seven days? If you missed last week's quiz, try it here Picture credits: Getty Images, PA, Reuters Join the conversation - find us on Facebook, Instagram, Snapchat and Twitter
Chile fue el gran ganador en la penúltima fecha de las eliminatorias sudamericanas al Mundial de Rusia 2018 al vencer a Ecuador y aprovechar la carambola de resultados en los otros partidos para saltar del sexto al tercer lugar en la tabla. Pero la euforia de la victoria en Santiago se puede transformar rápidamente en decepción si el próximo martes no asegura por lo menos un punto contra Brasil, al que nunca le ha ganado de visitante. Por encima de la Roja se encuentra Uruguay, pero la Celeste todavía no está matemáticamente en Rusia con su empate frente a Venezuela. De hecho, según las números, todavía hay seis países con posibilidades de lograr uno de los tres cupos directos que quedan por definir o en su defecto alcanzar la plaza que da acceso al repechaje contra Nueva Zelanda. Es en este escenario que se llevará a cabo el desenlace final de las eliminatorias más caprichosas de la historia, en la que en cuestión de minutos se puede transformar el sueño mundialista en pesadilla y viceversa. ¿Pero qué necesita cada uno de los países para llegar al Mundial? En BBC Mundo te lo contamos con la ayuda de los datos compartidos por el estadístico español Alexis Martín Tamayo, mejor conocido como MisterChip. 2º Uruguay - 28 puntos La Celeste va al Mundial en casi todas las combinaciones de resultados, pero si quiere evitar cualquier tipo de sustos debe por lo menos sumar un punto frente a Bolivia en el estadio Centenario. Por la historia no debería tener problemas para lograrlo ya que nunca ha perdido como local contra los bolivianos y ha ganado ocho de los nueves partidos jugados por eliminatorias, incluyendo los últimos siete. Pero en caso de producirse la sorpresa y perder todavía seguiría con un pie en el avión a Rusia y sólo si se dan dos escenarios de resultados improbables, como lo explica MisterChip, terminaría jugando el repechaje. El más factible de los dos, para tener una idea, es que ganen además de Bolivia, Chile, Colombia y Argentina, aunque esta última remontando una diferencia de nueve goles. Algo prácticamente imposible. 3º Chile - 26 puntos La Roja cumplió y ganó su último partido de local para mantener viva la esperanza de clasificar al Mundial. Pero si bien sus probabilidades aumentaron considerablemente tras la fecha del jueves, todavía no puede comenzar a hacer las maletas. La razón es que juega contra Brasil, a la que nunca ha ganado de visitante en partido oficial y sólo registra un empate, el que logró en los octavos de final del pasado Mundial de 2014 y que terminó perdiendo en la definición por penales. Si logra sumar un punto lograría la clasificación si empatan Perú y Colombia o no gana Argentina. En el caso de un triunfo albiceleste y que haya un ganador en Lima, los dirigidos por Juan Antonio Pizzi irían al repechaje. Todo lo anterior tomando en cuenta que Paraguay no logre golear a Venezuela por un margen superior de seis goles. Pero en caso de perder pasa a depender que Argentina y Paraguay no ganen y que no haya un empate entre Perú y Colombia. Aunque según MisterChip seguiría clasificando en 53 de los 81 casos posibles. 4º Colombia - 26 puntos En Colombia todavía no pueden creer cómo se les escapó la clasificación tras adelantarse con el gol de Radamel Falcao. Pero lo cierto es que todavía dependen de sí mismos para lograr el pase si logran ganar a Perú en Lima, algo que a priori y por antecedentes no parece imposible. En caso de empate también van a Rusia si Argentina no gana o si pierde Chile. Si esto no ocurre todavía tiene opciones de jugar el repechaje, aunque estos escenarios dependen, al igual que Chile, que no haya una goleada local en Asunción. "Aún perdiendo quedaría entre los cinco primeros en 31 de los 81 casos posibles", aclaró el estadístico español Martín Tamayo. 5º Perú - 25 puntos En Lima siguen aferrados a la posibilidad de jugar su primer mundial en 36 años y tras sobrevivir en la Bombonera buscarán sellar la clasificación como locales contra Colombia. Si gana se clasifica si no lo hace Chile en Brasil y Argentina no lo hace por una diferencia de goles mayor que el resultado en Lima. De ocurrir esto último iría a la repesca. Si empata, según MisterChip, quedaría entre los cinco primeros en 42 de los 81 casos posibles, pero si pierde sólo tienen una opción de mantener su quinto lugar. Eso sería que no gane Paraguay y que Argentina pierda por los mismos o más goles de diferencia que ellos. 6º Argentina - 25 puntos Pocos se podían imaginar que Argentina llegaría a la última fecha dependiendo de otros resultados para poder clasificar a Rusia, pero ni los cambios de estadios le han servido para sumar los puntos necesarios de local. De los nueve encuentros jugados en territorio argentino sólo ganó cuatro, sumando tres empates y dos derrotas. Ahora viajará a Quito con la necesidad de ganar o como mínimo sumar un empate, aunque ninguna de las dos opciones le garantiza la clasificación. En el primero de los casos logrará su boleto si Chile no le gana a Brasil y Perú no logra una victoria por una diferencia menor a la de Argentina sobre Ecuador. Si esto sucedes la albiceleste iría al repechaje. Si empata todavía podría quedar entre los cinco primeros en 30 de los 81 casos posibles, pero perdiendo sólo le queda una opción para ir a la repesca. Que no gane Paraguay y pierda Perú, pero estos últimos por una diferencia de goles mayor a la que sufra Argentina en Quito. 7º Paraguay - 24 puntos Unas de cal y otras de arena para la selección guaraní, que gana de visitante y pierde de local. Esa irregularidad es la que condicionó sus opciones de llegar al mundial, al que solo puede aspirar si logra ganar el partido que le queda en Asunción contra Venezuela. Si lo consigue, lograría el pase si pierde Chile y no gana Argentina. En caso que la Roja no pierda y gana Argentina quedaría eliminada, pero si llega a producirse otra combinación de resultados, siempre teniendo en cuenta su victoria contra Venezuela, obtendría la plaza del repechaje, como lo explicó MisterChip. El consuelo para cada una de estas selecciones sería llegar al repechaje y jugarse el pase en una eliminatoria que se presenta favorable frente a Nueva Zelanda. Pero por lo visto arriba sólo Uruguay podría darse el lujo de ir preparando las celebraciones. Al resto le quedan horas de angustia hasta que se defina todo este martes 10 de octubre.
Cuando entramos en el ciberespacio, no siempre somos conscientes de que nos adentramos en un mundo virtual donde el tiempo pasa más deprisa y pensamos y nos comportamos de manera muy distinta a como lo hacemos en el mundo real. La ciberpsicóloga forense Mary Aiken lo describe como un "mundo hiperconectado" en el que "todo se amplifica" (lo bueno, como el altruismo, y lo malo, como la delincuencia) y nos volvemos mucho más vulnerables. "La tecnología se ha infiltrado en cada uno de los aspectos de nuestra vida", escribe Aiken en su libro The Cyber Effect (2016), en el que habla del comportamiento humano en internet. "Estamos viviendo un momento histórico muy emocionante en el cual están cambiando muchos aspectos de la vida en la Tierra. Pero lo nuevo no siempre es bueno y tecnología no es sinónimo de progreso", dice la psicóloga, cuyo trabajo en el FBI e Interpol inspiró la serie televisiva CSI Cyber. Nuestros instintos nos fallan cuando entramos en el ciberespacio Aiken dice que, una vez que entramos en el ciberespacio (el mundo digital), "viajamos" a un lugar diferente en el que nuestras emociones y percepciones se transforman. "Muchos no se dan cuenta. Están sentados en el sofá de su casa y cuando están online nada cambia. En su mente no se fueron a ningún lugar, pero las condiciones son diferentes a las de la vida real. Por eso nuestros instintos nos fallan en el ciberespacio". Aiken y otros psicólogos como Patricia Wallace (The Psychology of the Internet, 1999) o John Suler (The Psychology of Cyberspace, 2001 y 2004) llevan años investigando este fenómeno. Y estos son algunos de los efectos que han observado. "Este efecto es muy interesante porque hace que la gente haga cosas en el mundo cibernético que no haría en el mudo real", le contó Aiken a la BBC. Los seres humanos somos menos amables en internet que en persona y más proclives a ofender a los demás. Una de las razones es la invisibilidad que nos proporciona internet, la ilusión del anonimato. La mayoría de las personas en internet no saben quién eres. Cuando tenemos la posibilidad de separar nuestras acciones del mundo real y de nuestra identidad, nos sentimos menos vulnerables a la hora de abrirnos a los demás. Y este efecto tiene como consecuencia otros efectos, como el de la agrupación online. "En un estado mental menos inhibido, las personas con ideas afines se encuentran más fácilmente", explica Aiken. "Si eres una niña de 13 años con un problema alimenticio, ¿cuáles eran las probabilidades de que conocieras a alguien con una condición similar antes de internet? Ahora con dos clics puedes encontrar a personas afines". La oportunidad de ser invisible amplifica el efecto desinhibidor. No tienes que preocuparte sobre cómo te ves o cómo suenas cuando dices (tecleas) algo y puedes evitar el contacto visual. Otra de las consecuencias de esta invisibilidad es lo que Aiken llama "cibersocialización", una forma acelerada de socialización potenciada por las redes sociales y la manera en que nos comunicamos en internet. Y también la minimización de la autoridad. "Si la gente no puede verte a ti o lo que te rodea, no saben si eres el presidente de una empresa o una persona 'normal'. [...] En internet, la autoridad se minimiza. La gente está mucho más dispuesta a hablar o comportarse mal", explica Suler. "Haz esto la próxima vez que te conectes a internet: desconecta el reloj de tu pantalla y, de vez en cuando, ponte a prueba para ver si eres capaz de calcular con acierto el paso del tiempo", sugiere Aiken. Este fenómeno ha sido ampliamente estudiado en los últimos años. En febrero de 2017, un grupo de psicólogos del Centro de Neurociencia Cognitiva y Sistemas Cognitivos de la Universidad de Kent, Reino Unido, publicó un estudio en el que aseguraban que tendemos a subestimar las horas que pasamos en redes sociales como Facebook. La razón es que internet modifica nuestro proceso de atención. A esta distorsión del tiempo habría que sumar el asincronismo del universo virtual: la interacción en internet no ocurre en tiempo real, y no tener que tratar con reacciones inmediatas hace que nos relajemos. Suler dice que en internet nos sentimos como personajes imaginarios que "creamos" y que existen en un espacio diferente, la dimensión digital. "Es un mundo soñado, fuera de las responsabilidades del mundo real [...]. Separamos o disociamos la ficción online de los hechos offline. La ciberabogada Emily Finch dijo que algunos ven su vida en internet como una especie de juego con reglas y normas que no se aplican en su vida diaria. "Una vez que apagan la computadora y vuelven a su rutina del día a día, creen que pueden dejar atrás su identidad en el juego", explica Suler. "¿Por qué deberían ser responsables de lo que ocurre en ese mundo de ficción que no tiene nada que ver con la realidad?".
For those living in countries like China, where the internet is heavily restricted, one way to get access to the open web is via a virtual private network, or VPN. These help obscure who you are and where on the internet you are going. There are catches, though. You often have to pay to use a good VPN. Or you give up something else, like your data, privacy, or even safety if the authorities find out what you are up to. One idea that hit my inbox earlier this week was Orchid. Orchid is a system that gets people to share their own internet bandwidth in order to create one big decentralised VPN service, which people in restrictive countries can use. (Or indeed, people who just want to browse the web anonymously.) Why would you do such a thing? Because you will get paid... sort of. ‘Credibility' In return for a slice of your bandwidth you will receive a new crypto-currency - the Orchid Token - that might be worth something, someday. Hard emphasis on "might" and "someday". “What they will be worth in the future... I do not know,” says Steven Waterhouse, chief executive and co-founder of Orchid. "I’m not in the business of making forward projections. But we’ve sold rights to these tokens to investors in Silicon Valley, Europe and Asia. We will be selling more rights very soon, and some time in 2018 we’ll be doing a public token sale." What that means is Orchid Tokens do not yet have a tangible value, but investors - including the extremely well-regarded venture capital firm Andreessen Horowitz - have backed their future value with real money, to the tune of $4.7m (£3.5m). It is just one of a number of new crypto-currencies that are popping up, modelled on the success of Bitcoin. Some show promise, but collectively they come with a warning: you might lose everything you put in. "What I would ask people to look at is the credibility of our team and the credibility of our advisors," says Mr Waterhouse. "We’re very mission-oriented, we’ve had great careers in this space and a lot of experience." Whitelist Assuming for a moment that Orchid Tokens become something people actually want, the system will work by combining bandwidth contributors and bandwidth consumers. A contributor would be someone in - for example - London, who wants to earn some tokens by connecting his computer up and sharing out his internet connection so it can be used as part of the Orchid VPN. Meanwhile, the consumer pays tokens in order to connect to the VPN. The user in London gets a cut of those tokens, as do other contributors offering up their bandwidth. If you have alarm bells ringing in your head, I do not blame you. The prospect of allowing someone I do not know to route data through my internet connection is terrifying - who knows what they may view or download. But Mr Waterhouse said they have built in safeguards against abuse. “You might say, 'Hey, I’m willing to access Wikipedia or Twitter for people in China, but I don’t really want to access some of these dodgy things'. "I can change what I'm going to allow people to access. They can go to Wikipedia, but not something else. Those white-lists are things that you can create, or you can subscribe to one that the community creates." Or, Mr Whitehouse adds, you could take the opposite approach. “You could say 'yeah, do whatever you want' - and you might get paid more for that.” Not like Tor The main stated use case for Orchid is for people in restrictive countries to get around firewalls, censorship and surveillance. But in countries where internet use is relatively open, Mr Waterhouse expects there to be interest in Orchid as an anonymising tool. However, he insists it will not be a place for illegal activity, which is known to occur on the existing anonymous network Tor. "We don’t enable dark services by default at all,” he said. He predicts the “good traffic” from Tor. People not using it for illegal purposes will migrate over to Orchid because it may be quicker, he believes - though that relies on Orchid having a large number of bandwidth contributors. A lot of ifs and buts in there. As I leave our interview, I apologise for pointing out the cliche “chicken and egg” scenario that Mr Waterhouse and his team face. Orchid needs contributors so consumers can connect. Consumers will only connect if there are contributors. And all of it relies on the Orchid Token being worth something, when right now its dollar value is precisely nothing. A beta programme for the service launches on Thursday, and if everything stays on schedule Orchid will be open to the public in January. Mr Waterhouse says he will quickly put many current VPN services out of business, but that remains to be seen.
The wife of an Army sergeant accused of tampering with her parachute said she should have never survived a 4,000ft fall, a court has been told. Victoria Cilliers, 42, suffered multiple injuries in a fall in Wiltshire in April 2015. Emile Cilliers, 37, denies two counts of attempted murder and one of recklessly endangering life. Mrs Cilliers told the court she could not categorically say if it was or was not an accident. But added: "Never in the history of parachuting worldwide has it happened". In a three-hour police interview, shown to Winchester Crown Court, the former Army officer spoke of her time in hospital after the near-fatal fall at Netheravon Airfield in which she suffered broken vertebrae, ribs and pelvis. The 42-year-old told detectives she "shouldn't have survived" that. "It's not really a conceivable accident, you can't categorically say it was not an accident, you can't categorically say it was, but never in the history of parachuting worldwide has it happened." Prosecutors allege Mr Cilliers, a sergeant with the Aldershot-based Royal Army Physical Training Corps, twisted the lines of her main parachute and sabotaged a reserve chute the day before her jump. Mrs Cilliers told officers how her husband did not visit her very often in the hospital and showed little interest in her. She said: "I said 'I love you' and he did not reply, which is harsh in that situation, really... harsh." She also spoke of how he had been "absolutely livid" after confronting him about smoking in the car adding it was the "one time" she was "scared" and had "never seen that kind of look on someone before". Mr Cilliers denies two counts of attempted murder and one of damaging a gas valve, recklessly endangering life. The trial was adjourned until Monday.
Jurors in the trial of a man accused of attempting to murder his wife by sabotaging her parachute have visited the airfield they used. Victoria Cilliers, 40, suffered multiple injuries in a 4,000ft fall at Netheravon Airfield, Wiltshire, on 5 April, 2015. Emile Cilliers, 37, denies attempting to murder her. Jurors were taken from Winchester Crown Court and shown the kit store and mats where parachutes are packed. The nine men and three women were told by Det Con Maddie Hennah of Wiltshire Police they would see locations "thought to feature significantly in this investigation". She told them they would pause at 20 locations identified on a plan and maps. That included toilets where the prosecution alleges Mr Cilliers took the parachute to tamper with it, before storing it in a locker overnight. The jurors were then shown a packed Safire 149 parachute, similar to the one used by Mrs Cilliers, and were given a chance to pick it up to feel its weight. Mr Cilliers, of the Royal Army Physical Training Corps in Aldershot, denies two charges of attempted murder and one count of damaging a gas valve at the couple's home in Amesbury, Wiltshire. The trial continues.
Husband-and-wife mountaineering team Romano Benet and Nives Meroi were attempting a winter ascent of the world's fifth-highest mountain, Makalu, when things went badly wrong. It was the first of two serious challenges that could have brought their climbing careers, and even their lives, to an end. The biggest problem on Makalu was the freezing wind. Considered one of the most difficult mountains in the world to climb, in early 2008 a relentless gale was making it almost impossible. Two years before, French mountaineer Jean-Christophe Lafaillle had died trying to make a winter ascent. But Benet and Meroi, and their fellow Italian Luca Vuerich, had not yet given up hope of success. "For a month the gusts knocked us from here to there, and we couldn't even sleep at night," Meroi remembers. Despite everything, the trio reached 7,000m (22,966 ft) - about 1,500m below the summit - and decided to hang on, hoping that the wind would die down. "Instead, the jet stream exploded in a furious crescendo," Meroi says. "We were running for our lives, when a gust of wind picked me up. "My feet lost their grip on the gravel, I slipped between two big boulders and I fell, with my body twisting on my trapped foot. "The wind continued to howl while I heard the sharp sound of my bone snapping." With a broken leg, she could not move unaided. So for two days Benet and Vuerich took turns to carry her on their shoulders. They walked through fog and along a glacier to reach Camp Hillary at 4,860m (16,000ft) where a rescue helicopter was able to pick them up and fly them to Kathmandu. "Despite 40 years of climbing we still fear the mountains," Meroi says. Meroi and Benet first met at high school in Italy, and started hiking and climbing together after discovering their shared passion for the outdoors. "Romano likes to say it was a matter of convenience," Meroi says. "It was easier to have a girlfriend who could also climb, so he didn't have to struggle to find a climbing partner every weekend." The couple's marriage, in 1989, was actually triggered by their desire to go climbing in the Peruvian Andes, on the Cordillera Blanca range. "It was a dream we had, but we had no money or leave days," Meroi says. "So we decided to get married because our employers would give us two weeks off, and we asked our friends and family to pay for the trip." Listen to Nives Meroi and Romano Benet talking about their extraordinary mountaineering success on Outlook on the BBC World Service. The year after the ill-fated Makalu trip, once Meroi's leg had healed, the couple to set out to climb Kangchenjunga, the world's third-highest mountain, which straddles India and Nepal. They were closing in on the 8,586m summit when Benet felt unwell. "I was tired and slower than usual so I decided to stop, but I told Nives to continue," he says. If Meroi had climbed the remaining few hundred metres to the summit, she would have stood a good chance of becoming the first woman to climb all of the world's 14 peaks above 8,000m (26,247ft). But she didn't think twice about turning round. "When I realised there was something wrong with Romano I decided to descend as fast as we could," she says. "I thought, 'What's the point of me going up there alone?' If Romano had waited in the tent at 7,600m while I was trying to climb to the top I might not have found him alive when I came back." Benet was eventually diagnosed with aplastic anaemia, a very rare and potentially life-threatening condition in which your bone marrow fails to produce enough new blood cells. The couple refer to this as their 15th eight-thousander, and the most difficult one. "If it wasn't for the difficult situations that we had experienced in the mountains, I don't think I would be able to bear all this," Benet used to tell Meroi during the months of his illness. He was to undergo nearly two years of treatment, including dozens of blood transfusions. "Mountaineering is about facing one problem at a time, and about knowing that every step forward is a step we'll have to take coming back down," Meroi says. "We like to think that climbing mountains gave us the skills to face the disease. It taught us to place one step after the other, to be patient, and to never give up." But every therapy that the doctors tried on Benet failed. Their last hope was to give him a bone marrow transplant. Finally a matching donor was found and the transplant was carried out. But it didn't work. "The doctors had run out of ideas," Meroi says. "But then they decided to experiment with something new - in mountaineering terms, to open a new route." They thought a second bone marrow transplant from the same donor might just work, even though the first had failed. "The person who had donated the bone marrow in the first place was asked to go through the entire process for a second time," Meroi says. "And, bless him, he agreed to do that." "That's what brought Romano back to life. To this day we don't know who this person is, but his silent and generous act really gives us hope in humanity." It wasn't only the anonymous donor, Benet says, who helped him to overcome his illness. "For two years Nives was the best partner I could imagine," he says. "She never left my side. We approached it as we always do, as a team, roped together." A few years later, Benet and Meroi put on their backpacks again and returned to Kangchenjunga for another attempt. "I was so thrilled to be back on the mountains - it was like unleashing a chained dog," Benet remembers. But in their excitement to be back in the mountains the pair accidentally climbed up the wrong gorge. "I think we are the first mountaineers in the history of the Himalayan ascents to get the wrong peak," Benet says. "But for me being there and knowing that I could still make it was enough." In 2014 they returned to Kangchenjunga for a third time. "That time we got the right mountain," Meroi says. "We were the first climbers of the season, so we had to open the route. It was just the two of us, but when we got to the top we realised we weren't alone - the anonymous donor was up there with us, the young man without a name who had chosen to give a stranger a chance of life. We wouldn't have made it without him." Although Meroi missed out on being the first woman to climb all of the eight-thousanders, in May this year she and Benet became the first couple to climb all 14 - an achievement all the more notable for their method of climbing without Sherpas or bottled oxygen. This brings with it real dangers. Beyond 2,400m, the human body becomes susceptible to altitude sickness, which can progress to life-threatening conditions including high-altitude pulmonary oedema (HAPE) or high altitude cerebral oedema (HACE), when blood vessels begin leaking fluid into the lungs or brain. By the time you reach 8,000m you have entered the "death zone", where the air is so thin it is insufficient to sustain human life. "The human body is not designed to live at those altitudes - even a tiny problem can escalate very quickly," Meroi says. "And it's not just a physical challenge - even thinking about your next move is tiring." The couple often climb during the night so that they can arrive at a mountain's summit just after dawn, meaning they can make their descent - which technically can be more difficult and dangerous than the ascent - in daylight. "When you climb at night you're guided by the light of the stars and sometimes it feels like you're actually above them," Meroi says. "And when you get to the top the first thing you experience is a sense of elation," says Benet. "The view from the top of an eight-thousander is something you'll never forget because from up there you can actually see the Earth curving at the horizon." For Meroi, reaching the summit of one of the world's highest mountains gives her a different perspective on life. "You really get a sense of how fragile human life is and how small it is compared to the power of nature, and you realise that the ambitions that drive us mad at sea level are completely irrelevant up there," she says. "I feel like I am at peace with nature and that's probably what makes me want to keep climbing, to find that feeling again." Join the conversation - find us on Facebook, Instagram, Snapchat and Twitter.
ब्रिटेनका आधा महिला र पाँचमध्ये एक पुरुषले कार्यस्थलमा वा शैक्षिक संस्थाहरुमा यौन दुर्व्यवहारको सामना गर्नुपरेको बीबीसीको एक सर्वेक्षणले जनाएको छ। दुर्व्यवहारको शिकार भएका बताउने महिलामध्ये ६३ प्रतिशतले कसैका समक्ष उजुरी नदिएको र ७९ प्रतिशत पुरुषले उक्त घटना कसैलाई नभनेको बताएका छन्। बीबीसी रेडियो फाईभ लाईभले गरेको सर्वेक्षणका क्रममा दुई हजारभन्दा बढी मानिससँग कुरा गरिएको थियो। हलिउडका एक निर्माता हार्भी वाइन्स्टिनले महिलाहरुमाथि यौन दुर्व्यवहार गरेका आरोपहरु सार्वजनिक भएपछि धेरै जनाले त्यस्तै किसिमका दुर्व्यवहार आफूहरुले पनि सामना गरेको भन्दै अनुभव साट्ने क्रमसंगै उक्त सर्वेक्षण गराइएको थियो। यौन दुर्व्यवहारको सामना गरेका महिला र पुरुषहरुले 'मि टू' अर्थात 'म पनि' भन्ने ह्याशट्याग राख्दै विश्वव्यापीरुपमै त्यस्तो समस्या विकराल रहेको देखाउने गरि आ-आफ्ना अनुभव सामाजिक संजालमा साटेका थिए। वाइन्स्टिन विरुद्ध हलिवुड अभिनेत्रीहरु गुईनेथ पाल्ट्रो, एन्जेलिना जोली र रोज मागोवान लगायतका दुई दर्जनभन्दा बढी महिलाले बलात्कार तथा यौन दुर्व्यवहारका आरोप लगाएका थिए। वाइन्स्टिनले भने आफूले यौन सम्बन्ध सहमतिमै राखेको बताउँदै आएका छन्। रेडियो फाईभ लाईभको सर्वेक्षणमा २०३१ जना ब्रिटिश वयस्कहरु समावेश गरिएका थिए। सर्वेक्षणमा ३७ प्रतिशतले यौन दुर्व्यवहारको सामना गरेको बताए। सर्वेक्षणमा सहभागी मध्ये ५३ प्रतिशत महिला र २० प्रतिशत पुरुषले कार्यस्थल वा शैक्षिकस्थलमा अनुचित टिप्पणी देखि लिएर यौन दुर्व्यवहारसम्म खेपेको जनाएका छन्। एक चौथाई भन्दा बढीले अश्लिल खालका चुट्किलाहरु सुन्नुपरेको र झण्डै सात जनामा एकजनाले आफूले अप्ठेरो महसुस गर्ने गरि स्पर्श गरिएको बताएका छन्। फाईभ लाईभको सर्वेक्षणअनुसार दुर्व्यवहार खेपेका १० मध्ये एकजना महिलाले यौन दुर्व्यवहारको शिकार भएको बताएका थिए। पुरुषभन्दा धेरै महिलालाई कम्पनीका मालिक वा वरिष्ठ प्रबन्धकले निशानामा पारेको सर्वेक्षणले देखाएको छ। त्यस्तो किसिमको दुर्व्यवहारमा पर्ने महिलाको संख्या ३० प्रतिशत र पुरुषको संख्या १२ प्रतिशत रहेको र १० पीडित महिलामध्ये एकजनाले दुर्व्यवहारकै कारण जागिर वा पढ्दै गरेको शैक्षिक संस्था छोडेको बताएका छन् । क्यामब्रिजकि स्याराह किलकोयनले पढ्दै गर्दा दुई पुरुषले यौन दुर्व्यवहार गरेको बताइन्। किशोरावस्थामा हुँदा विद्यालयका शिक्षक र पछि क्याम्पसका प्राध्यापकबाट दुर्व्यवहार भएको उनले बताइन्। मानिसहरु प्रायःजसो धेरै वटा कारणले यौन दुर्व्यवहारका बारे बताउन वा उजुरी गर्न असफल हुने एक्सेटर विश्वविद्यालयकी सामाजिक र संगठनात्मक मनोविज्ञानकी प्राध्यापक म्यानुएला बारेटोले बीबीसीलाई बताइन्। उनीहरुले त्यस्ता दुर्व्यवहार सोझै नभएको वा ठट्टामा भएको हुनसक्ने ठान्दछन्। तर जब संचारमाध्यममा दुर्व्यवहारको एउटा घटना बारे खुलासा गरिन्छ तब ती असरहरु बदलिन थाल्छन्। "यसले बुझाईमा मद्दत पुर्‍याउँछ। अनि कस्ता गतिविधि यौन दुर्व्यवहार हुन् भनेर छुट्ट्याउन मद्दत पुग्छ।" "यसले के सन्देश दिन्छ भने यो गम्भीर समस्या हो। साथै यो समस्या हो भन्ने सोचलाई समर्थन गर्ने बाहिर धेरै जना रहेछन् भन्ने पनि यसले अनुभव गराउँछ।" अभियानकर्मी तराना बुर्क सबभन्दा पहिला शुरु गरिएको #मि टू अभियान की संस्थापक हुन्। उक्त अभियान संयुक्त राज्य अमेरिकामा यौन हिंसा, आक्रमण, शोषण र दुर्व्यवहारका पीडितहरुलाई 'सहानुभूतिका माध्यमबाट सशक्तिकरण' प्रदान गर्न १० वर्ष अघि शुरु गरिएको थियो। यौन दुर्व्यवहारका घटना विरुद्ध कसरी परिवर्तन ल्याउने भन्नलाई अहिले यो अभियानले नयाँ गति पाएको आफूलाई लागेको उनले बताइन्।
ශ්‍රී ලංකාව තුළ ආකාලයේ මරණයට පත්වන අලි ඇතුන්ගෙන් බහුතරය එවැනි ඉරණමකට ගොදුරු වන්නේ අලි මිනිස් ගැටුමට මැදි වීමෙනි. එහෙත් යාල වනෝද්‍යානයේ විසූ තිලක් නමැති සද්දන්තයාට මරු කැඳවුයේ රැහේම එකෙකු විසිනි. අලි ඇතුන් අතර සටන් ඇති වීම සුලභව දැකිය නොහැකි බව ප්‍රවීනයන්ගේ මතයයි. කෙසේ නමුත් යාල ජාතික වනෝද්‍යානයේ දිවි ගෙවූ තිලක් නමැති ඇත් රජුගේ වියෝව පරිසරවේදීන් මෙන්ම සත්ත්ව ලෝලීන්ට ද කණගාටුදායක පුවතක් විය. තවත් තනි දළ ඇතෙකු විසින් එල්ල කරන ලද ප්‍රහාරයක් තිලක් නමැති ඇතාගේ මරණයට හේතු වී ඇති බව වනජීවී නිලධාරීහු පවසති. වනජීවී පශු වෛද්‍ය නිලධාරී විජිත පෙරේරා බීබීසී සිංහල සේවය වෙත අදහස් දක්වමින් කියා සිටියේ ඇතාගේ ඉලඇට ප්‍රදේශයට හානි සිදුව තිබූ බවය. එමෙන්ම පනස් විය ඉක්මවූ ඇතාගේ ශරීර සෞඛ්‍ය ද යම් තරමක් පිරිහී තිබූ බව ඔහු සඳහන් කළේය. තිලක් දෙස් විදෙස් සංචාරකයන් අතර ප්‍රචලිත, යුගයක් එකළු කළ හස්ති රාජයෙකු ලෙස හැඳින්විය හැකි බව පරිසරවේදී නයනක රන්වැල්ල පවසයි. "ඇත්තම කිව්වොත් දකුණේ තිලකය තමයි මේ මිය ගිහින් තියෙන්නේ. කාලාන්තරයකට ඒ වගේ ප්‍රතාපවත්, දැකුම්කළු, විශාල ඇතෙක් යාල කලාපය ආශ්‍රිතව බිහි වෙන එකක් නැහැ" යනුවෙන් ඔහු සඳහන් කළේය. අලි ඇතුන් අතර සටන් ඇති වීම සුලභව දැකිය නොහැකි බව අලි ඇතුන් සම්බන්ධයෙන් දීර්ඝ කාලයක් කටයුතු කර ඇති පශු වෛද්‍ය නන්දන අතපත්තු බීබීසී සිංහල සේවයට කියා සිටියේය. තමන් සැරිසරන භූමිය හා ආහාර මුල් කර ගනිමින් අලි ඇතුන් අතර සටන් ඇති නොවන බව කී පශු වෛද්‍ය නන්දන අතපත්තු "සටනක් ඇති වීමට එකම හේතුව දෙදෙනාම එකම ගැහැණු සතෙකුට ඇල්මක් දැක්වීම" යනුවෙන් සඳහන් කළේය. ගැහැණු සතා සිය අයිතියට පත් කර ගැනීමේ බලාපොරොත්තුවෙන් සටන ආරම්භවන බව කියා සිටි වෛද්‍යවරයා ඉන් මද වේලාවකට පසු ඇතින්න එම ස්ථානයෙන් ඉවත් වුවත් පිරිමි ඇතුන් දෙදෙනා අවසානය දක්වා සටන් කරන බව පැවසීය. එහිදී ලිංගික ආශාව යටපත්ව එය එකිනෙකාගේ අභිමානය පිළිබඳ ප්‍රශ්නයක් බවට පරිවර්තනය වන බව ඔහු පෙන්වා දෙයි. එවැනි සටන් ඇතුන් අතර ඇති වීමේ දී දළ පහර වැදීමෙන් එක් ඇතෙකු හෝ ඇතුන් දෙදෙනාම මිය යාමේ අවදානමක් පවතින බව පශු වෛද්‍ය නන්දන අතපත්තු කියා සිටියේය. "අදාළ ඇතින්නිය හෝ රංචුවේ සෙසු ඇතින්නියන් හෝ රංචුවේ නායිකාව මේ සටනට සහභාගී වන්නේ නැහැ. එහෙම රණ්ඩු වුනා කියලා ඇතින්නිය හෝ රංචුව එතෙන්ට වෙලා බලා ඉන්නේ නැහැ ඒ අය තම දෛනික කටයුතුවල යෙදීම සඳහා ඉවත්ව යනවා" පශු වෛද්‍ය නන්දන අතපත්තු විසින් එය හඳුන්වනු ලැබුවේ "ශක්තිවන්තයාගේ පැවැත්ම තහවුරු කර ගැනීම සඳහා වනයේ තිබෙන රීතිය" ලෙසය. මේ අතර තිලක් නමැති ඇතා දීර්ඝ කාලයක සිට මිනිසුන් අතර ගැවසීම හේතුවෙන් අනියම් ලෙස ගෘහස්ථකරණයට ලක් වූ බව පවසන පරිසරවේදී නයනක රන්වැල්ල ඒ හේතුවෙන් ඇතාගේ සටන්කාමී ගුණය පහව ගොස් තිබුණු බව පවසයි. ආගමික ස්ථාන සහ මහා මාර්ග අසල සැරිසරන අලි ඇතුන්ට ආහාර ලබා දීම ඔවුන්ගේ හැසිරීම් රටාවට බලපාන බව පරිසරවේදී නයනක රන්වැල්ල පවසයි. විශේෂයෙන් මිනිසුන් ලබා දෙන ආහාර තනියෙන් භුක්ති විදීම සඳහා ඔවුනොවුන් අතර තරගයක් ඇති වීමේ ස්වභාවයක් දක්නට ඇති බව ඔහුගේ අදහසයි. "සිතුල්පව්ව් ආශ්‍රිත වෙසෙන නන්දිමිත්‍ර කියන ඇතා ඒ ප්‍රදේශයේ වෙසෙන අනෙක් ඇතුන්ට මාරාන්තික ප්‍රහාර ගණනාවක් එල්ල කර තිබෙනවා. ඒ වගේම යාල වනෝද්‍යානයේ ඉන්න ගැමුණු කියන ඇතා අනෙක් සතුන්ට ප්‍රචණ්ඩකාරී ස්වභාවයක් පෙන්නුම් කරන්න පටන් අරන් තිබෙනවා. මේක කෘත්‍රිම තත්ත්ව යටතේ ඇති කරපු දෙයක්" ජාතික වනෝද්‍යාන යනු සත්වෝද්‍යාන නොවන බව කී ඔහු මිනිසුන් එවැනි ස්ථාන වෙත ගොස් සතුන්ට ආහාර ලබා දිය යුතු නොමැති බව සඳහන් කළේය. "ඒවා අපි පාලනය කරන පරිසර පද්ධති නොවෙයි. ඒවා ස්වාභාවික පරිසර පද්ධති" ඇතුන් ළඟට ගෙන්වා ගැනීම සඳහා ඇතැම් සෆාරි ජීප් රථ රියදුරන් විසින් ඔවුන් කුඩා කළ පලතුරු වැනි ආහාර ලබා දී ඊට හුරු කර ගන්නා බවත් පරිසරවේදී නයණක රන්වැල්ල වැඩිදුරටත් කියා සිටියේය. අලි ඇතුන්ට ආහාර ලබා දීම සතුන්ගේ ආරක්ෂාවට වඩා මිනිසුන්ගේ ආරක්ෂාවට තර්ජනයක් විය හැකි බවත් එය නීතියෙන් තහනම් කළ යුතු බවත් පශු වෛද්‍ය නන්දන අතපත්තු පවසයි. කෙසේ නමුත් මිනිසුන් සමග ඇසුරු කිරීමෙන් අලි ඇතුන්ගේ ශාරීරික ශක්තිය හීන නොවන බව ඔහු කියා සිටියේය. තිලක් වැනි සුවිශේෂ සද්දන්තයන් ගේ එදිනෙදා චර්යාව සහ ගමන් මග නිරීක්ෂණය කිරීම සඳහා දකුණු අප්‍රිකාව වැනි රටවල් විවිධ උපායමාර්ග භාවිත කරති. කලක් දෙස් විදෙස් සංචාරකයන් වසඟ කර ගෙන සිටි කෘගර් වනයේ රජු ලෙස විරුදාවලි ලත් ඩියුක් නමැති ඇත් රජුගේ ආරක්ෂාව සම්බන්ධයෙන් දකුණු අප්‍රිකානු බලධාරීන් ගෙන තිබූ ක්‍රියාමාර්ග ඊට එක් උදාහරණයකි. ඩියුක් නමැති සද්දන්තයා වයස්ගත වෙත්ම ඔහුගේ හැසිරීම් රටාව නිරීක්ෂණය කිරීම සඳහා ජී.එස්.පී කොලරයක් පැළඳවීමට දකුණු අප්‍රිකාවේ කෘගර් ජාතික වනෝද්‍යානය කටයුතු කර තිබිණි. 2011 වසරේ ඔක්තෝබර් 01 වෙනිදා මිය ගිය ඩියුක් ඇත් රජු කෘගර් වනය තුළ වසර පනස් පහකට අධික කාලයක් දිවි ගෙවා ඇති බව එහි වනෝද්‍යාන පාලකයෝ පවසති. "දකුණේ තිලකය" මැකී යාමට ස්වාභාවික සංසිද්ධියක් බලපා ඇතත් කලක් මුළුල්ලේ අයහපත් ශරීර සෞඛ්‍යයෙන් පසුවූ තිලක්ගේ ගමන් මග නිරීක්ෂණය කිරීම සඳහා ඔහුට ජී.එස්.පී කොලරයක් පළඳවා නොතිබූ බව පරිසරවේදී නයනක රන්වැල්ල පවසයි. ඊට යාල ජාතික වනෝද්‍යානයේ නිලධාරීන් වගකිවයුතු නැතත් මෙවන් ජාතික සම්පත් රැක ගැනීම සඳහා විධිමත් ජාතික වැඩපිළිවෙළක් අවශ්‍ය බව ඔහු පෙන්වා දෙයි.
"මේ අවුරුදු නවයට පුතාව හොයාගෙන නොගිය තැනක් නැහැ. අදටත් මගේ හිත කියනවා මගේ දරුවා කොහේ හරි ජීවත්වෙනවා කියලා." වසර නවයකට පෙර අතුරුදහන් වූ සිය එකම පුත්‍රයා වන රජීව් නාගනාදන් තවමත් කොතැනක හෝ ජීවතුන් අතර සිටිතැයි සරෝජා නාගනාදන් බලාපොරොත්තු පළ කරන්නීය. ගත වූ වසර නවය තුළ සිය දින චරියාවෙන් වැඩිම කාලයක් ගත වූයේ අධිකරණයේ, පොලිසියේ නොඑසේනම් කෝවිලේ පූජා පවත්වමින් බව ඇය පවසන්නීය. ඒ සිය එකම පුත්‍රයා ගැන කුමන හෝ තොරතුරක් ලැබෙතැයි බලාපොරොත්තුවෙනි. කොළඹ ජාත්‍යන්තර පාසලේ (CIS) ආදි ශිෂයෙකු වන රජීව් නාගනාදන් සිය මිතුරන් සිව් දෙනෙකුත් සමග 2008 වසරේ සැප්තැම්බර් මස 17 වෙනි දින සිට අතුරුදහන්ව සිටී. ප්‍රදීප් විශ්වනාදන්, තිලකේශ්වරන් රාමලිංගම්, ජමාල්ඩීන් ඩිලාන් සහ මොහොමඞ් සාජිත් අතුරුදහන්ව සිටින එම මිතුරන් සිව් දෙනාය. කප්පම් ලබාගැනීම පිණිස රජීව් ඇතුළු මිතුරන් පස් දෙනා පැහැරගෙන යාමේ චෝදනාව මත නාවික හමුදා සාමාජිකයන් හත්දෙනෙක් මේ වන විට අත්අඩංගුවේ පසුවෙති. ඔවුන්ට අමතරව තවත් පුද්ගලයන් හයදෙනෙකු ද පැහැරගෙන තිබෙන බවට මෙම නාවික හමුදා සාමාජිකයන්ට චෝදනා එල්ලවී තිබේ. "රජීව් මගේ එකම දරුවා. එයා අපිට ගොඩක් ආදරෙයි. එංගලන්තේ ගිහිල්ලා ඉගෙන ගෙන දොස්තර කෙනෙක් වෙන්නයි එයාට අවශ්‍ය වුනේ. එංගලන්තේ යන්න කලින් දවසේ තමයි යාළුවොත් එක්ක එලියට ගියාම එයාව නාවික හමුදාවෙන් පැහැරගෙන ගිහින් තියෙන්නේ," සරෝජා නාගනාදන් හැඬු කඳුලෙන් යුතුව සිය දරුවා ගැන මතකය අවදි කරන්නීය. පැහැරගනු ලැබූ රජීව් ඇතුළු පිරිස නිදහස් කිරීම සඳහා රුපියල් කෝටියක කප්පමක් ගෙවන මෙන් කප්පම්කරුවන් ඉල්ලා සිටි අවස්ථාවේ ඒ මුදල ගෙවීමට පවා දෙමාපියන් සූදානම් වුවත් ලබාදෙන ස්ථානය පිළිබඳව ඇතිවූ ගැටළුවක් හේතුවෙන් එය ක්‍රියාත්මක වී නැත. අත්අඩංගුවේ පසුවෙන අතරවාරයේ රජීව් නාගනාදන් කිහිප වරක්ම සිය දෙමාපියන් දුරකථනයෙන් අමතා තිබේ. කප්පම් ලබාගැනීම සඳහා තමන් පැහැරගෙන ගිය බව ඒ අවස්ථාවේත් ඔහු සඳහන් කර තිබේ. "2008 දෙසැම්බර් ඉඳලා 2009 මැයි වෙනකම් එයා වරින් වර දුරකථනයෙන් කථා කළා. මැයි වලින් පස්සේ කිසිම තොරතුරක් නැහැ," මව සරෝජාට කඳුළු වළකාගත නොහැකිය. "ළමයි තාම ඉන්නවා. ඒගොල්ලෝ බයයි මේ ළමයි එළියට දාන්න. මොකද ඒගොල්ලෝ කරපු ඒවා හෙළි කරයි කියලා." එවක නාවික හමුදාපතිවරයා 2009 දී පොලිසියට පැමිණිලි කිරීමෙන් අනතුරුව ශිෂ්‍යයන් පැහැර ගැනීම පිළිබඳව පොලිස් විමර්ශනයක් ඇරඹිණ. කෙසේ නමුත් නව ආණ්ඩුව බලයට පත්වන තුරු විවිධ හේතු මත එම පරීක්ෂණ සිදු වූයේ ඉතා මන්දගාමිව බව අතුරුදහන්ව සිටින රජිව්ගේ මිතුරු ඩිලාන් ජමාල්ඩින්ගේ මව ජෙරිෆා වීරසේකර පවසයි. "දැන් තමයි ඒ ගැන අවධානයක් ඇවිල්ල මාධ්‍ය පවා මේ ගැන කතාකරන්නේ. නැත්නම් කවුරුත් මේ අතුරුදහන්වීම් ගැන කතා කළේ නැහැ," ඇය පවසන්නීය. "අවුරුදු නමයකට පස්සේ එයාලව අත්අඩංගුවට ගත්තම කියනවා, ඒගොල්ලන්ගේ බිරින්දෑවරු අඬනවලු, දරුවෝ අඬනවලු. ඒගොල්ලන්ට හිරේ හරි ගිහිල්ල බලන්න පුළුවන් අපි අවුරුදු නමයක් තිස්සේ අඬනව, දකින්නවත් නැතුව." සිය දරුවන් එල්ටීටීඊ සංවිධානයට සම්බන්ධ බවට ඇතැම් දේශපාලකයන් නගන චෝදනා පිළිබඳව ජෙරිෆා වීරසේකර මෙන්ම සරෝජා නාගනාදන් දැඩි කලකිරීමෙන් යුතුව බීබීසී සිංහල සේවය සමග අදහස් දැක්වූහ. "උසාවියට ඇවිල්ලා පොලිසිය, බුද්ධි අංශයම කිව්වා අපේ ළමයි කිසිම දේකට වැරදි නැහැ කියලා. එහෙම කියලා අවුරුදු නමයකට පස්සේ දැන් මේ අත්අඩංගුවට ගැනීම් වෙනකොට මෙහෙම කතා කියනවා. ඇත්තටම ගොඩක් දුකයි." "මගේ මහත්තයා හමුදාවෙන් විශ්‍රාම ගිය රණවිරුවෙක්. අපි ආදරෙයි හමුදාවට, මොකද අපි කන්නේ බොන්නේ ජිවත්වෙන්නේ හමුදාවේ විශ්‍රාම වැටුපෙන්. අපි කිසිම විටක රණවිරුවන්ට බොරුවට දෝෂාරෝපණය කරන්නේ නැහැ," ජෙරිෆා වීරසේකර හැගීම් බරව එසේ පිළිතුරු ලබාදුන්නේ මෑතකදී විපක්ෂයේ දේශපාලකයන් කළ ප්‍රකාශ පිළිබඳව බීබීසී ය විමසූ අවස්ථාවේදීය. "රණවිරුවෙක් කියලා එයා වැරදි කරොත් ඒක වැරැද්දක් නෙවෙයිද ? උසාවිය තීරණය කරාවි මේකේ හරි වැරැද්ද. අපි ඉල්ලන්නේ පොලිසියට මේ පරීක්ෂණ කරන්න ඉඩදෙන්න කියලා දේශපාලනය ගාව ගන්නේ නැතුව," යනුවෙන් ඇය සියළු දේශපාලකයන්ගෙන් ඉල්ලා සිටියේ මෙම පරීක්ෂණ මගින් සිය පුතු පිළිබඳව කුමන හෝ ආරංචියක් ලැබෙනු ඇතැයි යන සුභවාදී බලාපොරොත්තුවෙනි.
शर्तअनुसार सेवा सुविधा नपाएका र कम तलबमा काम गर्न बाध्य भएका भनिएका कतारस्थित लाखौं नेपाली कामदारहरुले त्यहाँको सरकारले घोषणा गरेको न्यूनत ज्यालादरबाट लाभ लिन सक्ने दोहास्थित नेपाली दूतावासका अधिकारीहरुले बताएका छन्। राष्ट्रसंघीय श्रम संगठनको बैठकअघि कतार सरकारले आप्रवासी कामदारका लागि न्यूनतम ज्याला निर्धारण गर्ने घोषणा गरेलगत्तै कतारस्थित नेपाली कामदारहरु उत्साहित भएको त्यहाँ रहेका एक नेपाली कामदारले बताएका छन्। कतारमा हाल करिब ४ लाख नेपाली कामदार रहेको दोहास्थित नेपाली दूतावासको भनाइ छ। पछिल्लो घोषणा कार्यान्वयन भएपछि कम तलब पाउने, तथा कम्पनी बन्द भएर बिचल्लीमा पर्ने जस्ता समस्या कम हुने अधिकारीहरुको अपेक्षा छ। कतारका लागि नेपालका राजदूत रमेश प्रसाद कोइरालाले भने, "एकदमै कम ज्याला पाएका थुप्रैको गुनासो रहँदै आएकोछ। अब न्यूनतम तलब लागू भएपछि यो समस्या समाधान हुन्छ। नेपालमा हुँदा एउटा सम्झौता गर्ने र यहाँ ल्याएर अर्को सम्झौता गर्ने प्रवृत्ति पनि घट्छ।" कुनै पनि कम्पनी बन्द भएर काम छाड्न बाध्य कामदारको हितमा खर्च गर्न एउटा कोष बनाउने निर्णय पनि कतार सरकारले गरेको छ। सो कोषबाट रोजगारी छुटेका कामदारको तलब, उनीहरुको खाना र आवासको खर्च बेहोर्ने बताइएको छ। यसको कार्यान्वयन कहिलेदेखि हुने भन्ने अझै स्पष्ट हुन सकेको छैन। कतारस्थित नेपाली कामदारहरुले पछिल्लो निर्णय आफूहरुको निम्ति राम्रो भएको बताएका छन्। तर उनीहरु भन्छन् कतार सरकारको निर्णयको फाइदा लिन नेपालले कूटनीतिक प्रयासलाई तीव्रता दिन अत्यावश्यक छ। करिब डेढ दशकदेखि कतारमा काम गरिरहेका एक नेपाली करिम बक्स मियाँले भने, "नेपाल सरकारले आफ्ना कुटनीतिक संयन्त्रमार्फत् यसमा धेरै नै मिहिनेत गर्नुपर्ने देखिन्छ। हामीले त्यसो गर्न सकेनौं भने कतार सरकारले तोकेको न्यूनतम तलबकै वरिपरि घुम्न हामी बाध्य हुनेछौं।" सन् २०२२ मा कतारमा आयोजना हुने विश्व कप फुटबलका लागि कतारले भव्य रंगशालाहरु निर्माण गरिरहेको छ। ती पूर्वाधार निर्माण गर्न आप्रवासी कामदार खटाइएको छ तर उनीहरुको शोषण भएको भन्दै अन्तर्राष्ट्रिय रुपमा कतारको आलोचना भइरहेको छ। यस्तो आलोचनाबाट बच्न कतार आप्रवासी कामदारको हकहितको विषयमा गम्भीर हुन खोजेको जानकारहरु बताउँछन्।
پاکستانی کرکٹ ٹیم کے ہیڈ کوچ مکی آرتھر کو پوری امید ہے کہ پاکستانی ٹیم جس عمدہ کھیل کا مظاہرہ کر رہی ہے وہ سری لنکا کے خلاف ایک روزہ سیریز پانچ صفر سے جیت جائے گی۔ پاکستان اور سری لنکا کے درمیان پانچواں اور آخری ون ڈے انٹرنیشنل پیر کو شارجہ میں کھیلا جائے گا۔ مکی آرتھر نے اتوار کو شارجہ کرکٹ سٹیڈیم میں پاکستانی ٹیم کی پریکٹس کے موقع پر بی بی سی سے بات کرتے ہوئے کہا کہ کھلاڑیوں میں جیت کی بھوک موجود ہے اور وہ چاہتے ہیں کہ کلین سوئپ ہو۔ انھوں نے مزید کہا کہ اگر ایسا نہ ہوا تو بحیثیت کوچ انہیں مایوسی ہوگی۔ سٹے بازوں کے رابطے کی تصدیق، کھلاڑی کا نام ظاہر نہیں کیا ’کبڈی کھیلتا تھا، بھائی نے کرکٹ کی طرف رکھا‘ کلین سوئیپ کی کوشش کریں گے: سرفراز احمد مکی آرتھر کا کہنا ہے کہ پاکستانی ٹیم کے لیے ضروری ہے کہ اب تک وہ جس طرح کا کھیل پیش کرتی آئی ہے اسے برقرار رکھے۔ واضح رہے کہ چیمپئنز ٹرافی کے پہلے میچ میں بھارت سے ہارنے کے بعد پاکستانی ٹیم اب تک لگاتار آٹھ ون ڈے انٹرنیشنل جیت چکی ہے۔ مکی آرتھر نے کہا کہ سب سے اہم بات یہ ہوتی ہے کہ کھلاڑی اپنی ذمہ داری اور اپنے رول کو کتنا سمجھتے ہیں۔ 'بحیثیت کوچ میں اپنے کھلاڑیوں سے یہی تقاضا کرتا ہوں کہ وہ جارحانہ کرکٹ کھیلیں‘۔ مکی آرتھر نے ٹیم کے ایک کھلاڑی کو فکسنگ کی مبینہ پیشکش کے بارے میں کہا کہ اس کھلاڑی نے بہت ہی اچھا کام کیا اور بروقت اس کی رپورٹ کر کے اس معاملے کو بالکل صحیح انداز میں ہینڈل کیا۔ 'درحقیقت اس کھلاڑی نے قواعد وضوابط کی پاسداری کر کے ٹیم اور پوری کرکٹ کے لیے ایک بہترین مثال قائم کی ہے‘۔ وہ جنید خان کہاں رہ گئے؟ ’تو یونس خان سے پوچھنے میں کیا حرج ہے؟‘ یاسر شاہ کو سانس لینے دیں مکی آرتھر کا کہنا ہے کہ وہ اپنی ٹیم کے ایک ایک کھلاڑی سے مطمئن ہیں۔ انھوں نے کہا کہ یہ تمام کے تمام ذہین نوجوان کرکٹرز ہیں اور انہیں اس بارے میں کوئی شک و شبہ نہیں کہ اگر ان میں سے کسی سے بھی مشکوک فرد رابطہ کرے تو وہ ویسا ہی کریں گے جیسا کہ اس کھلاڑی نے اس سیریز کے دوران کیا ہے۔ مکی آرتھر کا کہنا ہے کہ حسن علی کا عالمی رینکنگ میں پہلے نمبر پر آنا، بابراعظم کا نمبر چار پوزیشن پر ہونا اور محمد حفیظ کا دوبارہ عالمی نمبر ایک آل راؤنڈر بننا یہ ظاہر کرتا ہے کہ پاکستانی ٹیم ون ڈے کی ایک بہت ہی اچھی ٹیم بنتی جارہی ہے۔
Stan Kroenke, the owner of Arsenal Football Club, has ordered big game hunting videos to be removed from the MyOutdoorTV (MOTV) app. MOTV is a paid-for video on demand app about hunting, shooting and fishing, and was launched in the US in 2016. It was launched this week in the UK, but immediately attracted criticism for carrying video of hunters with dead lions and other animals. Mr Kroenke owns the company behind MOTV. It is a small part of his huge Colorado-based sporting empire, Kroenke Sports & Entertainment, which runs TV stations including The Outdoor Channel and World Fishing Network. The range of programmes is not available in every country, partly for reasons of ownership rights, but also in some cases because of local tastes. Its website illustrates this, pointing out that some TV shows that are popular with members in the US may not be desirable to members in the Canada, even though they are both English-speaking regions. The company said: "There has been significant public attention to a small portion of programming on our MyOutdoorTV app that contains content associated with hunting certain big game animals," said Jim Liberatore, the chief executive of Outdoor Sportsman Group. "Stan Kroenke has directed us to remove all content related to those animals in light of the public interest," he said in a statement. Hunting TV app sparks protests The company was keen to underline that it operates independently from Arsenal Football Club. "Arsenal Football Club has nothing to do with any of our media outlets. It has nothing to do with our content or the editorial decisions we make," the statement said. "We deserve no credit when an Arsenal striker scores a goal. Arsenal deserves no criticism when we offer a program with which some disagree." Leader of the Labour opposition and local MP, Jeremy Corbyn, said he was "disgusted" by the channel: "As an Arsenal fan I'm disgusted that Stan Kroenke is involved in such a brutal, unethical and unnecessary activity." Robert Peston, ITV's political editor and one of Arsenal's best know fans, expressed his disgust about Mr Kroenke's connection to the channel. In a tweet earlier this week he said: "I feel sick I have to pay money to this person." Philippa King, from the League Against Cruel Sports, welcomed today's move: "Launching a TV channel which glorifies bloodsports was never going to be a good idea in a nation of animal lovers. We asked Mr Kroenke to cancel his plan to show trophy hunting and that's what he has done, so we thank him for it. "Whether the decision was taken because his eyes were opened to the suffering of animals involved in trophy hunting, or because he realised it was a PR disaster for Arsenal football club, I don't know. Hopefully it was the former."
Сирийские военные отрицают применение химического оружия в провинции Идлиб. Ранее во вторник базирующийся в Британии Сирийский центр мониторинга за соблюдением прав человека сообщил, ссылаясь на данные сирийских активистов, что в результате газовой атаки в Идлибе погибли не менее 58 человек. Представители службы скорой помощи в городе Хан-Шейхун заявили, что многие пострадавшие остаются на улицах города, большинство из них дети. Врачи также говорят, что люди умирают от удушья. По данным медиков, в Хан-Шейхуне погибли не менее 67 человек, около 300 пострадали. Оппозиционные СМИ сообщают о приблизительно 100 погибших. Хан-Шейхун удерживается силами сирийской оппозиции. Ранее поступали сообщения о том, что сирийская армия или российская авиация использовали химическое оружие во время атаки. Сирия согласилась уничтожить химическое оружие в 2013 году в рамках соглашения, достигнутого при участии России и США. Сирийское правительство ранее отрицало использование химоружия, однако ООН и Организация по запрещению химического оружия провели расследование и пришли к выводу, что сирийские правительственные силы совершили по меньшей мере три нападения с применением химоружия в 2014-2015 годах.
US department store chain JC Penney's shares have fallen more than 20% in early trading after it cut its full-year profit outlook sharply. The retailer said adjusted earnings per share would now be two to eight cents instead of 40 to 65 cents. It also said it expected not to report any sales increase for the year, having previously said 2017 sales would be as much as 1% higher than the year before. The firm has been struggling with declining clothing sales. Traditional department stores are losing ground to discount retailers and online giant Amazon. JC Penney has been trying to turn around its business by expanding in other categories, such as toys and white goods, while reducing its dependence on clothes. As a result, it has been selling clothing at heavy discounts to clear outdated lines and make way for an overhaul of its range. "We took the necessary steps to accelerate inventory liquidation primarily across all apparel divisions, which increases available funding to invest in new and trending merchandise categories," said chief executive Marvin Ellison.
Quan chức cao cấp dự Đại hội Đảng CSTQ lần thứ 19 đã gây chú ý của dư luận khi ca ngợi lãnh tụ Tập Cận Bình "phá tan một âm mưu đoạt quyền". Ông Lưu Sĩ Dư, quan chức phụ trách chứng khoán, được trích lời trên báo Trung Quốc hôm 19/10/2017 cho rằng đã có một "âm mưu soán Đảng đoạt quyền" bị phá vỡ. Trung Quốc Mộng làm Giang Trạch Dân ngủ gật? Bàn tròn: Đại hội 19 khai mạc - bình luận & phân tích TS. Vũ Cao Phan: Về ĐH 19 và Tư tưởng ông Tập 'Dân chủ Trung Quốc làm lu mờ Phương Tây' Giảm Đặng tăng Mao đề cao ý Tập Theo các báo nước ngoài, những người bị nêu tên đã tham gia "âm mưu" này gồm có Tôn Chính Tài, nguyên Bí thư Trùng Khánh, và cả người tiền nhiệm của ông ta, Bí thư Bạc Hy Lai. Bản thân Chủ tịch Tập Cận Bình chỉ nêu ra các vụ việc của Bạc Hy Lai, Chu Vĩnh Khang, Từ Tài Hậu, Lệnh Kế Hoạch và Tôn Chính Tài, trong phần phát biểu "chống tham nhũng", theo trang tiếng Trung của đài Đức, Deutsche Welle. Nhưng sau đó, ông Lưu Sĩ Dư đã có phát biểu trong một diễn đàn bên lề Đại hội Đảng ở Bắc Kinh hôm 19/10, cáo buộc các quan chức trên là "âm mưu cướp quyền". Ngay sau đó, một "ngôi sao đang lên" của chính trị Trung Quốc, ông Trương Khánh Vệ, Bí thư Hắc Long Giang lại lên tiếng "ca ngợi" nỗ lực cứu Đảng. Ông Trương nêu hẳn tên của ông Tôn Chính Tài là "kẻ lập mưu đoạt quyền của Đảng". Ngay trước Đại hội 19, ông Tôn Chính Tài (sinh năm 1963) đột nhiên bị điều tra 'tham nhũng, lạm quyền' và tước hết mọi chức vụ. Nay ông Lưu Sĩ Dư, Chủ tịch Ủy ban Chứng khoán Quốc gia lên án "những kẻ quyền cao chức trọng nhưng rất hủ bại, và đã lập mưu để soán đoạt quyền của Đảng và Nhà nước". Kể từ khi ông Chu Vĩnh Khang, cựu Bộ trưởng phụ trách an ninh bị hạ bệ, giới quan sát Trung Quốc cho biết đã có những lời đồn đoán về "âm mưu thoán đoạt". Cuối năm 2016, ông Vương Kỳ Sơn, cánh tay phải của Chủ tịch Tập trong công cuộc chống tham nhũng, được Nhân dân Nhật báo trích lời nói: "Có những kẻ thậm chí còn tìm cách đoạt quyền, chia rẽ Đảng và đe dọa nghiêm trọng ổn định chính trị của quốc gia." Nhưng đây là lần đầu tiên có hai quan chức cao cấp nói công khai về "âm mưu lật đổ" tuy thật khó biết về độ khả tín của các cáo buộc này. Theo trang South China Morning Post ở Hong Kong hôm 20/10, ông Lưu Sĩ Dư còn cho rằng qua việc phá vỡ âm mưu đó, ông Tập Cận Bình không chỉ "cứu Đảng, Nhà nước Trung Quốc" mà còn "cứu cả chủ nghĩa xã hội". Trong bảy ủy viên Ban Thường vụ Bộ Chính trị khóa 18, có sáu người đã lên tiếng công khai ca ngợi "Tư tưởng Tập Cận Bình" tại Đại hội 19. Họ đã nói nhiều lần về tư tưởng này, coi đó là nền tảng cho một ý thức hệ mới. Tuy thế, các nhà quan sát quốc tế vẫn đang cố gắng giải mã tư tưởng Tập Cận Bình là gì. Cho tới nay, theo những gì báo chí Trung Quốc công bố, tư tưởng này chỉ nêu rằng ông Tập Cận Bình "đưa Trung Quốc vào một thời đại mới là chủ nghĩa xã hội với tính đặc sắc Trung Hoa". Tân Hoa Xã trước Đại hội 19 đăng bài ca ngợi mô hình Trung Quốc đang làm "lu mờ" chế độ đại nghị kiểu Phương Tây, đang "chìm đắm trong hỗn loạn, chia rẽ". Xem thêm chủ đề Trung Quốc: Trung Quốc tưởng niệm tử sỹ Hoàng Sa TQ bắt 18 người của giáo phái chống Cộng Tập Cận Bình thành 'hạt nhân của Đảng'
Joanna Giannouli, de 27 anos, sofre de uma condição que determinou que ela nascesse sem vagina, colo do útero e útero. Ela explica os desafios de viver com uma síndrome que afeta uma em cada 5 mil mulheres no mundo: "Quando fui com minha família pela primeira vez ao médico, meu pai tentou mostrar coragem. Minha mãe, por outro lado, não aceitou bem. Ela se culpou pelo que tinha acontecido e foi muito doloroso vê-la daquela maneira.
يقرر بعض الناس وضع أهداف جديدة، أو إجراء تعديلات على أهدافهم الحالية في أوقات محددة من العام. لكن بعض الباحثين يقولون إن هناك طريقة أكثر فعالية للقيام بذلك. هل تؤجل مشروعا كبيرا في حياتك ينبغي عليك أن تبدأ فيه اليوم، وهل كنت تنوي انتظار أفضل وقت مناسب لذلك؟ يقرر كثير من الناس إجراء تعديلات جوهرية في حياتهم خلال أوقات محددة ذات دلالة شخصية بالنسبة لهم. فأيام الإثنين (كبداية لأسبوع العمل في أوروبا)، وذكرى أيام الميلاد، من الخيارات الأكثر وضوحا فيما يتعلق بالبدء في سلوك جديد يرتبط بتحقيق هدف ما، مثل البدء في التدريبات استعداد لخوض أحد سباقات الماراثون، أو الانتهاء من سداد دين ما، أو السعي للوصول إلى ترقية وظيفية ما. ويطلق العديد من الأكاديميين على مثل هذه الأوقات اسم "نقاط تحول مؤقتة"، وهي نقاط مهمة في مفكرة التقويم تحدد مرور ذكرى معينة، وتساعد الناس في تنظيم حياتهم. لكن هناك خبراء يقولون إن الناس من المرجح أن يشعروا بأنهم أكثر حماسة ونشاطا إذا بدأوا في تنفيذ أهدافهم في وقت يمثل دلالة شخصية بالنسبة لهم. وتطلق هينغتشين داي، الأستاذة المساعدة للسلوك التنظيمي بكلية "يو سي إل إيه أندرسون" للإدارة، على هذه الظاهرة اسم "تأثير البداية الجديدة". وتقول داي إنه مهما كان ما تشعر به في مثل هذه المناسبات فهو "نقطة تحول مهمة من الناحية النفسية"، حيث يمكنك عندها أن تترك ماضيك، وإخفاقاتك، وأي قصور في شخصيتك، وهذا وقت ستشعر فيه بأنك متحمس ولديك دافع قوي. وتضيف داي: "إذا كان ذلك (التوقيت) ذا دلالة شخصية لك، أو مرتبطا بك بشكل شخصي، فمن المرجح أنك ستقوم ببعض الأنشطة للسعي وراء أهدافك". وبينما يمكن لمثل هذه الأوقات أن تكون كل أسبوع، أو فصل من فصول السنة، أو موسم معين، ليس عليك أن تمسك بذلك التقويم دون إبداء أي مرونة. ففي الواقع، ربما تحقق نجاحا أكثر عند البدء في تنفيذ أهدافك إذا اخترت موعدا مختلفا، كموعد البدء في وظيفة جديدة، أو فصل دراسي جديد. وتعد ذكرى أيام الميلاد فرصة أخرى لوضع الأهداف أو إجراء تعديلات كبرى في حياة المرء، وخاصة إذا كنت تقترب من سن يعد علامة فارقة في حياتك. فقد توصل بحث أجراه أساتذة في كل من جامعة نيويورك وكلية "يو سي إل إيه أندرسون" للإدارة، إلى أن الناس يصبحون أكثر تأملا في ذواتهم، ويتخذون قرارات كبيرة في حياتهم عندما يقتربون بداية عقد جديد في حياتهم. وفي الواقع، توصلت تلك الدراسة إلى أن هناك عددا كبيرا من الناس يبدأون في خوض تحديات جديدة في ذكري أعياد ميلادهم التي تبدأ برقم تسعة (مثل 29 سنة، أو 39، أو 49). ولذا، فمن المرجح أن تستعد للمشاركة في أحد سباقات الماراثون عندما تكون في سن 29 أو 39 سنة، أكثر مما هو متوقع وأنت في تبلغ 30 أو 40 سنة. تقول ريبيكا وينغارتن، الخبيرة في التديب والإعداد المهني بمدينة نيويورك، إن عملاءها يبحثون دائما عن بدايات جديدة، لكن توقيت ذلك "يتوقف على نمط العمل الخاص بكل شخص منهم، وحاجته للتحفيز. فبعض العملاء يخططون لذلك بعد العودة من إجازات طويلة، بينما البعض الآخر من الرياضيين المحترفين يستغل موسم الرياضة الخاص باللعبة التي يمارسها لتحقيق ذلك". وهناك أشخاص آخرون يرون أنه بعد تسريحهم من العمل، أو انتهاء ارتباطهم العاطفي، يكون ذلك أفضل وقت للبدء في تنفيذ المشروعات الكبرى، أو الالتحاق بمهنة ما، أو إجراء تغييرات مالية معينة، أو تغيير خيارات شخصية محددة، بعد أن تأجل البدء في مثل هذ الأمور لفترة طويلة، و "لم نقترب منها على الإطلاق قبل ذلك"، كما تقول وينغارتن. وتقول وينغارتن إن بعض عملائها يكونون أكثر حماسة عندما تقترب ذكرى أعياد ميلادهم، أو ذكرى ميلاد أو وفاة أحد الأحباء إليهم. يميل الناس إلى أن يحققوا نجاحا على المدى البعيد في ظل وجود أهداف تتطلب عملا يقومون به لمرة واحدة، مثل توقيع عقد يتعلق بمدخرات التقاعد. لكن بينما نكون قادرين على أن نحدد موعدا ذا دلالة بالنسبة لنا، من أجل الإنطلاق في بداية جديدة، فإن هذا لا يعني أن هناك نجاحا مضمونا في انتظارنا على المدى البعيد، كما تقول كاثرين ميلكمان، أستاذ الاقتصاد السلوكي بكلية وارتون بجامعة بنسلفانيا، والمشاركة مع هينغتشين داي في تأليف دراسة حول تأثير البدايات الجديدة. وتتفق داي مع ميلكمان، وتقول إنه فيما يتعلق بمعرفة كيف سيتحقق ذلك النجاح على المدى الطويل، "سيكون ذلك سؤالا مفتوحا لا نزال نستكشفه". يمكنك قراءة الموضوع الأصلي على موقع BBC Capital.
Los seguidores de Will Smith se despertaron este viernes con la notica del regreso a la música del actor y rapero estadounidense tras diez años de ausencia. Y lo ha hecho con un remix del tema “Fiesta”de la banda colombiana Bomba Estéreo, que lleva una década haciendo bailar al público de todo el mundo con sus ritmos tropicales y electrónicos. La noticia de la colaboración entre Smith y Bomba Estéreo ha sido recogida por los principales medios en Estados Unidos, ya que el último disco del actor -“Lost and Found”- se publicó en 2005. “Fiesta” está incluida en el último álbum del grupo colombiano titulado “Amanecer” y tanto esta canción como el disco han sido nominados a sendos Grammy Latinos. Se espera que pronto se pueda ver el video musical de la canción en la que Bomba Estéreo colabora junto al actor de 47 años. “Will Smith había estado en Colombia hace un tiempo y nos conocía por nuestra canción ‘Fuego’, que le gustaba mucho”, le explicó a BBC Mundo Simón Mejía, fundador de Bomba Estéreo. “Este año estaba buscando alguna manera de volver a hacer música y se topó con nuestro nuevo disco y con el tema ‘Fiesta’, que le encantó. Así que nos llamó y nos dijo que quería hacer un remix, lo que realmente fue una gran sorpresa”, señaló Mejía. “Hace casi dos meses nos mandó un par de versiones. Las escuchamos y le dimos nuestra opinión. La verdad es que fue todo muy fluido. Sucedió todo de manera muy orgánica”, apuntó el bajista de Bomba Estéreo. Los integrantes de la banda -entre los que también están la cantante Liliana Saumet, el baterista Andrés Zea y el guitarrista Julián Salazar- viajaron hace unas semanas a Los Ángeles (California) para reunirse con Smith, a quien definen como “un tipo increíble”. “Este remix nos va a ayudar a llegar a nuevas audiencias y a que aumentan nuestros seguidores”. “Ha sido una gran oportunidad poder trabajar con él, ya que llevaba 10 años sin hacer música. Justamente nuestra banda está cumpliendo 10 años”, apuntó Simón Mejía. Según el fundador de Bomba Estéreo, tanto la música de su grupo como la de Will Smith “son para bailar, con mucho ritmo, sabor, y corazón”. “Además compartimos la raíz afro -afrocolombiana en nuestro caso y afroamericana en el suyo- lo que ha generado una bomba”.
If anyone doubts that China retains an unreformed Leninist political system, then the goings-on inside the Great Hall of the People over the past few hours should put them straight. Firstly, the president - and general secretary of the Communist Party - was seated alongside a nonagenarian former leader who is simultaneously thought to wield some political power while also frequently rumoured to be dead. The appearance of Jiang Zemin, whose large glasses and wide smile lead his admirers to affectionately call him "The Toad," caused a ripple of excitement on Chinese social media. "He's alive and well and chatting away!" said a typical post on Weibo - before the censors quickly got to work. There is nothing quite so Leninist as a country blocking discussion about the appearance, in full view, of a former leader at a major set-piece event broadcast on national television. Some comments, though, still find a way through. "Why can't I forward a picture of a toad?" reads one. "Can't I think of a toad? I'm thinking about a toad." For now, China cannot stop its citizens thinking about a toad, although the way things are going, some fear that day may come. And then Xi Jinping spoke for the best part of three and a half hours. Not quite a Fidel Castro length but enough to make another of Mr Xi's predecessors, Hu Jintao - also seated next to him on the opposite side to Mr Jiang - look like a study in brevity. Mr Hu spoke for a mere one hour and forty minutes at his last Congress in charge. And with Xi Jinping in full flow, journalists more observant than I counted at least ten occasions when the elderly Mr Jiang looked at his watch. Mr Hu appeared to briefly tap his as a tired-looking Mr Xi took his seat again once the speech had finally ground to an end. But of course, following the best traditions of Kremlinology, there are always things worthy of note in such speeches, regardless of the whopping duration, the predictable political rhetoric or the tight control of the message. There were, perhaps, a few more moments of spontaneous applause than one might usually expect - for example when Mr Xi touched on issues like bringing real estate speculation under control, and for one of his driving obsessions, poverty reduction. The language was slightly less formal than your average leader's speech and Mr Xi's deep and humble bow to delegates at the end was met with genuine warmth and approval. These are signs of his appeal beyond his party's factional interests - to the country as a whole, in fact. He has been enormously successful in this throughout his first term, for which he is accused of building a cult of personality. But as Mr Xi embarks on his next five years in power, the opening of this party congress is a good time to remind ourselves about the real nature of his project, something he has been making clear from the start. Anyone who ever thought that as China grew economically stronger it would inevitably become politically freer is wrong. His abiding preoccupation is keeping the Communist Party in power. So expect no short sound bites or shirt-sleeved attempts at working a crowd. And definitely no chat-show appearances for ageing political leaders, especially ones who remain popular because they actually did seem to have a bit of personality, like Mr Jiang, "The Toad". It's just not what these systems do. China's rigid political Leninism is here to stay.
Thieves have stolen hundreds of Christmas presents donated by the public for children in hospital and a hospice. About 370 presents were being stored in a carriage at Leicestershire's Great Central Railway's Quorn station following last year's Christmas event. They were due to be sent to Leicester Royal Infirmary and Rainbows Children's Hospice in Loughborough. Leicestershire Police is investigating the theft. Replacements are already being donated. The presents were left over from last Christmas, the railway confirmed, but were wrapped and labelled ready for delivery. Michael Stokes, from the railway, said the break-in happened at some point in the last two weeks in a carriage where the presents were being held. "All of them were wrapped ready for delivery," he said. "We would like to take this opportunity to thank those people who have donated replacement presents already."
Google says it is doubling the warranty on its new flagship smartphones following complaints about the screens. Some reviewers have noticed screen "burn in" - a permanent mark of images that have appeared previously - after only a couple of weeks with the larger version of the new phone. The firm argued that the effect was "in line with that of other premium smartphones" using OLED screens. However it promised software updates to maximise the screen life. "We use software to safeguard the user experience and maximize the life of the OLED display, and we'll make ongoing software updates to optimize further," wrote Mario Queiroz, vice-president of product management, in a Google message forum. The warranty for both the Pixel 2 and Pixel 2 XL will now be two years instead of one, he added - although in Europe this is already standard. Mr Queiroz also said "a new mode" for saturated colours would be released in a separate software update in the next few weeks, following other complaints about dull visuals. The Pixel 2 XL, which appears to be the affected handset, is currently only available in the US. The handset reviewed by the BBC was one of those which suffered the mild burn-in first reported by the tech website Android Central. Speaking to the BBC at the time, analyst Carolina Milanesi, from Creative Strategies, said it was "not a great start" for the device. “This was Google's big step into really going for the devices market, broadening the breath of the products," she said. "It raises the question of whether they can actually take on this much." Google's previous device, the Pixel, had good reviews but accounted for just 0.5% of the global smartphone market in 2016. In a separate forum, Google advised those Pixel 2 users who said their device appeared to be "clicking", to switch off NFC (near field communication) - used to make contact payments - and said a software fix was being developed. The Pixel 2 costs from £629 in the UK (£799 on pre-order for the XL).
Google's second-generation Pixel mobile phones are able to take "portrait mode" photos via both their front and rear single-lens cameras. Other handsets have been able to auto-blur image backgrounds for some time, but they typically rely on using two-lens cameras on the phones' backs to create realistic effects. Google said its innovation meant it could make more space for the battery and introduce front-facing speakers. But it has dropped the headphone jack. Instead of using a dedicated 3.5mm port, users will either need to use wireless headphones - Google is selling a pair called the Pixel Buds - or the USB-C charging socket. At the launch of the original Pixel phones, the search firm had mocked Apple's abandonment of the traditional socket and made a virtue of its opposite strategy. A spokesman defended the U-turn saying Pixel's engineers believed USB-C had "matured as a standard" over the past year. About 2.8 million units of the original Pixel phones have shipped since their launch a year ago, according to research firm IDC, representing just 0.5% of the wider smartphone market. Sales were in part limited by the firm's inability to make enough of the devices to meet demand. Google said it was producing the Pixel 2 and larger Pixel 2 XL models "in greater numbers". But one expert questioned whether it had done enough to pose a serious challenge to other Android phone-makers. "Launching a device in a region such as Western Europe, requires support to 50-plus operators and 70-plus retailers," said IDC's Francisco Jeronimo. "Google will have to put in place a massive sales and marketing organisation to be able to compete with Samsung and Huawei." The Pixel line-up is in part an effort to make sure consumers are always offered the latest version of Android. The phones are guaranteed the latest release as soon as Google makes it available, for at least three years - unlike other brands. However, the tech giant was also keen to promote several unique features at its San Francisco launch. The single-lens portrait mode photos were made possible by its adoption of a dual-pixel sensor - meaning each pixel can be used to both record the image and determine focus rather than just one or the other. Some of Samsung's handsets already feature the technology, but Google has built on it with proprietary software to make it possible to create a depth map for photos, which can be used to add special effects. An added benefit of this approach is that the new phones' front "selfie" cameras can also use portrait mode. And in the months to come, Google intends to make use of the depth information to let users add advanced augmented reality characters to their images. Another new feature is the ability to summon the Google Assistant artificial intelligence helper by squeezing the handsets' sides. The firm suggested this made it easier to activate, adding that it had trained the software to only pay attention to deliberate squeezes. In addition, the OLED (organic light-emitting diode) screens now automatically show the name of a song if it is heard playing in the surrounding area. The Shazam-like feature relies on a database of tens of thousands of tracks downloaded to the device in advance. This avoids seeking a match via the internet, which would have sapped the battery more quickly. One of the new handsets was also demoed auto-translating a conversation between an English speaker and a Swedish speaker wearing the Pixel Buds to create a more seamless experience than is normal when using the firm's Translate app. The new phones are between 4% to 11% more expensive than their predecessors in the UK, depending on the configuration. The 5in (12.7cm) version starts at £629 and the 6in (15.2cm) model at £799. Last month, Google agreed to pay $1.1bn (£828m) to HTC to hire 2,000 of its engineers, many of whom had been involved in the new handsets' creation. One expert suggested the firm now faced a tricky balancing act. "The challenge for Google is that if it starts prioritising new features and capabilities on its devices, it risks antagonising very important partners like Samsung," commented Ben Wood from CCS Insight. "And what is more important to the greater good of the Google empire? Is it the reach that Android has or is it Google's desire to have its own hardware platform?" One thing you have to say about Google's hardware ambitions - it doesn't give up when sales disappoint. The Daydream VR headset promised to be a big step forward in mobile virtual reality but you'll struggle to find anyone who has used one. Google Home showcases the firm's AI skills but arrived a long time after Amazon's Echo and is still struggling to catch up. The first Pixel had a great camera, won very positive reviews - and ended up with roughly 0.5% of global smartphone market share. But now all three products are getting a refresh with Google making a bold statement about its ability to combine hardware and software to produce a great user experience - rather like that other little tech company with its range of very profitable iDevices. It's the Pixel 2 that is now Google's flagship device, boasting features which the firm says you won't yet see on other Android smartphones. Sundar Pichai repeated his message about an AI-first world, and a new era where we interact more naturally with our devices. One example combines both - the squeeze feature which brings up the Google Assistant on your Pixel. He believes his engineers lead the world in machine learning and that should translate into leadership in machines too. Maybe - but first of all his company needs to up its game in two other key areas: marketing and manufacturing. It's all very well building a smartphone that gets five star reviews but if you can't make enough to meet demand you aren't going to get very far. Google also unveiled other products at its launch including a smaller version of its Home smart speaker, and a larger edition designed for high-quality music playback. The Home Mini will cost $49 and accepts tap-based commands as well as responding to voices. The $399 Home Max - which contains two subwoofers for superior bass - uses artificial intelligence software to take account of where it has been placed in a room and adjusts its sound balance to suit. The Max is likely to compete with speakers from Sonos - which had announced hours earlier that it would add Google Assistant to its latest speaker in 2018. One expert said the Mini might appeal to those wanting multiple smart speakers in their home, as well as price-conscious under-25s. "Google has been on the back foot at competing with Amazon," said Adam Simon from the consultancy Context. "The Home came after Amazon's Echo, it didn't have the same range of smart home partners or types of device available and now Google is trying to catch up." Perhaps the biggest surprise of the event was Google Clips, a small standalone camera that uses machine learning to recognise interesting scenes and familiar faces to record. The device is designed to be clipped to clothes or other objects and only sends the videos and photos to a smartphone when commanded. GoPro's stock tumbled when it was unveiled, but consumers may struggle to understand the need for the $249 gadget. A new high-end Chrome OS-based laptop called the Pixelbook was also unveiled, which has the Google Assistant built in, an optional stylus, and can run Android apps.
Change is constant on and off the football field, and technological advances means fans could soon be watching more intuitive players via more mobile friendly channels. The 22nd Soccerex football finance event returns to Manchester this weekend for its last year as host - discussing everything from who will be showing future action, to how top stars will in future be mentally match conditioned. There is change around the forum itself. Not only is the event poised to move to a new city next year, it is also the first without founder Duncan Revie as its driving force after his death last autumn. And Revie, as an innovator, would have taken a close interest in football's continued march into a new digital era. "Technology is continuing to emerge as a major part of the business of football," says Soccerex's David Wright. "It's a big factor on both the straight technology side and on the media side of things, where disruptors are helping to change viewing culture. "Social media is also changing the way fans consume football, and changing the broadcasting landscape. "Viewing habits are changing and more customers are moving online to watch football." In the UK it was recently reported that Sky had experienced a 14% drop in viewing figures but also recorded a 31% rise in adoption of its online services Sky Go and NOW TV. Indeed, there is debate in the sport industry at present involving broadcasters, rights holders and social media experts about the value and direction of rights in this disrupted marketplace. For example Amazon Prime has reportedly secured the rights to stream nearly all elite men's tennis events except for the four grand slams, with the US digital giant having secured the UK rights to the ATP World Tour from Sky. It would be Amazon's second big live-TV-sports rights deal this year, after its tie-up with the National Football League to stream 10 Thursday-night American Football games in the US from this month. And it has the rights to live audio-stream Bundesliga football commentaries in Germany, available via its Amazon Music service. Meanwhile, Facebook is also looking to establish deeper digital and streaming relationships with football clubs, fans and rights holders alike. The social media giant last year streamed Wayne Rooney's Man Utd v Everton testimonial match free of charge. It also live streamed matches from Spain's La Liga last season. And in the the US, where it has already streamed Major League Soccer (MLS) games, the social network will from this month show live Champions League matches through a partnership with Fox Sports. "The current state of flux is creating both problems and opportunities for all rights holders and media companies involved," says Mr Wright. "A lot of companies are looking to become viable challengers to more established media platforms. The Premier League rights are coming up for auction again sooner than we think. How Sky or BT will bid, or an incoming challenger such as Amazon or someone else, is up in the air." He adds: "If Amazon or Apple for example decided to bid, they would use their technological expertise to make it work. "There is technology there to deliver it via streaming and the internet, or via smart TVs. Also it is worth remembering that BT didn't have sports channels until they had done their first rights deal, so these things can be turned around quickly. "It is new technology that is allowing all of these new incumbents to operate. People want to dip in and out of content, and they want lots of it." It comes as a report from strategy consultants OC&C says that up to £1bn of the UK broadcast industry's overall profit could be at risk from the emergence of rivals such as Amazon and Facebook. And Mr Wright says that social media changes are not only disrupting broadcasting, but also marketing. "Historically, a brand seeking wider exposure might have gone with a player to endorse your product, or gone with TV advertising," he says. "Now there are other people on YouTube who may have many more eyeballs than the TV channels. And they have a trustworthy air and reputation, but bigger channels can seem more corporate. "What we are seeing in the marketing aspect in football are these user-generated channels." For example, one of the most popular of the supporter channels, Arsenal Fan TV, carries advertising for bookmaker Ladbrokes. Meanwhile technology continues to develop in other parts of the industry, including traditional areas such as marketing, ticketing, and sponsorship. However, it is in around health, fitness and performance where some of the most interesting innovations are taking place. For example, firms are looking at ways to help footballers improve their "field vision" - their ability to anticipate, react quickly, and make the right decision at high speed. Using technology, it is developing a methodology to break "vision" into separate components such as: peripheral vision, eye reaction time, and pattern recognition, which will enhance player performance. Tech that enables players to boost fitness and avoid injuries will also be discussed as Soccerex, which is set to be attended by 3,000 delegates, 450 clubs, 700 sports rights holders, and 170 exhibitors. As mentioned, founder Duncan Revie, 62, passed away last September. The son of the former Leeds and England manager, he came up with the idea for the event after a visit to a music business event, and realising he could do the same for football. The first conference was held in 1996 at Wembley stadium, and since then has been held in Paris, Los Angeles, Dubai, Johannesburg, Rio, as well as in Manchester. "His death was a huge blow, an awful surprise, for us to lose the guy who had the vision and drive to build the business," says Mr Wright. "The last thing his wife Rita and chairman Tony Martin wanted was to stop what we were doing. It was his passion and commitment which developed the conference and took it across the globe. "Most positive thing for us is that his legacy continues and we are coming back to Manchester for this year's Soccerex."
For almost three years, while her home city of Mosul was under occupation by so-called Islamic State (IS), Tahani Salih kept a daily diary documenting their crimes. Tahani, now 27, filled almost 500 pages with her experiences and those of her family and friends, as well as her hopes and dreams for the time when IS would be defeated. "Just before our neighbourhood was liberated, IS began to harass people and force their way into their homes to carry out searches. One day I took out those hand-written pages and started to reread them, and I was shocked," she said. "I realised that the content could put my life and my family at risk, as well as people I had mentioned in my diary. So I had no choice but to destroy those papers. "I sat down, and started to burn one page at a time. Later, I blamed myself for not hiding my diary or burying it in our garden." Although the diary is gone, Tahani remembers every word of the plans she made. Now IS has been defeated, Tahani is throwing herself into putting them in place. The young woman - who has been trained and supported by the Institute for War and Peace Reporting (IWPR) - is one of a new group of Mosulite activists who are determined to not only rebuild the city but also help rehabilitate fellow residents traumatised by the events of the last three years. "There are about 40 of us - we're ambitious, educated, respectable young people who love their city and fellow human beings, and want to have a decent future," she said. Tahani's own priority is to ensure that young women like herself can get involved. "We live in a culture in which women think it's improper to speak up, or to work outside the home or lead a campaign, which is not true. I know girls who are very strong and motivated, but are scared of harassment or are being forced to stay at home by their families. "People need to know that being a girl is not shameful," she continued, arguing that a culture of fear and repression was "the very condition that helped IS come in". So when Tahani got involved with an ambitious scheme to restore Mosul university's library, which was destroyed by IS during the occupation, she delighted in encouraging other young women to defy gender stereotypes. Herself one of the first to enter the bombed-out library, she remembers seeing "a boy approaching a girl carrying five or six heavy books. "He said: 'No, you don't have to carry that much. It's too heavy for you, just carry what you can.' She said: 'Of course I can carry the books, I've come to do just that. Please do your work and carry books, and I'll carry mine.'" Tahani also put together a football tournament for the library project's volunteers, initially forming one for men and one for women, before deciding this looked too much like gender segregation. To her colleagues' astonishment, she mixed the teams together - an unprecedented move that proved successful. "The next day, they brought the ball, and said: 'Let's play again.' So we did." Tahani said that it was not just Mosul's physical fabric that needed rebuilding; it was crucial to harness young people's enthusiasm for freedom in the first few months of liberation. "So we started with cultural events - books, music, festivals, colours, painting, photography. "We wanted to draw media attention to Mosul so that a young person could see his or her image on a global platform and admire themselves and realise their value." Tahani organised the first concert in the city after IS' defeat, with live music played in front of the university campus. "One of the girls took me by the hand and told me: 'Tahani, this is the first time I feel really alive,'" she recalled. And together with some friends, Tahani set up a Facebook page called Women of Mosul, a place where they could air views and share ideas for projects. The work by young Mosulites like Tahani seems to be gaining some traction. Last month, a day-long peace festival set up by other activists drew a crowd of 25,000 people to the city's main stadium. But Tahani said there was much more to be done, arguing that true success would come when women felt totally free to walk on the street without wearing hijab, or when a bar selling alcohol could function freely in the centre of the city. "Only then will I be reassured that the city has begun to truly accept everyone, and accept the world." That seems a long way away, given the conservative attitudes still dominant in the city. Many fear that former IS supporters remain in the city, trying to blend into the civilian population. Tahani acknowledges that she has received threats over her activism, but refuses to be intimidated. "If I get scared, then I'll have to return to just sitting at home, which I won't accept. There's no way I will go back to that and forget all my hopes and dreams, no matter the price." The Institute for War and Peace Reporting is a non-profit organisation which supports local reporters, citizen journalists and civil society activists in three dozen countries in conflict, crisis and transition around the world.
A British local newspaper received an anonymous call about "some big news" in the US, shortly before President John F Kennedy was assassinated, according to documents. A memo dated 26 November 1963 said the call was made to the Cambridge News at 18:05 GMT on 22 November 1963. This was 25 minutes before Kennedy was shot in Dallas, Texas. A copy of the memo was released by the National Archives in the US in July, but had gone unreported. It was revealed again when the latest batch of documents relating to the assassination were released on Thursday. President Kennedy was shot as he rode in a presidential motorcade in Dealey Plaza at 12:30 Central Standard Time, which is six hours behind Greenwich Mean Time. The document, from the deputy director of the FBI James Angleton to the director, J Edgar Hoover, said the British Security Service (MI5) had reported that the call was made to the senior reporter of the newspaper. The memo read: "The caller said only that the Cambridge News reporter should call the American Embassy in London for some big news and then hung up. "After the word of the President's death was received the reporter informed the Cambridge police of the anonymous call and the police informed MI5. "The important point is that the call was made, according to MI5 calculations, about 25 minutes before the President was shot. "The Cambridge reporter had never received a call of this kind before, and MI5 state that he is known to them as a sound and loyal person with no security record." The memo added that similar anonymous phone calls "of a strangely coincidental nature" had been received by people in the UK over the past year, "particularly in connection with the case of Dr Ward" - potentially a reference to Dr Stephen Ward, one of the central figures in the Profumo affair. Current staff at the Cambridge News said they did not know who took the call, but they were speaking to people who worked there in the 1960s to find out. Reporter Anna Savva said hearing about it was "completely jaw-dropping". "It would have been common knowledge in the office who took the call, but we have nothing in our archive - we have nobody here who knows the name of the person who took the call," she said. In a video posted on the newspaper's website, chief reporter Chris Elliott, said "no one has ever been able to establish whether that call was actually made" but the fact that it might have been made came to light in the 1980s. "A London solicitor, Michael Eddowes, started to investigate a document he found allegedly from the CIA," he said. "In that document it was mentioned a call had been made to the Cambridge News warning that something big was going to happen... "We don't know whether that call was ever made, we don't know which reporter took the call and we don't know what the reason possibly could have been for anyone ringing a newspaper in Cambridge about it." Mr Elliott said Mr Eddowes, who died in 1992, was "convinced there was some kind of conspiracy" and the call might have been one of a number made to newspapers and other media to try to foster the idea that there was a conspiracy to kill the president.
ලක්ෂ සංඛ්‍යාත රෝහින්ග්‍යා වැසියන් මුහුණ පා සිටින අවාසනාවන්ත ඉරණම ලොව වේගයෙන්ම වර්ධනය වන සරණාගත අර්බුදය ලෙස සැලකේ. මියන්මාරයේ රඛයින් ප්‍රාන්තයේ සිය නිවාස වලට සිදුව ඇති විනාශය සහ වධ හිංසා හමුවේ මේ වසරේ අගෝස්තු මාසයේ සිට අසල්වැසි බංග්ලාදේශය වෙත පළා ගොස් ඇති රෝහින්ග්‍යා වැසියන් සංඛ්‍යාව පන්ලක්ෂයකට අධිකය. රඛයින් ප්‍රාන්තය තුළ දියත් කර ඇති හමුදා මෙහෙයුම "වාර්ගික ශුද්ධයකට කදිම උදාහරණයක්" බව එක්සත් ජාතීන්ගේ සංවිධානය පැවසීය. එහෙත් රෝහින්ග්‍යා කැරලිකරුවන් පමණක් සිය මෙහෙයුමේ ඉලක්කය වී ඇති බව පවසන මියන්මාර හමුදාව සාමාන්‍ය වැසියන් ඉලක්ක කර ප්‍රහාර එල්ල කරන බවට නැගෙන චෝදනා බැහැර කරයි. රෝහින්ග්‍යා ප්‍රජාව, මියන්මාරයේ වෙසෙන සුළු ජන කණ්ඩායම් ගණනාවක් අතරින් එකකි. මේ වසර මුල දී එරට විසූ රෝහින්ග්‍යා ජනගහනය දස ලක්ෂයක් පමණ විය. මියන්මාරයේ මුස්ලිම් භක්තිකයන්ගෙන් බහුතරය නියෝජනය කරන රෝහින්ග්‍යාවරුන් වැඩි වශයෙන්ම ජීවත් වන්නේ රඛයින් ප්‍රාන්තය තුළය. තමන්ගේම භාෂාවකට සහ සංස්කෘතියකට උරුමකම් කියන ඔවුන් පවසන්නේ තමන් අරාබි වෙළෙන්දන්ගෙන් පැවත එන බවය. තමන් පරම්පරා ගණනක සිට රඛයින් ප්‍රාන්තයේ වෙසෙන බවත් රෝහින්ග්‍යාවරු පවසති. නමුත් බහුතර බෞද්ධයන් වෙසෙන මියන්මාරයේ ආණ්ඩුව රෝහින්ග්‍යාවරුන් එරට පුරවැසියන් ලෙස පිළිගැනීම ප්‍රතික්ෂේප කරයි. රෝහින්ග්‍යාවරුන් එරට වෙසෙන ජන ප්‍රජාවක් වශයෙන් හෝ පිළිනොගන්නා මියන්මාර ආණ්ඩුව 2014 පැවති සංගණනයෙන්ද ඔවුන් ඉවත් කර තිබිණි. ඔවුන් බංග්ලාදේශයේ සිට නීති විරෝධී ලෙස පැමිණි සංක්‍රමණිකයන් බව මියන්මාරයේ මතය වී තිබේ. හැත්තෑව දශකයේ සිට රෝහින්ග්‍යාවරුන් කලාපයේ වෙනත් රටවලට ද සංක්‍රමණය වී ඇත. ප්‍රජාවන් අතර ඇති වූ ප්‍රචණ්ඩ ක්‍රියා හෝ හමුදාව විසින් සිදු කරන ලද බව පැවසෙන වධහිංසා හමුවේ මෑතක හටගත් අර්බුදකාරී වාතාවරණයට පෙර පසුගිය වසර කිහිපය තුළදී ද රෝහින්ග්‍යා වැසියන් දහස් ගණනක් මියන්මාරයෙන් පළා ගොස් තිබේ. රෝහින්ග්‍යාවරුන් බංග්ලාදේශය කරා යළි ගලා යාම ආරම්භ වූයේ පසුගිය අගෝස්තු 25 වෙනිදා රෝහින්ග්‍යා කැරලිකරුවන් විසින් මියන්මාර පොලිස් මුරපොල වෙත ප්‍රහාර එල්ල කරනු ලැබීමත් සමගය. බංග්ලාදේශයේ 'කොක්ස් බසාර්'නමැති ප්‍රදේශයට වෙත ළඟා වන රෝහින්ග්‍යා ජනතාව පවසන්නේ බෞද්ධ කලහකාරීන්ගේ සහාය ද ඇතිව මියන්මාර හමුදා සිය ගම්මාන ගිනිබත් කරමින් සාමාන්‍ය වැසියන්ට ප්‍රහාර එල්ල කරන බවය. එහිදී සාමාන්‍ය වැසියන් මරණයට පත් වූ අවස්ථා ද ඇති බව ඔවුහු කියා සිටිති. මේ අතර ඇම්නෙස්ටි ඉන්ටනැෂනල් මානව හිමිකම් සංවිධානය පවසන්නේ මියන්මාර ආණ්ඩුව විසින් රෝහින්ග්‍යාවරුන් සිය ගණනක් මරා දමනු ලැබ ඇති බවය. එමෙන්ම හමුදා විසින් කාන්තාවන් සහ දැරියන් දූෂණයටත් අපයෝජනයටත් ලක් කරනු ලැබ ඇති බවත් එම සංවිධානය වැඩිදුරටත් කියා සිටී. කැරලිකරුවන්ට එරෙහිව දීයත් කරන ලද "නිදහස් කර ගැනීමේ මෙහෙයුම්" සැප්තැම්බර් 05 වෙනිදා අවසන් කළ බව මියන්මාර ආණ්ඩුව පවසයි. නමුත් ඉන් අනතුරුවත් මෙහෙයුම් ක්‍රියාත්මක වී ඇති බව දැක්වෙන සාක්ෂි බීබීසී වාර්තාකරුවන්ට දැක ගත හැකි විය. හියුමන් රයිට්ස් වොච් මානව හිමිකම් සංවිධානය විසින් ගනු ලැබූ චන්ද්‍රිකා ඡායාරූප හරහා සිදු කළ විශ්ලේෂණ මගින් පෙනී යන්නේ අවම වශයෙන් ගම්මාන 288 සම්පූර්ණයෙන්ම හෝ අර්ධ වශයෙන් විනාශ වී ඇති බවය. ආසන්නයේ පිහිටි රඛයින් ගම්මානවලට කිසිදු හිංසාවක් වී නැති නමුත් රෝහින්ග්‍යා ගම්මාන පිහිටි ප්‍රදේශ ගණනාවක් විනාශ වී ඇති බව එම ඡායාරූප අනුව දැකගත හැකිය. වැඩිම හානියක් දැක ගත හැක්කේ මවුන්ග්ඩෝ ප්‍රදේශයේ බව හියුමන් රයිට්ස් වොච් මානව හිමිකම් සංවිධානය පවසයි. එක්සත් ජාතීන්ගේ සරණාගතයන් පිළිබඳ ආයතනය (UNHCR) පවසන පරිදි අගෝස්තු 25 වෙනිදාට පෙර ද රෝහින්ග්‍යා සරණාගතයන් 307,500 ක් කඳවුරුවල, තාවකාලික වාසස්ථාන සහ ඉඳුම් හිටුම් ලබා දෙන ප්‍රජාවන් අතර දිවි ගෙවා තිබේ. පළා යන රෝහින්ග්‍යා ජනයා අතරින් වැඩි දෙනෙකු බංග්ලාදේශය වෙත ළඟා වෙති. පානීය ජලය, ආහාර, ඖෂධ සහ හිසට වහලක් නොමැති තත්ත්වයක් යටතේ එසේ ඇඳිවත පමණක් ඉතිරිව පැමිණෙන පුරුෂයෝ, කාන්තාවෝ සහ දරුවෝ හැකි ඕනෑම ස්ථානයක කඳවුරු ලා ගනිති. අගෝස්තු මාසයේ සිට පැමිණි 537,000 වන රෝහින්ග්‍යාවරුන්ගෙන් 58% දරුවන් වන අතර වැඩිහිටියන්ගෙන් 60% ක් කාන්තාවන්ය. විශාලතම රැඳවුම් ස්ථානය කුටපොලො කඳවුර වන අතර එහි ඉඩකඩ සීමා වී ඇති බැවින් ඒ අවට තැනින් තැන සහ භුලුකාලි ප්‍රදේශයේ ද සරණාගතයෝ රැඳී සිටිති. 13,901 දෙනෙකු රැඳී සිටි කුටපොලො කඳවුර අගෝස්තු මාසයේ සිට 20,000 වර්ධනය වී ඇත. කඳවුරෙන් පිටත තාවකාලික වාසස්ථාන හෝ තැනින් තැන පිහිටි නවාතැන්වල රැඳී සිටි පිරිස 99,495 සිට 311,225 දක්වා ඉහළ ගොස් තිබේ. එම කලාපයේ පිහිටි සෙසු කඳවුරු ද ව්‍යාප්ත වී තිබේ. ජාත්‍යන්තර ප්‍රතිචාරය මේ අතර තාවකාලිකව ශ්‍රී ලංකාවේ රැඳී සිටින රෝහින්ග්‍යා ජනයා වෙනත් රටකට පිටත් කරන ලෙස ඉල්ලා පසුගියදා කොළඹ උද්ඝෝෂණ පැවැත්විණි. එක්සත් ජාතීන්ගේ භාරයේ පසුවන රෝහින්ග්‍යා සරණාගතයන් 31 දෙනෙකු රඳවා සිටි ගල්කිස්සේ නිවාසයක් ඉදිරිපිට දී පසුගිය සැප්තැම්බර් 26 වෙනිදා උණුසුම් වාතාවරණයක් හට ගත් අතර එහිදී ප්‍රචණ්ඩකාරී ලෙස හැසිරුණු බවට චෝදනා ලත් බෞද්ධ භික්ෂූන් ඇතුළු පිරිසක් පසුව අත්අඩංගුවට ගනු ලැබිණි. ශ්‍රී ලංකාව, 1950 සහ 1967 වසරවල අත්සන් තබන ලද එක්සත් ජාතීන්ගේ සරණාගතයන් පිළිබඳ ප්‍රඥප්තියේ සාමාජික රටක් නොවන බැවින් ඔවුන්ට ශ්‍රී ලංකාව තුළ සරණාගතභාවය ලබා දිය නොහැක. ඒ අනුව දැනට එක්සත් ජාතීන්ගේ සරණාගතයන් පිළිබඳ මහ කොමසාරිස් කාර්යාලය භාරයේ පසුවන රෝහින්ග්‍යා කණ්ඩායම ඉදිරියේ දී වෙනත් රටකට පිටත් කර හැරීමට නියමිතය.
نشرت الإدارة الأمريكية 2800 ملف سري بشأن حادث اغتيال الرئيس الخامس والثلاثين للولايات المتحدة، جون إف كينيدي. وقال الرئيس الأمريكي دونالد ترامب إن من حق الشعب أن يكون "على دراية تامة" بكل ما يتعلق بهذا الحدث، الذي ظل مادة للعديد من نظريات المؤامرة. لكن بعض الوثائق حُجبت بناء على طلب جهات حكومية. وكشفت إحدى المذكرات أن مكتب التحقيقات الفيدرالي (إف بي آي) حذر الشرطة من أن المتهم بقتل كينيدي، لي هارفي أوزولد، مهدد بالقتل. وقال مدير مكتب التحقيقات الفيدرالي حينها، جيه إدغار هوفر "لقد أبلغنا في الحال رئيس الشرطة، وأكد لنا أن الشرطة ستؤمن الحماية الكافية لأوزولد". لكن بعد يومين من مقتل كينيدي، قُتل أوزولد، العضو السابق بسلاح مشاة البحرية، بالرصاص في قبو قسم شرطة دالاس. ومع دراسة الوثائق وتحليلها، اتضحت أمور أخرى، منها مذكرة لوكالة المخابرات المركزية الأمريكية (سي آي ايه) ترجح أن أوزولد تحدث مع بالاستخبارات الروسية (كيه جي بي) بسفارة روسيا في مكسيكو سيتي. وبحسب المذكرة، كان الضابط الذي تحدث معه أوزولد يعمل بالقسم "المسؤول عن التخريب والاغتيالات". كما كشفت مذكرة أخرى أن مسؤولين في الاتحاد السوفيتي السابق أبدوا خشيتهم من أن يطلق "جنرال غير مسؤول" صاروخا على الاتحاد في أعقاب وفاة كينيدي. وتروي مذكرة أخرى أن صحيفة "كمبريدج نيوز" المحلية في بريطانيا تلقت اتصالا هاتفيا من شخص لم يحدد هويته، تحدث عن "خبر هام" في الولايات المتحدة، وذلك قبل ساعات من الاغتيال. ونشر الأرشيف الوطني في الولايات المتحدة نسخة من المذكرة في يوليو/ تموز الماضي، لكن الأمر لم يحظ بتغطية إعلامية. ويقضي قانون أقره البرلمان الأمريكي (الكونغرس) في عام 1992 بالكشف عن جميع الملفات المتعلقة باغتيال كينيدي، والواقعة في نحو خمسة ملايين صفحة، خلال 25 عاما. وكان الموعد النهائي للنشر هو يوم 26 أكتوبر/ تشرين الأول 2017. وأُتيح بالفعل أكثر 90 في المئة من الوثائق للعامة. وأفادت تقارير بأن وكالة الاستخبارات المركزية ومكتب التحقيقات الفيدرالي ووزارة الخارجية ووكالات أخرى ضغطت في اللحظة الأخيرة لإبقاء وثائق معينة قيد السرية. وتخضع بعض الوثائق السرية للمراجعة مرة أخرى لمدة ستة أشهر، ولكن من الممكن أن تظل هذه الوثائق سرية بعد انقضاء الموعد النهائي المحدد في 26 أبريل/ نيسان من العام المقبل. ووفقا لمسؤولين في البيت الأبيض، وافق ترامب على مضض على طلبات الوكالة بالإبقاء على بعض الملفات قيد السرية. وقال "ليس لدي أي خيار سوى أن أقبل بمدة مراجعة جديدة لبعض الوثائق، فذلك أسلم من أن أعرض أمننا القومي لمخاطر لا يمكن التراجع عنها". وقد نشرت تلك الوثائق على الموقع الإلكتروني للأرشيف الوطني. في 22 نوفمبر/ تشرين الثاني، اغتيل كينيدي برصاص بندقية أثناء مرور موكبه في مدينة دالاس. وكان يركب سيارة مكشوفة برفقة زوجته جاكلين وحاكم ولاية تكساس جون كونالي. وقد أصيب حاكم تكساس، الذى كان جالساً أمام الرئيس، بجروح. واعتقل لي هارفي أوزولد في دالاس يوم إطلاق النار، واتهم باغتيال الرئيس، لكنه نفى التهم التي وجهت له مدعيا أنه "مجرد شخص ساذج". وفي 24 نوفمبر/ تشرين الثاني، قُتل أوزولد بالرصاص في قبو قسم شرطة دالاس على يد جاك روبي، وهو صاحب ملهى ليلي محلي. قال تقرير لجنة وارن، الذي نشر في سبتمبر/ أيلول 1964، إن لي هارفي أوزولد أطلق النار على موكب الرئيس من مبنى مستودع الكتب المدرسية في تكساس. وقالت اللجنة إنه "لا يوجد دليل على أن لي هارفي أوزولد أو جاك روبي كانا جزءا من أي مؤامرة محلية أو أجنبية". وخلص تقرير أعدته لجنة التحقيق في الاغتيالات التابعة لمجلس النواب عام 1979، إلى "احتمال كبير" بوجود مسلحين نفذا الاغتيال. كان لي هارفي عنصرا سابقا في قوات مشاة البحرية الأمريكية، وحسب زعمه كان يتبنى الفكر الماركسي، وقد سافر إلى الاتحاد السوفيتي عام 1959 و عاش هناك حتى عام 1962. وعمل أوزولد في مدينة مينسك في مصنع الراديو والتليفزيون، والتقى زوجته في المدينة. ووجدت لجنة وارن أنه زار السفارتين الكوبية والروسية في مكسيكو سيتي قبل شهرين من إطلاق النار على كينيدي. يشير البعض إلى أنه قد يكون هناك شخص ثان قام بإطلاق النار أيضاً، في حين يقول آخرون إن من المرجح أن الرصاص الذي قتل كينيدي أُطلق من أمامه وليس من خلفه. وأظهر اختبار بمادة البارافين أجري على صدغ أوزولد بعد اعتقاله أنه لم يطلق رصاصاً من بندقيته، لكن شُكك لاحقا في مصداقية ذلك الاختبار. كما قال حاكم ولاية تكساس إنه لم يصب بنفس العيار الناري الذي قتل كينيدي، ما يناقض كلياً النتائج التي خلصت إليها لجنة وارن.
د پاکستاني ‌‌‌‌طالبانو ویاند احسان الله احسان له خپلې دندې ګوښه شوی او پر ځای یې شیخ مقبول نومي قومندان ګومارل شوی دی. دغه اعلان شمالي وزیرستان کې د پاکستانی طالبانو له لوري په یوه خبر پاڼه کې خپور شو. خبر پاڼه کې ویل شوي، چې پخواني ویاند احسان الله احسان په خپلو څرګندونو کې هڅه کوله، د پاکستاني او افغان طالبانو تر منځ اختلاف رامنځ ته کړي. دغه راز خبر پاڼه کې ویل شوي، چې شیخ مقبول د احسان الله احسان پر ځای د ویاند په توګه ټاکل شوی. د هغو معلوماتو له مخې چې بي بي سي تر لاسه کړي، شیخ مقبول د اورکزی ایجنسۍ سیمې اړوند دی او له افغان طالبانو سره نژدې اړیکې لري. طالبانو ته نژدې سرچینې وايي پر احسان الله احسان داسې تورونه وو، چې د ځینو څرګندونو له کبله یې افغان طالبانو شکایت درلود او دغه شکایتونه د بیت الله مسېد په مشرتابه مرکزي شورا ته هم رسېدلي وو، چې له هغه وروسته دغه غبرګون څرګند شو او نوموړی له دندې لېرې کړل شو. ویل کېږي، چې دوې اونۍ مخکې د مومندو ایجنسۍ د ‌طالبانو مشر عمر خالد ویاند عمر خراساني له لوري رسنیو ته په لېږل شوې اعلامیه کې ویل شوي وو، چې د افغانستان له کونړ ولایت څخه لسګونه افغان طالبان دغې سیمې ته ورغلي او د لشکر طیبه او انصار الاسلام ډلو د مرستې لپاره یې د دوی پر مرکزونو بریدونه کړي. عمر خراساني دا هم ویلي وو، چې د دغه برید په اړه د طالبانو افغان مشرتابه ته خبر ورکړل شو او ورته وویل شول، چې خپل جنګیالي د دوی پر مرکزونو د خپلو جنګیالو د بریدونو مخه ونیسي، خو دوی و نه توانېدل داسې وکړي. د سرچینې په وینا وروسته په مرکزي ترجمان تور ولګېد، چې د عمرخراساني له لوري خپره شوې دغه اعلامیه خپله د احسان الله احسان له لوری خپره شوې وه. د نوموړي دریځ معلومولو لپاره له هغه سره د اړیکې ټینګولو هڅه وشوه، خو بریالي نه شوو. د یادونې ده، چې مومندو ایجنسۍ سیمه کې د ‌طالبانو د ځايي قومندان عمرخالد او لشکر طیبه ډلې تر منځ اختلاف شته او دوی څه موده مخکې له یوه بل سره خونړۍ نښتې کړې، چې په کې دواړو لوریو ته مرګ ژوبله اوښتې. د لشکر طیبه په باب ویل کېږي، چې افغان خاوره کې دننه د امریکايي او ګډو ځواکونو ضد بریدونه کوي او دوی د پاکستان پلوې ډلې پلوي بلل کېږي. د دې دواړ ډلو تر منځ د جوړجاړي لپاره د افغان طالبانو له لوري هڅې شوې، خو کومه بریا ته نه دي رسېدلي. ویل کیږي، چې احسان الله احسان هم د مومندو ایجنسۍ اړوند دی او له دې مخکې د قومندان عمرخالد مرستیال او د مومندو ایجنسۍ طالبانو ویاند هم و.
تحرص البي بي سي على حماية خصوصية المعلومات الشخصية التي تتلقاها منكم عند استخدام مختلف خدماتها. ولكي تتمكن البي بي سي من تقديم كافة خدماتها لكم، فانها بحاجة احيانا الى جمع معلومات عن مستخدمي هذه الخدمات. تلتزم البي بي سي بالتعامل مع اي معلومات تتلقاها منكم طبقا للقواعد القانونية المطبقة في بريطانيا بشأن حماية المعلومات الشخصية، بما في ذلك قانون حماية البيانات الصادر عام 1998. يحتوي موقع بي بي سي على روابط لمواقع اخرى. البي بي سي غير مسؤولة عن محتوى المواقع الخارجية، وتقع مسؤولية استخدامها على عاتق المستخدم. عندما تطلب الاشتراك في احدى الخدمات التي تقدمها البي بي سي، مثل تلقي الاخبار بالبريد الالكرتوني او المشاركة في مسابقات، او المشاركة في حوارات على الهواء مباشرة، فقد نطلب تقديم بيانات شخصية، مثل الاسم وعنوان البريد الالكتروني ومحل الاقامة ورقم الهاتف وتاريخ الميلاد. تقديم هذه البيانات الشخصية الى بي بي سي يمكن العاملين بها من تقديم الخدمات المطلوبة. تستخدم بي بي سي ايضا ملفات تعريف الارتباط cookies، وهي عبارة عن بيانات محدودة عن تفضيلات المستخدمين للاونلاين، وهذه البيانات تساعد البي بي سي على تلبية احتياجات مستخدميها. بشكل مشابه تقوم بي بي سي ايضا بتسجيل عنوان الـ IP، وهو عبارة عن رقم يمكن ان يحدد كل جهاز كمبيوتر يستخدم شبكة الانترنت. نستخدم برامج تحليلية لمتابعة ملفات الارتباط cookies وعناوين الـ IP بهدف التعرف على احتياجات المستخدمين. ولا تستخدم هذه المعلومات لتجميع ملفات شخصية عنكم. كما تستخدم بي بي سي عنوان الـ IP لمعرفة ما اذا كان يتم الدخول الى موقعها من داخل بريطانيا ام من خارجها. اذا كانت اعماركم تقل عن 16 عاما فنرجو الحصول على موافقة الآباء او اولياء الامور قبل ارسال اي بيانات شخصية الى موقع بي بي سي. وبدون هذه الموافقات لا يسمح بارسال بيانات شخصية. تستخدم بي بي سي المعلومات الشخصية التي تتلقاها منكم لاغراض محدودة، منها ادارة الخدمات التي تقدمها لمستخدميها، وعلى سبيل المثال الاتصال بكم بخصوص الخدمة التي طلبتم الحصول عليها. ستحتفظ بي بي سي بسرية المعلومات التي تحصل عليها من مستخدميها، الا اذا تطلب القانون الافصاح عنها، او سمح بذلك. سنحتفظ بالبيانات الشخصية المقدمة منكم طالما كانت هناك حاجة اليها لتقديم خدمات اليكم. وعندما ترسلون مساهماتكم الى موقع بي بي سي فانه سيتم الاحتفاظ بالمحتوى لفترة معقولة حسب الغرض الذي ارسلت المساهمات من اجله. لمزيد من التفاصيل عن سياسة حماية الخصوصية في بي بي سي، يمكنكم زيارة الصفحة الخاصة بذلك باللغة الانجليزية على العنوان التالي: http://www.bbc.co.uk/privacy
Fue necesaria una operación internacional en la que participaron más de 40 países y que se alargó durante cuatro años para desmantelar la red de estafa cibernética más grande del mundo. La policía alemana, el FBI), Eurojust, Interpol, Europol, y sus socios internacionales incautaron 39 servidores, miles de dominios digitales y detuvieron a 16 sospechosos de fraude a principios de este mes. Todos ellos pertenecían a una red para actividades criminales que se hacía llamar "Avalanche" (Avalancha, en español) y cuyas víctimas principales eran los clientes de bancos que hacían transacciones por internet. Era la mayor red mundial de bots informáticos para el robo de datos en internet. "Calculamos que los daños económicos ascienden a cientos de millones de dólares en todo el mundo. Las cifras exactas son complicadas de obtener por la alta cantidad de malware (programas maliciosos) gestionados a través de la plataforma", dijo Europol. "Identificamos víctimas en 180 países. La operación implicó el mayor uso de sinkholing (toma de control de los equipos infectados) para combatir las infraestructuras de redes de robots informáticos y su escala no tiene precedentes". "Avalancha muestra que sólo podemos cosechar éxitos si colaboramos estrechamente", expresó el comisario europeo por la unión de la seguridad Julian King en un comunicado. Pero ¿cómo funcionaba esta red criminal para cuyo desmantelamiento fue necesaria una operación a tan gran escala? Avalancha era una plataforma de prestación de servicios para gestionar malware a gran escala y operaciones de reclutamiento de mulas de dinero, es decir, para seleccionar personas que, sin saberlo, blanqueban el dinero de los delincuentes. Varios grupos criminales habían utilizado el sitio web desde 2009 "para llevar a cabo actividades de malware, pishing y spam", confirmó Europol. Enviaron, en total, según el organismo policial, "más de un millón de correos electrónicos con contenido fraudulento o enlaces cada semana a víctimas desprevenidas". La policía comenzó a investigar esta red en Alemania en 2012 luego de que un ransomware troyano infectara a un gran número de sistemas informáticos, bloqueando el acceso a los usuarios. "Millones de sistemas personales y comerciales fueron también infectados con malware, permitiendo a los criminales gestionar la red para obtener contraseñas de cuentas bancarias y de emails", explicó Europol. Gracias a esa información, los criminales pudieron hacer transferencias bancarias desde las cuentas de sus víctimas. Y se redirigieron los ingresos a ellos mismos a través de un sistema similar creado específicamente para garantizar los procedimientos de las organizaciones criminales. Con ayuda de esa "sofisticada infraestructura", explican los agentes europeos, los delincuentes lograron el éxito de sus operaciones. Se calcula que, cada día, la red Avalancha permitió efectuar ataques a unas 500.000 computadoras en todo el mundo. "Pero lo que hacía a la infraestructura Avalancha especial era el uso de la denominada técnica de doble flujo rápido", dijo Europol. ¿Qué significa eso? De acuerdo con los especialistas, es un sistema que permite cambiar periódicamente la resolución del Sistema de Nombre de Dominios (DNS, por sus siglas en inglés) de las máquinas que activan esos robots informáticos. El objetivo es ocultar el servidor que aloja un sitio web parte de un pishing o que sirve de malware, y así retrasar o evitar la identificación de los criminales. Y esta característica de Avalancha era muy conocida entre los cibercirminales. Aunque, por ahora, ya es historia. "Avalancha era una de las infraestructuras de redes botnet (robots informáticos) más maliciosas del mundo. Y fue neutralizada de manera decisiva en una de las operaciones de desmantelamiento más grandes jamás efectuada hasta la fecha", dijo el presidente de Eurojust, Michèle Coninsx.
As consumers consider whether to spend big on the new $999 iPhone X, Apple isn't the only company hoping for a sales boost. A global chain of components and technology suppliers are used to build Apple's smartphones. The tech giant has designed certain parts of the X's internal components. But new features such as 3D facial recognition and an expansion of augmented reality functions will boost specialised suppliers. The iPhone X, a glass and stainless steel device with an edge-to-edge display, was unveiled in the US on Tuesday. Like previous models, the new phone, Apple's most expensive yet, will be made up of parts from around the world. Until analysts crack it open and examine the inner workings of the device, it's not clear exactly which suppliers will be the biggest winners in the provision of parts such as batteries, memory chips and screen displays. But the past gives a good guide. Jake Saunders, Asia-Pacific vice president for ABI Research, in Singapore, said Apple was unlikely to depart too much from its iPhone 7 supplier base. For that model, Mr Saunders said Intel, which provides the modem that handles data traffic, was the biggest third-party supplier. He said Intel parts made up around 15% of the value of the device. Other big contributors were Japan's Toshiba, US firms Broadcom and Texas Instruments, and the UK's Dialog Semiconductor. Those firms are likely to feature again, but another name to watch is Lumentum. The US company, which makes components of 3D sensors, may benefit from the phone's new facial recognition technology. Lumentum said it has received $200m (£150m) in orders for these lasers since April. The company said it has various customers, but many analysts believe that orders from Apple are behind the sales surge. Samsung stands to take cut from the OLED display screens - which do away with traditional LCD backlight technology - it is supplying for the new phone. Canalys research analyst TuanAnh Nguyen says the South Korean conglomerate, which controls roughly 90% of the OLED display market, is poised to be a big winner of the iPhone X. However, some suppliers will be squeezed as Apple moves to design more of the iPhone's internal components. The latest phones feature Apple's first proprietary graphics processor, which provides more speed, improved cameras and some features for augmented reality apps. The iPhone maker had previously used graphics chips from Imagination Technologies Group, which put itself up for sale earlier this year after Apple said it would make its own technology. Despite Apple's shift away from graphics chips suppliers, other firms are poised to benefit as the iPhone maker deepens its augmented reality (AR) functions in future devices. Canalys analyst Mr Nguyen said the focus on AR - think functions like Pokemon Go - could pay fresh dividends for some partner firms. "There are more opportunities for new suppliers who focus on products such as light sensors, light receivers, and cameras because Apple is committed to a future where the camera offers AR experiences," he said. To put all the parts together, Apple's handsets are assembled in China. The country is home to the biggest iPhone factory in the world, run by Taiwanese manufacturing partner Foxconn. Apple is also looking to India. Earlier this year the firm said it will start making iPhones in the southern Indian state of Karnataka. That could change the part mix - for it to be able to sell direct to customers in India, Apple would have to source 30% of the components of its products locally.
When I meet Tupperware Brands boss Rick Goings there's a funny moment. He's just finished his lunch, but wants to pack the remainder away for later. He looks expectantly at his colleague, expecting her to magic a box out of thin air. "What, you think I've got some in my handbag?" she scoffs. You can tell Mr Goings is slightly disappointed. The King of Tupperware hasn't got any at just the moment he needs some. Yet, despite being in Switzerland, thousands of miles away from the firm's headquarters in Orlando, Florida, it's not an unreasonable expectation that Tupperware's products may indeed be available. For while Tupperware may, in the UK at least, be forever associated with a bygone era when women stayed at home and men went to work, it's now a thriving international juggernaut. "We do not look at ourselves as a US company," says Mr Goings. And you can see why. Sales last year were $2.2bn (£1.8bn) with Asia-Pacific responsible for almost a third of these, while the biggest sales growth was seen in Brazil. The firm's products - which now include not only Tupperware, but also several beauty brands - are sold in more than 80 countries, and for the past five years, more than 90% of sales have come from non-US markets. It's a revolution Mr Goings has driven. When he became chief executive in 1997, the firm had already expanded overseas, but was failing. In his first week at the helm he had to write off $100m of bad debt. "So much was broken," he says about the company, founded in 1946 by inventor Earl Tupper. His solution was to ramp up the firm's expansion overseas, in particular focusing on Latin America, Asia and Africa and eventually taking the firm to more than 20 additional countries. He says this shift in focus was obvious, given that Europe and the US combined account for just a tenth of the world's population overall. "We didn't have to make major changes to our business model and it's where most of the people in the world live," he says. Many big consumer brands from Coca-Cola to Procter & Gamble have followed similar paths into emerging markets, tapping into a growing middle class and strong demand for well-known US brands. Yet Tupperware's model of direct selling - the famed suburban housewives' gathering of the 1950s and 1960s - is exactly the thing that has given it an edge. While easy to mock - do modern women really get excited about plastic boxes? - it's enabled the firm to get around all the problems of trying to sell in regions where infrastructure is less developed and shops can be a long distance away. The firm hasn't had to invest in shops, and instead of travelling into town, people can nip over to a friend's house to buy things. And while the party attendees may start off as housewives, they're unlikely to stay that way, according to Mr Goings. For many of the firm's 3.1 million casual sales consultants, it has provided their first chance of an independent income. Typically a party will yield about $400 (£320) worth of sales, of which the sales consultant will earn 30%. "It's a heck of a lot of money," Mr Goings says. Ng Chiu Gwek, one of Tupperware's most successful Indonesian sales force members, who joined the company in 1997, says she loves the firm. "I have changed my own life into a better life, going from nothing into something," she says. Previously a full-time housewife, Ms Gwek - who was introduced to the firm by her mother-in-law - now runs a distributorship, responsible for a team of several thousand sales consultants in her hometown of Pontianak and the surrounding small cities. The job has enabled her to educate all three of her children overseas. "Tupperware is my life and I have not seen any other company like Tupperware that has changed so many lives for the better," she says. A shake-up of the party format has also helped drive growth. They are no longer polite gatherings over tea and cake, but have been updated to "a girls' night out", says Mr Goings with a conspiratorial nod. Themes include Mexican night with tequila, and decadent and delicious desserts and meals, with one such party held every 1.3 seconds globally, the firm claims. In some countries, where small homes mean space for hosting gatherings is limited, the firm has opened so-called "experience studios", where would-be customers can see the products in action. In China it has 5,600 such spaces, but reckons there's capacity for 20,000. The firm's sales model has another advantage. A recommendation from a friend is always likely to be more persuasive than one from a company, but in emerging markets this is particularly so, according to McKinsey. The management consultancy found consumers in Africa and Asia were far more dependent on word of mouth, than their developed counterparts. It said this was because with few brands around long enough to have built a loyal following, seeing a friend use a product was reassuring. It's also tough for counterfeiters - and those making cheaper imitations of the products - to imitate this kind of sales network. Neil Saunders, managing director at consultancy Globaldata Retail, says while in developed markets like the UK the firm's long history means Tupperware is seen as a bit old-fashioned compared to more modern rivals such as Joseph Joseph, in emerging markets it doesn't carry this "baggage". "For consumers there it's a modern innovative brand. It's a challenger and innovator," he says. And as Mr Goings is at pains to point out while handing me the firm's brochure, the airtight storage boxes that wowed Western consumers in the postwar years now account for just a third of sales. Instead it is now brightly coloured microwaveable pressure cookers, mini food processors and water bottles that are driving sales. "The party has changed, the product has changed. We're not just a plastic box company," he says.
China's Tiangong-1 space station is currently out of control and expected to fall back to Earth next year. But not in the remote place where many other spacecraft end their days. Explorers and adventurers often look for new places to conquer now that the highest peaks have been climbed, the poles reached and vast oceans and deserts crossed. Some of these new places are called the poles of inaccessibility. Two of them are particularly interesting. One is called the continental pole of inaccessibility - it's the place on Earth furthest from the ocean. There is some debate as to its exact position but it's considered by many to be near the so-called Dzungarian Gate - a mountain pass between China and Central Asia. The equivalent point in the ocean - the place furthest away from land - lies in the South Pacific some 2,700km (1,680 miles) south of the Pitcairn Islands - somewhere in the no-man's land, or rather no-man's-sea, between Australia, New Zealand and South America. This oceanic pole of inaccessibility is not only of interest to explorers, satellite operators are interested in it as well. That's because most of the satellites placed in orbit around the Earth will eventually come down, but where? Smaller satellites will burn up but pieces of the larger ones will survive to reach the Earth's surface. To avoid crashing on a populated area they are brought down near the point of oceanic inaccessibility. Scattered over an area of approximately 1,500 sq km (580 sq miles) on the ocean floor of this region is a graveyard of satellites. At last count there were more than 260 of them, mostly Russian. The wreckage of the Mir space station lies there. It was launched in 1986 and was visited by many teams of cosmonauts and international visitors. With a mass of 120 tonnes it was never going to burn up in the atmosphere, so it was ditched in the region in 2001 and was seen by some fishermen as a fragmenting mass of glowing debris racing across the sky. Many times a year the supply module that goes to the International Space Station burns up in this region incinerating the station's waste. No one is in any danger because of this controlled re-entry into our atmosphere. The region is not fished because oceanic currents avoid the area and do not bring nutrients to it, making marine life scarce. One future visitor to this desolate place will be the International Space Station. Current plans are for it to be decommissioned in the next decade and it will have to be carefully brought down in the oceanic pole of inaccessibility. With a mass of 450 tonnes - four times that of the Mir space station - it will make a spectacular sight. Sometimes however, it's not possible to bring a satellite or space station down in the South Pacific if ground controllers have lost contact with it. Such a thing happened with the 36-tonne Salyut 7 space station in 1991 which came down in South America or the American Skylab that struck Australia in 1979. No one on the ground was injured, or indeed as far as we know, ever has been by a piece of falling spacecraft debris. We will face that problem again next year. Between January and April the Chinese Tiangong-1 will come back to Earth. It was launched in 2011 as China's first space station. The following year it was visited by China's first female astronaut, Liu Yang. Tiangong-1's orbit is decaying as it heads towards re-entry. But Chinese engineers have lost control of it and cannot fire its thrusters to bring it down in the South Pacific. Instead it will come down somewhere between 42.8 degrees north and south. That's between the latitude of northern Spain and southern Australia, and we won't be able to be more precise than that until just a few hours before it burns up. Tiangong-1 is one space station that probably won't join its companions in the remote South Pacific. Dr David Whitehouse was the BBC's science correspondent from 1988 until 2006, and is a former science editor at the BBC News website.
Zaman gazetesinin eski yönetici ve yazarlarına yönelik davada mahkeme heyeti, 31 sanık hakkındaki ara kararını verdi. Mahkeme heyeti savcının talebi doğrultusunda; Mümtazer Türköne, Şahin Alpay ve Ali Bulaç'ın da aralarında bulunduğu 22 tutuklu sanığın tahliye taleplerini reddetti. Duruşma 8 Aralık'a ertelendi. Davanın 2. duruşması Salı günü Silivri Ceza İnfaz Kurumları Kampusü'nün karşısında bulunan binada 13. Ağır Ceza Mahkemesi'nce görüldü. Duruşmada 22 tutuklu sanık ile 4 tutuksuz sanık hazır bulundu. Savunmalarını yapan sanıklar suçlamaları reddederek tahliyelerini istedi. Tutuklu sanıklardan, gazetenin eski yazarı, 63 yaşındaki Ahmet Turan Alkan, hakkında gözaltı kararı verildikten sonra evinde oturup polisi beklediğini söyledi. Sanık Alkan, "Biz ekmek parası için yazı yazan yazarlarız. Zaman gazetesinin yöneticisi değilim, sadece yazarım. Bu örgütün önemli bir mensubu olsam kaçardım. Evimde oturdum, polisi bekledim. Ben terörist değilim, darbeci hiç değilim" dedi. Alkan, iddianamede suç delili olarak yazdığı yazıların gösterildiğini, hakkında tanık, itirafçı ya da bir raporun bulunmadığını savundu. Alkan, "Cemaat mensubu değilim asla da olmadım" diye konuştu. Eski yazar Ali Bulaç ise savunmasında "Bence Gülen hareketi cemaatken iyiydi. Güzel hizmetlere imza atıyordu. Zaman içinde kötüye dönüştü. FETÖ oldu" dedi ve hareketin "güç zehirlenmesine uğradığını" söyledi. 17-25 Aralık'ın 'rüşvet ve yolsuzluk' olduğunu yazmadığını belirten Bulaç, "AK Parti'yi yolsuzluk yapmakla suçlamadım. Genel üslubuma uygun ve gündemle ilgili tarihi, sosyolojik ve fikri değerini araştıran yazılar yazdım. Eleştirilerimi cemaat adına veya onlara paralel doğrultuda yapmadım. 2007 yılında verilen e-muhtırada Ak Parti'nin yanında durdum. 2008 yılında Ak Parti'nin kapatılmak istenmesine karşı çıktım. Sayın Erdoğan'ı hedef alan tek bir eleştiri yazım olmadı. Erdoğan'ın önerdiği Başkanlık sistemine karşı çıkmadım. Ak Parti'nin doğru bulduğum politikalarını destekledim. Gezi olaylarının başlamasından 2-3 gün sonra hükümete karşın kalkışmaya dönüştüğünü, şiddet ve terörün bu işe bulaştığını yazdım. Meşru iktidarı ve Sayın Erdoğan'ı korudum. 11 Nisan 2016'da 'Darbecilik alçaklıktır' diye yazdım. Darbeye zemin hazırlayan kişi böyle bir yazı yazar mı?" ifadelerini kullandı. Medya sektöründeki Fethullah Gülen hareketi içinde önemli sayılacak birçok kişinin aylar öncesinden yurtdışına çıktığını anlatan Bulaç, geriye her şeyden habersiz kimselerin kaldığını öne sürdü. Gazetenin eski yazarı Şahin Alpay, Zaman gazetesinde yazarlık yaptığı için pişmanlık duyduğunu söyledi. "Gülen hareketiyle ilgili hayal kırıklığım 15 Temmuz 2016'daki askeri darbe girişimiyle patlak verdi" diyen Alpay, "İtiraf edeyim ki o güne kadar hareketin gayrimeşru işlere karışan bir karanlık yüzü olduğunun bilincinde değildim" şeklinde konuştu. Alpay "15 Temmuz darbe girişimini lanetliyorum. Bu nedenle Zaman'da yazdığım için pişmanlık duyuyorum. Bu hareketin karanlık yüzünü göremediğim için fena halde yanıldım" diye konuştu. Gazetenin eski yazarı Mümtazer Türköne ise 15 Temmuz darbe girişiminin engellenmesi için çaba harcamasından ötürü heykelinin dikilmesi gerektiğini söyledi. Türköne, "Yargılamalar biter, her şey yerli yerine oturduğunda 15 Temmuz darbesinin arka planda engellenmesinde çaba harcayan kim var diye sorarlarsa ilk sırada ben varım. Benim büstümün dikilmesi gerekiyor. Vasiyetimdir, öyle bir şey olursa büstümü Çağlayan Adliyesi'nin önüne diksinler" dedi. Türköne, "Darbecilere karşı tavrım 15 Temmuz günü de devam etti. Attığım tweetlerle darbenin bir ihanet olduğunu, meşru hükümetin yanında olduğumu söyledim. Cumhurbaşkanı halkı sokağa davet etmeden önce köprüye gitmek için yola çıktım" ifadelerini kullandı. Tutuklu sanıklardan İbrahim Karayeğen, 12 yıldır Zaman gazetesinde gece editörlüğü yaptığını belirterek, "Darbeye katıldığım ve terör örgütüne üye olduğuma dair tek bir kanıt varsa en ağır cezaya razıyım" dedi ve suçlamaları reddetti. Sanık Cuma Kaya da "Darbeye teşebbüsünü lanetliyorum. Ben suç işlemedim. Örgüt üyesi değilim. Ben böyle bir eylem içinde olmadım" diye konuştu. Sanık İsmail Küçük de Bank Asya'ya para yatırmadığını sadece maaş hesabının olduğunu belirterek, suçlamaları reddetti. Sanık Murat Avcıoğlu da 15 Temmuz'da sokağa çıkarak darbe girişimini protesto ettiğini belirterek, ByLock kullanmadığını, bağış yapmadığını söyledi. Sanıklardan Mustafa Ünal da "Darbelere karşı yazılar yazdım. Hiçbir terör örgütü içinde yer almadım. Yasal sınırlar içinde yazılar yazdım" dedi. Doğan Haber Ajansı'nın haberine göre, savcı tutukluluğun devamı için, suçun vasıf ve mahiyeti, delillerin tam olarak toplanmamış olması, kuvvetli suç şüphesi, delil durumu ve sanıklar için istenen cezaların alt ve üst sınırlarını gerekçe gösterdi. Savcı, tutuksuz sanıkların adli kontrol taleplerinin kaldırılması taleplerinin de reddine karar verilmesini ayrıca İstanbul Emniyet Müdürlüğü'ne yazı yazılarak sanıkların el konulan dijital materyallerinin inceleme sonuçlarıyla ilgili bilgi talep edilmesini istedi. Savcı İsmet Bozkurt tarafından hazırlanan 64 sayfalık iddianamede, Fethullah Gülen hareketinin, "basın ve ifade özgürlüğü sınırlarını aşarak devlet sırlarını ifşa ettiği, algı oluşturarak meşru hükümetleri çalışamaz hale getirmeyi hedeflediği" kaydediliyor. İddianamede, bunu yapması için de medya gücünü kullandığı, şüphelilerin de haber ve yazılarıyla bu durumu bilerek sürdürdüğü öne sürülüyor. 31 şüpheli hakkında "Darbeye teşebbüs" suçundan 3'er kez ağırlaştırılmış müebbet hapis cezası ve "Silahı terör örgütüne üye olmak" suçundan da 15'er yıla kadar hapis cezası isteniyor. Gazeteye İstanbul 6. Sulh Ceza Hakimliği talebiyle 4 Mart 2016'da kayyım atanmış, 15 Temmuz darbe girişimi sonrası çıkarılan bir Olağanüstü Hal (OHAL) kararnamesi ile de gazete kapatılmıştı.
El adjetivo "democrático" no es necesariamente el primero que viene a la mente a la hora de describir al sistema político chino, donde las tareas de gobierno están exclusivamente reservadas para el Partido Comunista. Pero en vísperas de la celebración del 19 congreso del partido de gobierno, los medios estatales del gigante asiático han estado destacando las lecciones que la "democracia ilustrada" de China le puede enseñar a las "decadentes" democracias occidentales. El término fue reivindicado por la agencia Xinhua en un artículo sobre las diferencias entre la "democracia china" de "la crisis y el caos que empantanan a las democracias liberales occidentales". Y es un ejemplo de la razón que tenía George Orwell cuando sostenía que "los defensores de todo tipo de régimen aseguran que el suyo es una democracia". La Constitución china reserva para el Partido Comunista el derecho de liderar al gobierno y, en la práctica, todas las otras fuerzas políticas del país le están supeditadas. Pero, según Xinhua, el "sistema de cooperación y consulta multipartidaria" que resulta de ese arreglo constituye un "sistema político completamente nuevo… muy diferente del sistema bipartidista de los países occidentales o los sistemas de partido único practicados en otros". Aunque, a la hora de las comparaciones, la agencia se centra sobre todo en destacar los problemas del modelo occidental fundamentado en el pluralismo político y el sufragio universal y directo. "A diferencia de la política competitiva y confrontacional de Occidente, el CPC y los partido no comunistas cooperan entre sí, trabajando juntos para el avance del socialismo y para mejorarlas condiciones de vida de la gente", se lee en el artículo. "Esta relación mantiene la estabilidad política y armonía social y garantiza la formulación e implementación eficiente de las políticas públicas", agrega. En el artículo abundan las críticas implícitas a un modelo occidental que "después de varios cientos de años, empieza a mostrar su edad". Pero el artículo tampoco duda en formularlas con todas sus letras: "El sistema chino conduce a la unidad social en lugar de a las divisiones que son la inevitable consecuencia de la naturaleza antagonista de la democracia Occidental actual", se lee ahí. Xinhua también denuncia que las eternas críticas, disputas y cambios de políticas -que, según la agencia, son la principal característica de la democracia liberal- han retrasado el progreso social y económico y terminado por ignorar los interese de la mayoría de los ciudadanos. E incluso la celebración de elecciones periódicas es vista como un problema. "Tanto en la política parlamentaria como presidencial los partidos obtienen su legitimidad por turnos a través de las urnas, causando frecuentes cambios de régimen y a menudo cambios completos en materia de políticas". El resultado, al menos desde la óptica china, es que "cualquier progreso logrado a menudo se pierde y reina la ineficiencia". Y Xinhua también hace notar que "en la medida en que los partidos en occidente cada ve representan más a grupos de interés y estratos sociales, la democracia capitalista se vuelve cada vez más oligárquica en su naturaleza". "Las grietas se están haciendo notar, como prueban los resultados inesperados o excéntricos de varios plebiscitos recientes", advierte la agencia. No se menciona nombres, pero en ocasiones anteriores los medios estatales chinos han mencionado la elección de Donald Trump y la decisión británica de abandonar la Unión Europea como ejemplos de los problemas de la democracia occidental, recuerda la agencia Reuters. Por lo demás, el evidente objetivo del escrito es la defensa del sistema político chino tanto de las críticas internas como externas. Como también recuerda Reuters, los activistas chinos que demandan pluralismo político son arrestados regularmente y las críticas al sistema silenciadas rápidamente. Mientas que las esperanzas de reforma en su momento alentadas por la elección de Xi Jinping poco a poco se han ido diluyendo, pues el mandatario ha presidido una verdadera ofensiva contra la sociedad civil marcada por el arresto de numerosos activistas de derechos humanos y mayor censura de internet. En contrapartida, el crecimiento económico del gigante asiático, y especialmente sus logros en reducción de pobreza, son a menudo presentados como ejemplo de las bondades de este modelo. Y aunque no hay una correlación obligatoria el artículo de Xinhua no es la excepción, pues además de celebrar "los logros" del PC tajantemente afirma que "la democracia estilo chino nunca ha estado más saludable y China en lo absoluto necesita importar el fallido sistema de política partidaria de otros países". Una conclusión que en cierta forma explica por qué nadie espere mayores sorpresas en el congreso, en el que Xi seguramente confirmará su poder y al final del cual, en palabras de Xinhua, el PC continuará llevado al país "por la vía correcta y por mucho tiempo más".
A selection of the best photos from across Africa and of Africans elsewhere in the world this week. In Ivory Coast's main city Abidjan, Sandra Kouadio takes time off to pose with her latest hairstyle... While Simon Nkendoh waits for clients at his salon in the city. The next day in the Democratic Republic Congo's capital, models prepare backstage for Kinshasa Fashion Week... Some make-up artists had to rely on mobile phone lights to make the models picture-perfect... While this model later takes to the stage in a marquee, displaying a creation by a Congolese designer. On Wednesday, Moroccan knights ride in an equestrian show in el-Jadida city, south of Casablanca... The performance sees horse riders charging along a straight path at the same speed in a line, then pick up speed and at the end of the charge, fire into the sky using old muskets or muzzle-loading rifles. While on Thursday, classical dancers do their final touch of make-up before performing at a celebration of Diwali, the Hindu Festival of Lights, at an old drive-in in South Africa's coastal city of Durban. Meanwhile, these dancers perform on Tuesday at the First Ladies of West Africa conference held to campaign against child labour. The next day in Liberia's capital Monrovia, children carry the message of gender equality on their heads as the country founded by freed US slaves celebrates Day of the Girl Child... While a day earlier, people who cannot afford newspapers or mobile internet data follow presidential election results on Daily Talk chalkboard, at a busy intersection in the city. A run-off will be held next month after ex-football star George Weah failed to defeat Vice-President Joseph Boakai by an outright majority. While back in South Africa's main city of Johannesburg on Monday, people walk past cost-effective container flats stacked on top of each other in the district of Maboneng. The once-downtrodden area is becoming trendy, following a redevelopment programme launched by city officials. On Saturday, Gabonese football striker Pierre-Emerick Aubameyang celebrates after scoring the winning goal for German first division club Dortmund in their home game against RB Leipzig. Images courtesy of AFP, EPA, PA and Reuters
د افغانستان په کرېکټ بورډ کې د لوبو پرمختګ څانګې مشر بشیر ستانکزی وايي، د کرېکټ ملي لوبډلې نامي توپوهونکی شهزاد محمدي به ژر لوبو ته ستون شي. نوموړي بي بي سي ته وویل کوم وکیل چې د شهزاد محمدي دوسیه پر مخ بیايي دوی ته یې ډاډ ور کړی، چې ډېر ژر به ای سي سي یا د کرېکټ نړیواله شورا دا پرېکړه وکړي. "ما چې له کوم وکیل سره خبرې کړې، هغه وايي، نتیجه به ژر راوځي چې د شهزاد په ګته به وي. هیله ده شهزاد به ژر لوبو ته ستون شي". "شهزاد محمدي به د پاکستان ليګ سياليو کې راسره وي" ستانکزی: اصغر او شهزاد زموږ لپاره يوه "ستونزه" ده د ښاغلي ستانکزي په خبره، ممکن بله اونۍ دا کار وشي: "موږ چې کوم ثبوتونه وړاندې کړي، ای سي سي او واډا به دې ته راضي کېږي چې دا ومني، کله چې دا ومنل شي، وکیل او ای سي سي به پر دې خبرې کوي چې څومره بندیز ولګېږي". نوموړی وايي، د وکیل له لارې یې پر ای سي سي فشار اچولی: "وکیل چې له ای سي سي سره خبرې کړې، ماته یې د ای سي سي له قوله ویلي چې په دې تړاو به ژر پایلې ته ورسېږي". د روان کال په لومړیو کې شهزاد محمدي د ناقانونه درملو د خوړلو په تور د کرېکټ د نړیوالې شورا له لوري له لوبې منع شو. د افغانستان کرېکټ بورډ وايي، شهزاد محمدي نه و خبر چې منع شوي دارو یې خوړلي. د نوموړي په ملاتړ د افغان کرېکټ مینه والو پر ټولنیزو شبکو یو کمپیان هم وکړ چې پکې د کرېکټ له نړیوالې شورا (ای سي سي) غوښتل شوي و، دغه وتلی افغان توپ وهونکی شهزاد محمدي وبښي. شهزاد یو له هغو وتلو افغان لوبغاړو دی چې د بهرنیو هېوادونو په لیګونو کې لوبېدلی دی.
Jurors have been shown pictures of a parachute supposedly sabotaged by the husband of a woman who survived a 4,000ft fall. Victoria Cilliers, 40, suffered multiple serious injuries at Netheravon Airfield, Wiltshire, on April 5 2015. Emile Cilliers, 37, denies attempting to murder her. Army Parachute Association chief instructor Mark Bayada told Winchester Crown Court he had "never seen the lines of a main chute so tangled". Mr Bayada, who is based at the Netheravon airfield, told the jury he had also looked at the reserve chute and "noticed that ties, known as slinks, were missing". The prosecution claim Mr Cilliers "sabotaged" his wife's parachute by "deliberately tangling the main chute and removing two slinks". Both Mr and Mrs Cilliers have been described as "expert parachute jumpers" and the court heard "he wanted her dead so he could benefit from her life insurance policy and because he was having an affair with another woman". When Victoria Cilliers made the jump both her main and reserve chute failed to fully open. Prosecutors argue Mr Cilliers kept the "tampered parachute in his locker one day because of bad weather" when he should have handed it back in. But under cross-examination from the defence, Mr Bayada admitted other parachutists also kept their rigs in their lockers at Netheravon, and that to have done so "might not have been unusual". The jury was also told Mr Cilliers had tried to kill his wife a few days earlier in their kitchen - the prosecution said he had "tampered with a gas fixture". Mr Cilliers denies two charges of attempted murder and one count of damaging a gas valve at their home in Amesbury, Wiltshire. The trial continues.
Tin cho hay Tây Ban Nha sắp đình chỉ quy chế tự trị của Catalonia vào ngày thứ Bảy, sau khi lãnh đạo vùng này đe dọa tuyên bố độc lập. Văn phòng chính phủ của Thủ tướng Mariano Rajoy nói họ sẽ kích hoạt điều 155 vào ngày thứ Bảy này để áp dụng trực trị, xóa bỏ chính quyền địa phương Catalonia. Điều 155 của Hiến pháp năm 1978 chưa từng được sử dụng trong bốn thập niên, kể từ khi Tây Ban Nha có nền dân chủ sau khi chế độ phát xít của Tướng Francisco Franco chấm dứt. Nhà lãnh đạo Catalan, Carles Puigdemont, nói trước đó, Quốc hội vùng sẽ bỏ phiếu độc lập nếu Tây Ban Nha "tiếp tục đàn áp". Một số người lo sợ những động thái này có thể gây ra bất ổn. "Chính phủ Tây Ban Nha sẽ tiếp tục các thủ tục được nêu trong Điều 155 của Hiến pháp để phục hồi tính hợp pháp trong tự trị của Catalonia," tuyên bố của Thủ tướng Mariano Rajoy nói. Điều 155 của Hiến pháp 1978 của Tây Ban Nha cho phép Madrid áp đặt nguyên tắc trực tiếp trong một cuộc khủng hoảng nhưng nó chưa bao giờ được kích hoạt. Các nhà lãnh đạo chính trị ở Madrid và Barcelona đang ở trong một tình huống đối đầu căng thẳng kể từ cuộc trưng cầu dân ý gây tranh cãi. Trước đó, hôm 11/10, người đứng đầu vùng Catalonia, Carles Puigdemont và các lãnh đạo cấp vùng khác đã ký tuyên bố độc lập từ Tây Ban Nha. Tuyên bố viết: "Chúng tôi kêu gọi mọi nhà nước và tổ chức quốc tế công nhận cộng hòa Catalonia là nhà nuớc độc lập có chủ quyền." Nhưng họ nói sẽ chưa tiến hành trên thực tế trong vài tuần tới để diễn ra đàm phán với chính phủ ở Madrid. Ông Puigdemont nhấn mạnh với nghị viện rằng "ý chí của nhân dân" là tách khỏi Madrid nhưng ông muốn "giảm" căng thẳng. Ông nói nghị viện hãy tạm thời chưa chính thức tuyên bố độc lập để có đối thoại. Trưng cầu dân ý hôm 1/10 tại tỉnh đông bắc này với kết quả ủng hộ độc lập đã bị Tòa hiến pháp Tây Ban Nha tuyên bố không hợp lệ. Lãnh đạo Catalonia chịu áp lực trước khi tuyên bố ly khai Tây Ban Nha: Cảnh sát đàn áp trưng cầu độc lập Trong hôm thứ Ba, ông Puigdemont nói với nghị viện Catalonia ở Barcelona rằng vùng này đã giành được quyền độc lập nhờ cuộc bỏ phiếu. Không rõ triển vọng đối thoại chính trị với Madrid sẽ là thế nào, vì chính phủ ở Madrid đã tuyên bố không chấp nhận cuộc bỏ phiếu. Chính phủ Tây Ban Nha sẽ họp ngày thứ Tư để ra phản ứng trước tuyên bố của ông Puigdemont. Ada Colau, thị trưởng Barcelona là người chỉ trích cả hai phe, đã kêu gọi giảm căng thẳng. Bà thị trưởng cảm ơn ông Puigdemont trên Twitter vì lựa chọn "đối thoại". Chủ tịch Hội đồng châu Âu Donald Tusk đã kêu gọi ông Puigdemont không tuyên bố độc lập. Tổng thống Pháp Emmanuel Macron từ chối lời kêu gọi của ông Puigdemont muốn EU làm trung gian, nói rằng Madrid có thể giải quyết vấn đề. Chính quyền Catalonia nói 90% người bỏ phiếu đã ủng hộ độc lập, nhưng tỉ lệ đi bầu chỉ là 43%. Catalonia là một trong những vùng giàu có nhất của Tây Ban Nha, chiếm 1/4 sản lượng xuất khẩu của cả nước. Catalonia, một vùng khá giả với dân số 7,5 triệu người tại đông bắc Tây Ban Nha, có ngôn ngữ và văn hóa riêng. Là khu vực có quyền tự trị cao, nhưng Catalonia không được công nhận là một quốc gia độc lập theo hiến pháp Tây Ban Nha. Hiện Catalonia đã có lực lượng cảnh sát riêng, 'Mossos d'Esquadra', có quy chế truyền thanh truyền hình riêng và một số sứ bộ ngoại giao như là 'sứ quán mini' ở nước ngoài để thúc đẩy thương mại. Nhưng hiện nay công tác kiểm soát biên giới, hải quan, quan hệ quốc tế, quốc phòng và ngân hàng trung ương là do chính quyền Tây Ban Nha kiểm soát. (Tiếp tục cập nhật)
If you were trying to recruit a celebrity to give your ambitious young music tech company a higher profile, it is hard to imagine a much better choice than Pharrell Williams, best known for his hit song Happy. So all credit to Roland Lamb - founder of Roli - for his coup in persuading the artist to appear with him on stage last night at the Hackney Empire and riff for 40 minutes about creativity. I first came across Roli four years ago under a railway arch in east London, where a small team was working away on an innovative new musical instrument called the Seaboard, a sort of spongy-keyed piano. Although it cost about £8,000, the Seaboard was a success, with endorsements from the likes of Stevie Wonder helping the marketing. Since then, Roli has expanded into much more affordable music technology products such as Blocks, a modular system that combines a physical interface with an app to encourage you to get creative. Roli has expanded over the years into the neighbouring railway arches, as well as offices in Los Angeles and New York, and now it has a new chief creative officer. Yes, that was the point of last night's event - to break the news that Pharrell Williams is on the team. The new hire has even invested in the company, though Roli said one report describing him as "co-owner" was wide of the mark. Now cynics will point to the rather dismal track record of celebrities getting involved in tech businesses. It was not too long after Alicia Keys was made "global creative director" of BlackBerry that it became apparent that she was tweeting from an iPhone rather than one of her temporary employer's devices. But Roland Lamb, a cerebral figure with a Harvard degree in classical Chinese, told me this would be different, with Pharrell having a real influence on the company's development. He said he'd met the star after "reaching out" to him during a trip to Los Angeles. "When we met it felt like we were on the same page," he says, explaining that they had a common interest in making music more accessible, particularly to children. And, indeed, on stage Pharrell talked eloquently about the waste of talent for many from a background similar to his, who had not been given the same opportunities. Roland Lamb says his new chief creative officer is already coming up with ideas for new products. So let's hope that this is one celebrity endorser with sticking power - though I'm a bit disappointed that Pharrell left the stage without even caressing the keys of the Seaboard sitting there awaiting his attention.
A growing number of start-ups are trying to help retailers deliver goods to customers more quickly and at lower cost. But can they really compete with the big courier and postal firms? It was a road accident in the Norwegian mountains that inspired the idea for start-up delivery company Nimber. One of the founders was on his way to a ski-jumping competition near Lillehammer when he saw a postal truck had overturned on the road. "No one was hurt, but all these cars were just passing by," says Nimber chief executive Ari Kestin, whose partner Knut Bjerke made the trip. "He thought, why don't they stop and carry some of the parcels to their destinations? A light-bulb came on." Nimber was launched soon after, joining a wave of new apps aimed at shaking up the delivery market. The website connects people who want to send large, awkward-to-carry goods, with members of the public travelling in the same direction. These "crowdsourced couriers" name their own price, Mr Kestin says, but are usually cheaper than using a traditional courier service or postal firm, such as FedEx or Royal Mail. "If you're driving from London to Manchester anyway, you will probably accept a lower price to deliver a package than a big delivery firm would," he says. "We are making use of spare capacity and allowing people to monetise their movements." The site, whose main markets are Norway and the UK, has more than 40,000 registered "bringers" and 80,000 senders. It handles hundreds of deliveries a day of things like bikes, car parts and furniture. So far it has focused on serving people selling second-hand goods on sites like e-Bay and Norway's finn.no, but it has just started working with several big retailers, including Norway's largest meat and eggs producer, Nortura. "Nimber is a great choice because it is environmentally friendly and doesn't create more traffic or pollution," a Nortura spokeswoman tells the BBC. But using members of the public to deliver goods does have its drawbacks. Mr Kestin admits that his service may not be as economical as a traditional delivery service for smaller items. Its crowdsourced couriers are not always available to handle deliveries, and, on occasion, pull out at the last minute - although "that's quite rare", he says. This isn't stopping other firms experimenting with the crowdsourcing model. Some, like Uber Rush, Deliveroo and Instacart are using crowdsourced couriers to deliver packages, groceries and hot food locally - often more cheaply and quickly than major couriers could. Belgium postal giant Bpost and DHL are among those to have experimented with crowdsourced couriers. And Amazon launched its "citizen delivery" service Flex in 2015. With global retail e-ecommerce sales forecast to rise 23% this year to $2.3tn (£1.8tn), it's not surprising start-ups are trying to muscle in on a delivery market still dominated by national postal services and courier firms like UPS, DHL, FedEx, Blue Dart and PostNL. These account for more than 90% of e-commerce deliveries, not including food, estimates Alex le Roy, an analyst at consultancy Transport Intelligence. "These start-ups are basically serving the needs that the larger delivery companies can't meet," he says. "That's because typically, traditional postal companies can deliver packages more or less anywhere, but they can't do it quickly. "And the big courier firms can deliver quickly, but charge much higher prices when they deliver to out-of-the-way places or carry awkwardly shaped goods." Nimbler start-ups can also help smaller retailers reach new markets. Fetchr, for example, is a Dubai-based delivery company aiming to connect retailers with around four billion people worldwide who live in places without street names or house numbers. "There is this huge demand for online shopping in emerging markets, but many big retailers are facing the same problem," says Fetchr co-founder Idriss Al Rifai. "How can you grow if you can't deliver large numbers of parcels?" The firm uses a customer's smartphone GPS location as the address. As soon as one of Fetchr's couriers has picked up a package from a retailer, it notifies the customer, offering them a two-hour delivery slot. The customer then shares their location with Fetchr. "Fifteen minutes before the firm delivers, we will ask the customer to share their location again - and if they have moved elsewhere, that's fine," Mr Al Rifai says. "Even when there is an address, people don't want to be pinned down for hours to receive a package." The firm, which employs 2,000 of its own couriers, serves brands such as supermarket chain Carrefour and Gucci, in countries such as the United Arab Emirates, Egypt and Saudi Arabia. It hopes to expand internationally, having raised $41m (£31m) in investment in May, but will face competition from the likes of the UK's What3Words and South Africa's WumDrop, which are also addressing the "lack-of-address" issue. Some start-ups, such as Red Stag Fulfilment in the US and UK-based Weengs, are offering one-stop-shop services aimed at taking the delivery hassle away from small businesses. "Shipping companies expect you to have packed your items properly, have done an analysis of your shipping costs, and prepared your customs paperwork," explains Weengs co-founder Alex Christodoulou. "But many small businesses don't have the expertise to do this efficiently - it costs time and money." Weengs manages the whole shipping process from end-to-end, collecting your items unboxed and packing them at its warehouse in Kings Cross, London. "We then measure your item with a laser and create a box exactly fitting the dimensions of your goods," says Mr Christodoulou. This reduces costs because some delivery companies charge by volume, not weight, he says. Big retailers sending lots of parcels can often negotiate bulk discounts on delivery costs. Smaller retailers can't. So Weengs pools its customers' orders and shops around between 10 to 30 courier firms to bring down costs, says Mr Christodoulou. His firm has handled 200,000 orders since launch in 2015, but faces competition from more established comparison services, such as parcel2go.com. "These firms are already re-distributing the share of delivery volume from traditional delivery companies to smaller ones and individuals," says e-commerce consultant Kunle Campbell. "I think more delivery companies will adopt their approaches, and it could cut the costs of delivery across the board." That will be music to the ears of all e-commerce entrepreneurs.
It took Xi Jinping just under three and a half hours to deliver his all-important speech to Congress, and that is about the length of time it takes to get from one side of Beijing to the other on the subway. It's never easy to get on at rush hour and even harder this week. Some commuters have queued for over an hour and though Beijingers are usually stoical about living in a city on lockdown for political gatherings and military parades, this week the subway actually suspended its online comment section to avoid facing users' rage. So when I did finally make it on to a train, I was surprised to find so much of what Xi Jinping likes to call positive energy. Given the censorship in this one-party state, I didn't expect commuters to pour out political grievances to a complete stranger on public transport. But I've been asking people questions about politics ever since the first congress I covered back in 1992, and I hope I've learned to detect the difference between genuine positive energy and parroting the official line. The only grumbler was a tall, striking young woman with high cheekbones and a penetrating gaze, who told me her company had stopped work to watch his entire speech. She couldn't name a single thing in it that she liked and said she would be happy to see China with a woman leader, a lesbian perhaps. But as our train rattled through the tunnels under the Great Hall of the People and Tiananmen Square, most people told me they approved of the goings-on above. They were pleased to hear that Xi Jinping's campaign against tigers, flies and foxes will continue. In that particular menagerie the tigers are the powerful officials who steal billions, the flies are small-time officials who extort hundreds and the foxes are those who flee the country having stashed their money in tax havens. The second big thumbs-up from my swaying focus group was for Xi Jinping's line that homes are for living in, not for speculation. China's spiralling property prices Beijing is one of the world's most expensive cities and some stand on these trains for hours to get back to the only apartments they can afford. There's no better way to the heart of ordinary Chinese citizens than to promise you're going to deal with speculation. Actually doing it may be harder. And not everyone is born equal when it comes to residency, according to one young designer who complained of migrant labourers crowding Beijing. It then turned out he himself was a migrant - but he meant low-skilled migrants, not white-collar workers like himself. In fact, Beijing is determinedly turning into a gleaming futuristic capital, closing down the small businesses that once lent local character and sending low-skilled workers back to their villages. One smartly dressed banker told me he was also a Communist Party member. He said he travelled a lot and had noticed the wealth gap in the US and Europe was much starker than in China. I pointed out that China, in fact, was now one of the most unequal countries in the world, and if that wasn't visible it was because the poor had been pushed out of city centres. "But don't you feel safe in Beijing?" he countered. When I asked a tired forty-something whether she wouldn't like more freedom, she said America had more freedom but that didn't make it better. We should weigh up the pros and cons of different political systems, she observed. I think she meant it, but just in case anyone was tempted to feel differently, all the major TV channels cleared their schedules to run Xi Jinping's speech in full. Schools and even kindergarten classes lined their children up North Korean-style to absorb the thought of the leader. Photos of babies and pets staring into Mr Xi's face on mobile phone screens went viral. And not to be outdone, China's biggest social media company, Tencent, launched an online game. The most frenzied applause for Xi Jinping's speech wins. It's quite something when you stop to think that a lot of the speech was couched in turgid ideological language about the new era of socialism with Chinese characteristics. I should explain that the Chinese characteristics are to distinguish China's socialism that works from the disastrous socialism with Soviet characteristics, which brought much of the communist world to ruin in the early 1990s. Back when this subway was on the drawing board, Moscow was the big brother of the socialist world. It sent the engineers from its magnificent subway to teach its little Beijing brother how to do it. And then when the brothers fell out, this subway was delayed by a decade. But history has moved on. Beijing's subway long ago overtook London and New York in size and passenger numbers. It doesn't have the chandeliers of the Moscow model but it's cheap, efficient and second only to Shanghai in scale. And it has even bigger ambitions for the future. That confidence and ambition are very much the mood of the moment in this town. I felt it from the congress hall to the subway carriage.
The wife of an Army sergeant who survived a 4,000ft fall after her husband allegedly tampered with her parachute was among the UK's top parachutists, a court has heard. Victoria Cilliers, 40, suffered multiple serious injuries at Netheravon Airfield, Wiltshire, on April 5, 2015. Emile Cilliers, 37, denies attempting to murder her. Winchester Crown Court heard Mrs Cilliers has completed more than 2,600 jumps. Prosecutors allege her ex-husband sabotaged both her main and reserve parachute by removing components. Mark Bayada, chief instructor of the Army Parachute Association at Netheravon, told the court Mrs Cilliers was "in the top per cent of competency in the country". He told jurors two vital components, known as slinks, were missing from Mrs Cillier's reserve chute. It is "almost impossible", he said, for the "extremely strong" components to come off by mistake. Mr Bayada said Mrs Cillier's main parachute was "distorted, rotated and bunched up". He said the parachute's lines were "massively entangled". It was "highly unlikely", he said, that user error "would result in a malfunction with that much entanglement". The only "innocent explanation" for the missing slinks, he said, was that medics had cut them away. But upon checking, he said, the only thing at the scene which first aiders had cut was Mrs Cilliers' goggles strap. Mr Bayada attributed Mrs Cilliers' survival to the relatively low height of her jump. Its "sub terminal" nature meant she had not reached full speed, he said. He also said her small size and "exceptionally soft" field had probably contributed to her survival too. Prosecutors alleged Mr Cilliers wanted to leave his wife for a lover he had met on Tinder. Alongside the allegation he tampered with his wife's parachutes, Mr Cilliers is also accused of deliberately causing a gas leak in the family home while he stayed away. He denies two counts of attempted murder. Mr Cilliers, who is based at the Royal Army Physical Training Corps in Aldershot, Hampshire, is also accused of a third charge of damaging a gas valve at their home in Amesbury, Wiltshire. The trial will resume on Friday.
استخرج علماء قطعة أثرية من حطام سفينة على ساحل سلطنة عمان، واكتشفوا أنها أقدم نموذج معروف لأداة ملاحة. ويقول علماء في الآثار البحرية إن هذه الأداة هي أسطرلاب، وهي أداة استخدمت في وقت ما من جانب البحارة لقياس ارتفاع الشمس خلال رحلاتهم. ويعتقد أن تاريخ هذه الأداة، التي تتخذ شكل قرص معدني، يرجع للفترة بين عامي 1495 و1500. واستخرج هذا القرص من سفينة استكشاف برتغالية، غرقت خلال عاصفة في المحيط الهندي عام 1503. وكانت السفينة الغارقة تسمى إسمرلادا، وكانت جزءا من أسطول بقيادة المستكشف البرتغالي فاسكو دا غاما، وهو أول شخص أبحر مباشرة من أوربا إلى الهند. ويقول ديفيد ميرنز، من شركة بلو ووتر ريكافري، الذي قاد عملية الاستخراج لبي بي سي: إنها ميزة عظيمة أن تجد شيئا نادرا للغاية. شيئ مهم للغاية من الناحية التاريخية، شيئ سيدرس من جانب علماء الآثار وسيملأ فجوة ما". وعثر السيد ميرنز على الأسطرلاب عام 2014، وكان واحدا من بين نحو ثلاثة آلاف قطعة أثرية اكتشفت خلال سلسلة من عمليات الغوص. ويبلغ قطر القرص البرونزي 17.5 سنتيمتر، بينما سمكه أقل من 2 ملليمتر. وقال ميرنز: "إنه لا يشبه أي شيء رأيناه من قبل، وعرفت على الفور إنه شيئ مهم للغاية، لأنك يمكنك أن ترى عليه هاتين العلامتين". وأضاف: "إحدى العلامتين عرفتها على الفور وهي شعار دولة البرتغال، والثانية اكتشفتها في وقت لاحق، وهي الشعار الشخصي لـ دون مانويل الأول ملك البرتغال حينذاك ". واعتقد فريق عملية الاستخراج أن القطعة الأثرية هي أسطرلاب، لكنهم لم يستطيعوا رؤية أي علامات للملاحة عليها. لكن تحليلات لاحقة كشفت التفاصيل المخفية للقطعة الأثرية. وأجري فحص بالليزر من جانب علماء في جامعة ووريك بانجلترا، كشف عن حفر حول حافة القرص، يفصل بين كل منها خمس درجات. وهذا من شأنه أن يسمح للبحارة بقياس ارتفاع الشمس في الأفق وقت الظهيرة، لتحديد موقعهم ومن ثم إيجاد طريق رحلتهم في أعالي البحار. ويعد أسطرلاب البحارة شيئا نادرا إلى حد ما، وهذه القطعة هي رقم 108 التي يتم تصنيفها على وجه التأكيد. كما تعد أقدم نموذج معروف ويسبق غيره بعدة عقود من الزمان". وقال السيد ميرنز: "نعلم أنه يفترض أنه صنع قبل عام 1502، لأنه في هذا الوقت غادرت السفينة مدينة لشبونة، كما أن دون مانويل لم يصبح ملكا إلا في عام 1495، وما كان لهذا القرص أن يحمل شعار الملك قبل أن يصبح ملكا". وأضاف: "اعتقد أنه من المقبول أن نقول إنها ترجع تقريبا للفترة ما بين عامي 1495 و1500. لكن أي عام على وجه الدقة لا نعلم، لكنها تتراوح بين تلك الفترة الضيقة". وأضاف: "إن هذا القرص ينبؤنا عن الفترة التي تسبق ذلك التاريخ بنحو 30 عاما، إنه يضيف إلى تطور عملية الملاحة، ويضيف إلى التاريخ، ونأمل أن نعثر على أدوات أسطرلاب أخرى تعود إلى هذه الحقبة من التاريخ".
Cuando se trata del consumo de opioides, Estados Unidos tiene el desafortunado honor de liderar el mundo. Por cada millón de estadounidenses, se toman casi 50.000 dosis de opioides todos los días. Eso es cuatro veces la tasa en Reino Unido. En ocasiones, hay buenas razones para tomar opioides como la codeína o la morfina son opioides, por ejemplo. Los pacientes con cáncer los usan para aliviar el dolor, al igual que quienes se recuperan de la cirugía. Pero si consumes demasiados tienes un problema. Y Estados Unidos ciertamente tiene un problema. En dos años, la ciudad de Kermit en Virginia Occidental recibió casi nueve millones de píldoras opioides, según un comité del Congreso. Solo 400 personas viven en Kermit. A nivel nacional, los derivados del opio mataron más de 33.000 personas en 2015, según los Centros para el Control y la Prevención de Enfermedades (CDC, por su sigla en inglés). Esa cifra incluye las muertes por heroína, un opioide ilegal. Pero casi la mitad involucró un opioide recetado, es decir, un analgésico adquirido en una farmacia con una prescripción de un médico. Entonces, ¿por qué Estados Unidos, más que cualquier otro país en el mundo, tiene un problema de opioides? Hay más de una causa. Pero estas son algunas de las más importantes. A diferencia de la mayoría de los países europeos, EE.UU. no cuenta con atención médica universal pagada que es solventada por los impuestos. En cambio, los estadounidenses deben obtener su propio seguro, generalmente a través de un empleador o del gobierno. "La mayoría de los seguros, especialmente los que tienen las personas pobres, no pagan por otra cosa que no sea por píldora", dice la profesora Judith Feinberg de la Facultad de Medicina de la Universidad de Virginia Occidental. "Digamos que tienes un paciente de 45 años. Tiene dolor en la parte inferior de la espalda, lo examinas y tiene un espasmo muscular. Lo mejor es la fisioterapia, pero nadie pagará por eso. Así que los médicos sacan su recetario para ordenar pastillas", cuenta Feinberg. "Incluso si el seguro cubre fisioterapia, probablemente requieran autorización previa, lo que implica mucho tiempo y papeleo". El CDC afirma que las recetas de opioides han caído un 18% desde su pico en 2010. Pero el total sigue siendo tres veces mayor que en 1999. EE.UU. y Nueva Zelanda son los únicos países que permiten que los medicamentos con receta sean promocionados por televisión. Según la firma de investigación Kantar, el gasto en publicidad de compañías farmacéuticas en EE.UU. alcanzó los US$6.400 millones en 2016, un aumento del 64% desde 2012. Ninguna de las 10 marcas más anunciadas en 2016 fue un opioide. Pero el marketing masivo de las drogas tiene un efecto, dice la profesora Feinberg. "Como médico, la gente viene y dice: 'Vi esto en televisión, ¿puedes darme esta droga?'". En 2015, la Asociación Médica Estadounidense solicitó la prohibición de anuncios de medicamentos recetados. Nada sucedió. Tres meses más tarde, el alcance de la cultura opioide de Estados Unidos se vio en el entretiempo del Superbowl, la franja publicitaria más cara del país. Un anuncio de 60 segundos se dedicó al estreñimiento inducido por opioides. La publicidad, pagada por AstraZeneca, aconseja a los pacientes que visiten a su médico y "pregunten sobre las opciones de tratamiento con receta". Al jefe de gabinete del presidente Barack Obama no le impresionó. En Estados Unidos, es común que las compañías farmacéuticas cortejen a los médicos, en un esfuerzo por promocionar sus productos. "Son amigables, atractivos, están bien vestidos, reparten obsequios para todo el mundo. Organizan cenas, patrocinan conferencias y auspician viajes, dice el profesor Keith Humphreys de la Universidad de Stanford. "Eso afecta la prescripción". Durante los últimos cuatro años, el gobierno de EE.UU. publicó los montos pagados por las compañías de medicamentos y dispositivos a doctores y hospitales docentes. El total en 2016 fue más de US$8.000 millones. Más de 630.000 médicos tenían registros de pago. Por ejemplo, Purdue Pharma, que produce OxyContin, un popular analgésico opiáceo, realizó casi 80.000 transacciones en 2016, por un valor total de más de US$7 millones. En 2016, un estudio analizó el vínculo entre los médicos, las comidas gratis que recibieron de las compañías farmacéuticas y los medicamentos que recetaron. El estudio encontró que recibir comidas gratuitas estaba "asociado con una mayor tasa de prescripción del medicamento de marca promovido". Las compañías farmacéuticas dicen que sus representantes simplemente comparten información con los médicos. Pero el profesor Humphreys dice que hay una influencia "corruptora". "Necesitamos una industria farmacéutica, no es que esté mal", dice. "Pero no puedes dejar que el zorro proteja el gallinero". Las compañías farmacéuticas también gastan dinero en trabajadores de la salud y organizaciones en otros países. En Reino Unido, las empresas dieron US$153 millones a los trabajadores de la salud y las organizaciones para la investigación y el desarrollo en 2016. Pero, aunque la cifra de Reino Unido es un 7% más alta que en 2015, es menos del 2% del monto pagado en EE.UU. El doctor Richard Frank es profesor de economía de la salud en la escuela de Negocios de la Universidad de Harvard y se desempeñó en el Departamento de Salud de EE.UU. de 2009 a 2016, durante la gestión del presidente Obama. Él piensa que la formación médica en Estados Unidos no fue lo suficientemente buena hasta hace unos años. "Los médicos casi no recibían capacitación sobre el manejo del dolor", dice. "Hasta hace muy poco estaban bajo conceptos erróneos acerca de cuán adictivos son varios productos". Y agrega: "Hace un par de años testifiqué ante el Congreso cuando estaba en el gobierno. Uno de los representantes, antes de ingresar al Congreso, era cirujano torácico. "Notó que casi no había recibido entrenamiento en el manejo del dolor, y lo que había aprendido provenía exclusivamente del personal de enfermería con el que trabajaba". Frank dice que la formación médica no es la única razón del problema de los opiáceos en Estados Unidos. "La responsabilidad es de todos", dice. Pero su crítica tiene eco en la profesora Judith Feinberg. "Los médicos no aprendían nada sobre la adicción en la escuela de medicina", dice. "Eso ahora está cambiando, pero todos los que ya son médicos no aprendieron nada. Yo aprendí sobre los medicamentos opiáceos en la parte de la farmacología donde se trata la anestesia", afirma. "Probablemente todo el tema de las drogas parecidas a la anestesia demoró dos horas. La gente no tiene mucho conocimiento sobre los opiáceos. No había un plan de estudios que incluyera la adicción". En 1980, el doctor Hershel Jick escribió una breve carta al New England Journal of Medicine. En la misiva, señalaba: "A pesar del uso generalizado de estupefacientes en los hospitales, el desarrollo de la adicción es raro en pacientes médicos sin antecedentes de adicción". Esa afirmación fue desacreditada, y ahora lleva una nota de advertencia. Pero la carta Jick tuvo un gran impacto. Este año, investigadores canadienses dijeron que la carta había sido citada 600 veces, generalmente para afirmar que los opioides no eran adictivos. A fines de la década de 1990, la Administración de Salud de Veteranos, que administra servicios de salud para veteranos militares, presionó para que el dolor sea reconocido como el "quinto signo vital". Esto le dio al dolor el mismo estatus que la presión arterial, la frecuencia cardíaca, respiratoria y la temperatura. Luego, en 2001, la Comisión Conjunta (JC, por sus siglas en inglés), que certifica casi 21.000 organizaciones y programas de salud de EE.UU., estableció normas para la evaluación y el tratamiento del dolor. En 2016, el JC publicó una declaración que afirmaba que "todos están buscando a alguien a quien culpar" por el problema de los opiáceos. Insistió en que sus estándares de 2001 "no requerían el uso de medicamentos para controlar el dolor de un paciente". Pero la profesora Feinberg dice que los movimientos de VHA y JC significaron que los médicos estaban bajo presión para recetar analgésicos fuertes, como los opioides, cuando podrían no haber sido necesarios. "Para cuando alcanzas la edad madura, es raro ver a una persona que no le duele alguna parte", dice. Y agrega que, en un país donde los pacientes califican a sus médicos y las bajas calificaciones pueden afectar sus ganancias, el puntaje puede verse influenciado por si los pacientes reciben opiáceos. Algunos estadounidenses, dice el profesor Keith Humphreys de la Universidad de Stanford, creen que la vida es "reparable". "Tengo 51 años", dice. "Si voy a ver a un médico estadounidense y le digo: 'Oye, corrí la maratón que solía correr cuando tenía 30 años, ahora estoy dolorido, arréglame', mi médico probablemente intentará arreglarme. "Si haces eso en Francia, el médico diría: 'Es la vida, toma una copa de vino, ¿qué quieres de mí?'". En 2016, un estudio comparó cómo los médicos japoneses y estadounidenses prescribieron opiáceos. Se conoció que los médicos japoneses trataban el dolor agudo con opiáceos en el 47% de los casos, en comparación con el 97% en EE.UU. "Obviamente hay una disposición y un hábito de aliviar el dolor con opioides que no se comparte en ninguna otra parte", dice la profesora Feinberg. "Otros países lidian con el dolor de maneras mucho más saludables".
If you're lucky enough to get a ticket to this year's Wimbledon tennis championships, be prepared to be scanned by a supercomputer. Cameras linked to IBM's Watson "machine-learning" platform may be monitoring your facial expressions and trying to work out what emotions you are displaying. If Watson learns quickly enough over the fortnight, it will apparently be able to work out which player you are supporting just by reading your face. The All England Lawn Tennis Club (AELTC) and its tech partner IBM are remaining tight-lipped on the details of the new technology - not least because it needs legal approval and raises privacy concerns. But it is another example of how sport is becoming increasingly digital, for fans, players and venues alike. Even if Watson isn't tracking your every cheer and grimace at the championships - which begin on Monday 27 June - it will be digesting millions of conversations on social media platforms, such as Twitter, Facebook and Instagram, and using natural language processing to identify common topics - not necessarily just about tennis. "During last year's final we were analysing about 400 tweets a second," says IBM's Sam Seddon. "Expand that out into Facebook, Instagram and more long-form content, and that's a lot of data. "We can come up with insights much faster than humans can and inform the media team so they can decide what kind of content they should be offering." Wimbledon's digital team has a global audience to serve - the website received 71 million visitors last year - and a window of just a few seconds to persuade people to read its social media content rather than that of other publishers. So, armed with IBM's social media analysis, the team will be able to entice people chatting about their own country's performance in the current Euro football championships, say, towards Wimbledon content about a tennis player of the same nationality. "Social media is growing exponentially and is increasingly becoming the primary voice with which we communicate with our fans," says Alexandra Willis, Wimbledon's head of communications, content and digital. On top of this social analysis by IBM's "cognitive command centre", sensors and computers at the venue will be collecting about 3.2 million pieces of data from 19 tennis courts across the fortnight. The tech company claims a sub-second response time and 100% accuracy. This performance-monitoring data - everything from live scores to fastest serves to the number of backhand winners - is made available to fans via smartphone apps, the website, and now Apple TV. You can personalise the app and receive every piece of relevant content on your favourite players, using data going back eight years. But, to the surprise of many tech commentators, Wimbledon still has no plans to introduce wi-fi in the grounds, so visitors will have to rely on an imperfect mobile network to access all this data and content. It will be interesting to see if this limited connectivity - and potentially higher mobile data costs - mars the user experience, particularly for international visitors. While the tennis players can also use sensors inside tennis racquets and wristbands to monitor their own performance, under current International Tennis Federation rules the data is not allowed to be used for coaching purposes during matches. But is there a danger players will become too reliant on detailed data analysis of their opponents and end up cancelling each other out? "The great players know how to understand and react to what's happening on the court - no amount of data analytics can prepare for that. It's only one element of a sportsman's preparation," says Mr Seddon. The increased use of smartphones and apps is giving sports venues reams of valuable data about the way fans move around, the things they buy, and the content they want to watch. For example, during February's Super Bowl final at the Levi's Stadium in Santa Clara, California, data analytics helped improve the fan experience and drive up sales of drinks and merchandise. Tech firm VenueNext developed an app on behalf of the NFL (National Football League) and nearly half the stadium's 71,000 capacity used it on the day to make purchases and access game stats. "By offering an in-seat beverages delivery utility orders increased 67% during the Super Bowl," says John Paul, VenueNext's chief executive. "Delivery times averaged less than 10 minutes." A crack team of 200 ushers delivered the drinks and fed back data to the app on how long the queues for the toilets were, for example, and where the quickest place to buy a hotdog was at any time during the event. "We also implemented express pick-up of merchandise after ordering online via your mobile," says Mr Paul. "We ran out of inventory because it was so popular - we could've sold five times more than we did." The average spend was $212 (£145) and the most popular item was a woman's Denver Broncos jacket costing $225, he says. Mr Paul admits that the many breaks in play during an American football match make in-seat ordering practicable, but it wouldn't be suitable for other sports and venues. Indeed, Wimbledon's Alexandra Willis says that's the last thing they want during an intense tennis match. Nevertheless, location-based app data does help them improve signage and navigation for visitors across the complex site, she says. During a summer of sport that includes the current Euro football championships, Wimbledon, and the Olympics, global audiences are set to grow and digital will be the main way most people access the action. Andrew Chant, head of networks at cloud services firm Exponential-e, notes: "Since the Uefa European Championship began on 10 June, an average of 30% extra traffic has been added to networks. "Excited by real-time intensity, we predict that the reach of this year's biggest sporting events - from the Euros to Wimbledon and the Olympics - will extend far beyond the stadium and into the workplace, as connected sports fans live every second of the game, wherever they are." If sports venues and promoters aren't sufficiently digital these days, they risk losing the game. Follow @matthew_wall on Twitter Click here for more Technology of Business features
The Irish prime minister has said the UK government needs to provide "a lot more detail" on how it intends to avoid a hard border after Brexit. Taoiseach Leo Varadkar was speaking at a European Council meeting in Brussels. He said the UK had used "all the right language" but that was not enough. The UK has said it is leaving the customs union and single market but that will not mean new border infrastructure. The Irish border is one of three issues where the EU requires "sufficient progress" before it will talk about transitional arrangements or trade. Mr Varadkar also asserted that it is likely that a majority of people from Northern Ireland will be Irish and therefore EU citizens after Brexit. People born in Northern Ireland can choose to be Irish, British or both. He said he thought people from unionist background would assert their right to Irish citizenship "at the very least for convenience".
Nearly half of Scots aged 40 to 64 believe they will not have enough money to retire when they reach state pension age, a survey has suggested. YouGov research for Age Scotland found 43% said they would not be able to afford to give up work at that point. A total of 44% said they were planning to work into their late 60s and beyond to enjoy a better retirement lifestyle. More than a third (36%) planned to continue working in their current job with the same hours. One in four (25%) wanted to reduce their hours. Not having enough money was the most common reason to continue working, according to the study commissioned by Age Scotland in partnership with Business in the Community (BITC). More than a fifth (22%) cited enjoying the social side of working and 19% worried they would get bored or lonely at home. Of those who expected to stop working or reduce their hours before their late 60s, nearly one in four (24%) said their job would be too physically demanding to continue, while 18% expected their health would not be good enough. Almost one in four adults aged 40 to 64 said they have felt disadvantaged or treated negatively when at work or applying for jobs past the age of 40. Age Scotland is now calling for a "career MoT" to be offered to everyone at age 50 to help people adjust future plans and pension savings. Chief executive Brian Sloan said: "It's worrying that retirement seems increasingly unaffordable for a growing number of Scots. "While there are various reasons people choose to keep working, money concerns are the main factor forcing them to work into their late 60s and beyond. At the same time, many feel they will need to reduce their hours or switch to a less physically demanding job. "Of course many people choose to stay on at work because they enjoy the social side or want to share their skills. Yet instead of an ageing workforce being seen as a valuable asset, too many older workers continue to face negative perceptions or age discrimination. "As the state pension age increases, working longer is set to become part of life. We're urging the Scottish government to continue to invest in our older workers, tackle barriers to working, and offer mid-career guidance to everyone who requires it." YouGov surveyed 1,023 adults, of whom 442 were aged 40 to 64, online between 21 and 25 September.
A British team is developing a car that will be capable of reaching 1,000mph (1,610km/h). Powered by a rocket bolted to a Eurofighter-Typhoon jet engine, the vehicle will first mount an assault on the world land speed record (763mph; 1,228km/h). Bloodhound should start running on Hakskeen Pan in Northern Cape, South Africa, in 2019. Bloodhound roared into life right on cue. Several months ago, we committed to getting the car to Newquay Airport at the end of September, to start our "slow speed" (200 mph) UK runway tests. Exactly as planned, at 17:20 local on 28 September, the car's EJ200 jet engine fired up for the first time. Starting the jet engine on schedule is not the half of it, though. Here's the huge surprise. We got FULL REHEAT! You can see a clip of the car's massive power at the top of this page. Reaching full power was completely unexpected, even by the Rolls-Royce team who came down to support our engine tests. The static tie-down engine tests were designed to "characterise" the jet intake. The intake is sized to provide the jet engine with just the right amount of air - at 850 mph. When the car is stationary, or travelling very slowly (anything less than 100mph is "very slow"), there is no "ram effect" from the airflow, and the intake is too small to feed the jet engine with as much air as it would like. As a result, we were pretty certain that the jet would be power-limited, probably quite severely, at slow speeds. "Characterising" the intake was all about finding out just how much the engine would be limited. When I pushed the throttle pedal down to its first detent, trying to select "max dry" power (full engine rpm), we were all expecting the engine to struggle and stop short. I couldn't quite believe my eyes when the cockpit instruments showed full dry power. Hardly daring to hope, I pushed the throttle through the detent to select minimum reheat… and sure enough, it lit with no problem at all. Maximum reheat? Yes, that worked too. After shutting the car down, I climbed out to discuss the results with the rest of the team. We've spent years discussing the effects of the expected power limits. How would it affect our runway testing? What speed can we reach in the UK? How will it affect acceleration during record runs in South Africa? We were so concerned about the possible limitations that we even designed the air intake with the option to fit "auxiliary intakes" if necessary. If you look closely at the sides of the car, just behind the intake mouth, you'll see two large square hatches, where we can fit additional intake doors if required. These are now redundant, which is great news. One thing I can't describe to you is what full reheat sounded like outside the car, because I don't know. In the cockpit, I can see the engine instruments showing the power setting, and I can feel the car straining against its 10-tonne-rated steel tie-down cables, but I can't feel or hear the reheat at all. Outside the car it's a different matter. After the reheat runs, I asked Mark Elvin what it was like for the rest of the team. Mark is our senior mechanical designer, with a background in both F1 and aerospace, so he's worked with some pretty impressive technology in the past. Even he was struggling to find words for the shattering power of the EJ200. After collecting his thoughts for a moment, he said: "It was just astonishing. Simply astonishing." Now that we've completed the static testing, we need to do some dynamic testing of the car - wheels, brakes, steering, etc - as we prepare for our first big public runs on 26th and 28 October (there are still a few tickets left if you want to come and join us!). With this much power available, I have to confess to being both excited about the amazing performance on offer and a little nervous about controlling it. This car is going to be seriously fast and I've got to learn to drive it in a small handful of tests, before our first big (and public) runs. While we're getting the team and the car ready for our big show at the end of October, interest is growing everywhere. A couple of weeks ago I was in the Isle of Man, for a Bloodhound day with the local schools, organised by Swagelok. While the company is a huge multinational, the Isle of Man factory is very proud of its contribution to Bloodhound, as this is where some of the key components of our rocket system were designed and built. As you can imagine, the island's school kids were hugely excited to hear all about the world's fastest car. The Isle of Man post office has joined in the excitement, producing a commemorative set of Bloodhound stamps (joining other countries around the world who have celebrated the Land Speed Record with a set of stamps - did you know that Guinea-Bissau in West Africa has also produced some? No, me neither). One of the Isle of Man stamps is just a plain black silhouette of the Car, which looks a little boring until you rub it - after a few seconds, the thermochromic ink warms up and changes colour, revealing a cutaway diagram of the car. I've never seen a stamp with technology built into it - buy one and try it! It's not just youngsters in the Isle of Man that are getting excited. I was amazed to find out this month that a school in rural Zambia has been studying Bloodhound and making their own rocket cars. Our "Engineering Adventure" really is becoming a global event. Bloodhound's long-term aim is to create an "adventure" that will inspire a generation. It's a fact of life that we will only be able to measure our success after we've finished, but it's looking good so far. It's been a great few weeks getting Bloodhound ready to run. Keep watching the Bloodhound website, it won't be long before we're streaming live video and data from the most sophisticated Land Speed Record car ever made.
¿Qué pasa cuando algunos de los jóvenes más prometedores de América Latina aceptan el reto de dar clase en algunos de los colegios más necesitados de la región? Esa es la pregunta a la que desde hace varios años están respondiendo organizaciones como Enseña Chile, Enseña por México, Enseñá por Argentina y los otros siete miembros latinoamericanos de la red Teach for All. La red, que esta semana celebra su 10 aniversario, actualmente tiene presencia en 46 países de todo el mundo, incluyendo Panamá, Colombia, Ecuador, Perú, Uruguay, Brasil y Haití. Con ligeras variaciones, todos sus miembros trabajan para tratar de convencer a los jóvenes más talentosos de sus respectivos países que dediquen al menos un par de años a la enseñanza al salir de la universidad. Y para ello, además de capacitación y un seguimiento permanente, estas iniciativas les garantizan a estos profesores "inesperados" -por lo general destinados a escuelas en las zonas menos privilegiadas- un estipendio mensual. El resultado es que muchos jóvenes que originalmente planeaban trabajar como banqueros, ingenieros, doctores o abogados terminan "enganchados" al mundo de la educación. "El 97% de los jóvenes que han pasado por Enseña Chile siguen ligados al tema de una forma u otra y el 80% sigue en educación a tiempo completo", le dice a BBC Mundo su director ejecutivo, Tomás Recart. Y algo muy similar ocurre en otros países. Pero, ¿qué pueden aprender los sistemas educativos de la experiencia de estos jóvenes? ¿Puede este tipo de iniciativas tener un impacto que trascienda la anécdota o el aula de clases a la que llegan a dar? Para averiguarlo BBC Mundo conversó con varias personas ligadas a estos programas en tres países diferentes de América Latina: México, Chile y Perú. Con sus contribuciones, identificamos estas cuatro claves para mejorar la educación en la región, según los profesores "inesperados" de Enseña. El chileno Tomás Recart es un buen ejemplo de lo difícil que es sacarse de encima el "virus" de la educación una vez que uno ha sido inoculado con el mismo. Este hijo de banquero, que se formó como ingeniero industrial con mención en transporte, no parecía destinado a una carrera en el sector. Y él mismo admite que terminó vinculado al mundo educativo un poco por accidente. Al terminar la universidad su prioridad era hacerse con un buen mentor y eso lo llevó a trabajar con Andrés Iacobelli, quien acabada de regresar de la universidad de Harvard a fundar el Centro de Políticas Públicas de la Universidad Católica de Chile. "Me tocó servir de puente entre la universidad y comunas de mucha pobreza para tratar de ayudarles a resolver sus principales problemas. Y fueron los propios alcaldes los que me dijeron que el principal problema era la educación", recuerda. Así empezó un camino que encontró su rumbo definitivo varios años más tarde, cuando en el marco de sus estudios de posgrado en Harvard asistió a una conferencia de Wendy Koch, la fundadora de Teach for All. "Su mensaje era: cuando tienes un sistema con muchos problemas que hay que resolver al mismo tiempo, no trates de resolverlos todos por tu cuenta", recuerda Recart. "En lugar de eso ocúpate de construir puentes para que otra gente talentosa también se familiarice y se comprometa con esos problemas y se sume a los esfuerzos por darles solución", es su resumen de los planteamientos de Koch. Según el chileno, eso le hizo comprender que el problema de muchos de los que estaban tratando de mejorar la calidad de la educación "era que estábamos tratando de responder la pregunta equivocada". "Nos estábamos preguntarnos 'qué' debemos hacer, en lugar de preguntarnos 'quién' es el que tiene que hacerlo", le dice a BBC Mundo. Y en su caso particular su respuesta fue fundar junto a cinco amigos Enseña Chile -la primera miembro de la familia en América Latina- con la idea de atraer y formar al mejor talento disponible para enviarlo a las escuelas de los lugares con más carencias del país. Como destaca Recart, el objetivo fundamental de la iniciativa no es necesariamente que estos jóvenes se queden en las aulas de clase, sino que salgan de la experiencia convencidos de que el problema de la educación no sólo es urgente, sino también solucionable y, sobre todo, también un problema suyo. "El problema no son los profesores, sino un sistema que requiere de muchas manos diferentes en muchos lugares diferentes de la sociedad", le explica a BBC Mundo. Recart también tiene claro que Enseña Chile no posee la solución a todos los problemas. Pero desde 2009 la organización ha contribuido a la formación tanto de profesores como de tomadores de decisiones y emprendedores sociales que, desde sus trincheras, siguen peleando la batalla por una mejor educación. El caso de Marcia Rivas ilustra perfectamente el efecto multiplicador de la red Enseña, pues sus dos años de experiencia en las aulas de clase informaron buena parte de su trabajo en el Ministerio de Educación de Perú. Abogada de formación, Rivas inició el programa de Enseña Perú en 2011 y tres años después ingresó al ministerio, ocupando el cargo de directora de educación básica especial hasta el pasado 3 de octubre. "Yo sabía que tenía que hacer algo social, pero no sabía que iba a ser en educación", dice de un trayecto que, por lo que cuenta, también le ayudó a familiarizarse con realidades muy distintas a las de la conservadora provincia de la que es originaria. "Pero después de ver lo que se podía lograr poniendo a la gente correcta en los lugares correctos me dije: esto es lo mío, me quedo en el sector público", le dice a BBC Mundo. La peruana de 29 años no tiene ninguna duda de que el gran desafío de la educación en su país, América Latina "y yo creo que en el mundo" es la inequidad. "Hay grandes disparidades determinadas por donde nació cada persona. Y eso no nos lo podemos permitir" explica. Pero también insiste en que el problema no se soluciona únicamente inyectando recursos, pues la inequidad tiene numerosas expresiones, como por ejemplo un niño en Puno que recibe clases en un idioma que no entiende. Según Rivas, después de años preocupados por el tema de acceso, es sólo muy recientemente que América Latina ha empezado a asumir que no basta con tener escuelas, sino que estas tienen que ser buenas. En su opinión, eso pasa por poner el énfasis en la capacitación de los docentes, pero también en la creación de condiciones para que puedan ejercer mejor su labor. Y también por "pensar fuera de la caja", entre otras cosas abriendo más la escuela a la comunidad. "Si tengo que capacitar al docente, ¿por qué no permitirle tener experiencias con otros profesionales, biólogos, ingenieros, etc.?", se pregunta Rivas. Y es que según ella, esto permitiría que la educación sea permeada por otras visiones, pero también ayudaría a que más actores se sumen al esfuerzo por mejorar su calidad, como busca la filosofía de Teach for All. Hace poco más de dos años Jujy Navarro estaba dedicada a un trabajo que no le gustaba cuando fue interpelada por la pregunta: ¿quieres cambiar tu país? La pregunta articulaba la tercera convocatoria de Enseña por México y esta nativa de Guadalajara que ahora tiene 26 años no dudó en dejar su trabajo en una oficina de recursos humanos para postular al programa, que acaba de completar. "Yo siempre he estado convencida de que la educación es lo mejor para cambiar al país, porque lo hizo conmigo", dice Navarro, recordando los problemas que tuvo que enfrentar junto a sus cuatro hermanos por causa del abandono de uno de sus padres. Ahora está poniendo en práctica todo lo aprendido como parte de su experiencia como maestra en una comunidad rural de Jalisco en su nuevo trabajo: un proyecto educativo de la ONG internacional TECHO en el Estado de México. "Es lindo poder aplicar todo lo que aprendí. Y la verdad es que todas las herramientas (adquiridas durante su paso por Enseña por México) son aplicables en cualquier trabajo", asegura. Y lo mismo se puede decir de los principales aprendizajes de su experiencia tratando de dejar su huella en la pequeña escuelita de La Manzanilla de la Paz en la que le tocó trabajar. "Lo peor que se puede hacer es no contextualizar, no conocer el lugar donde uno tiene que implementar sus políticas, sus ideas", le dice a BBC Mundo. "Muchos ven ideas de otros lugares y las quieren implementar sin pensar en las realidades de la gente. Hay gente con muy buena intención, pero hay que conocer y saber antes de hacer", sostiene. En su caso, esa recomendación tuvo importantes implicaciones para la sostenibilidad de sus esfuerzos para reducir la deserción escolar, pues basó los mismos en un mejor aprovechamiento de los programas de gobierno existentes, así como en el apoyo directo de una parte importante de la comunidad. "Una buena parte de los habitantes de La Manzanilla de La Paz es gente mayor que viaja a EE.UU., así que busqué que ellos ayudaran con becas" cuenta con orgullo Martínez, quien también trabajó de cerca con el presidente de la comunidad. "Uno tiene que preguntarse qué va a pasar cuando me vaya", explica, y luego insiste: "La clave es vincular a todos los agentes, creo que esa es la forma de cambiar". Tomás Despouy también renunció a su trabajo para responder a la convocatoria de Enseña Chile en 2009, en un momento en que toda la sociedad chilena era interpelada por el debate nacional sobre el futuro de la educación. Pasó así de Microsoft Chile a dar clases de matemáticas a estudiantes de los 13 a los 17 años en una escuela ubicada en una localidad más o menos céntrica de Santiago donde abundaban los jóvenes en situación de riesgo. La experiencia fue transformadora y los beneficios de la atención que los jóvenes de Enseña empezaron a dedicarle a sus alumnos rápidamente se hizo evidente. "Pero no nos daba el tiempo ni la energía para acompañar a todos nuestros estudiantes", recuerda Despouy. "Necesitábamos más manos. Así que nos pusimos a pensar cómo vincular a los otros estudiantes", le cuenta a BBC Mundo. De esa idea en 2014 nació Panal, una organización que ahora también tiene gemelas en México, Colombia, Perú y Ecuador. "Nuestro objetivo es ayudar a conformar comunidades de estudiantes que en vez de tener una actitud pasiva se hacen cargo de sus problemas", explica Despouy, 4 novedosas claves para mejorar la educación en América Latinaactualmente director ejecutivo de Panal en Chile. "Mucho se hace de arriba hacia abajo y no se están generando los espacios participativos, cuando la participación de los estudiantes puede acelerar los cambios", lamenta el chileno. "Así que trabajamos para ayudar a que sean más partícipes de su proyecto educativo y a que no estén a la espera de soluciones", le dice a BBC Mundo. El modelo de Panal es organizar sesiones sabatinas con los estudiantes interesados para ayudarles a desarrollar habilidades e identificar y trabajar sobre sus problemáticas de la mano de universitarios y profesionales que trabajan como voluntarios. "Los estudiantes pueden ser valiosos agentes de cambio", resume Despouy. Una visión que también encierra otra posible clave para mejorar la calidad de la educación en América Latina.
صبح سویرے میچ دیکھنے کے لیے ٹی وی آن کیا تو محمد حفیظ سکرین پہ دکھائی دیے۔ ابھی میچ شروع نہیں ہوا تھا، سو یہ مناظر ابوظہبی کرکٹ گراونڈ کے نہیں تھے بلکہ حفیظ اسلام آباد کے ایک ٹی وی سٹوڈیو میں تشریف فرما تھے۔ گمان ہوا کہ شاید موصوف نے اچانک ٹیسٹ کرکٹ سے ریٹائرمنٹ لے لی ہو اور ہمیں خبر تک نہ ہوئی ہو۔ اس گمان کی تصدیق یا تردید کے لیے خاصی چھان پھٹک کی مگر کہیں سے تصدیق ہو نہ پائی۔ جس وقت آپ یہ سطور پڑھ رہے ہیں، اس وقت تک محمد حفیظ ٹیسٹ کرکٹ میں حاضر سروس ہیں۔ پچھلے سال انگلینڈ کے خلاف تیسرے ٹیسٹ تک وہ پاکستان ٹیسٹ ٹیم کا حصہ تھے، اس کے بعد انھیں ’ڈراپ‘ کر دیا گیا۔ تب سے یہ پاکستان کی مسلسل پانچویں ٹیسٹ سیریز ہے مگر حفیظ ابھی تک سلیکٹرز کو قائل نہیں کر پائے۔ جب کہ 50 ٹیسٹ میچز میں ان کی بیٹنگ اوسط 40 کے لگ بھگ ہے جب کہ بولنگ اوسط اور اکانومی بلاشبہ قابل رشک ہے۔ ابوظہبی میں پاکستان تین پیسرز اور ایک سپنر کے ساتھ میدان میں اترا۔ کل شام بولنگ کوچ اظہر محمود کہہ رہے تھے کہ ہم نے حالات و واقعات کے مطابق بالکل درست فیصلہ کیا کہ تین پیسرز اور ایک سپنر کے ساتھ میدان میں اترا جائے۔ نیز ان کا یہ بھی فرمانا تھا کہ سپن اور پیس کا یہی تناسب ہماری ’سٹرینتھ‘ ہے۔ اب یہ کون سے حالات و واقعات تھے جو اس فیصلے کی درستی کے لیے سازگار ٹھہرے اور پچھلے چھ سال میں تین پیس اور ایک سپن کا فارمولہ کب کب پاکستان کی ’سٹرینتھ‘ رہا، اس کا ہمیں چنداں علم نہیں۔ فی الوقت ہم سے یہ گتھی نہیں سلجھ رہی کہ آخر وہ کون سے عوامل ہیں جن کے نتیجے میں یہ طے کر لیا گیا ہے کہ محمد حفیظ اب پاکستان کے لیے مزید ٹیسٹ کرکٹ نہیں کھیل سکتے۔ کیونکہ بادی النظر میں نہ تو کوئی ایسا مستند آل راؤنڈر ابھر کر آ گیا ہے کہ حفیظ کی ضرورت باقی نہ رہی ہو اور نہ ہی کوئی ایسا تباہ کن فاسٹ بولر سامنے آ چکا ہے کہ سپن کے شعبے کے لیے صرف یاسر شاہ ہی کافی ٹھہرے گا۔ ثانیا حفیظ کو ڈراپ کرنے کے بعد سے پاکستان مسلسل تجربات کر رہا ہے۔ سب سے پہلے نواز کو لایا گیا کہ وہ آل راؤنڈ کردار ادا کریں گے مگر دو سیریز بعد ہی تھنک ٹینک کو خیال آیا کہ وہ فیصلہ درست نہیں تھا۔ پھر ویسٹ انڈیز کے خلاف سیریز کے لیے شاداب خان کو موقع دیا گیا۔ مگر ایک ہی میچ کھلانے کے بعد تھنک ٹینک کو پھر یہ خیال آیا کہ شاداب ابھی ٹیسٹ کرکٹ کے لیے موزوں نہیں ہیں۔ حالیہ سیریز کے لیے حارث سہیل سے اسی کردار کی توقع باندھی گئی ہے۔ ہم امید کرتے ہیں کہ وہ اس میں کامیاب ٹھہریں لیکن ساتھ ہی ساتھ ایک چیز ایسی ہے جو غیر محسوس انداز میں پاکستان کو مسلسل زک پہنچا رہی ہے۔ ڈیبیو سے اب تک یاسر شاہ 26 ٹیسٹ میچز میں پاکستان کی نمائندگی کر چکے ہیں۔ ابوظہبی میں جاری میچ ان کے کریئر کا 27واں میچ ہے، جس میں انھوں نے اپنے کریئر کی 150 ویں وکٹ حاصل کر کے تیز ترین 150 وکٹوں کا ریکارڈ بھی اپنے نام کیا۔ یاسر شاہ میں وہ تمام گن موجود ہیں کہ آج سے دس سال بعد وہ پاکستان کے کامیاب ترین سپنر اور شاید سب سے زیادہ ٹیسٹ وکٹیں لینے والے بولر ہوں۔ لیکن کیا کسی نے غور بھی کیا ہے کہ تھنک ٹینک کے تجربات کا یاسر شاہ پہ کیا اثر پڑ رہا ہے؟ ابوظہبی ٹیسٹ کی پہلی اننگز میں یاسر شاہ نے 57 اوورز پھینکے۔ یاد رہے ابھی میچ کی دوسری اننگز باقی ہے۔ اس سے پہلے ڈومنیکا میں بھی انھیں 57 اوورز پھینکنا پڑے تھے۔ بظاہر دیکھا جائے تو سپنر کے لیے یہ کوئی غیر معمولی ورک لوڈ نہیں ہے۔ مرلی دھرن ایک دن میں 40 اوورز بھی پھینک لیا کرتے تھے لیکن ایسا شاذ ہی ہوا کرتا تھا۔ یاسر کے مقابلے میں شین وارن کے کیریئر کو دیکھا جائے تو وارن فی میچ لگ بھگ 44 اوورز پھینکا کرتے تھے جب کہ کل کے 57 اوورز کے علاوہ یاسر اب تک فی میچ 54 اوورز پھینک چکے ہیں۔ ہم سب آگاہ ہیں کہ پچھلے ایک سال سے یاسر مختلف فٹنس مسائل کا شکار ہیں، ایک بار غلطی سے ممنوع دوائیں بھی کھا بیٹھے، آسٹریلیا کے خلاف سیریز میں اپنے کیریئر کے بدترین اعداد بھی دیکھ چکے، حتیٰ کہ حالیہ سیریز سے قبل سکواڈ کا اعلان صرف اسی لیے موخر کیا جاتا رہا کہ یاسر شاہ کی فٹنس کی تصدیق ہو سکے۔ اور ان حالات کے بعد جب یاسر شاہ میدان میں اترتے ہیں تو ابوظہبی کی چلچلاتی دھوپ میں ان سے 57 اوورز پھینکوائے جاتے ہیں۔ جب کہ پارٹ ٹائم آپشن اظہر علی سے ایک بھی اوور نہیں کروایا جاتا اور جب 57 اوورز پھینک کر وہ ڈریسنگ روم پلٹتے ہیں تو انہی کے بولنگ کوچ یہ فرماتے پائے جاتے ہیں کہ اس وکٹ پہ ایک ریگولر سپنر ہی کافی تھا۔ بھئی اگر ایک سپنر ہی کافی تھا تو 57 اوورز کسی فاسٹ بولر سے کروا لیتے۔ اور ستم ظریفی یہ ہے کہ پچھلے چھ سال میں ہوم گراونڈز پہ ناقابل شکست رہنے والی ٹیم نے کبھی بھی صرف ایک سپنر پہ اکتفا نہیں کیا تھا، ہمیشہ دو ریگولر سپنرز کھلائے جاتے تھے۔ تھنک ٹینک سے دست بستہ عرض ہے کہ حضور! ٹیم کو ینگ بنانے کی کوششیں ضرور جاری رکھیے مگر یہ مت بھولیے کہ یاسر شاہ لمبی ریس کے گھوڑے ہیں اور اگر ان کا ہاتھ بٹانے کو اور کوئی آل راؤنڈر نہیں مل رہا تو50 ٹیسٹ کا تجربہ اور یو اے ای کی وکٹس پہ بہترین ریکارڈ رکھنے والے حفیظ میں کیا برائی ہے؟
In our series of letters from African journalists, novelist and writer Adaobi Tricia Nwaubani writes that many of the hopes Nigerians had at independence have been dashed. Of all the stories I have heard of the day when Nigeria gained independence from Britain on 1 October 1960, the most memorable is the one told by my friend's father, Onye Kamanu, who had spent the preceding night at Tafawa Balewa Square in the then capital, Lagos. Sitting on the surrounding walls and bare ground were thousands of Nigerians, who, like him, could hardly wait to usher in the day that their country would finally be free from colonial rule. With tears in his eyes, Mr Kamanu recalled the occasion, describing the deafening bellow of triumph that went up from the teeming crowd when the British Union Jack finally went down and the green-white-green Nigerian flag was hoisted. Nigeria's then Prime Minister Tafawa Balewa captured the mood of the entire nation during his Independence Day speech. "This is a wonderful day and it is all the more wonderful because we have awaited it with increasing impatience. Words cannot adequately express my joy and pride at being the Nigerian citizen privileged to accept from Her Royal Highness these constitutional instruments which are the symbols of Nigeria's independence," he said. "It is a unique privilege which I shall remember forever, and it gives me strength and courage as I dedicate my life to the service of our country," he added. Shortly after witnessing the historic event, Mr Kamanu received a scholarship to study at an American university. Throughout the journey by sea, he was fed little else but macaroni and cheese, hence his subsequent lifelong abhorrence of the meal. Once in the US, he boasted to his classmates about the future of Nigeria, Africa's most populous state. "Nigeria is going to be a world power in the next few years," he said. "Oh, you just wait and see." Mr Kamanu was certain that, with the coloniser gone and with the advent of self-rule, Nigeria would soon bound forth like a racehorse released from its stall. That same year, a total of 17 African states celebrated their independence from the UK, France and Belgium. I understand that a cartoon at the time depicted the map of Africa as a growing giant bursting out of its chains. Nigeria: Key facts Clearly, Mr Kamanu was not the only one with high hopes. Others also expected that a continent, blessed with natural resources and hard-working people, would arise in her full splendour and shine. About 40 years after independence, Mr Kamanu travelled from Nigeria to attend his college reunion in the US. His classmates remembered how loudly he had boasted. "I thought you said Nigeria was going to be a world power?" they asked, giggling and nudging one another. "So, Onye, what happened?" A lot happened. Within six years of his emotional speech, Mr Balewa was assassinated in a coup. About a year later, Nigeria plunged into a civil war after member of the Igbo ethnic group tried to secede and form the breakaway state of Biafra in the south-east. Three years of war eventually ended and three decades of coups and dictatorships followed. Human rights abuses and pillaging of the nation's vast resources by those in power carried on with little restraint. Adaobi Tricia Nwaubani: Particularly alarming are the ethnic agitations sounding from almost all parts of the country Nigeria finally found her way back on to her feet with the return to democracy in 1999. The giant of Africa leaped several steps forward in March 2015 when the government of Goodluck Jonathan was voted out, the will of the people prevailing, for the first time, over the power of an incumbent. That historic election of President Muhammadu Buhari led many Nigerians to be as optimistic as Mr Kamanu was in 1960 about the country's future. But barely two years later, some of the forces that derailed Nigeria then are once again flashing their sharp talons. Particularly alarming are the ethnic agitations sounding from almost all parts of the country, especially from the south-east where clashes between the military and the separatist group, the Independent Peoples of Biafra (Ipob), have led to the loss of life and property. In the media and in daily conversation, Nigerians continue to express their fears about how much more ferocious the crisis could become if not handled with immense care. This is one déjà vu that Nigeria cannot afford. The giant of Africa has marched too far to be suddenly crippled by the same old mistakes. As my country celebrates her 57th year of independence, my prayer is that the Nigerian government will handle these agitations with compassion and great wisdom. Surely none of us wants to look back at this era of hope and struggle to answer the question: "What happened?" Follow us on Twitter @BBCAfrica, on Facebook at BBC Africa, on Instagram at bbcafrica or email africalive@bbc.co.uk
Her nesil , orijinal olduğunu düşünmek ister. Ancak Derek Ridger'in 1980'ler İngilteresi'nde çektiği fotoğraflara baktığınızda aslında hiç de farklı olmadığımızı anlayacaksınız. Ridger, "O zamanlar Instagram yoktu, insanlar giyinip dışarı çıkmak zorundaydı. Şimdi giyinmeli, evde kalmalı ve nasıl göründüklerini bütün dünyaya yatak odalarından göstemeliler" diyor. İkonik fotoğrafçı Ridger, "80'lerde" adlı kitabını BBC'nin Newsbeat ekibine anlattı. Hafifler, sıcak tutuyorlar ve eyşalarınızı koyabileceğiniz 20 kadar cebi var. Pilot ceketlerin son yıllarda neden geri döndüğüne şaşırmamalı. Amerikalı pilotlar tarafından 1950'lerde giyilen ceketlerde eğer uçakları düşürülürse sinyal vermek için kullanılabilen turuncu bir astar vardı. Şimdilerde Gigi Hadid, Kanye West, Wiz Khalifa ve ABD'nin first ladysi Melania Trump bile bu ceketin hayranları arasında; ancak Derek 80'lerde bu ceketleri işçi sınıfının çocuklarının kullandığını söylüyor. Derek, o dönemin yaratıcı zamanlar olduğunu hatırlatarak insanların bu ceketleri bazen rozetlerle bazen de dergilerden kestikleri parçalarla kapladığını anlatıyor. Asker tıraşının (buzzcut) çok tartışılan bir geçmişi var. 1980'lerde aşırı sağcılar ile beraber anılır olmuştu. Ancak uzun bir zaman boyunca modanın bir parçasıydı, geçen yıl ise özellikle kadınlarda geri geldi. Cara Delevingne, Kristen Stewart ve Adwoa Aboah ile Slick Woods gibi modeller bu tarzın yeniden ünlü olmasını sağladı. Derek, dazlaklardan emolara ve rockerlara, alt kültürdeki çok sayıda gencin fotoğrafını çekti. "70'lerde fotoğrafçı olarak işe başladığımda, kameramla gezinir ve ne görürsem çekerdim. Genelde ortalarda insanların bakabileceği boş bir resim çerçevesini tutarak, ne gördüğümü görmek için gezinirdim. Bütün fotoğraflarımı öyle yaptım" diyor. Şimdi herkesin bir kamerası olduğu için insanların portrelerini çekmenin zorlaştığını söylüyor: "İlk fotoğraf çekmeye başladığımda insanların daha önce hiç fotoğraflarının çekilmediğini söylemesini istiyordum. Şimdi bu olamaz. Herkesin Instagram'ı var, herkes imajının nasıl olduğunu kontrol etmek istiyor." Kürk montlar, Naomi Campbell ve Pamela Anderson gibi ünlülerin destek vermesiyle hayvan hakları savunucusu grupların protestolarının ardından 1990'larda moda olmaktan çıktı. Ancak geçtiğimiz yıllarda gerçek ve sahte kürkler defilelere geri döndü. Eğer 1980'lerde bir alt kültüre aitseniz o kültürün kurallarına sıkı sıkı uymak zorundaydınız. Derek ise şimdi daha çok tarzların karıştırıldığını düşünüyor: "Punk varken daha çok 'Kendin yap' tadındaydı. İnsanlar ne istiyorsa onu yapıyordu. "Şimdi yüksek modada onu görüyorsunuz. Birçok tasarımcı sokak modasını alıyor ve onu çok değiştirmiyor bile." Derek son zamanlarda fotoğraf çekmek için daha çok zorlandığını çünkü insanların tek bir yere gitmediğini anlatıyor: "70 ve 80'lerde daha çok Soho ve Camden gibi yerlerde olurlardı. Bir akşamüstü dışarı çıkıp 50 farklı tarzı olan kişiyi çekebilirdim. "Şimdi Camden'a gidersem orasının turist dolu olduğunu görüyorum. Sadece 10 kadar ilginç insan bulabilirim. "Ancak alt kültürler kesinlikle halen var."
Toys 'R' Us has filed for bankruptcy protection in the US and Canada as it attempts to restructure its debts. The firm was once a dominant player in the US toy market, but has struggled against larger rivals such as Amazon. The move casts a shadow over the future of the company's nearly 1,600 stores and 64,000 employees. However, a US bankruptcy judge approved a loan of more than $2bn to help stabilise the toy chain. The aim is to give Toys 'R' Us money and time to prepare for the upcoming Christmas shopping season. The firm's European operations are not part of the bankruptcy proceedings and Toys R Us says it does not expect any immediate impact on its UK stores. Toys 'R' Us's operations in Australia, about 255 licensed stores and a joint venture partnership in Asia are also not included in the bankruptcy move. The bankruptcy filing is more evidence that traditional retailers are struggling in the US, as online retailers continue to capture market share. Toys 'R' Us said the majority of its stores around the world remained profitable, and would continue to operate as normal through the holiday period, which is when they do most of their business. But the company is also looking to online sales to secure its future, with recently launched web stores for its products. GlobalData Retail estimates that in 2016 about 13.7% of all toy sales were made online, up from 6.5% five years ago. "The past decade has seen a dramatic change in the domestic toy market with new channels, increased competition, and new technology all having a deleterious impact on the sector and traditional toy stores. Unfortunately, Toys 'R' Us has not responded effectively to these challenges," said Neil Saunders, managing director of GlobalData Retail. Gary Grant, founder of UK toy shop chain The Entertainer, said people's buying habits were changing. "We're seeing it even in the supermarkets, where the big sheds aren't being visited as frequently as more convenient in-town locations," he told the BBC. "So we're seeing in grocery the convenience stores are much more successful now than some of the over-spaced units that the grocers have." Toys 'R' Us wants to use the bankruptcy process to restructure and make the company viable over the long term. Enormous debt levels are its most immediate problem. Various lenders, including a JPMorgan-led bank syndicate and some of the company's existing lenders, have committed more than $3bn in new financing to turn the company around. "A combination of high debt and severe structural changes in the industry created a toxic mix against which Toys 'R' Us had little choice but to restructure and try to put itself on a firmer footing," said Mr Saunders. However, the company says the new financing will improve the company's financial health and support its operations during the court-supervised bankruptcy process. "Our objective is to work with our debt holders and other creditors to restructure the $5bn of long-term debt on our balance sheet, which will provide us with greater financial flexibility to invest in our business," said chief executive Dave Brandon. Toys 'R' Us is one of a number of traditional US retailers to have run into trouble recently. Department store chain Sears has been struggling with falling sales and heavy losses. In January, it announced the closure of more than 100 stores. Other department stores - including Macy's, which also owns Bloomingdales - have also seen sales slide. US clothing chains The Limited and Wet Seal filed for bankruptcy protection earlier this year, as did discount shoe retailer Payless.
A dinosaur from China sported a "bandit mask" pattern in the feathers on its face, scientists have said. Researchers came to their conclusion after studying three well-preserved fossil specimens of the extinct creature, called Sinosauropteryx. They were able to discern the dinosaur's colour patterns, showing that it had a banded tail and "counter-shading" - where animals are dark on top and lighter on their underside. The study appears in Current Biology. The bandit mask pattern is seen in numerous animals today, from mammals - such as raccoons and badgers - to birds, such as the nuthatch. "This is the first time it's been seen in a dinosaur and, to my knowledge, any extinct animal that shows colour bands," co-author Fiann Smithwick, from Bristol University, told BBC News. There are a variety of ideas about why animals carry the bandit mask pattern. And the reasons might differ between individual species. "In raccoons and badgers, it's an advertisement of the fact that they're aggressive," said Dr Smithwick, adding: "If you're a predator and you mess with them, they're going to fight back." "We think that's probably unlikely in Sinosauropteryx because there's no real anatomical evidence that it could have defended itself well. It's a small dinosaur and quite gracile (lightly built). "It would probably have been fast-moving, but in terms of a physical deterrent that you'd need to back up a signal like that, it doesn't really have one. He added: "If you have a non-honest signal like that, you're generally found out pretty quickly in evolutionary terms." Instead, the team thinks the bandit mask served a similar function to the one seen in modern birds - which makes sense given the evolutionary relationship between the two groups. Scientists think one reason birds have it is to reduce glare from light reflected on feathers around the eye. This might be particularly important in environments where there's lots of direct sunlight. "The analogy is athletes who paint a dark stripe under their eyes... it's really beneficial for increasing your visual acuity," said Dr Smithwick. But they might also camouflage the eyes, making them harder for predators to spot. Sinosauropteryx is known to have lived between 133 and 120 million years ago in north-eastern China. It was a small feathered dinosaur characterised by a long tail and short arms. The longest specimen is about a metre (three-and-a-half feet) in length. "One of these fossils was looked at about seven years ago, by a team that found pigment preserved in the feathers - this was in the form of melanin. This was a particular type of melanin that's known to give 'ginger' or 'rusty-brown' colours in living animals," he explained. Only pigmented feathers were preserved by fossilisation. So parts of the dinosaur's body where they were not found were presumed to be white in life. Co-author Dr Jakob Vinther, also from Bristol University, travelled to China to take very high-resolution photos of the specimens. Some of these were normally lit, but others were taken using cross-polarising filters on the light and the camera. These filters reduce the glare that comes off the fossil under artificial light, allowing the scientists to see in detail where the dark-pigmented areas were. "It essentially allowed us to map out the distribution of the light and dark plumage," said Dr Smithwick. In addition to the bandit mask, the researchers identified counter-shading on the body and a banded tail. These patterns can tell scientists lots about the animal, its behaviour, and habitat. Counter-shading is a common form of camouflage present in modern animals. It balances out the natural patterns of light and shade cast by sunlight, making the creature appear flatter against the background. The particular way that the dinosaur was counter-shaded suggests Sinosauropteryx lived in open habitats, rather than dense forest. Sinosauropteryx could not have held the long tail in a perfectly horizontal position for long periods, which may explain why it's banded rather than counter-shaded. Follow Paul on Twitter.
නිව්යෝක් නුවර මීළඟ සතියේ පැවැත්වීමට නියමිත එක්සත් ජාතීන්ගේ මහා මණ්ඩල සැසිවාරයට මියන්මාරයේ නිල නොවන නායිකා අවුන් සාන් සුචී සහභාගී නොවනු ඇති බව එරට ආණ්ඩුවේ ප්‍රකාශකයෙකු පැවසීය. කෙසේ නමුත් ඒ සඳහා හේතුවක් ඉදිරිපත් කර නොමැත. මේ අතර රෝහින්ග්‍යා මුස්ලිම් ප්‍රජාවට ආරක්ෂාව සැපයීමට අපොහොසත් වීම සම්බන්ධයෙන් අවුන් සාන් සුචී දෝෂ දර්ශනයට ලක් වේ. අගෝස්තු මාසයේ හටගත් ප්‍රචණ්ඩ ක්‍රියා හමුවේ රඛයින් ප්‍රාන්තයේ සිට අසල්වැසි බංග්ලාදේශය වෙත පළා ගොස් ඇති රෝහින්ග්‍යා වැසියන් සංඛ්‍යාව තුන් ලක්ෂ හැත්තෑ දහසකි. "වාර්ගික ශුද්ධයක" යෙදී සිටින බවට එක්සත් ජාතීන්ගේ සංවිධානය මියන්මාර ආණ්ඩුවට චෝදනා කරයි. රෝහින්ග්‍යා කැරලිකරුවන්ට එරෙහිව මෙහෙයුම් ක්‍රියාත්මක කරන බව පවසන මියන්මාර හමුදාව සාමාන්‍ය වැසියන් ඉලක්ක කරන බවට එල්ල වන චෝදනා ප්‍රතික්ෂේප කරයි. බෞද්ධ බහුතරය සහිත මියන්මාරයේ රඛයින් ප්‍රාන්තයේ වෙසෙන රෝහින්ග්‍යා මුස්ලිම් ප්‍රජාව දීර්ඝ කාලයක සිට වධ හිංසාවලට ගොදුරු වේ. පරම්පරා ගණනාවක සිට මියන්මාරයේ වෙසෙන නමුත් ඔවුන්ට එරට පුරවැසිභාවය ලබා දී නොමැත. රෝහින්ග්‍යා ප්‍රජාව බංග්ලාදේශයේ සිට සිය රට වෙත සංක්‍රමණය වී ඇති බව මියන්මාරය පවසයි. රෝහින්ග්‍යා ජනතාව මුහුණ පා ඇති මානුෂීය අර්බුදය සම්බන්ධයෙන් සාකච්ඡා කිරීම සඳහා එක්සත් ජාතීන්ගේ ආරක්ෂක මණ්ඩලය බදාදා (සැප් 13) රැස්වීමට නියමිතය. ප්‍රචණ්ඩත්වය මැඩපැවැත්වීම සඳහා ප්‍රමාණවත් පියවර ගැනීමට අපොහොසත් වීම සම්බන්ධයෙන් අවුන් සාන් සුචීට මීට ඉහත දී සහාය පළ කළ බටහිර රටවල විවේචන එල්ල වේ. ප්‍රජාතන්ත්‍රවාදය වෙනුවෙන් හඬ නැගූ අවුන් සාන් සුචී වසර පහළොවක් නිවාස අඩස්සියේ පසු විය. නොබෙල් සාම ත්‍යාගයෙන් ද පිදුම් ලද ඇය මියන්මාර ආණ්ඩුවේ ප්‍රධානියා ලෙස සැලකේ. ප්‍රචණ්ඩ ක්‍රියා අවසන් කරන මෙන් ටිබෙට් බෞද්ධ නායක දලයි ලාමා, අගරදගුරු ඩෙස්මන්ඩ් ටුටු සහ මලාලා යූසෆ්සායි ඇතුළු සෙසු නොබෙල් සාම ත්‍යාග ලාභීහු ඇයගෙන් ඉල්ලා සිටියහ. අගෝස්තු 25 වෙනිදා රෝහින්ග්‍යා කැරලිකරුවන් විසින් පොලිස් මුරපොලවල් වෙත එල්ල කරන ලද ප්‍රහාරවලින් ආරක්ෂක අංශ සාමාජිකයන් 12 දෙනෙකු මරණයට පත් විය. පිහි සහ තමන් විසින් සකසන ලද බෝම්බ යොදා ගනිමින් රෝහින්ග්‍යා කැරලිකරුවන් විසින් රඛයින් ප්‍රාන්තයේ උතුරු ප්‍රදේශයේ පිහිටි පොලිස් මුරපොළවල් 30 ට පහර දෙනු ලැබ ඇතැයි මියන්මාර ආණ්ඩුව පවසයි. එම ප්‍රහාරයත් සමග ආණ්ඩුවේ හමුදා සහ බෞද්ධ කණ්ඩායම් වැටලීම් සිදු කරමින් ගිනි තැබීම ආරම්භ කළ බව පළා යමින් සිටින රෝහින්ග්‍යා මුස්ලිම් වැසියෝ පවසති. පොලිස් මුරපොලවල් වෙත එල්ල කළ ප්‍රහාරය තමන් විසින් දියත් කරන ලද බව 'අරකන් රෝහින්ග්‍යා ගැලවීමේ හමුදාව'හෙවත් 'අර්සා' ලෙස හඳුන්වා ගනු ලබන කණ්ඩායමක් පවසයි. රාජ්‍ය මර්දනයෙන් මියන්මාරයේ රෝහින්ග්‍යා මුස්ලිම් සුළුතරය ආරක්ෂා කර ගැනීම සිය ප්‍රධාන අරමුණ බව ඔවුහු පවසති. 'අර්සා'නායකයන් විදේශයක දී පුහුණුව ලබා ඇති බවත් එය ත්‍රස්තවාදී කණ්ඩායමක් බවත් මියන්මාර ආණ්ඩුව පවසයි. එම කණ්ඩායමේ ප්‍රකාශකයෙක් 'ඒෂියා ටයිම්ස්' වෙත පවසා තිබුණේ තම කණ්ඩායම ජිහාඩ් කණ්ඩායම් සමග සබඳතා නොපවත්වන බවය. 2012 වසරේ හට ගත් ප්‍රචණ්ඩ ක්‍රියා හමුවේ කෝපයට පත් තරුණ පිරිස් සිය කණ්ඩායමේ සාමාජිකත්වය දරන බවත් ඔහු සඳහන් කර තිබිණි.
From the edge of Jaramana in eastern Damascus, you get a view of what was once a frontline in the battle for the Syrian capital. There is a cluster of buildings in the distance, with bits of steel and cement hanging from the edges, and the top floors almost completely collapsed. They are in Dukhaniya, once held by rebels, now under regime control. A stream of filthy water runs from Jaramana in the direction of Dukhaniya, and cows graze on a piece of farmland between the two areas. The children playing around refer to it sarcastically as "the river". Overlooking the farmland is an unfinished building that houses about 25 families. They have all been displaced by the war, some of them several times. It was pitch-dark in the hallway leading to Um Mohammed's flat. A chilly breeze found its way through the cracks in the walls, and a dim light came in through the windows. Her sons were out working to pay for their school books, and her daughters sat nearby, browsing through theirs. Um Mohammed told me her family of seven are living in a flat without any running water, sewage, or even a sink. The walls are full of holes, and even when they manage to find logs to burn for heating, the wind still seeps in. They have reconciled themselves to three hours of electricity a day, and they and their neighbours have laid mousetraps all over the building, which is infested with rodents. "We used to live in dignity in our own houses," Um Mohammed said. "Now we're chasing after charities." Not all the displaced Syrians in Damascus live in run-down buildings. A first stop for many would be shelters run by local authorities, such as one in Qudsaya, on the western edge of Damascus. It was originally meant to be a school, but the local authorities in rural Damascus turned it into a shelter when displaced families started pouring in. There are currently about 90 families here, but the number keeps changing. People come here as a first step and they leave as soon as they find somewhere else to stay. The shelter provides accommodation, education and primary health care, and the workers are mostly volunteers, many of whom are themselves displaced. The UN estimates the number of internally displaced people in Syria at more than 6.5 million, and Damascus houses the second largest number of IDPs after Aleppo in the north. The number of people inside Syria classified by the UN as "in need of assistance" is 13.5 million. Regime-held parts of the country, safe from air strikes and full of aid agencies, attract those Syrians who are not wanted by security services, and who can make their way safely to these areas. But many IDPs still live on edge. The front-lines are constantly shifting, and even in safer areas, economic pressure is on the rise. Um Mohammed and her neighbours live in fear of eviction because the owner constantly threatens to raise the rent. "He can kick us out any time he likes," she said.
La estación espacial de China, Tiangong-1, se encuentra fuera de control y se anticipa que caerá de vuelta a la Tierra el próximo año. Sin embargo, no lo hará en el remoto lugar donde la mayoría de naves espaciales han terminado sus días. Los exploradores y aventureros se la pasan buscando nuevos lugares para conquistar, en vista de que las cumbres más altas ya han sido escaladas, los polos alcanzados y los vastos océanos y desiertos cruzados. Algunos de estos nuevos lugares se llaman polos de inaccesibilidad. Dos de ellos son particularmente interesantes. Uno, conocido como el polo continental de inaccesibilidad, es el lugar de la Tierra más apartado del océano. Su posición exacta es debatida, pero muchos consideran que se encuentra cerca de la llamada Puerta de Zungaria, un puerto de montaña fronterizo entre China y Asia Central. El punto equivalente en el océano, es decir el sitio más apartado de tierra alguna, se ubica en el Pacífico Sur, a unos 2.700 km de las Islas Pitcairn, un territorio de nadie entre Australia, Nueva Zelanda y Sudamérica. Este polo oceánico de inaccesibilidad no es solamente de interés para los exploradores. Los operadores de satélites también están atraídos. Se debe a que la mayoría de los satélites que orbitan en torno a la Tierra finalmente caerán pero, ¿a dónde? Los satélites más pequeños satélites se quemarán en la atmósfera, pero trozos de los más grandes sobrevivirán hasta alcanzar la superficie terrestre. Para evitar que se estrellen contra zonas pobladas son guiados para caer cerca del polo oceánico de inaccesibilidad. Esparcido sobre un área de unos 1.500 km² en el lecho del océano que comprende esta región yace una tumba de satélites. La última vez que se contaron había más de 260, la mayoría rusos. Los restos de la estación espacial MIR también se encuentran allí. La estación que la Unión Soviética lanzó en 1986 fue visitada por muchas tripulaciones de cosmonautas y astronautas internacionales. Con su masa de 120 toneladas, nunca iba a desintegrarse por completo en la atmósfera, así que fue dirigida hacia la región en 2001 y su descenso fue visto por pescadores como una fragmentada masa de basura incandescente atravesando el cielo velozmente. Muchas veces al año, el módulo de abastecimiento que viaja hasta la Estación Espacial Internacional se quema en esta región, incinerando el desperdicio que lleva de la estación. No peligra la vida de nadie en este tipo de reingreso controlado en nuestra atmósfera. En la región no se pesca porque las corrientes oceánicas no pasan por ahí y, como no hay un flujo de nutrientes, la vida marina es escasa. Un futuro visitante de este desolado lugar será la misma Estación Espacial Internacional. Será retirada de servicio en la próxima década, según los planes, y su descenso tendrá que ser cuidadosamente controlado hasta el polo oceánico de inaccesibilidad. Con una masa de 450 toneladas, cuatro veces el tamaño de MIR, será un espectáculo impresionante. Pero algunas veces no es posible dirigir la caída de un satélite o estación espacial hacia el Pacífico Sur si los controladores en tierra han perdido el contacto. Algo así ocurrió con la estación rusa de 36 toneladas Salyut 7, en 1991, que cayó sobre Sudamérica, o la estadunidense Skylab, que impactó en Australia en 1979. Nadie en tierra resultó herido ni, hasta donde se sepa, lo ha sido por algún pedazo de basura espacial cayendo. Pero el riesgo se presentará de nuevo el año entrante. Entre enero y abril de 2018, la estación china Tiangong-1 regresará a Tierra. Fue lanzada en 2011 como la primera estación espacial de ese país asiático. El año siguiente fue visitada por la primera astronauta china, Liu Yang. La órbita de Tiangong-1 está degradándose a medida que se dirige a un reingreso. Pero los ingenieros chinos han perdido el control de la nave y no tienen cómo disparar sus cohetes para dirigirla hacia el Pacífico Sur. En cambio, descenderá sobre algún lugar entre los paralelos a 42,8 grados norte y sur. Esas son las latitudes del norte de España y el sur de Australia, y no se podrá ser más preciso que eso hasta una pocas horas antes de que se empiece a quemar en la atmósfera. Tiangong-1 será una de las estaciones espaciales que probablemente no se unirá a sus naves similares enterradas en el remoto Pacífico Sur. El doctor David Whitehouse fue el corresponsal de ciencia de la BBC, entre 1988 y 2006, y es exeditor científico del sitio de noticias de la BBC.
Зампредседателя комитета по обороне и безопасности Совета Федерации Франц Клинцевич сообщил о строительстве военно-морской базы на Курилах. Это не первое упоминание о военном объекте на островах, ранее об этом говорил министр обороны Сергей Шойгу, но впервые об этом проекте заговорили в настоящем времени. "Решение принято. Оно в стадии реализации", - заявил Клинцевич, не уточнив, где именно будет располагаться военный объект. Возможно, он имел в виду остров Матуа - небольшой клочок суши в центре Курильской гряды. В 2016 году министр обороны Шойгу говорил, что Россия предполагает не только восстановить, но и активно эксплуатировать этот остров. К тому моменту на острове уже побывала крупная экспедиция Русского географического общества и Тихоокеанского флота (ТОФ). Вторая экспедиция началась летом 2017 года и продолжается до сих пор. "Специалистами было проведено более 1000 лабораторных исследований по физико-химическим и биологическим показателям, сделано более 200 измерений рельефа и внешней среды. Также была проведена радиационная и химическая разведка, обследованы фортификационные сооружения острова и более 100 исторических объектов. Водолазами проводилась работа по гидрографическому исследованию бухт и заливов острова Матуа", - говорится на сайте РГО. В отчетах экспедиций много говорится об изучении морских беспозвоночных животных и водорослей, изучении активности вулкана Пик Сарычева, но если минобороны действительно собралось строить на этом островке базу, то для него, скорее всего, особенно важны гидрографические исследования рельефа морского дна и изучение остатков японских военных сооружений. Новая база будет способна принимать любые корабли, в том числе первого ранга, сказал в четверг Клинцевич, не уточнив, какие именно суда будут базироваться на этом объекте. К кораблям первого ранга относятся авианосцы, миноносцы, ракетные и противолодочные крейсера, атомные подводные лодки. Для таких плавсредств с большой осадкой действительно нужно тщательно подготовить морское дно. Принадлежность некоторых Курильских островов России оспаривает Япония. Они достались Советскому Союзу в самом конце Второй мировой войны, когда на островах высадился советский морской десант. Принадлежность части островов не была закреплена международными договорами. Япония претендует на острова Курильской гряды Итуруп, Кунашир, Шикотан и группу малых островов Хабомаи, ссылаясь на Симоносекский трактат 1855 года. Остров Матуа, о котором говорил Шойгу, не относится к группе спорных - он находится в другой части гряды, в ее центральном районе. Россия настаивает, что острова принадлежат ей, ссылаясь на недопустимость пересмотра итогов Второй мировой войны. Курильские острова расположены в стратегически важном районе: они отделяют Охотское море от Тихого океана, как бы запирая выход к нему от южного побережья российского Дальнего Востока. Во время Второй мировой войны на островах была построена мощная система укреплений, аэродромов, военно-морских баз. Один из объектов располагался как раз на Матуа - до сих пор на острове остаются береговые бетонные укрепления, остатки аэродрома, склады, укрытия. В советское время и до 2001 года на острове располагалась погранзастава, однако в последние годы остров оставался необитаемым. В настоящее время на Курильских островах дислоцирована 18-я пулеметно-артиллерийская дивизия (единственное подобное соединение в российской армии) с частями усиления на Итурупе и Кунашире. Недавно на островах разместили береговые ракетные комплексы "Бал" и "Бастион", а также зенитные комплексы "Бук". Комплекс "Бастион" был размещен на острове Итуруп, а "Бал" - на Кунашире. Матуа - не самое комфортное место для жизни и даже для строительства военной базы. На острове дуют сильные ветра, на побережье нет больших удобных бухт. Наконец, вся северная часть небольшого островка - вулкан, который последний раз извергался совсем недавно - в 2009 году. Остров находится на большом удалении от баз снабжения, и связь с ним, особенно в зимние месяцы, затруднена из-за того, что Охотское море в этом месте замерзает. В любом случае, строительство крупной базы на нем будет чрезвычайно затратным делом. Однако Россия, похоже, готова пойти на траты. С одной стороны, Кремль давно стремится к тому, чтобы расширять свое военное присутствие в Мировом океане. И тихоокеанский регион, который в последние годы привлекает к себе все больше внимания, крайне важен для России. К примеру, один из двух десантных вертолетоносцев, которые Россия намеревалась закупить во Франции, должен был базироваться на Тихоокеанском флоте. "Когда я служил на Дальнем Востоке, рассматривался вопрос размещения корабельного соединения ТОФ на Курилах. На островах выгодно создавать базу по единственной причине - прямого выхода в океан. Из мест, которые были определены как пригодные под нее по геометрии, трудности были следующие. Первая - сложная ледовая обстановка зимой. Вторая - приливы и отливы около шести метров. Третья - сильные ветра", - заявил в интервью РИА Новости бывший командующий Балтийским флотом адмирал Владимир Валуев. Во времена СССР, имевшего более крупный Тихоокеанский флот, чем теперь Россия, на Курильских островах большая военная база так и не была построена. Вторая цель России - укрепиться на самих Курильских островах. Нерешенный вопрос с Курилами мешает развиваться отношениям двух стран, поднимается каждый раз во время переговоров Москвы и Токио и явно сильно нервирует обе стороны. Говоря о масштабах будущего объекта, сенатор Франц Клинцевич заявил, что новая база будет способна принимать любые корабли, в том числе первого ранга. При этом Клинцевич использовал слово "база", то есть он имел в виду довольно крупный объект, который должен включать в себя не только причалы, но также и инфраструктуру для технического обслуживания кораблей, в идеале - док и судоремонтный завод, казармы для размещения экипажей и персонала базы, части ПВО и аэродром. И все это - на островке плщадью 52 квадратных километра, значительную часть которого занимает вулкан. Старший научный сотрудник центра комплексных европейских и международных исследований Высшей школы экономики Василий Кашин рассказал Би-би-си, что в результате на Матуа может появиться лишь небольшой пункт материально-технического обслуживания кораблей, подобный Тартусу в Сирии, а деньги Россия будет вкладывать в уже существующие базы Тихоокеанского флота. Их на Дальнем Востоке пять - во Владивостоке, Фокино, Вилючинске (там базируются атомные подлодки), Советской Гавани и Петропавловске-Камчатском. "Может быть, это будет гавань, где будет несколько пирсов, опять же мы не знаем, сколько; там будет свой ледокол и пара буксиров, и какие-то небольшие силы будут постоянно дислоцироваться", - сказал он. При этом Кашин отметил, что даже если к острову сможет подойти, например, большой противолодочный корабль (первого ранга), то еще неизвестно, сколько таких кораблей там сможет обслуживаться одновременно и какой объем обслуживания они смогут там получить.
A hugely successful internet reality show has put hip-hop music into the national spotlight for the first time in China. With more than 2.5 billion views on China's largest online video hosting website, iQiyi, the Rap of China has seen dozens of Chinese rappers shoot to stardom. Showcasing young and feisty contestants locked in rap battle in front of a panel of celebrity judges, the show sparked debate, memes and catchphrases across the Chinese-speaking web. "Can you freestyle?" became a buzzword, after one of the celebrity judges, Kris Wu, used it to repeatedly grill contestants as he was questioned over his own hip hop legitimacy. Hip hop terms like "diss" - to put someone down - have crept into everyday conversation. The 12-episode show, which wrapped up last weekend, was hugely successful in bringing underground rappers such as HipHopMan, Tizzy T, PG One, Jony J, or VAVA to public attention. "It's like they ripped open a gap and found it full of gold," Wang Ke, or MC Bigdog, one of the contestants featured in the show, told the BBC. "Chinese rappers have been underestimated and neglected," Wang said. "Our net worth has grown exponentially after the show, but it should have done so a long time ago." Rappers like MC Bigdog were around long before Rap of China. The genre started gaining momentum in the early 2000s, influenced by American rappers like Eminem and Jay-Z. Rappers who did well might be signed to labels, music festivals and fashion brands. Some got to perform in clubs. The number of hip hop music venues and clubs has grown over the years, and national competitions like the China Iron Mic helped to spur on the scene in many cities. Yet in a society that doesn't encourage self expression, the rebel spirit of hip hop never really managed to take centre stage but stayed in its own ecosystem. For most rappers it has remained a hobby - some would even pay out of their own pockets to record albums. Rap of China, therefore, was a game changer. It was said to be the most expensive reality show in history with an investment of 200 million yuan ($30m; £23.7m). Some 700 aspiring rappers auditioned. Al Rocco mainly raps in English. He was eliminated in Rap of China in the first round because he didn't rap in Chinese. He then wrote an expletive-laden song, The Rap of China DISS, to show his contempt for the format. Although the show provided money for hip hop music to grow, "it's not real hip hop that is in the show," Al Rocco complains. He thinks the programme focuses on drama rather than the music itself so people who didn't know about hip hop would tune in to see it. "China is a hard market," says Al Rocco, a Hong Kong-born rapper who lives in Shanghai. "Hip hop is so small in China even though we've been doing it for so many years. You need money to bring that to the world," he says. Adding drama was not the only criticism Rap of China faces. Many have accused it of having an unfair selection process that favoured some contestants, and others pointed out that the set-up and theme were strikingly similar to South Korean hip hop reality TV show Show Me the Money. But the criticism that matters most to rappers and diehard underground hip hop fans in China is whether going mainstream would mean the end of what they see as "real hip hop". Wang Bo, or MC Webber, who many consider to be China's hip hop authority, was one of the many underground rappers who tried to steer clear of the show. Wang thinks even Xi Ha, the Chinese translation of "hip hop", was created to help make a quick profit. Over-commercialising hip hop will drain the creativity of young people and reduce the songs to "fast food music", he wrote on his microblog. However, MC Hotdog, who now has his own hip hop business managing rappers and performances, says he's hopeful about the new changes. "It was hard to keep hip hop real before in China because of all the politics in China," MC Hotdog said. "Now that the money problem is solved, hip hop artists don't have to worry about their livelihood. They will have more room to keep it real." "Real hip hop", MC Hotdog says, is for those underdogs in society to have a voice of peace, love, independence and unity. "We are not highly commercialised like in the US where hip hop is just about money and sex," MC Hotdog says. "What China offers is our long history and deeply cultured literature." This is not the only thing that China will offer though. Rap of China also had to face China's increasingly stringent internet censorship. The latest restriction is for online multimedia content like mini movies, reality shows and commentary programmes to avoid producing content that is vulgar, sensational or political. The "healthy and positive" environment the authorities require is not entirely in line with what's considered "real hip hop", but what we already see is hip hop living in harmony with Chinese characteristics. "Like Chairman Mao said, borrow what's good from the West and use it in China," says one of the contestants MC Sun Bayi, who is known for performing in formal business attire. "The Chinese invented gunpowder and the Westerners made firearms with it. Now they have hip hop, and we will make it Chinese." "I don't like rapping about what I shouldn't rap about anyway, especially things not in line with Socialist values," MC Sun Bayi says, shrugging off concerns that hip hop is losing its edge. "This is the Chinese version of hip hop," he concludes.
The spice saffron, as well as being famously expensive, is packed with antioxidants. It is said to help combat depression and lower blood pressure, to soften your skin and hair and is essential in a broad range of dishes from Swedish buns to paella. So what's stopping it becoming as fashionable as turmeric and cinnamon? Is it just its high price? In my palm I have five tiny strands, like pieces of slightly fraying dark red sewing thread, which smell rather like a fruity tobacco. Four of them I'm placing into a cup and dousing with warm water; they're destined for the cooking pot. The fifth I place on my tongue. I'm told this taste test is essential to check that what I'm using is proper saffron. After all, if you've spent more than £5 for a gram of anything, you want to be sure it's the real thing. And after a few seconds I'm gratified that, despite having languished at the back of my spice cupboard for quite some time, the tiny threads are still capable of imparting the heady floral aroma, the honey notes, and the slight astringency I've been promised. And the strands in the water are leaching an orangey hue, as they should. Saffron is central to national cuisines from Morocco to the Himalayas, essential to dishes from risotto Milanese to Kashmiri curry. As well as being a sought-after culinary ingredient the versatile spice is also increasingly being added to medications and cosmetics. Cleopatra used it to infuse her bathwater. Alexander the Great bathed his battle wounds with it and drank saffron tea. In the 14th Century it was used to combat bubonic plague It is a key ingredient in dishes from Spanish paella, to Persian rice dishes and Indian curries It is added to products from coffee to salt, skin creams to shampoos. Saffron has been used in traditional medicine to treat menstrual problems, depression, asthma and sexual dysfunction It has been trialled in research for conditions from memory loss to cancer, but the evidence so far is inconclusive And yet the reputation of the spice, dubbed "red gold", still does not glister quite as brightly as perhaps it should. Keith Alaniz, an American soldier-turned-entrepreneur, thinks he understands why. After serving in Afghanistan, he and two other veterans decided to establish a social enterprise based on a crop that could offer locals better returns than illegal opium poppy cultivation. Their company, Rumi Spice, buys saffron crocuses from local growers and employs 380 Afghan women to do the painstaking work of separating the tiny rust-red stigmas in the centre of the crocus from its petals, stamens and the rest of the flower head, prior to being dried and packed for export. It's those long laborious hours of work that makes saffron so expensive. Rumi Spice sells its saffron - higher grade than the one from my kitchen cupboard - for $18 (£14) per gram. Mr Alaniz says saffron's high price tag is the reason it has so much promise in war torn Afghanistan. But it is also in many ways the root of its biggest problem: it makes it extremely tempting for counterfeiters. "A lot of the reason saffron hasn't taken off is because of the adulteration that you've seen." He says they're battling against the disappointment some shoppers have felt in the past. They've spent money on an extravagant product, only to find it didn't have much flavour because it was substandard or even fake saffron. "What we've seen with chefs and foodies is, once they see what high quality saffron tastes like, they're blown away by the flavour and aroma," says Mr Alaniz. Their saffron is now doing well with specialist buyers and high end restaurants. And they hope to rebuild its reputation amongst ordinary consumers in the same way. But the plan will only work if the product consistently delivers on its promise; and despite recent efforts to introduce more rigorous standards, stories continue to circulate of horse hairs, corn silks, and shredded paper, all masquerading as saffron. Earlier this year there were reports of the synthetic food colourings tartrazine and sunset yellow being used in counterfeit powdered saffron. Sally Francis, botanist and saffron grower, says only a few weeks ago she saw safflower, a common substitute from the unrelated thistle family, being sold as saffron in a street market in the Netherlands. And she's met plenty of tourists returning from exotic holidays with what they thought was bargain saffron, only to find out it was bogus. Even legitimate saffron can vary enormously depending on how it's produced, she says. "You can have a huge range in saffron quality, with no indication on the packaging as to what you are buying," says Ms Francis. Often it's simply that careless harvesting has meant some of the flavourless parts of the crocus have found their way into the final mix. It's still saffron but rather than "packing a punch" like the purest spice, what you're basically getting is "expensive yellow food colouring," she says. "The difference between a grade I and a grade III that's huge. You're talking Trabant and Lamborghini," she says. Check it has strands which are frayed at one end Look for a deep red hue that colours water orangey-yellow when submerged Smell it and put it on your tongue - fake saffron has very little aroma or flavour Real saffron will smell slightly fruity and floral It should taste sweet and bitter at the same time Ms Francis produces saffron on a small scale in Norfolk. The UK is a tiny player in the global saffron market, despite a saffron tradition going back several centuries. But it is one of many countries from New Zealand to Germany, Greece to India, where producers are recognising the potential for high-grade saffron, with transparent country of origin and quality labelling, to reassure consumers that it is worth the high price tag. In Iran which supplies around 90% of the world's saffron, there are signs that traceability and certification are becoming priorities. "We are trying to show the quality of Iranian saffron to other people in the world," says Mehrdad Rowhani, chief executive of a family-owned wholesaler from Mashhad, the city at the heart of Iran's saffron growing region. After years hampered by American sanctions, which meant a lot of Iranian saffron ended up exported in bulk to be repackaged and sold as "produce of Spain" or sold via backdoor bartering deals, Iranian producers are again able to sell directly to western customers. This could have more impact than anything else on the standard of saffron available to ordinary shoppers, as Iran's producers embrace the opportunity to emphasise the authenticity, origin and quality of their product. Mr Rowhani says his firm's exports have already more than doubled since sanctions were lifted. "We started exporting to the United States and we have good - and big - customers from there," he says. Now he's focusing on improving every step of the production process from planting, harvesting and drying, to selling in smaller, better designed packaging. "When they see Persian saffron is of high quality, they want to buy more," he adds.
The European Union is preparing for the UK to leave without a deal, a senior official has said. Stefaan De Rynck said Brussels did not want a "no deal" scenario but it was braced for one. Mr De Rynck is an adviser to EU chief Brexit negotiator Michel Barnier. He dismissed claims by David Davis that the EU would push talks on a deal to the wire saying the bloc did not want to "add risk" to the exit process by "playing with time". Davis warned over Brexit vote promise "Brexit is a process we want to manage in a calm and rational way," Mr De Rynck told a seminar at the Institute for Government think tank in London, adding that failing to reach a deal would harm both sides. He said: "There is a clear negative impact from no deal, I think that that is clear, for both sides but especially for the UK economy. But it is not a scenario people want to work towards. "We are preparing for it, that is for sure, at 27 [the other 27 EU states] but it is not a scenario that we in the negotiation room want to bring in that negotiation room." He added: "On going to the wire, we would certainly want to avoid that." As it stands, the UK will leave the EU in March 2019 whether it agrees a deal on the terms of withdrawal or not. Prime Minister Theresa May has said she believes the two sides will reach a deal but the UK must prepare for all eventualities. The so-called divorce bill, the amount the UK will pay to settle its liabilities when it leaves the EU, remains a major sticking point in negotiations. Hopes that negotiations would move on to Britain's future relationship with the EU this month were dashed after EU chiefs said more work was needed first on the divorce talks. Mr De Rynck said "sufficient progress is not far away" but the UK must set out how it believes the divorce bill should be calculated to end the deadlock over money. "In terms of the guidelines for the future relationship as well as the possible transition, all of that can come very quickly," he said. Earlier this month, European Council President Donald Tusk said the rest of the EU was not preparing for a no deal outcome. "EU27 is not working on 'no-deal' scenario," he said. "We negotiate in good faith and hope for sufficient progress by December."
Tech giants Amazon and Google's parent Alphabet have posted a surge in sales over the last three months. Shares in Alphabet jumped above $1,000 in after-hours trading after the company reported sales up 24% to $27.8bn. Amazon, the world's biggest e-commerce site, saw sales rise 34% to $43.7bn - nearly the size of Slovenia's economy last year. Meanwhile, Microsoft's profit beat estimates on gains from cloud services. Alphabet's profits for the three months to 30 September rose to $7.8bn, from $5.6bn for the same quarter last year. Analysis: Tech results bring sweet Valley highs The company's chief financial officer, Ruth Porat, said the firm was delighted with the way it was performing. "We had a terrific quarter, with revenues up 24% year on year, reflecting strength across Google and Other Bets," she said. "Our momentum is a result of investments over many years in fantastic people, products and partnerships." Google continues to make up the vast majority of Alphabet's revenue and income. However the so-called Other Bets unit, which includes the Waymo driverless car business and the Project Loon WiFi-enabled weather balloon venture, saw revenue increase and losses fall. Total Other Bets revenue was up to $302m, from $197m last year. YouTube continued to see "phenomenal growth", said Google chief executive Sundar Pichai in a conference call, with more than 1.5 billion people spending an average of an hour a day watching videos there on mobile devices, and surging use on television screens in homes. Despite Amazon's sales growth, the firm's profits were nearly flat as it ploughed money into tech gadgets, streaming video, data centres and warehouses to support its growing empire. The firm said profits in the three months to the end of September were $256m, up from $252m in 2016. Shares surged in after-hours trade anyway, as investors, who had been expecting a smaller number after being warned to expect the reinvestment, cheered the firm's growth prospects. Chief executive Jeff Bezos said the Amazon sales increase was in part down to the growing demand for the firm's smart home products, which are powered by artificially intelligent assistant, Alexa. "In the last month alone, we've launched five new Alexa-enabled devices, introduced Alexa in India, announced integration with BMW, surpassed 25,000 skills, integrated Alexa with Sonos speakers, taught Alexa to distinguish between two voices, and more," Mr Bezos said. Upmarket grocer Whole Foods, which Amazon acquired in August, brought in $1.3bn in sales in the quarter. Excluding Whole Foods, sales increased 29%, Amazon said. Sales were up 35% overall in North America, which accounts for the bulk of Amazon's business. They increased 29% in its international division thanks in part to a Prime Day surge, but the unit is still running at an operating loss. The firm also said it now has nearly 542,000 full and part-time staff, including workers from Whole Foods. It continues to look at ways to expand its physical stores as well. Microsoft said it earned revenue of $24.5bn in the three months to end-September, up 12% year-on-year. The firm's profits were $6.6bn, rising 16%. Microsoft shares rose 3.1% after-hours to a record $81.2. Microsoft said growth was driven in part by its cloud computing products, which it has focused on in a bid to be less reliant on computer sales and older software. Amy Hood, executive vice-president and chief financial officer at Microsoft, called it a "strong start" to the year. The firm reported $6.9bn in revenue from its intelligent cloud unit, up 14% year-on-year. Its productivity and business processes division, which includes sales from Office 365, reported $8.2bn in revenue, up 28%. A fourth tech company, Intel, also posted a jump in revenues and profit. The world's largest computer chip maker said revenue rose 2% during the quarter to $16.1bn, with net income up 34% to $4.52bn.
The only Arab to be awarded Israel's highest honour for saving Jews during the Nazi Holocaust has posthumously received his award. Egyptian doctor Mohamed Helmy hid a young Jewish woman and helped her family in Berlin, where he lived and had worked before World War Two. A descendant of Dr Helmy, who died in 1982, was presented with the award at a ceremony in the city. Some 70 Muslims are among 26,500 non-Jews recognised by Israel as saviours. Righteous Among Nations award bestowed for first time to an Arab Dr Mohamed Helmy who bravely rescued a Jewish family in the holocaust pic.twitter.com/6XvKcPpHnO End of Twitter post by @JIssacharoff Mohamed Helmy had settled in Berlin in 1922, where he studied medicine and worked at a hospital. He himself suffered racial discrimination under the Nazis, lost his job and was twice arrested. As persecution of Germany's Jews intensified, Dr Helmy provided a hiding place for one of his patients, 21-year-old Anna Boros, at a property he owned in the city. He managed to shelter her from the Gestapo and provide assistance to her mother, stepfather and grandmother until the end of the war in 1945. Later on, Anna Boros, wrote: "Dr Helmy did everything for me out of the generosity of his heart, and I will be grateful to him for all eternity." Dr Helmy was recognised by Yad Vashem - Israel's national Holocaust Memorial institution - as Righteous Among the Nations in 2013. His award was presented to his great-nephew, Nasser Kotby - also a doctor - at the Israeli embassy in Berlin. Anna Boros's daughter also came from New York to honour him at the event.
දඬුවම් ලබා සිර ගත කෙරෙන නේපාලයේ මව්වරුන් බොහෝ විට බන්ධනාගාර තුළ රඳවා තබනු ලබන්නේ ඔවුන්ගේ බාල වියේ පසුවන දරුවන් ද සමගය. අවුරුදු පහ සම්පූර්ණ වූ පසු එම දරුවන් ඔවුන්ගේ මව්වරුන්ගෙන් වෙන් කෙරේ. ඉන්දිරා රණමගර්, එවැනි දරුවන්ට අධ්‍යාපනය ලබා දී පැහැබර අනාගතයක් උරුම කර දීම සඳහා කැප වූ දිරිය කාන්තාවකි. බන්ධනාගාර රැඳවියන්ගේ දරුවන් වෙනුවෙන් ඇය නේපාලය පුරා ළමා නිවාස ආරම්භ කර තිබේ. "සෑම දරුවෙකුටම නිවසක් තිබිය යුතුයි. සෑම දරුවෙකුටම කුසට අහරක් ලැබිය යුතුයි. ආත්ම ගරුත්වයෙන් ජීවත් වීමේ අයිතිය ඔවුන්ට හිමි විය යුතුයි. එයයි මගේ සටන, එයයි මගේ සිහිනය" යනුවෙන් ඇය කියා සිටියාය. දරුවන් ඇය අමතන්නේ 'අම්මා' යන නමිනි. වසර 27 කාලයක් තුළ තමන් විසින් දරුවන් 1600 අධික සංඛ්‍යාවක් බේරා ගනු ලැබ ඇතැයි ඇය සඳහන් කළාය. ගැහැණු ළමයෙකු වීමත් දුගී පරිසරයක හැදී වැඩීමත් නිසා ඉන්දිරාට පාසල් අධ්‍යාපනය ලැබීමට වරම් ලැබී නොමැත. "මගේ සහෝදරයා පාසල් ගියා නමුත් ගැහැණු ළමයෙක් නිසා මාව පාසල් යැවුවේ නැහැ. මගේ සහෝදරයා ඉස්කෝලේ ගිහින් ඇවිත් ගෙදරවැඩ කරද්දී මම ඒවා ඉගෙන ගත්තා. නමුත් මට පැන්සලක් තිබ්බේ නැහැ" යනුවෙන් ඇය සිය අතීතය සිහිපත් කරන්නීය. පොත් පැන්සල් නොතිබූ හෙයින් පොළොවේ අකුරු ලියමින් තමන් විසින්ම ඉගනීමේ යෙදුණු බව ඇය වැඩිදුරටත් සඳහන් කළාය. රැඳවියන්ගේ දරුවන්ට අමතරව දෙමව්පියන් විසින් හැර දමා යනු ලැබූ දරුවන්ට ද ඇය පිහිට වන්නීය. සබැඳි යොමු:
حذر متخصصون في طب العيون من مخاطر ارتداء العدسات اللاصقة التنكرية في عيد القديسين (الهالوين)، قائلين إن هذا قد يؤدي إلى إصابة العين بالتهابات وخدوش. وغالبا ما تُباع عدسات لاصقة في متاجر الأزياء التنكرية وعلى مواقع الإنترنت، لاستخدامها في احتفالات الهالوين. لكنها تُباع دون أن تكون مرفقة بتعليمات بشأن الاستخدام الآمن. ويقول خبراء في طب العيون إن العدسات اللاصقة لا يجب أن تُستخدم من قبل أكثر من شخص، أو تُخزن في مياه الصنبور أو تظل ملامسة للعين أثناء النوم. وفي الحالات القصوى، قد يؤدي هذا إلى ضعف الرؤية وفقدان البصر. وقالت رابطة أخصائي البصريات في بريطانيا إن أعضاءها كثيرا ما يرون أشخاصا يعانون من مشاكل في العين بعد استخدام العدسات اللاصقة التنكرية. ودعت الرابطة من يشارك في احتفالات الهالوين إلى ارتداء العدسات التي تباع تحت إشراف الأخصائيين المعتمدين في مجال صحة العين. وقال بادرول حسين، الخبير الاستشاري في جراحة العيون بمستشفى مورفيلدز للعيون، إنه في كل عام يعالج مرضى، بينهم أطفال دون سن 16 عاما، يعانون من مشاكل في العين بعد ارتداء العدسات اللاصقة التنكرية. وأشار حسين إلى أن مشاكل العين تزداد أثناء فترة الاحتفال بالهالوين. وأضاف "تكون هناك آثار مدمرة في بعض الحالات التي نراها لمرضى يستخدمون نفس العدسات مع أصدقاء ويرتدون نفس العدسات عاما بعد عام بعد انتهاء تاريخ الصلاحية، ويضعون العدسات فى مياه الصنبور". وتابع "عدم معرفة أساسيات استخدام العدسات اللاصقة بأمان قد يعرضك لخطر الإصابة بإصابات مؤلمة في العين، وفي أسوأ الحالات، خطر فقدان البصر بشكل دائم". اضغط هنا لتنزيل تطبيق بي بي سي عربي الخاص بمستخدمي نظام أندرويد تابع أحدث الأخبار من بي بي سي عربي ومن شبكة صحفييها العالمية في تطبيق جديد خاص بمستخدمي نظام #أندرويد. حمل التطبيق الآن! http://bit.ly/2ikGmBK نهاية فيسبوك الرسالة التي بعث بها BBC Arabic
A cold rain was falling as the men carried the small bundle towards me. They were insisting I should take it. A crowd had gathered. The only light came from the phones we carried; there had not been electricity for months. The men stopped and slowly, carefully unwrapped the blanket. At first, I could not make out what was inside. Then it suddenly dawned on me that it was an old man. He was wearing a jumper and black tracksuit bottoms. His little stick legs dangled in the air. His mouth lolled open. His eyes stared into nothingness. He was hovering between life and death. The men looked at me expectantly. But there was nothing we could do. A couple of hours earlier, we had entered the town of Madaya. An hour's drive from the Syrian capital, Damascus, the town had been under siege for months. Tortuous negotiations had taken place to gain access to this, and other, besieged towns. Now, my organisation, the International Committee of the Red Cross (ICRC), along with the Syrian Arab Red Crescent and the UN, had been allowed to bring in much-needed aid. Civilians under siege in Syria International system has failed Syria The story of the Syrian conflict But Madaya is just one of dozens, if not hundreds, of places in Syria where humanitarian assistance is desperately needed. There is a colossal level of suffering. The war has been raging for nearly five years. 250,000 people are dead; 13 million are in need of assistance. Nearly half a million are living in besieged areas. What is needed is a genuine and sustained effort to alleviate that suffering. At the moment, that is just not happening. Take the relief operation in Madaya. It took literally months to negotiate. From the start, the aid to Madaya, in the south, was linked to the delivery of aid to two towns in the north of the country, Foua and Kefraya. Whereas Madaya is besieged by pro-Syrian government forces, Foua and Kefraya - which are suffering just as much as Madaya - are besieged by opposition groups. One town could not be given relief without relief going to the others - and at exactly the same time. This system was so strictly followed that when one truck literally got stuck in the mud in the north, the trucks in the south could not move until it was freed. No food could be delivered to one town until it was shown - via photos on WhatsApp - that the same food was being delivered to the other side. Aid by synchronisation. This is not the way to run relief operations. Back in Madaya, I was taken to what was euphemistically called the "health centre". It was, in fact, one room in the basement of a house. Ushered into the semi-darkness, I was met by the sight of limp bodies lying on blue blankets on the floor: elderly people, weak from hunger and illness. There were several children, hollow-faced. I noticed the needle marks on their arms where drips had been administered to try to give them the sustenance they needed to survive. The doctor, in a bloodied white coat, took me to the one and only bed. It had two occupants. One was a young woman on the verge of giving birth, but she had been drifting in and out of consciousness for the past four days. The second was an eight-year-old girl, unable to speak and move. She was too weak. There was silence. Then, next to me, the doctor started to cry. Peace talks come and go. And still the killing goes on. All sides have been using what can only be termed "siege warfare", like something from the Middle Ages, where one side tries to starve the other into submission. As ever, it is the ordinary citizen who suffers. So as humanitarian workers, what should we do? Yes, we can talk about how all sides should respect "international humanitarian law" - I mean respect civilians, do not attack hospitals, respect the dignity of the detainee. Yes, we can talk about the need for "access"; allow humanitarian workers into areas to help the hungry, the ill and the wounded. But what do we mean in practice? Let the humanitarian workers do their jobs. If an eight-year-old girl needs food, give it to her. If a 70-year-old man needs medical care, give it to him. Do not put lives at risk because a truck is stuck in mud, or one food parcel is not exactly the same as another. Speed up negotiations wherever possible; this can save lives. And let us return, again and again to these places, so that we can continue to provide assistance. Be humane. Keep your humanity. Even under the greatest strains of war. In Madaya, there was another moment that moved me. A woman came up to me and, despite everything, and knowing her plight was far from over, she was smiling. I presumed she was just happy because we had brought the aid in. I was wrong. She lent forward and whispered to me: 'You know what you have done, you people who have come here from the outside? By talking to us, by remembering us, you brought us back something else: our dignity. Thank you."
41382430 Almanya'da genel geçim sonuçlarının zorlu geçecek koalisyon görüşmelerini gündeme getirmesi , piyasaların da belirsiz bir tabloyla karşı karşıya kalmasına yol açtı. Başbakan Angela Merkel'in liderliğindeki Hristiyan Demokratik Birlik (CDU/CSU) seçimleri kazansa da Sosyal Demokrat Parti'nin (SPD) muhalefette kalacağını söylemesi, büyük koalisyonun uzak bir ihtimal olarak kalmasına neden oldu. Bu yüzden Merkel'in Hür Demokrat Parti ve Yeşiller Partisi ile uzun sürecek koalisyon görüşmelerine girmesi bekleniyor. Diğer yandan aşırı sağcı Almanya için Alternatif Partisi'nin (AfD) parlamentoya girmesi de uzun vadede analistler tarafından Euro Bölgesi için bir risk olarak görülüyor. Almanya'da düzenlenen seçim sonuçlarına ilk tepki ise Asya piyasalarının açılmasının ardından euronun iki günlük yükselişini durdurarak düşüşe geçmesiyle görüldü. Pazartesi günü Yeni Zelanda'da euro, Amerikan dolarına karşı yüzde 0,4 düşerek 1,1903'a kadar indi. Euro Bölgesi'nin para birimi bu yıl yüzde 13 değer kazanmıştı. #Euro opens lower as Merkel faces German coalition change and anti-Euro party AfD surges into parliament. pic.twitter.com/DEwcUoMOIZ @Schuldensuehner tarafından yapılan numaralı Twitter paylaşımının sonu Alman gazetesi Die Welt'in kıdemli finans editörü Holger Zschaepitz da attığı tweetinde, "Euro, Merkel'in koalisyon engeli ile karşılaşması ve euro karşıtı parti AfD'nin parlamentoya girmesiyle düştü" ifadesini kullandı. Brüksel merkezli Bruegel düşünce kuruluşunun direktörü olan ekonomist Guntram Wolff, BBC Türkçe'ye yaptığı açıklamada hükümetin uzun bir sürede kurulması durumuna piyasaların tepkisinin olumsuz olacağını söylüyor. Ancak Wolff'a göre durum çok da dramatik değil. Saxo Bank'ın kur stratejisinin başında bulunan John Hardy ise sonuçların euronun aleyhine olduğunu söylüyor: "Avrupa Birliği adına en iyi sonuç büyük koalisyon olduğu için sonuçlar euro aleyhine, büyük koalisyon olsaydı Fransa Cumhurbaşkanı Macron'un da öngördüğü gibi daha çok mali entegrasyonun sağlandığını görebilirdik. "Ancak şimdi SPD kendileri adına felaket gibi gelen sonuçların ardından muhalefet olmaya karar verdiği için tek seçenek CDU, Hür Demokrat Parti ve Yeşiller Partisi'nden oluşan garip koaliyon gibi gözüküyor. Hür Demokrat Parti ise Almanya'nın AB projesine olan bağlılığına karşı çıkıyor." Hardy ayrıca aşırı sağcı Almanya için Alternatif Partisi'nin (AfD) parlamentoya girmesinin risk iştahı açısından parlak olmayacağını vurguluyor. İş Yatırım Uluslararası Piyasalar Müdürü Şant Manukyan, "Tek bir seçim ile euronun beli kırılmaz ancak var olmasına rağmen unutulan bazı riskler akıllara gelecektir" açıklamasında bulunuyor. Manukyan, AfD'nin ilk etkisinin ise Merkel'in daha sağa kaymasıyla göstereceğini söylüyor: "Bölgenin en başarılı ekonomisinde bile böyle bir parti zafer kazanabiliyorsa sorunu sadece 'kemer sıkma politikalarına' bağlamak hatalı olur."
قضت المحكمة العليا الأسترالية بعدم أهلية كل من نائب رئيس الوزراء الأسترالي، بارنابي جويس، وأربعة سياسيين آخرين لتولي مناصب عامة بسبب ازدواجية الجنسية. وقالت المحكمة إن قرارها يعني أن ثلاثة ساسة بمن فيهم جويس انتخبوا خطأ لتولي مناصب عامة، في حين غادر اثنان آخران مناصبهما في شهر يوليو/ تموز الماضي. ويحظر الدستور الأسترالي انتخاب من يملك جنسية أخرى بجانب الجنسية الأسترالية، وقد قال جويس تعقيبا على القرار "أحترم قرار المحكمة، إننا نعيش في ديمقراطية رائعة. أخذا في الاعتبار الضوابط والتوازنات التي أعطيت لنا، فإننا نرى هذه الحريات. أشكر المحكمة على قرارها الذي اتخذته بعد مداولاتها". ويحرم قرار تجريد جويس من منصبه الحكومة من الأغلبية بمقعد واحد في البرلمان، لكنه يمكن أن يستعيد مقعده عن طريق الانتخابات الفرعية. وتعهد نائب رئيس الوزراء الذي تخلى عن جنسية نيوزيلاندا في شهر أغسطس/آب الماضي بخوض الانتخابات الفرعية لاستعادة مقعده في الغرفة السفلى من البرلمان الأسترالي. من هم النواب الذين يملكون الجنسية المزدوجة؟ وقد حُرم أعضاء في مجلس الشيوخ من مناصبهم وهم فيونا ناش، ومالكوم روبرتس، ولاريسا واترز، وسكوت لودام . فيما يوجد سياسيان تحت المراقبة وهما مات كانافان ونيك زينوفون وقد صدر قرار المحكمة في حقهما يقضي بأنهما غير مؤهلين لانتخابهما من أجل تولي مناصب عامة. يُذكر أن مسألة الجنسية المزدوجة أرَّقت المشهد السيساسي في أستراليا منذ شهر يوليو/تموز الماضي، الأمر الذي دفع عشرات السياسيين إلى تسوية أوضاعهم بهدف البقاء في مناصبهم. وأصبحت حكومة رئيس الوزراء الأسترالي، مالكوم تونبال، بعد تجريد جويس من منصبه تملك 75 مقعدا في مجلس النواب المتكون من 150 مقعدا، الأمر الذي يعني أنه يشرف على حكومة أقلية. لكن رئيس الحكومة قد يستعيد الأغلبية وهي 76 مقعدا لو استعاد جويس مقعده البرلماني في الانتخابات الفرعية، علما بأن هذا الأخير يحق له أن يخوض الانتخابات الفرعية في الثاني من ديسمبر/ كانون الأول القادم بعدما يتخلى عن جنسية نيوزيلندا. وسيكون رئيس الحكومة في حاجة إلى دعم النواب المستقلين والأحزاب الصغرى لتمرير القوانين التشريعية. واضطر رئيس الوزراء إلى تعديل تركيبته الحكومية لأن جويس وناش كانا يتوليان حقائب وزارية. وقالت المعارضة العمالية إن القرارات التي اتخذها وزيران في الحكومة "تشوبها ضبابية قانونية" ويمكن الطعن فيها.
Uma terapia que tem o potencial de proteger bebês no útero de mulheres infectadas pelo vírus Zika está em desenvolvimento por cientistas americanos. Até agora, o tratamento foi testado apenas em ratos de laboratório, conforme revelou a revista científica Nature. No entanto, os cientistas afirmam que a técnica pode eventualmente levar a uma terapia disponível para mulheres grávidas que venham a contrair o vírus Zika, causador de microcefalia em recém-nascidos. A terapia utiliza anticorpos de células sanguíneas de indivíduos que já combateram o Zika. Nos ratos de laboratório, o tratamento diminuiu de forma substancial a quantidade de vírus em circulação no sangue materno. Consequentemente, a placenta foi menos afetada e os ratinhos nasceram muito maiores do que os filhotes das mães que não haviam recebido o tratamento. Os pesquisadores ressaltaram que ainda serão necessários anos de testes para se ter certeza de que o tratamento será seguro e efetivo para ser implementado em mulheres grávidas. No meio tempo, cientistas também concentram esforços para o desenvolvimento de uma vacina que poderia evitar que o vírus se prolifere. "Até se nós tivermos um dia uma vacina contra o Zika, ainda assim algumas pessoas serão infectadas," afirmou a professora Laura Rodrigues, da London School of Hygiene and Tropical Medicine. "Para essas pessoas, um tratamento como esse, com a utilização de anticorpos, seria útil", explicou a especialista. Surtos do vírus Zika foram registrados no continente americano e, mais recentemente, no Sudeste Asiático. No Brasil, o último boletim divulgado pelo Ministério da Saúde registrou 200.465 casos prováveis de febre pelo vírus Zika entre janeiro e setembro de 2016, tendo sido confirmados 109.596 casos. Os Estados de Mato Grosso, Rio de Janeiro e Bahia foram aqueles com maior incidência de infecções pelo vírus. Entre gestantes, o número de casos prováveis registrados no Brasil foi de 16.473, sendo 9.507 confirmados. No total, 9.862 casos de microcefalia foram notificados até outubro, sendo 2.063 confirmados.
Big banks beware - innovative technology challengers are coming to eat your lunch. Special Report: The Technology of Business How do businesses cope with Bitcoin? Tapping into the IT cloud crowd 2014: The year of encryption Stress test: Are you fit for work? 2013: The year we all went 'mobile' That was the key message emerging last week from FinTech City London, a series of events for financial services technology professionals organised by the CEO Agenda and Icon Corporate Finance. Fintech, as financial services technology is modishly called, is enabling nimbler, hi-tech companies to re-engineer most financial activities, from payments processing to personal loan applications, and cut out the middleman. It's what Clayton Christensen, professor of business administration at Harvard Business School, calls "disruptive innovation". While the things we do with money - save, borrow, invest, spend - have not changed much over the centuries, the way we interact with financial institutions is "drastically changing", said Alex Scandurra, director of innovation strategy and business development at Barclays. And that's largely to do with mobile, open-source databases and cloud computing. About three-quarters of the UK population owns a smartphone, and there are more than five billion mobile phones globally. "As a result of the proliferation of technology, digital, and now mobile with it, the barriers to entry have significantly decreased," said Mr Scandurra. "Now we're seeing that teams of 10 to 15 people can actually take on the large incumbents all around the world." Whereas big financial institutions have to cater for a mass market and try to please everybody, small fintech companies can focus on niche markets, globally spread. They can form what futurist and writer Alvin Toffler called "the micro multinational". One such company is Funding Circle, the peer-to-peer (P2P) lending service launched in 2010, which aims to provide businesses with access to loan funding while providing investors with a decent return on their money. Its 65,000-plus investors have lent over £208m to UK businesses so far. In March 2013, the UK government began lending £20m to British businesses through Funding Circle as part of its Business Finance Partnership scheme. Co-founder and chief executive Samir Desai said that while his company had certainly benefited from the 2008-13 banking crisis and the consequent collapse of trust in High Street banks, it is new open-source technologies and databases that have enabled P2P lending companies to grow. "Every loan that goes through Funding Circle is funded on average by 700 different people," he said "Those loans can then be bought and sold by other investors through a secondary market. So we have as many mini-loans going through our system as any bank, and thousands of secondary market transactions going through each day. "We couldn't have done that without these new open-source technologies." Open-source databases that anyone can access and adapt, such as Hadoop and Cassandra, can process and structure vast amounts of data from a wide and growing range of sources, including social media, helping P2P lenders and other financial companies assess creditworthiness to much higher degrees of accuracy than before. "Banks haven't started to embrace these new types of technology," said Mr Desai. "So we can lend to businesses they wouldn't even consider." So now even your Twitter comments could affect whether or not you're granted a loan, and companies like Facebook could end up displacing old-fashioned credit reference agencies. Giles Andrews, chief executive and co-founder of Zopa, a more established P2P lender founded in 2005 that has lent more than £455m to individuals and sole traders, agrees that customer data - its efficient collection and analysis - is key to success these days. "The business is not a bank and I'm not a banker," he added. "We're more of a data company." This is why Zopa has just hired its first ever chief data scientist, he said, who comes not from a bank, but from Amazon, the online retailer. Newer fintech companies are not encumbered by old technology, the so-called legacy systems that traditional banks struggle to integrate with newer software and hardware. The Lloyds Banking Group IT glitch, which affected debit card and cash machine transactions at the weekend, is the latest in a long line of big bank technology problems. "It's an opportunity for the new challengers who don't have that legacy issue," said Sue Langley, chief executive of UK Trade & Investment's Financial Services Organisation, "because it's much easier with a blank sheet of paper to.... come up with something new." "The banks have an increasing need for technology," said Mark Boleat, chair of the City of London's policy and resources committee. "Some of that comes from their huge IT departments, but an awful lot of it is coming from new and start-up businesses." Alex McCracken, director of ventures groups at Silicon Valley Bank's UK arm, believes we will see a polarisation in financial services, with global all-you-can-eat banks serving multinationals at one end, and small, technology-driven niche players serving local needs at the other. "Corporates and small businesses are going to be able to pick and choose their niche service providers," he said. Mobile payment companies like Square, simpler direct debit providers like GoCardless, and foreign currency specialists like The Currency Cloud, all are offering financial services at lower cost and greater convenience through clever use of the latest technologies. Are the big banks running scared? Last week, US banking giant Wells Fargo banned some of its staff from investing in for-profit P2P lending companies, such as Lending Club and Prosper, admitting that they were competitors. That is the wrong approach, argues Barclays' Alex Scandurra. His bank is collaborating more with tech entrepreneurs and start-ups, as well as offering non-banking products such as Cloud It, an online data storage service. He calls the approach "amplification through collaboration". Labour leader Ed Miliband may want to increase competition by forcing big UK banks to offload High Street branches, but to many observers, this is a red herring. It is technology that is helping the fintech mouse take on the giants and roar.
ආදිත්‍යගේ සිරුරේ නූල්පොටක් නැත. එහෙත් ඔහු ජීවත් වන්නේ ප්‍රසිද්ධියේ නිරුවත්ව සිටීම සපුරා තහනම් දේශයකය. ඒ ඉන්දුනීසියාව. සිය ආහාර වේල පිළියෙළ කරමින් සිටින අතරවාරයේ, බීබීසී ඉන්දුනීසියානු සේවයේ මාධ්‍යවේදිනී ක්ලාරා රොන්දොනුවූ (Clara Rondonuwu) සමඟ කතාබහක නිරත වෙමින් සිටින අතරේ වැලි කකුළුවන්,බිත්තර සහ චීන ගෝවා බදිමින් තිබුණ විශාල භාජනයෙන් විසිර ගිය තෙල් බින්දු ආදිත්‍යගේ නිරුවත් උදරය ප්‍රදේශයට ඉසෙමින් තිබිණි. "මගේ ආහාරය මා විසින්ම පිළියෙළ කර ගනු ලැබීම ඇතුළුව මගේ දෛනික වැඩ කටයුතු මගේ අතින්ම කර ගන්න මම කැමතියි" ආදිත්‍ය පවසයි. "මට අවශ්‍ය වෙලාවට නිරුවත්ව සිටීම මගින් මම විශාල සතුටක් ලබනවා. ඇඳුම් නැතිව සිටීම පහසුයි. ඒ වගේම නිරුවත්ව සිටීම ඇඳුමකින් ඉන්නවාට වඩා සතුටක්." ඒ ආදිත්‍යගේ අදහසය. 'නග්නත්වය' සපුරා තහනම් සමාජයක එම තහංචිය කඩ කිරීම මගින් ආදිත්‍ය අනතුරක් භාර ගනී. එහෙත් ඒ නිසාම ඔහුට එල්ල වීමට ඉඩකඩ ඇති අනතුර හමුවේ ඔහු සිය සැබෑ නම හෙළිදරව් නොකරයි. මුස්ලිම් බහුතරයක් සහිත ඉන්දුනිසීයාවේ කාමෝද්දීපන ප්‍රචාරණය තහනම් වන අතර ප්‍රසිද්ධියේ නිරුවත්ව සිටීම නීතියට පටහැණිය. පුංචි නිරුවත් සමාජයක් ආදිත්‍යට ඔහු වැනි නිරුවත් වීමට මනාප තවත් සගයන් හතර දෙනකුගෙන් යුත් මිතුරු සමාජයක් ඇත. ඔවුහු නිරන්තරයෙන් මුණ ගැසෙති. "අපි ප්‍රසිද්ධියේ නිරුවත්ව ඉඳල අහු වුනොත් සිරගත කරාවි. ඒ නිසා තමයි අපට නිරුවත් වීම රහසිගතව සිදු කරන්න සිදු වෙලා තියෙන්නේ" ආදිත්‍ය පවසයි. මේ නිරුවත්ලෝලියා තමාට විවේක ඇති අවස්ථාවන්හි එසේ සිටීමට පටන් ගෙන ඇත්තේ 2007 වසරේ සිටය. "මම අන්තර්ජාල වෙබ් අඩවිවල සැරි සරනවා. 'නග්නත්වය' පිළිබඳව ලියැවුන ලිපි කියවනවා. මමත් ඒක ප්‍රායෝගිකව අත්හදා බලනවා. ඒක මම බලාපොරොත්තුව සිටි ජීවිතයේ කොටසක් වගෙයි" ඔහු පවසයි. මේ අතර ඔහු රටේ වෙනත් 'නිරුවත්ලෝලීන්' සමඟ ද සබඳතා පවත්වයි. ඔවුන්ගේ කණ්ඩායම කුඩා සංඛ්‍යාවකට සීමා වෙතත් කිට්ටු සබඳතා පවත්වා ගැනීම සඳහා ඔවුහු අධිෂ්ඨාන සහගතව සිටිති. 'ජකර්තා' නගරවාසී එම 'ප්‍රකෘතිවාදීන්'ගේ (naturists) සංඛ්‍යාව දහයත් පහළොවත් අතර වෙති. එම නග්නලෝලීන් අතර පුරුෂයෝ මෙන්ම කාන්තාවෝ ද සිටිති. ආදිත්‍ය විශ්වාස කරන පරිදි නිරුවත් වීම මගින් ඔවුන් අතර 'දිගුකාලීන පැවැත්මක් සහිත ශක්තිමත් සම්බන්ධතාවක්' ගොඩ නැගේ. "අපි අපි බවට පත් වෙනවා. අපි කවුරුවත් තමන්ගේ සිරුර ගැන ලජ්ජා වෙන්නේ නැහැ, කොච්චර මහතද? බඩ නෙරල තියෙනවද? පුරුෂ ලිංගය එල්ලා වැටෙනවද? පියයුරුවල ප්‍රමාණය කොයි තරම්ද? උපන් ලප තියෙනවාද? මේ කිසිම දෙයක් ගැන අපි කවුරුවත් ලජ්ජා වන්නේ නැහැ. අපි නිරුවත් සමාජයක් " ආදිත්‍ය සිය පිළිගැනීම් විස්තර කරයි. ඔහුගේ එම සිහිනය , ප්‍රංශය සහ ජර්මනිය වැනි රටවල ඇති නිරුවත් ජනපදයක් (nudist colonies) කරා යාමය. එවැනි නිරුවත් සමාජයක් තමා තෝරාගත් ජීවන රටාව 'අසාමාන්‍ය නොවන දෙයක්' හැටියට භාර ගනු ඇත යන්න ඔහුගේ විශ්වාසය වේ. එහෙත් ඉන්දුනීසියානු නීතියෙන් ප්‍රසිද්ධයේ නග්නව සිටීම සඳහා අවසරයක් නැත. එහෙත් නිරුවත්ව සිටීමට අවස්ථා ලාභයන් නැත'යන්න එයින් අදහස් නොවේ. සමාජමය තහංචි ඉදිරියේ නග්නලෝලීන් විසින් තෝරා ගනු ලැබ ඇති විකල්පයක් වන්නේ නිවාඩු නිකේතනයක් කුලියට ගනිමින් රිසි පරිදි කාලය ගෙවීමය. ජකර්තා අගනුවර අද්දර පිහිටි කඳුකර නිවාඩු නිකේතනයක් මෑතදී ඔවුන් විසින් කුලියට ගනු ලැබ තිබිණි. "තත්පර කීපයක් ඇතුළත අපි අපේ ඇඳුම් ගලවනවා. ඊළඟට අපි දේශපාලනයේ පටන් අපේ රැකියා දක්වා ඇති විවිධ මාතෘකා ගැන සංවාද සාකච්ඡා පවත්වමින් සාමාන්‍ය දවසක් ගත කරනවා" ආදිත්‍ය පවසයි. තමා ඉන්දුනීසියානු මුහුදු වෙරළේ රහස්‍ය කලාපයක පසුගිය දිනවල ගත කළ බවත් ඔහු බීබීසි සමග කියා සිටියේය. නිරුවත්වීම නිසා රටේ වෙනත් තැන්වල දී ලක් වෙන වෙනස්කම් ආදියට එම කලාපයේ දී තමන් ගොදුරු නොවන බවත් ආදිත්‍ය කියා සිටී. එය නග්න අවසර කලාපයක් නොවුනත් වෙරළේ ඝනව වැඩුණ තුරුලතා අතුපතර අතර හොඳින් සැඟව සිටිය හැකිබව ඔහු පෙන්වා දෙයි. "මම ඉතාම ප්‍රවේශමෙන් කාලය තෝරා ගත්තා. උදේ පාන්දරම නැගිටලා වෙරළ දිගේ ඇවිද්දා" තමාට මුහුණ දීමට සිදුවිය හැකි අන්තරාය ද නොතකා කටයුතු කරන ආදිත්‍ය සිය ජීවන රටාව නග්නලෝලීන් විසින් පවත්වා ගෙන යනු ලබන වෙබ් අඩවියක පළ කර ඇත. එසේම ඔහු සිය 'ඉන්ස්ටග්‍රෑම්' (Instagram) ගිණුමක තමා සහමුළින්ම නිරුවත්ව සිටින පින්තූර පළ කර ඇත. "ඉන්දුනීසියාවේ මිනිස්සු නිරුවත් වීම ලිංගික ක්‍රියාවන්ට සම්බන්ධ කරනවා." නග්නත්වය ප්‍රදර්ශන කාමය නොවන බව පෙන්වා දෙන ආදිත්‍ය කියා සිටී. "ඇඳුම් ගැලෙව්වාම මිනිස්සු හිතනවා - එය ලිංගික සබඳතා පිරුණ 'කාම උත්සවයක්' කියල. ඒත් ඇත්ත ඒක නොවෙයි. එතැන කිසිම ලිංගික ක්‍රියාකාරකමක් නැහැ" "නිරුවත්ව ඉන්නවාට වඩා ඇඳුම් වලින් ඇඟ වහගෙන ඉන්න එක හරිම ආචාරශීලීයි කියල හිතන එක කුහක කමක්" ආදිත්‍ය සමාජයට අභියෝග කරයි. දුෂ්කර ජීවන රටාවක් ඉන්දුනීසියාවට අයත් 'බෝර්නියෝ' දූපත්වාසී, සිය නම සඳහන් නොකළ නග්නලෝලියෙක් අදහස් දක්වමින්, එය සියරට තුළ 'දුෂ්කර ජීවන ශෛලියක්' බව පිළි ගත්තේය. ඔහු ප්‍රංශයේ සහ ජර්මනියේ නිරුවත් සමාජ සඳහා ඇති පිළිගැනීම සම්බන්ධයෙන් 'ඊර්ෂ්‍යා මුසුව' අදහස් දක්වයි. එසේම ඔහු විශ්වාස කරන පරිදි, ඉන්දුනීසියානු ව්‍යාපාර ක්ෂේත්‍රයට නිරුවත් වෙළෙඳපොල සඳහා බොහෝ සැපයුම් කළ හැකි වනු ඇත. මුස්ලිම් බහුතරයක් සහිත ඉන්දුනීසියාවේ වෙනත් කලාප වලට වඩා 'බාලි' දූපතේ නීතිය ලිහිල් හෙයින් එම දූපත කෙරෙහි නිරුවත් සමාජයේ අවධානය යොමු වෙමින් ඇත. එහෙත් 'බාලි' දූපතේ දැනට පවතින නිරුවත් මිත්‍රශීලී ආයතන "විදේශිකයන්ට පමණක් සීමා වී" ඇති බව බෝර්නියෝ දූපත්වාසී නිරුවත්ලෝලියා පෙන්වා දෙයි. 'බාලි' දූපත වැනි ස්ථානවල සංචාරක කාන්තාවන් උඩුකය නිරුවත්ව ඇවිදීමත්, සහමුළින්ම නිරුවත්ව දිය නාමින් ජල ක්‍රීඩාවන්හි නිරත වීමත් වසර හතළිහක පටන් පැවත එන්නකි. හින්දු ජනයා බහුතරය වන 'බාලි' දූපතේ වෙරළ තීරයන්හි නිරුවත් පුද්ගලයන් ප්‍රසිද්ධියේ දක්නට නොලැබෙන නමුත් ගල්පර මගින් වැසී ඇති හෙයින් වෙරළ තීර කීපයක් නග්නලෝලීන් අතර ජනප්‍රියව ඇත. බාලි දූපතේ සංචාරක ආයතනයක කළමනාකරුවෙක් අදහස් දක්වමින් "ඇඳුම් ඇඳීම ස්වකැමැත්ත මත" තීන්දු කළ හැකි බව පැවසෙන වෙළෙඳ ප්‍රචාරණයක් සහිත ස්ථාන දෙකක් තමා සතු බවත්, එම දූපතේ 'සෙමින්යැක්' (Seminyak) සංචාරක කලාපයේ එවැනි ස්ථාන දහයක් ඇති බවත් සඳහන් කළේය. "සමහර සංචාරක මධ්‍යස්ථාන තමන් නිරුවත් සංචාරකයන් භාර ගන්නා බව ප්‍රසිද්ධ කරන්නේ නැහැ. ඒත් බොහෝ විදේශිකයන් එම ස්ථානවල නිරුවත්ව ඉන්නවා" ඔහු වැඩි දුරටත් සඳහන් කළේය. "නිරුවත්ව සිටීම ඉහළ පන්තියේ මිනිසුන් අතර සාමාන්‍ය දෙයක්" ඔහු පෙන්වා දෙයි. බීබීසී වෙත කරුණු දැක්වූ එම සංචාරක කළමනාකරු තමා භාර ගනු ලබන්නේ විදේශීය අමුත්තන් පමණක් නමුත් වෙනත් සංචාරක ආයතන ඉන්දුනීසියානු දේශීය නග්නලෝලීන් ද පිළිගන්නා බව කියා සිටියේය. තමා සහ තම නිරුවත් සගයනුත් සෙසු මිනිසුන්ට සමාන "මිනිසුන්" බව අවබෝධ කර දීමට අවශ්‍ය බව ආදිත්‍ය මේ අතර පවසයි. "හුඟක් මිනිස්සු තමන්ට වෙනස් 'අසාමාන්‍ය දෙයක්' දැක්කාම පමණ ඉක්මවා කතා කරන්න යොමු වෙනවා. බලන්න! ඔවුන් සංක්‍රාන්තික ලිංගිකයන් සම්බන්ධයෙන් කුපිතකාරීව හැසිරෙන ආකාරය. මිනිස්සු ඔවුන්ට පහර දෙනවා" ආදිත්‍ය පෙන්වා දෙයි. "මම සදාචාරයක් නැති 'මිනිහෙක්' යැයි විනිශ්චය කරනු ලැබීම කනගාටුවක්! සමහරු අපිව හඳුන්වන්නේ 'සත්තු' විදිහටයි. මම මමයි. මම අස්වාභාවික විකාර රූපී මිනිහෙක් නොවෙයි. මම කාටවත් හිරිහැරයක් කරන්නේ නැහැ" ආදිත්‍ය සිය ස්ථාවරය පැහැදිලි කරන ලද්දේ එවැනි වචන සමුදායකිනි. එහෙත් සමාජයේ බොහෝ දෙනාට 'නිරුවත් සමාජය' සමඟ ගනුදෙනු කිරීමට අවබෝධයක් තවමත් නොමැති බව ද ආදිත්‍ය පිළිගනියි. සබැඳි පුවත්;
د فرانسې د کلتور مخکېنۍ وزیره اودري ازولای د ملګرو ملتونو کلتوري سازمان (یونیسکو) مشره ټاکل شوې ده. اغلې اودري ۳۰ رایې خپلې کړې. د هغې سیال د قطر د کلتور پخوانی وزیر حمد بن عبدالعزیز الکواري و، چې ایله ۲۸ رایې یې وګټلې. د یونیسکو د مشر ټاکلو لړۍ څو ورځې وخت واخیست. مصرۍ نومانده مشیره خطاب په یوه پړاو کې له پاتې راتلو وروسته د اغلې ازولای په ګټه له کاندیداتورۍ تېره شوه. د یونیسکو په نوملړ کې د بامیانو د پاېښت هڅې ملګري ملتونه په لومړي ځل یو افغان ته د "نړیوال اتل" جایزه ورکوي افغان چارواکو د یونیسکو رپوټ رد کړ د یونیسکو د اداري اجراتو له مخې، کوم کاندید/کاندیده چې ددغه سازمان د ټول ټال ۵۸ غړو رایې ۳۰ واخیستی شي، د دغه سازمان مشر/مشره ټاکل کېږي. د فرانسې د بهرنیو چارو وزارت ویانددې ایجانس روماتېه د ټاکنو له بهیر شېبه وړاندې وویل: "یونیسکو له هر بل وخت اوس د غړو هېوادونو د پرمختګ پروژې ته ډېره اړتیا لري". د امریکا متحدو ایالتونو او اسرائیلو له دغه سازمان د خپل غړیتوب د ختمولو اعلان کړی دی. واشنګټن پر یونیسکو د "اسرائیلو ضد کړنو" تور لګولی. د یونیسکو مخکېنۍ مشره د بلغاریا ایرینا بوکووا وه. د یونیسکو مشر/مشره د څلورو کلونو لپاره ټاکل کېږي. ۴۵ کلنه ازولای له بوکووا وروسته د یونیسکو دویمه ښځینه مشره ده. نوموړې د فرانسوا اولاند د ولسمشرۍ پرمهال د کلتور وزیره وه. اغلې ازولای په ۱۹۷۲ کال زیږېدلې، په ۲۰۰۰ کال د ادارې له هغه ملي ښوونځي فارغه شوې، چې د فرانسوا اولاند په ګډون د فرانسې ګڼ نور چارواکي هم ترې فارغ شوي او ماسټري یې اداره کې بریتانیا کې کړې ده.
A British team is developing a car that will be capable of reaching 1,000mph (1,610km/h). Powered by a rocket bolted to a Eurofighter-Typhoon jet engine, the vehicle will first mount an assault on the world land speed record (763mph; 1,228km/h). Bloodhound should start running on Hakskeen Pan in Northern Cape, South Africa, in 2017. With just one year - 365 days - to go until we'll be running Bloodhound SSC on the desert in South Africa, work continues to get the Car ready. This seemed like a perfect time to inspect our desert track in South Africa, and to take a moment to celebrate the amazing achievement of the team which has prepared the best straight-line race track ever. To build the excitement a little, we got them to spell out "365" on the desert, as a message to the world that Bloodhound is coming. When I first saw the surface of Hakskeen Pan, in the Northern Cape of South Africa, over seven years ago, two things were immediately obvious. The first was that the hard, smooth clay pan surface could be the best land speed record track ever. The second was that it would take a truly huge effort to clear the layer of stones that covered most of the 20 million sq m that we would need. The Northern Cape Provincial Government very bravely agreed to take this immense task on and, seven years later, the results are just astonishing. With work now all but complete, we went from one end to the other, over 12 miles (20km) away. As we raced along, all we could see was a perfectly smooth and stone-free surface, as far as the eye could see. The track team of over 300 people has worked away for the past seven years, clearing an area equivalent to a wide road from London to Moscow. They have prised around 16,000 tonnes of stones (over 50 tonnes per person!) out of the surface to leave the most incredible track surface behind, ready for Bloodhound to arrive next year. The track team has hand-cleared the largest area on earth ever prepared for a motorsport event. We felt this should be formally recognised, so we contacted the Fédération Internationale de l'Automobile (FIA). I was thrilled by the response: while the FIA President Jean Todt was unable to join us personally for the celebration, he sent the track team a very warm video message of congratulations. His message highlighted the essential contribution that the Northern Cape team has made to Bloodhound, and he told the workers that "the credit will be shared with you" for everything that Bloodhound achieves. Absolutely right. In addition, the President of the FIA's Land Speed Record Commission, Dennis Dean, flew half way round the world to represent the FIA and to thank the track team personally. Dennis presented every member of the team with a certificate of recognition from the FIA, and Bloodhound gave each person a medal to thank them for their unique achievement. We were also joined by the Premier of the Provincial Government, along with several of her cabinet, and the whole event was covered live on national TV in South Africa. A great day out for a great bunch of people. Being back in South Africa also gave me a chance to meet up with Dirk Coetzee. Dirk is the young South African who won our design competition to paint one of the Arai helmets that I will be wearing when I drive Bloodhound SSC. He proudly presented me with the finished article, resplendent in its Northern Cape sunrise orange, with the twin flags of South Africa and the UK, and (very aptly) an outline of the fastest local antelope, the Gemsbock. It's a real work of art. Meanwhile, work in Bristol carries on, getting the car ready for record-breaking speeds next year. The car has been stripped down, separating the 3,500-odd bespoke parts that make up Bloodhound SSC. Each one is being carefully inspected, before being prepared for reassembly - the final build before running the car. Each component and system will also be tested to check that it works as advertised. One of the first bits to undergo an end-to-end test will be the fuel system, which is being installed in the rear lower-chassis. The fuel system has a main tank (400 litres of Jet-A), which provides more than enough fuel for a full-power run. However, we also need to allow extra fuel for jet engine warm-up and cool down, plus a reserve in case there is a delay before a run. The main fuel tank already fills the space available for it, so we've added another two 100-litre auxiliary tanks, in the narrow spaces behind the main tank, just in case. The three tanks will be connected together, with pumps to feed the fuel to the main tank and then into the EJ200 jet engine. We'll take the whole system down to our UK test facility at Newquay Aerohub at the end of this year, for leak and function testing. After that, the fuel system's next job will be to feed a live and screaming jet engine, when the car fires up for the first time next Summer. Can't wait. There was clear evidence the other day that we're now into final assembly, when a tank of liquid nitrogen turned up at the Bloodhound Technical Centre in Bristol. The tolerances for some of the components, such as the wheel bearing carriers for the suspension uprights, is so small that they can only be assembled when they are extremely cold (in this case, liquid nitrogen is below minus 195C). Once each carrier goes into its upright and warms up again, it won't be coming out again. This really is the final build. The cockpit monocoque has been hoisted up into the air, so that the titanium floor can be fitted to the underside and trimmed to its final size. When the car travels across Hakskeen Pan at supersonic speeds, the shockwaves around the wheels will rip up the surface, creating a supersonic dust storm immediately behind the wheel. Over the course of several weeks of testing, this supersonic "sand blasting" would start to wear away the underside of the car, just as it did on Thrust SSC, back in 1997. The titanium floor panel is hard enough to survive this extreme environment, so that's one less thing to worry about. One thing we haven't started work on yet is refining the cockpit displays and controls. We are still looking to recruit a couple of key people for the team, including a software engineer to look after the cockpit. If you know anyone with the right skills who might like to join us for this unique once-in-a-lifetime Engineering Adventure, please do get in touch. Bloodhound continues to draw young people in to the fascinating world of science and technology. In advance of the car's arrival at Newquay next Summer, the Royal Cornwall Museum ran a Bloodhound experience over the past few of months. To the museum's surprise and delight, the "Bloodhound Effect" has doubled the number of schools visiting the museum, compared with this time last year. I went down there a few weeks ago, to talk about next year's testing and record-breaking plans, and saw a very excited group of youngsters building their own rocket cars. Talking of rocket cars, if you haven't put your name down for a free rocket car kit for next year's competition (first prize - the chance to see Bloodhound SSC run in South Africa), then you have until the end of November. Book now to avoid disappointment!
أسقطت السلطات الإماراتية حكما بالسجن لثلاثة أشهر على المواطن الاسكتلندي جيمي هارن الذي اتهم بارتكاب "فعل فاضح في مكان عام" بعد أن لمس فخذ رجل في حانة في دبي. وبحسب اندرو بلاك، من بي بي سي اسكتلندا، فإن هارن تم ابلاغه بأن السلطات أسقطت التهمة وحكم المحكمة، وأعيد له جواز سفره. وقالت مجموعة قانونية تمثل هارن إنه أبلغ بأنه له الحرية في مغادرة البلاد. ولم يكن هارن قيد الاحتجاز. وألقت السلطات في الإمارات القبض على هارون في يوليو/ تموز الماضي. وقال في التحقيقات إنه كان يحاول تفادي انسكاب مشروبه، ما دفعه إلى لمس الرجل في حانة "روك بوتوم" التي كانت مزدحمة بالرواد. وحكم على رجل الأعمال الذي تقدم بالشكوى ضد هارن، البالغ من العمر 27 سنة، بالسجن لمدة شهر لتناوله الجعة. وتنازل رجل الأعمال عن الشكوى، لكن السلطات الإماراتية قررت الاستمرار في إجراءات المحاكمة. ونشر خبر الحكم بحبس الاسكتلندي مجموعة من النشطاء تسمي نفسها "المحتجزون في دبي"، والتي تدعم هارون منذ القبض عليه. وقالت المجموعة إن فريق الدفاع عن هارن سوف يستأنف الحكم أمام محاكم دبي. وجاء في بيان صادر عن "المحتجزون في دبي: "اليوم حكم على جيمي هارون بالسجن لثلاثة أِشهر لاحتكاك يده بفخذ شخض عربي دون قصد في حانة روك بوتوم في دبي." وأضاف أن "المحكمة لم تستدع الشهود الرئيسيين للإدلاء بما رأوه ودحض هذه المزاعم". وأكد البيان أن هارن سوف يستأنف هذا الحكم. غير أنه سوف يبقى في محبسه في ظل ظروف وصفتها المجموعة بأنها "صعبة" داخل السجن في دبي. وأشار إلى أن المواطن الاسكتلندي تعرض لخسائر مالية كبيرة بسبب نفقات المحاكمة. وقالت تقارير إن هارن، الذي يعمل كهربائيا في أفغانستان وكان في الإمارات ليومين فقط، فقد وظيفته وأنفق حوالي 30 ألف جنيه إسترليني على الإجراءات القانونية منذ بداية القضية في الخامس من يوليو/ تموز الماضي. اضغط هنا لتنزيل تطبيق بي بي سي عربي الخاص بمستخدمي نظام أندرويد
Turkish prosecutors investigating the failed July coup have issued an arrest warrant for one of the country's best-known footballers, ex-international Hakan Sukur, state media report. Searches were carried out at two houses in western Turkey, as officials said he faced charges of being a member of an "armed terrorist organisation". A former MP for the ruling AK party, Hakan Sukur is a known supporter of the cleric blamed for the botched coup. He moved to the US several months ago. A warrant was also issued for the ex-footballer's father, Sermet Sukur. He was arrested in his hometown of Adapazari after he was seen at a local mosque and reported to the police. Sermet Sukur for years acted as his son's manager. Hakan Sukur's twitter account and website were not publicly accessible on Friday. However, he has expressed support for cleric Fethullah Gulen in the past. Mr Gulen lives in self-imposed exile in the US and the Turkish government has called for his extradition to face trial on charges of masterminding the failed 15 July coup. He denies involvement. Some 270 people died and many more were wounded when parts of the armed forces tried to seize power. President Recep Tayyip Erdogan responded by purging the military and public services of tens of thousands of people suspected of following Mr Gulen, whom the government accuses of setting up a parallel state. Hakan Sukur went on trial in absentia in June for insulting President Erdogan on social media and the decision by prosecutors to seek his arrest is not seen as a surprise because of his support for the US-based preacher.
The Scottish government has pledged to set up a publicly-owned, not-for-profit energy company to sell gas and electricity to customers at "as close to cost price as possible". But how would a state-run energy company work? In her speech to the SNP conference in Glasgow, First Minister Nicola Sturgeon said the idea would be taken forward by 2021. More detail will be provided when the Scottish government publishes its new energy strategy later in the year. The basic details are that "energy would be bought wholesale or generated in Scotland - and sold to customers as close to cost price as possible". Ms Sturgeon said the company would not pay shareholders or corporate bonuses. Its only job would be to secure the lowest price for consumers, she said. It does not appear that the Scottish government intends at this stage to take control of any power generation of its own such as running its own wind farms. Yes. Ms Sturgeon said it would give people - particularly those on low incomes - more choice of which supplier to use. Her speech implied that some commercial firms were making unfair or unreasonable profits. Rising power prices have become a big political issue in the UK in recent years. At Westminster, Prime Minister Theresa May has made similar claims and said she intends to cap the Standard Variable Tariff - the default price for energy, set by each company. Labour leader Jeremy Corbyn had previously proposed a network of public energy companies. The intention is to lower prices, especially for people on low incomes, but it might not be quite that simple. David Hunter, director of market studies at the energy market firm Schneider Electric, said people who were being charged too much were generally those who had not switched suppliers and were on the most expensive standard variable tariff. He said customers who had sought out better deals were usually already making the "vast majority of savings it is possible to make". "The retail supplier profit on competitive energy deals is relatively low," he said. Mr Hunter also said that independent suppliers had reduced the dominance of the Big Six suppliers over recent years but they could not always beat them on price because of the way the wholesale market worked. "It tends to mean independent suppliers do well when the wholesale market falls because they are tracking the market more closely and their tariffs are more responsive," he said. "The flip side is that when wholesale markets rise they tend to do less well and have to increase their prices." Yes. In 2015, a new not-for-profit energy supply company - Our Power Energy - was founded by 35 organisations including some of Scotland's largest housing associations. It planned to be selling heat and power to tenants in 200,000 homes across Scotland by 2020. In Nottingham, the city council set up non-profit Robin Hood Energy. It has attracted tens of thousands of customers but is not the cheapest on the market. Earlier this year it had to put up its dual fuel tariffs by about 17% because of wholesale market increases. They are also paying off quite hefty set-up costs. David Pike, who set up People's Energy in East Lothian, said his company already did everything the first minister was suggesting. He said it bought wholesale energy and retailed it at the lowest cost, as well as giving profits back to the people and free shares in the company. Nicola Sturgeon's speech suggested the company would supply energy bought on the wholesale market or generated in Scotland. She added that the Scottish generated energy would be "renewable, of course". The details are unclear but the Scottish government's energy strategy has been to move away from sources that produce greenhouse gases towards renewables such as wind, hydro and potentially wave. Dermot Nolan, the chief executive of Ofgem, the energy industry regulator, said it would "welcome any form of potential new entry" into the energy market. Mr Nolan told BBC Radio Scotland's Good Morning Scotland programme the necessary process of granting a licence to the new company could probably be completed within months. He said: "I don't think it should take overly long. We would try to facilitate any licence application" Mr Nolan stressed any new power firm would "need to satisfy its customers and provide a high quality level of service". The draft energy strategy said a government-owned non-profit company could address areas where the market is deemed to have failed. These included delivering new schemes and initiatives and changing energy infrastructure, such as district heating. It could also co-ordinate the procurement of energy efficiency and heat technology measures. EDF, which is a big player in the UK market, is majority-owned by the French government. So state-owned companies do operate in the market but they have to play by European competition rules. EDF does not follow the model proposed by the Scottish government as it operates to make profits. Denmark has the state Energy Agency, formed in 1976, which administers energy and supply, and climate change initiatives. It has 400 staff, with tasks ranging across energy production, supply, transportation and consumption, including energy efficiency and building standards. This is a question that can't be fully answered at the moment. Let's recap on what Ms Sturgeon said in her speech to conference: "Energy would be bought wholesale or generated here in Scotland - renewable, of course - and sold to customers as close to cost price as possible." That could be interpreted as the new company owning energy. The first minister went on to say that her government would "set out more detail when we publish our new Energy Strategy". So, we are now in a wait-and-see situation.
स्पेनबाट स्वतन्त्र भएको घोषणा गर्ने वा नगर्ने भन्नेबारे स्पेनको क्षेत्रीय सरकार क्याटलोनियामा थप विभाजन हुने संकेतहरु देखिएका छन्। क्याटलन नेता कार्लेस पुजडमोनले उपयुक्त कदमहरुको खुलासा नगरी सांसदहरुलाई त्यसबारे निर्णय गर्न आह्वान गरेपछि यो विवाद शुरु भएको हो। शुक्रबार स्पेनको सिनेटले क्याटलोनियाको स्वायत्त शक्ति कटौती ठानिएको छ। मड्रिड र बार्सिलोनामा हुन लागेको दुई महत्वपूर्ण मतदानका कारण यो विवाद शुक्रबार थप चर्किने देखिएको छ। क्याटलोनियाको स्वतन्त्रतासम्बन्धी भएको जनमत संग्रहपछि यी विवादहरु देखापरेका हुन्। उक्त जनमत संग्रहलाई स्पेनको संवैधानिक अदालतले गैरकानुनी घोषणा गरेको थियो। अक्टोबर १ मा भएको मतदानपछि पुजडमोनले स्वतन्त्रता घोषणा गरेका थिए। तर तत्कालै उनले उक्त घोषणा कार्यान्वयन नगरी वार्ताका लागि आह्वान गरे। स्वायत्त क्षेत्र क्याटलोनियाको शक्ति कटौती गर्ने केन्द्र सरकारको योजनालाई स्पेनको सिनेटले अनुमोदन गर्न लागेको छ।
Nghị viện Catalonia vừa bỏ phiếu đồng ý tuyên bố độc lập khỏi Tây Ban Nha, trong lúc chính phủ Tây Ban Nha dường như đã sẵn sàng áp đặt quyền điều hành trực tiếp đối với vùng này. Nghị quyết của Catalonia tuyên bộ họ "lập ra nước Cộng hòa độc lập có chủ quyền". Động thái này đã nhận được sự ủng hộ với tỷ lệ 70-10 trong một cuộc bỏ phiếu bị các nghị sĩ đối lập tẩy chay. Thủ tướng Tây Ban Nha Mariano Rajoy trước đó nói với các thượng nghị sĩ việc áp đặt điều hành trực tiếp của chính quyền Trung ương là cần thiết để trả lại "luật pháp, dân chủ và ổn định" cho vùng Catalonia. Tây Ban Nha 'sắp loại bỏ' lãnh đạo Catalan Tập tái cử, Trump sắp thăm Việt Nam Bàn tròn Điểm tin tức cuối tuần (từ 15-21/10/2017) Cuộc khủng hoảng bắt đầu khi người dân Catalonia ủng hộ độc lập trong một cuộc trưng cầu dân ý về độc lập gây tranh cãi hồi đầu tháng này. Hôm 20/10, tin cho hay Tây Ban Nha sẽ đình chỉ quy chế tự trị của Catalonia vào ngày thứ Bảy, sau khi lãnh đạo vùng này đe dọa tuyên bố độc lập. Văn phòng chính phủ của Thủ tướng Mariano Rajoy nói họ sẽ kích hoạt điều 155 để áp dụng trực trị, xóa bỏ chính quyền địa phương Catalonia. Điều 155 của Hiến pháp năm 1978 chưa từng được sử dụng trong bốn thập niên, kể từ khi Tây Ban Nha có nền dân chủ sau khi chế độ phát xít của Tướng Francisco Franco chấm dứt. Nhà lãnh đạo Catalonia, Carles Puigdemont, nói trước đó, Nghị viện vùng sẽ bỏ phiếu độc lập nếu Tây Ban Nha "tiếp tục đàn áp". Tây Ban Nha sắp ngưng quy chế tự trị của Catalonia Lãnh đạo Catalonia chịu áp lực trước khi tuyên bố ly khai Tây Ban Nha: Cảnh sát đàn áp trưng cầu độc lập Cuộc trưng cầu dân ý hôm 1/10 tại Catalonia với kết quả ủng hộ độc lập đã bị Tòa hiến pháp Tây Ban Nha tuyên bố không hợp lệ. Tin mới nhất cho hay thủ tướng Tây Ban Nha Mariano Rajoy nói cuộc bỏ phiếu trong nghị viện ở Barcelona là "chà đạp lên pháp luật".
أعلنت هيئة الخدمات الصحية الوطنية في انجلترا عزمها حظر بيع شرائح الشيكولاته "فائقة الحجم"، في متاجر ومقاصف المستشفيات. وقال سيمون ستيفنز، الرئيس التنفيذي للهيئة، إن الحلويات وشرائح الشيكولاتة التي تباع في المستشفيات يجب أن تتضمن 250 سعرا حراريا بحد أقصى. ووفقا لتلك الخطط، فإن معظم "عُلب الهدايا المقفلة" ستحظر، وستمنح المستشفيات دعما ماليا إضافيا لتسهيل وتنفيذ هذا التغيير. وستشهد تلك الخطط المقترحة أيضا تعديل طرق إعداد الشطائر الجاهزة، التي تباع بالمستشفيات، بما يؤدي إلى تخفيض السعرات الحرارية فيها، إلى أقل من 400 سعر حراري. ويجب أن تتضمن الشطائر والوجبات الجاهزة الفاتحة للشهية 5 غرامات من الدهون المشبعة، كحد أقصى لكل 100 غرام. وفي أبريل/نيسان الماضي، قالت هيئة الخدمات الصحية الوطنية في انجلترا إنها ستحظر المشروبات السكرية في المستشفيات، إذا لم تقلل منافذ البيع هناك من الكميات التي تبيعها. وقال سيمون ستيفنز، الرئيس التنفيذي لهيئة الخدمات الصحية الوطنية في انجلترا، إن الهيئة "تكثف من جهودها" لمكافحة مشكلة، تتسبب في "وباء السمنة وداء السكري القابل للوقاية منه، وتسوس الأسنان وأمراض القلب والسرطان". وأَضاف: "بدلا من الوجبات الخفيفة المليئة بالسعرات الحرارية والسكريات، نرغب في أن نجعل الطعام الأكثر صحة خيارا سهلا ومتاحا، لأطقم العاملين بالمستشفيات والمرضى والزوار". ويعد العاملون في هيئة الخدمات الصحية الوطنية مستهدفين، كجزء من هذه الخطة الرامية لمعالجة مسألة تناول الطعام غير الصحي، بمن فيهم هؤلاء الذين يعملون في نوبات العمل الليلية. وتقول إدارة الصحة العامة في انجلترا إن المستشفيات عليها "دور مهم" في معالجة مشكلة السمنة، وليس فقط التعامل مع تداعياتها.
Burgers used to be fast and cheap - the epitome of fast food. But now a different type of patty exported from the US is rapidly expanding across the globe. What's driving the rise of the so called "better burger"? "What's fascinating", observes Paul Reynish, chief executive of US burger chain Five Guys International, is "the complete fundamental change" that has taken place with people prepared to pay more and wait longer for a more upmarket burger. We're speaking via phone whilst he's in the firm's Belfast restaurant, doing what he calls "product calibration" - where the firm tries to match US ingredients not available or allowed under EU laws with local alternatives. Making sure its overseas burgers taste the same as those in the US is important, he says. "Unless you have consistency there is no brand... you've got to have some confidence that the burger you have in Dubai and Paris is the same as the one you have in California and Miami," he says. This is still a fairly new experience for the firm, which opened its first restaurant outside the US just four years ago. The family controlled firm, started by husband and wife team Jerry and Janie Murrell and their five sons in 1986, is one of the biggest operators in the so called "better burger" market. This is where the cheap fast food staple morphs into the world of cooked-to-order, brioche buns, grass fed cattle and triple cooked chips. A level up from the fast food chains such as McDonald's and Burger King and two to three times more expensive, these types of burger bars still tend to be cheaper and more relaxed than a restaurant meal. In a world where prices are rising faster than pay, it's an affordable indulgence. Yes it's a treat but not one that'll put too much of a dent in your bank balance. So called millennials, the generation that came of age after the 2008 financial crisis, are their core customers. The trend of diners wanting to know where their food comes from, how it was prepared, and the "story" behind it has also helped drive the better burger's rapid expansion. Five Guys, for example, boasts of 120-day grain-finished beef from family-owned farms in Ireland. Less than 1% of all UK beef qualifies, it says. "Burgers, fries, shakes and Coke it's a pretty simple model," says Mr Reynish. Nonetheless, it's a profitable market, worth some £3.3bn in the UK last year, according to market research firm Mintel. The US and the UK aren't the only ones with an appetite for a more upmarket burger. Five Guys is currently in nine countries, but expects to expand to 28 over the next five years. It's not to everyone's taste. "Overpriced, overrated and over here," is one disgruntled Trip Advisor reviewer's verdict on the explosion of higher end US burger places in the UK. Yet Mr Reynish says it was demands from visitors to the US desperate to experience the burgers in their home countries that drove their decision to expand. In contrast to Five Guys, US rival Shake Shack wasn't even a chain when it decided to take its concept overseas. "Quite honestly it's serendipitous we're even talking now...Shake Shack was totally an accident," laughs Michael Kark. As vice president of Shake Shack's licensed business, he is the man in charge of the firm's international expansion. The firm's taken an unusual approach to expansion, opening restaurants overseas before it was an established presence in its home country. Less than a decade ago the firm was a temporary stand in a New York park with queues so long that one fan set up a webcam so people could see at a glance just how long they'd have to wait. It was after the firm, founded by restaurateur Danny Meyer, opened its second restaurant, that Kuwaiti firm Alshaya approached them about opening a franchise. "Kuwait isn't top of most brands' lists", admits Mr Kark. But for the firm which was then "really really tiny", it turned out to be a massive opportunity. They agreed a licensing deal whereby Shake Shack took a one-off fee plus a percentage of sales. It's a model the firm has stuck to for all its overseas restaurants. The experience helped its success: "As a company we were really great at creating one off concepts but we had no experience about duplication," says Mr Kark. But why on earth did Alshaya choose Shake Shack? Mr Kark says when he asked him, the group's founder said it was the really long queues. "We'd gained this enormous cult following and that's how he found us." Burger bars often inspire a cult-like following. UK burger firm Meat Liquor began as irregular gatherings called #Meateasy advertised on Twitter. At that stage there was no restaurant, website or permanent venue, but just a hashtag and a burger van dubbed the "meatwagon". Nonetheless, people would trek to south London and queue for two hours just to get a taste of their particular take on classic American diner food. It wasn't just the food, but the atmosphere that lured customers. With violently loud music and dark graffiti-adorned walls, the venues are more like a nightclub than a restaurant. The first meatwagon was vandalised and the second was stolen. Founder Yianni Papoutsis, who was juggling the ad hoc stall with his job as a technician for the English National Ballet, eventually teamed up with pub owner Scott Collins to find a restaurant in 2010. Now the pair have 13 sites and expect to make £17m in sales this year. "It's more like luck than judgement," says Mr Collins. More stories from the BBC's global trade series looking at trade from an international perspective: What it takes to get Beyonce on a world tour The country losing out in the breakfast juice battle Why a $1.6bn car plant has been left to decay 'You don't have to be a squillionaire to buy art' How Scottish salmon conquered the world Read more global trade series here. But one thing hasn't changed. They still make customers seek them out. Their restaurants are often in sites other restaurants reject, tucked away in alleyways, or unusual places such as an ice rink or a box park made of shipping containers. "Part of our USP is that we're hidden away," says Scott Collins. But for people fed up with queuing it now lets customers reserve tables. He says there's really nothing new about the gourmet burger craze which has long been a pub menu staple. It's this very popularity which could eventually slow the sector's growing success. Mintel says the fact that there is so much competition, often in the exact same locations, means it's becoming harder for firms to attract customers. Five Guys Mr Reynish isn't worried. "We're just not seeing any reduction in demand or frequency. Our annual sales per store are going up not down," he says.
25 Eylül'de yapılan bağımsızlık referandumunun ardından peşmerge güçlerinin Kerkük dahil statüsü tartışmalı bölgelerden çekilmesine yol açan süreç sonrası Irak Kürdistan Bölgesel Yönetimi'nde (IKBY) siyasi gerilim arttı. "Bağımsızlık referandumunun ertelenmesi gerektiğini" savunan Goran (Değişim) Hareketi başta olmak üzere bazı kesimler Kürt yönetimine istifa çağrıları yapmaya başladı. BBC Türkçe'ye konuşan Goran Politbüro üyesi Muhammed Tefvik Rehab, ulusal geçiş hükümeti kurulmasını istediklerini söyledi. Rehab, yeni hükümetin, Bağdat ile sorunlarını çözebilecek kapasitede "gerçek ulusal teknokratlar" tarafından oluşturulması gerektiğini belirtti. Referandumdan önce "Bölgedeki bütün taraflar terörizm ve IŞİD ile mücadele ediyor ve bu nedenle Irak'ın toprak bütünlüğünü destekliyorlar. Bu referandum için uygun ortam değil" dediklerini hatırlatan Rehab, sözlerini şöyle sürdürdü: "Asla referanduma veya bağımsızlığa karşı değiliz ancak bu sürecin Bağdat ile ve Irak Anayasası çerçevesinde yürütülmesini istedik. Referandumu yaptılar ve şu anda bedelini hepimiz ödüyoruz." IKBY'de iç siyasetinin Kürdistan Demokrat Partisi (KDP) ve Kürdistan Yurtseverler Birliği (KYB) tarafından domine edildiğini söylemek yanlış olmaz. Bölgesel yönetimin idari başkenti olan Erbil'de KDP, Süleymaniye'de ise KYB etkisi hissedilebiliyor. Yine her iki partinin de kendilerine bağlı peşmerge güçleri, silahlı güvenlik birimleri ve farklı ticari ortaklıkları var. Dış politik çizgileri de zaman zaman farklı. Bu ikili durum, Peşmerge güçlerinin Kerkük'ten çekilmesine neden olan süreçte bir kez daha ortaya çıktı. Sürece dair karşılıklı ithamlar devam ediyor ancak KDP ve KYB peşmergeleri arasında farklı politik duruşa sahip iki farklı merkezden komuta edilmeleri nedeniyle yaşanan koordinasyon sorunu iyice belirginleşti. Goran Politbüro üyesi Muhammed Tefvik Rehab da iki partinin hakimiyetinden doğan sistemin IKBY'nin en zayıf noktası olduğu görüşünde; "Bizim tek çatı altında birleşmiş ulusal kurumlarımız yok. Biz, parti kurumlarına sahibiz. Peşmerge, güvenlik, dışişleri, ekonomi kuruluşları, karar alma mekanizmaları, komuta merkezleri… Hepsi siyasi partiler tarafından domine ediliyor." Aslında referandum sürecinde tartışmalar alevlenmiş olsa da iç siyasi çevreler arasındaki gerginlik yeni değil. IKBY'nin Türkiye ile petrol satış anlaşması yapmasının ardından Bağdat hükümeti bölgenin bütçedeki payını göndermemeye başladı. IŞİD saldırıları ile yatırımların durması, savaş bütçesinin giderek büyümesi, 1,5 milyona ulaşan iç göçmen ve mülteci akını, işsizlik ve yolsuzluk gibi faktörler tansiyonu yükseltti. Son olarak, IKBY Başkanı Mesud Barzani'nin görev süresinin uzatılmasına ilişkin tartışmalar nedeniyle bölgede parlamentonun faaliyetleri 2015 yılında askıya alındı. Bu şartlar altında alınan referandum kararını KDP desteklerken, IKYB kararı destekleyenler ve ertelenmesini isteyenler şeklinde bölündü. Goran ise parti olarak referandumun ertelenmesini istedi. Muhammed Tefvik Rehab, IKBY'de halkın "yeni politikacılar, yeni yüzler görmek istediklerini" söylüyor. IKBY'de başbakanlık ve Irak hükümetinde ekonomiden sorumlu başbakan yardımcılığı da yapmış olan Berhem Salih, Demokrasi ve Adalet Cephesi adı altında yeni bir hareket kurdu. Salih, referandum sonrası süreçte Goran ve Kürdistan İslami Cemaati (Komal) ile ortak çağrılar yapıyor. Yine, yerel medya kuruluşu NRT'nin sahibi Sehsuvar Abdulvahid de referandum öncesi muhalif söylemleri ile öne çıkan isimlerden biri. Peki yeni partiler, hareketler iç siyasi yapıda etkili olabilir mi? Gazeteci Fazel Hawramy'ye göre, "IKBY'de insanlar, 16 Ekim'de Kerkük'te olanlardan sonra Kürdistan liderliği ile ilgili hayal kırıklığına uğradı. Ancak normal insanlar için en önemli kriter ekonomi." 2014 yılından beri bölgesel yönetimin ekonomik kriz girdabında olduğunu vurgulayan Hawramy halkın yeni politik oluşumlardan beklentilerine dair şunları söyledi; "Şüphesiz ekonomiyi ve peşmergeyi kontrol eden KDP ve KYB, Kerkük'ten sonra destek kaybetti. Kerkük'ün ve diğer statüsü tartışmalı bölgelerin kaybı Kürdistan bölgesinin ekonomik gücünü azalttı. Geliri, çoğunlukla hükümet kaynaklarına dayalı olan normal insanlar ekonomik açıdan çok sıkıntılı. İnsanların hayatlarında değişiklik yaratma gücü elde etmediği sürece herhangi bir partinin yükselmesi zor olur. "Bölgesel yönetimde şartlar, yeni partiler için uygun ancak halk geniş ittifakları olan hareketler istiyor." Bölgeyi yakından izleyen gazetecilerden biri olan Amberin Zaman da, IKBY iç siyasetindeki aile tekelinin (Barzani ve Talabani aileleri) kolay kırılamayacağını ancak son gelişmelerle birlikte Berhem Salih'in, Goran'ın ve diğer muhalif çıkışların yakından izlenmesi gerektiğini söyledi. Referandum sürecinin Mesud Barzani'ye darbe vurduğunu savunan Zaman, "IKBY Başkanı Mesud Barzani'nin ikinci kez tartışmalı biçimde uzatılan görev süresi 1 Kasım'da doluyor. Başkanlığı bırakması bekleniyor. Meclisin toplanması ve parlamenter sisteme geri dönülmesi öngörülüyor. Böylece güç, mevcut Başbakan Neçirvan Barzani'nin eline geçmiş olacak" dedikten sonra "Peki, Goran buna razı olur mu?" diye soruyor. Amberin Zaman'a göre Neçirvan Barzani bu süreçte birçok açıdan avantajlı görünüyor: "ABD, Ankara, Tahran ve Moskova ile iyi ilişkileri var. Enerji dosyasına hakim ki bu, IKYB açısından kritik. Ancak Berham Salih'in de Bağdat ve Washington tecrübesi var. Esas mesele, Bağdat ile krizin kan akmadan çözülmesi."
මේ මස 29 වෙනි දින ලාහෝර් නුවර පැවැත්වීමට නියමිත විස්සයි විස්ස තරගයට සහභාගි වීම පිණිස පාකිස්තානයේ සංචාරය කිරීම පිළිබඳව යළි සලකා බලන මෙන් ඉල්ලා සිටිමින් ජාතික ක්‍රිකට් කණ්ඩායමේ ක්‍රීඩකයන් පිරිසක් විසින් ශ්‍රී ලංකා ක්‍රිකට් ආයතනය වෙත ලිපියක් යොමු කරනු ලැබ තිබේ. එවැනි ලිපියක් ලැබුන බව බීබීසී සිංහල සේවය කළ විමසීමකදී සනාථ කළ ශ්‍රී ලංකා ක්‍රිකට් ආයතනයේ සභාපති තිලංග සුමතිපාල, ආයතනයේ විධායක කමිටුව සඳුදා (ඔක්තෝබර් 16) රැස් වී ඒ සම්බන්ධ අවසාන තීරණයකට එළඹෙන බවත් කියා සිටියේය. කෙසේ නමුත් කණ්ඩායම පාකිස්තාන සංචාරයේ නිරත වන්නේ නම් ඒ සඳහා තරග විනිසුරන් හා තීරකයන් යොදවන බව අයිසීසී ජගත් පාලක මණ්ඩලය දැනටමත් දැනුම් දී තිබෙන බව ද ඔහු සඳහන් කළේය. "අයිසීසී ඒකෙන් සංවිධානය කරලා T20 තරග තුනක් ගැහුවා World II කණ්ඩායමත් එක්ක. ඒකෙදි ආරක්ෂක කටයුතු පිළිබඳව 100% ක් ඒගොල්ල සෑහීමකට පත්වෙනවා." ශ්‍රී ලංකා කණ්ඩායම පාකිස්තානයේ සංචාරය කිරීම පිළිබඳව ක්‍රිකට් ආයතනය ප්‍රතිපත්තිමය වශයෙන් එකඟ බව පැවසූ සභාපතිවරයා, ඒ අතරම ආරක්ෂාව ක්‍රීඩකයන් මතු කරන කරුණු ද සලකා බලා අවසාන තීරණයට එළඹෙන බවත් සඳහන් කළේය. දැනට එක්සත් අරාබි එමීර් රාජ්‍යයේ පාකිස්තානයට එරෙහිව තරග වැදී සිටින ශ්‍රී ලංකා කණ්ඩායම, ලහෝර් නුවර ගඩාෆි ක්‍රීඩාංගනයේ දී අවසාන විස්සයි විස්ස තරගයකට සහභාගි වීමට නියමිතය. 2009 මාර්තු 03 වෙනි දින ශ්‍රී ලංකා කණ්ඩායම ලහෝර් නුවරදී ත්‍රස්ත ප්‍රහාරයකට ගොදුරු වීමෙන් අනතුරුව, සියලුම ජාත්‍යන්තර ක්‍රිකට් කණ්ඩායම් පාකිස්තානයේ සංචාරය කිරීම නවතා දැමුවේය. එවක් පටන් පාකිස්තානයේ සංචාරයක නිරත වූයේ සිම්බාබ්වේ කණ්ඩායම පමණි. ඒ අතර පාකිස්තාන ක්‍රිකට් බලධාරීන් World II කණ්ඩායම සමග පසුගිය සැප්තැම්බර් මාසයේ තරග සවිධානය කර තිබුණේ සිය රට තුළ යළිත් වරක් ජාත්‍යන්තර තරග ආරම්භ කිරීමේ උත්සාහයක් වශයෙනි. ශ්‍රී ලංකා කණ්ඩායමේ තිසර පෙරේරා ද World II කණ්ඩායමේ සාමාජිකයෙකු විය. ලබන 29 වෙනි දින තරගය සඳහා සහභාගි විය යුතු යයි ශ්‍රී ලංකා ක්‍රිකට් ආයතනය තීරණය කරනු ලැබුවහොත්, එවිට "අනිවාර්යයෙන්ම ශ්‍රී ලංකාව නියෝජනය කරන කණ්ඩායමක් සහභාගි කරවන" බව ද තිලංග සුමතිපාල බීබීසී සිංහල සේවයට පැවසීය. "තාමත් ක්‍රීඩකයන් කිහිප දෙනෙක් මේ සංචිතවල ඉන්නවනේ එදා 2009 ඒ ප්‍රශ්නෙට මුහුණ පාපු අය. බොහොම සාධාරණයි ඒ අයට කිසියම් භීතියක් තියෙනව. අපිට ඒ ගැන අවබෝධයක් තියෙනව," ඔහු සඳහන් කළේය. එබැවින් සංචාරයට එක්විය නොහැකි බව ක්‍රීඩකයන් කිහිප දෙනෙකු පවසන්නේ නම් ඔවුන්ට එම තීරණය ගැනීමට හැකියාව තිබෙන බව ද සභාපතිවරයා වැඩිදුරටත් පැවසීය. ලාහෝර් නුවර ප්‍රහාරයේදී පාකිස්තාන පොලිස් නිලධාරීන් හය දෙනෙකු සහ සාමාන්‍ය වැසියන් දෙදෙනෙකු මරුමුවට පත් වූ අතර, තිලාන් සමරවීර, නායක මහේල ජයවර්ධන, උප නායක කුමාර් සංගක්කාර, අජන්ත මෙන්ඩිස්, තරංග පරණවිතාන, චමින්ද වාස් සහ සුරංග ලක්මාල් තුවාල ලැබූහ. එහිදී බරපතලම තුවාල ලැබූ ක්‍රීඩකයාවන තිලාන් සමරවීර පසුගියදා බීබීසී ක්‍රීඩා අංශය සමග අදහස් දක්වමින් කියා සිටියේ ප්‍රහාරයෙන් ඇති වූ මානසික කම්පනයෙන් ඔහු තවමත් පූර්ණ සුවය ලබා නැති බවය. "මම හිතන්නේ නෑ මම නම් ආයෙත් යාවි කියල. ඒ සිදුවීම නිසා මමත් මගේ පවුලේ අයත් හොඳටම දුක් වින්ද," තිලාන් සමරවීර පැවසීය. ප්‍රහාරයට ලක් වූ පාකිස්තාන සංචාරය පිළිබඳව එය සංවිධානය කළ අමාත්‍ය අර්ජුන රණතුංග සහ එවකට උප නායකයා වූ කුමාර් සංගක්කාර අතර පසුගියදා වාග් සංග්‍රාමයක් හටගත් අතර, ඉන් අනතුරුව ඔවුන් දෙදෙනා 2011 ලෝක කුසලානයේ අවසාන මහා තරගය පිළිබඳව ද ප්‍රසිද්ධ වාදයක නිරත වූහ.
Iraq's 2005 Constitution recognises an autonomous Kurdistan region in the north of the country, run by the Kurdistan Regional Government. This was the outcome of decades of political and military efforts to secure self-rule by the Kurdish minority, who are estimated to number more than 6 million and make up between 17% and 20% of the population of Iraq. Kurds, who number 30-40 million in total, live in a compact area that reaches from Syria in the west to Iran in the east and Iraq in the south, north through Turkey, and into the states of the former Soviet Caucasus. Only in Iraq have they managed to set up a stable government of their own in recent times, albeit within a federal state. However, the increase of sectarian tensions within Iraq as a whole from 2013 onwards, culminating in a campaign of violence launched by the radical Islamic State group, meant that by 2014 the unity of Iraq was under severe threat. In July 2014, Iraqi Kurdistan President Massoud Barzani announced that his government planned to hold a referendum on independence later in the year, given that Iraq was already "effectively partitioned". The announcement triggered alarm among Iraq's neighbours, who feared that it could set a precedent for their own restive Kurdish minorities. But a change of leadership in the Iraqi government was followed by improved relations with Iraqi Kurdistan. The two sides agreed to work together to defeat the common enemy of Islamic State and plans for an independence referendum were put on hold - but only until 2017. The vote went ahead in September of that year, and the overwhelming majority voted for independence, buoyed in part by the success of their Peshmerga armed forces in defeating Islamic State and advancing into disputed between the central and Kurdish governments. The Kurds of Iraq came under British colonial rule after the defeat of the Ottoman Empire in 1918. Frustrated in their hopes for independence, Kurdish leaders launched a series of rebellions against British and subsequent Iraqi rule. These were put down ruthlessly, most notoriously in the late 1980s when Saddam Hussein attacked the Kurds with massed armed forces in the 'Anfal' campaign. This involved the deliberate targeting of civilians with chemical weapons, most notoriously in the town of Halabja in 1988. Various Iraqi governments promised autonomy to the Kurds after the 1958 revolution, but none came to fruition until the anti-Saddam international coalition established a partial no-fly zone in northern Iraq in 1991 after the first Gulf War. This allowed Kurdish leaders and their Peshmerga armed forces to consolidate their hold on the north after Iraqi forces withdrew, and provided the basis for the 2005 constitutional settlement. The immediate tasks facing the Kurdish government were great, and included rebuilding infrastructure, creating an administration and absorbing hundreds of thousands of displaced people after years of war and destruction. Overall its efforts exceeded all expectations. Iraqi Kurdistan largely escaped the privations of the last years of Saddam's rule and the chaos that followed his ouster in 2003, and built a parliamentary democracy with a growing economy. Major problems remain, nonetheless. The landlocked Kurdistan Region is surrounded by countries unsympathetic to Kurdish aspirations -Turkey, Syria and Iran. It is also in dispute with the Iraqi government over several territories, in particular the historic city of Kirkuk. Tension between the main political parties - the Patriotic Union of Kurdistan and the Kurdistan Democratic Party - erupted into a civil war that almost destroyed the autonomous government in 1994-97, and some differences remain. President: Massoud Barzani Massoud Barzani has been president of Iraqi Kurdistan since his election in 2005. After his latest mandate expired in August 2015 his term in office was extended in a moved described as illegal by the opposition. Some key dates in Iraqi Kurdistan's history: 1920 - After the break-up of the Ottoman Empire, Kurdish hopes of having a nation of their own are raised and then dashed. Kurds in Iraq, Iran, Syria and Turkey have sought their own homeland ever since. 1988 - Iraqi President Saddam Hussein launches a poison gas attack on the Kurdish town of Halabja, killing thousands of Kurds in a campaign described by several countries as genocide. 1991 - After the Gulf War, coalition forces create a safe haven for Kurds, who in effect gain autonomy. 1994-97 - Civil war involving forces of the rival Kurdish Democratic Party and the Patriotic Union of Kurdistan. 2005 - After the overthrow of Saddam Hussein, a new Iraqi constitution designates Kurdistan as an autonomous federal region. 2017 - iraqi Kurds vote overwhelmingly for independence in a long-delayed referendum, but the Iraqi army puts pressure on the regional government to annul the decision.
මහා මමු ලෙබනනයේ උපත ලැබූ සිරියානු ජාතික තරුණියකි. එහෙත් ඇයට, ඇයගේ සොහොයුරාට සහ සොහොයුරියට සිරියාවේ පුරවැසිභාවය අහිමිය. ඒ ඔවුන්ගේ මව ඉස්ලාම් භක්තික කාන්තාවක සහ පියා ක්‍රිස්තියානි භක්තිකයෙකු වීම හේතුවෙනි. මිශ්‍ර විවාහයක් බැවින් ඔවුන් දෙදෙනා අතර විවාහය සිරියානු බලධාරීන් පිළිනොගැනීම එයට හේතුවයි. සිරියාවේ අඹු සැමි යුවලක් අතර විවාහය නිල වශයෙන් පිළිනොගන්නේ නම් ඔවුන්ට දාව උපත ලබන දරුවන්ට එරට පුරවැසිභාවය හිමි නොවේ. ඔවුන්ට පුරවැසිභාවය ලබාදීම ලෙබනනය ද ප්‍රතික්ෂේප කරයි. "මට රටක් නෑ," මහා පවසන්නීය. "ඒ නිසා මම ලෙබනන් ජාතිකයෙකුත් නෙවෙයි, සිරියානු ජාතිකයෙකුත් නෙවෙයි." මේ ගැටලුව හේතුවෙන් තෙවසරකට ආසන්න කාලයක් මුළුල්ලේම ඇයට සිය මව දැකගැනීමට ද නොලැබිණ. පුරවැසිභාවයක් අහිමි බැවින් කිසිදු විදෙස් චාරිකාවක නිරතවීම පමණක් නොව රෝගාබාධයකට ප්‍රතිකාර ගැනීම පිණිස ජාතික සෞඛ්‍ය සේවයේ පිහිට පැතීමේ අවස්ථාව ද ඔවුන්ට අහිමි කරනු ලැබ තිබුණි. "මගේ දුක කියමින් මම හැම රටකම තානාපති කාර්යාලවලට ගියා," මහා පවසන්නීය. "අපිව පිළිගත්තේ බ්‍රසීලය විතරයි." දේශපාලන අනාථයන් ලෙසින් බ්‍රසීලය විසින් ඔවුන් භාරගනු ලැබීමෙන් අනතුරුව පැය 48 ක් ඇතුළත ලෙබනනයෙන් පිටවන මෙන් මහා සහ ඇයගේ සොහොයුරාටත් සොහොයුරියටත් දන්වනු ලැබිණ. වහාම ෆේස්බුක් පිහිට පැතූ ඔවුහු බ්‍රසීලයේ දී තමන් භාරගැනීමට කැමති කාන්තාවක සොයා ගත්හ. ඇය එමිලින්ය. මහා දැන් බ්‍රසීලයේ ගොවිපොලක සේවය කරමින් සිටියි. ඔවුහු බ්‍රසීලයට පැමිණ මේ වනවිට දෙවසරක් සහ මාස දහයක් ගත වී ගොසිනි. තෙවසරකට ආසන්න කාලයක් සිය දරු තිදෙනා නොදුටු ඔවුන්ගේ මව ද ඔවුන් සොයා බ්‍රසීලයට පැමිණියාය. එහෙත් මව පැමිණෙන විට දරු තිදෙනා අතරින් එක් දරුවෙක් මෙලොව හැර ගොසිනි. බ්‍රසීලයේදී මහා ගේ සොහොයුරා පැළඳ සිටි අත් ඔරලෝසුව පැහැර ගැනීමට පැමිණි සොර මුලක් ඔහුට වෙඩි තබා මරා දමා තිබුණි. "මාව පිළිගත්තේ මේ රට විතරයි," මහා පවසන්නේ සතුට සහ ශෝකය මිශ්‍ර හැඟීමකින් බ්‍රසීලයේ සිය මිතුරිය, එමිලින්, වැළඳ ගනිමිනි.
Amazon says it has now received 238 proposals from places vying to be the home of its next employment hub. The bids come after the e-commerce giant said it was looking to build a "second headquarters" in North America, where it would invest $5bn (£3.8bn) and hire as many as 50,000 people. The locations are vying on factors such as workforce talent, tax breaks, and proximity to an international airport. Amazon said it will decide on a location next year. Amazon has seen major growth. The firm had nearly $136bn in sales last year and employs about 380,000 people globally - adding about 39,000 since the start of 2017 alone. Politicians are eager to attract the economic engine to their home towns. The proposals come from all but seven US states, most southern provinces in Canada and three states in Mexico, as well as Washington DC and the territory of Puerto Rico, according to a map published by the company. The places competing include sites in Baltimore, Boston, Chicago, Detroit, Newark and Toronto.
They are not exactly hanging out the bunting at the Treasury, but today's better-than-expected economic growth figures have put a bit of a spring in the step of the chancellor. And that is not just for economic reasons. Philip Hammond is under increasing political pressure from cabinet colleagues to loosen the purse strings in his Budget on 22 November. Sajid Javid, the communities secretary, has gone public, suggesting that the government should borrow more for housebuilding. And another senior cabinet minister I spoke to, with excellent knowledge of the prime minister's thinking, also suggested to me that some fiscal largesse might be just what the country needs.
The Socceroos have won an all-or-nothing clash against Syria, meaning their World Cup dream is still alive. Qualification would be a boon for Australian football, but excitement isn't limited to the men's team, as Phil Mercer reports. In the burning heat of Australia's Gulf of Carpentaria, even cut feet and blisters can't dull the passion of tropical Borroloola's young indigenous footballers. They bleed for the game they love, and ache in the hope that their country can once again qualify for next year's World Cup in Russia. Reaching the 2018 finals has become tortuous for fans of the Socceroos, who have qualified for football's biggest global party three consecutive times since 2006. Borroloola, an outpost of about 1,000 people on the McArthur River in the Northern Territory, is one of the many beating hearts of grassroots football in Australia. "Our kids have been playing with bare feet here on the concrete and gravel and it is 34C here at the moment. They just love it," explains John Moriarty. He runs training camps for indigenous children that link football to education and good health, as well as opportunities in sport. Moriarty was the first indigenous player to be selected for Australia, and although he never played for his country, he hopes many others will. "It is my dream to have some of our kids playing for the Matildas [Australia's women's team] and the Socceroos. The World Cup will help develop that," he said. "In 2014 we were able to get four boys and four girls from Borroloola to Brazil for the World Cup. The World Cup just brings about magic within the community and with individuals to better their own lives." After a failure to progress through one of four automatic places in the Asian Football Confederation, Australia, coached by Ange Postecoglou, beat Syria 2-1 in Sydney on Tuesday. This means the team will be on the plane to Russia if it triumphs in yet another nail-biting play-off against Honduras next month. Australia's first appearance at football's most spectacular show was in West Germany in 1974. But decades in the wildness followed, and supporters would have to wait more than 30 years before tasting that World Cup thrill again thanks to John Aloisi's sweetly struck spot-kick against Uruguay in Sydney in November 2005. "Everyone in Australian football knows about that penalty," said Luke Wilkshire, capped 80 times by the Socceroos and a veteran of two World Cups. He is now with Sydney FC, the reigning champions of the A-League, Australia's decade-old professional competition. "Back in 2006 at the World Cup you saw football really grow (in Australia) with the A-League," he told the BBC. "It's gone from strength to strength and long may that continue. Every time you play for the national team was a great moment, but the first World Cup - the first game - was a very special moment. "We need to be at the World Cup. It is vital for football in Australia. Hopefully everything will go well for the Socceroos and we'll see them next year in Russia." Football in Australia has feasted on World Cup success. Its profile and reputation have soared. So have participation rates, especially among Aussie kids, and there are almost 250,000 women and girls playing the game across the country. The government's AusPlay study, released in December last year, found football is the nation's popular club sport. But a failure to make it to Russia could cost the game millions of dollars, according to the Sydney Morning Herald. Champion international Australian striker Lisa de Vanna told the BBC it would be "devastating" if the Socceroos were denied a spot at next year's finals. But there is another increasingly powerful force driving the round ball game down under - the national women's team. In July, the Matildas made history when they beat the United States, the current number one-ranked nation. It was the first time the Aussies had defeated the reigning World Cup winners, and they went on to win the Tournament of Nations. Then followed two home victories over Brazil in September, with the first in Sydney attracting a sell-out crowd. De Vanna was a goal scorer that day and believes Australia's elite women are an integral part of a football revolution. "Everyone is jumping onboard and wanting to know about the Matildas," she said. That bandwagon could become supercharged if Australia wins the right to host the women's football World Cup in 2023. "We are playing some really good football and that's what Australians like, they like winners," the long-serving centre-forward added. Losers, though, can often expect little sympathy, and the pressure is building on Ange Postecoglou. Former players have called for his sacking, but the under-fire coach has insisted he remains committed to the cause for now. Ex-Socceroos goalkeeper-turned-TV pundit Mark Bosnich insisted the coach's team selections were "astounding". But Graham Arnold, the mastermind of Sydney FC's domestic domination, believes there is no need to panic. "The whole country is behind the Socceroos," he said. When asked by the BBC if a failure to qualify for the 2018 World Cup would be a significant blow to the game at home, he responded in a typically forthright manner. "Mate, you shouldn't think like that. We will qualify."
Người Trung Quốc - tôi nghĩ số đông - vui mừng vì sự thành công của Đại hội Đảng Cộng sản 19. Họ háo hức về một thời đại mới, với sự phục hưng vĩ đại của dân tộc Trung Hoa, mơ ước vĩ đại nhất của dân tộc Trung Hoa từ thời cận đại, sẽ trở thành hiện thực. Mục tiêu "một trăm năm" đầu tiên, mốc thành lập ĐCSTQ năm 1921 - 2021 với "xã hội khá giả toàn diện" thì đã ở trước mặt. Sát sườn hơn nữa, với việc xác định "tham nhũng là mối đe dọa lớn nhất mà Đảng phải đối mặt", với công cuộc Đả hổ, Diệt ruồi, Săn cáo đạt kết quả tích cực và tiếp tục được Đảng hứa hẹn sẽ "giành thắng lợi áp đảo, tiêu diệt cả gốc lẫn ngọn" (Báo cáo của ông Tập Cận Bình), đã tạo được niềm tin nhất định trong quần chúng. Dư luận Phương Tây đã có một cái nhìn không thật khách quan khi một mực cho rằng công cuộc chống tham nhũng ở Trung Quốc có mục đích chính trị. Nếu cái chính trị ấy đồng hành với tham nhũng thì tại sao không chống, tại sao không diệt? Một đòn cho hai mục tiêu thì ai chẳng muốn thực hiện. Ông Tập công bố dàn lãnh đạo mới của TQ Tập Cận Bình 'dẫn đầu và ở lại còn lâu' VN học được TQ cách 'dùng Đảng trị quốc'? Mặc dù đã có dự báo rộng rãi, việc tư tưởng Tập Cận Bình được ghi vào Điều lệ Đảng tại Đại hội 19 dưới mệnh đề: "Tư tưởng Tập Cận Bình về chủ nghĩa xã hội đặc sắc Trung Quốc cho thời đại mới" vẫn gây ra nhiều bất ngờ trước dư luận. Bởi vì đây là lần đầu tiên tư tưởng của một lãnh tụ được ghi vào Điều lệ của Đảng này cùng với tên tuổi của họ ngay lúc họ còn sống. Nhưng đừng nghi ngờ việc ông Tập Cận Bình đã nghĩ việc cần đặt một nền tảng tư tưởng mới cho một thời đại mới, dù ông có muốn nhân thể vinh danh tên tuổi mình hay không?. Nước Trung Hoa bước vào "thời đại mới" thực sự cần có kim chỉ nam để hướng đến cuộc "phục hưng vĩ đại dân tộc Trung Hoa". Tờ New York Times (13/10) cho biết, chỉ hai tuần sau khi nhận chức Tổng bí thư tại Đại hội 18, ông Tập Cận Bình đã có một tấm ảnh đáng đồng tiền bát gạo, chụp ông cùng đồng chí của mình trước gian "Con đường phục hưng" của Bảo tàng quốc gia. Tấm ảnh sẽ còn lưu dài dài theo lịch sử phát triển của Đảng. Một thắng lợi khác rất đáng kể của ông Tập Cận Bình là Ban thường vụ Bộ Chính trị gồm bảy người được bầu ra lần này gần như là một tập hợp đáng mơ ước, dẫu có cuộc đấu tranh và thương nghị không mấy thuận cho ông ở Bắc Đới Hà hồi tháng 8 năm nay. Ông Tập: 'Lãnh đạo quyền lực nhất TQ' sau ông Mao Tư tưởng Tập Cận Bình Người ta có thể dự đoán ngay được cả sự thay máu, đổi chỗ sẽ đến như thế nào sau 5 năm nữa, tại Đại hội 20. Tôi có thể mạnh dạn dự báo, ông Tập Cận Bình còn có thêm nhiệm kỳ, thì có lẽ từ thời điểm này sẽ khó tiếp tục mặc nhiên tồn tại trong Đảng Cộng sản Trung Quốc các phái như phái Đoàn Thanh niên, phái Thượng Hải, phái Tử Đệ. Với thời gian, rồi sẽ xuất hiện những phe phái khác, với những tục danh khác. Tuy nhiên, dư luận nước ngoài đón nhận kết quả của Đại hội 19 Đảng Cộng sản Trung Quốc không được lạc quan như chính trong nước này. Điều đó không có gì khó hiểu. Người ngoài có cái nhìn cởi mở, khoáng đạt hơn và có thể dễ thấy vấn đề hơn. Về mặt kinh tế, người ta lo hộ Trung Quốc: kinh tế thị trường và chủ nghĩa xã hội có thể song hành với nhau mà không làm nảy sinh tư bản thân hữu, nguyên nhân tệ hại nhất của tham nhũng trong xã hội Trung Quốc hiện nay? Về chủ nghĩa xã hội đặc sắc - trong tiếng Hán "đặc sắc" có nghĩa là sắc thái riêng, còn trong tiếng Việt "đặc sắc" có nghĩa là rất tốt, hoàn hảo. Để nguyên từ "đặc sắc" khi chuyển sang tiếng Việt ở trường hợp này dễ hiểu sai. Chưa nói người Trung Quốc chắc không tự khoe mình là hoàn hảo và tính ngữ này xuất hiện nhiều nhất trong Báo cáo, hơn 50 lần được hiểu như thế nào về phương diện kinh tế? Về chính trị, ông Tập lập luận rằng không thể có hai chế độ chính trị giống như cùng một khuôn và Trung Quốc sẽ có thể làm mẫu cho thế giới về thể chế của mình thì khi đề cập đến cái "đặc sắc Trung Quốc" ấy. Vậy nó sẽ được hiểu như thế nào? Nhiều lập luận nhưng chưa thấy rõ. Tập quyền mạnh trong một đất nước rộng lớn, đông dân, nhiều sắc tộc, nhiều bè cánh như Trung Quốc có thể là cần thiết và mang tính giai đoạn nhưng một khi "tập" quá thì lại đi ngược với cải cách mà Trung Quốc muốn chuyển đổi nhằm mở rộng quyền công dân, cởi mở với bên ngoài. Tại cuộc phỏng vấn trước thềm Đại hội Đảng Cộng sản Trung Quốc, BBC có nêu một câu hỏi không dễ trả lời ngay: người viết cảm nhận thế nào trước khả năng một Trung Quốc tiếp tục dưới quyền ông Tập Cận Bình, xét từ góc độ quan hệ Việt - Trung? Vấn đề đáng quan tâm nằm phía sau câu hỏi. Đại hội 19 và thực chất tư tưởng Tập Cận Bình Cái đã qua thì ta đã biết. Ông Tập từng tuyên bố một cách không tự tin rằng các đảo, đá trên Biển Đông đã thuộc về Trung Quốc từ hơn hai ngàn năm trước. Tuyên bố vậy nên ông để quân tướng mình mặc sức đào đào đắp đắp, điều được ông đánh giá tại diễn đàn Đại hội là "Đã tích cực đẩy mạnh xây dựng các đảo, đá…" và " đã thuộc về Trung Quốc" như thế nào chưa thấy phía Trung Quốc đưa các bằng chứng thuyết phục thưa ông. Chỉ biết những ghi chép của người Trung Quốc từ cả ngàn năm trước cho đến tận thế kỷ XIV, XV cho thấy nơi này chỉ toàn là những bãi nhô lên từ lòng biển, chớ có bén mảng mà đắm tàu thiệt thân. Tôi có chú ý đến đoạn kết trong Báo cáo chính trị, ông Tập Cận Bình nói: "Đứng trên mảnh đất bao la với hơn 9,6 triệu km2 và 1,3 tỉ người dân Trung Quốc…" Nghĩa là ông thừa nhận Trung Quốc có 9,6 triệu km2, gồm 9.596.960 km2 đất liền cộng với 270.500km2 lãnh hải mà thôi. Vậy mà nhiều người Trung Quốc cứ khăng khăng rằng Trung Quốc còn gần 3 triệu km2 Biển Đông. Một nữ nghiên cứu viên của Viện Khoa học Xã hội Quảng Tây còn lập luận rất… nước lớn, rằng "Trung Quốc đông dân, không lẽ chỉ có 270.000km2 mặt biển sao?" Với Đường chín đoạn, ông Ngô Sĩ Tồn, Viện trưởng Viện nghiên cứu Nam Hải, vào năm 2013 trả lời chính dư luận Trung Quốc đã khẳng định một năm sau đó sẽ có được sự lập lý vững chắc thì đến nay, nhiều "một năm nữa" đã trôi qua. Không cần đề cập thêm những xung đột từng gây căng thẳng theo chu kỳ, chỉ như vậy cũng đã thấy Biển Đông là câu chuyện sóng gió nhất trong quan hệ giữa hai nước Việt Nam - Trung Quốc. Cộng thêm với đó, thặng dư thương mại luôn ở mức nhiều chục tỉ (đô la Mỹ) nghiêng về phía Trung Quốc, trong khi các công trình thắng thầu ở Việt Nam thường được Trung Quốc thực hiện kéo dài, đội vốn, với công nghệ thấp, ngược lại điều mà Trung Quốc luôn đòi hỏi các nước khác khi đầu tư vào nước mình, đã làm cho hình ảnh của Trung Quốc kém thân thiện với người Việt Nam. Tuy nhiên, ông Tập Cận Bình cũng từng mong muốn một quan hệ láng giềng hữu nghị, ổn định lâu dài với Việt Nam, mà ông nói là cùng chung vận mệnh. Trước diễn đàn Đại hội lần này, ông tuyên bố: "Trung Quốc quyết không phát triển bản thân mình mà trả giá bằng sự hy sinh lợi ích của nước khác." Quan hệ giữa hai quốc gia, mặt khác luôn tùy thuộc vào cả hai, vào đối tác. Cặp Việt - Trung cũng vậy. Nước nhỏ có cái mạnh của nước nhỏ. Ít nhất là ở chỗ biến điều không thuận lợi thành thuận lợi. Bài viết thể hiện quan điểm riêng của tác giả, một nhà nghiên cứu phân tích chính trị và quan hệ quốc tế từ Đại học Bình Dương, ông cũng từng là Phó Chủ tịch, kiêm Tổng Thư ký Hội hữu nghị Việt - Trung.
A partir del año que viene, un kilo dejará de ser lo que era. Y es que el kilo es una de las cuatro unidades de medición básicas -junto con el amperio, el kelvin y el mol- que serán redefinidas por la Conferencia General Sobre Pesos y Medidas (CGPM) en noviembre de 2018, en lo que constituye la mayor revisión del Sistema Internacional de Unidades (SI, por sus siglas en inglés) desde su instauración en 1960. El objetivo de este cambio es definir a estas unidades en relación a constantes fundamentales y no arbitrarias como ha sido hasta ahora. Esta decisión fue alcanzada la semana pasada en una reunión en París, Francia. Aunque estos cambios no afectarán a la gente de a pie (lamentablemente nos nos hará adelgazar ni un gramo), son de gran importancia para las investigaciones científicas que requieren un elevado nivel de precisión en sus cálculos. El nuevo sistema, que entrará en vigencia en mayo de 2019, le permitirá a investigadores realizar varios experimentos para relacionar las unidades de medida con constantes. Tomemos por ejemplo el caso del kilogramo. Actualmente esta unidad de medida está definida en función de un objeto: un kilogramo equivale a la masa que tiene un cilindro de 4 centímetros de platino iridio fabricado en Londres que se conserva en la Oficina Internacional de Pesos y Medidas (BIPM según sus siglas en inglés), guardado desde 1889 en una caja de seguridad en Francia. Pero este kilo original ha perdido en un siglo 50 microgramos. Esto se debe a que los objetos pueden fácilmente perder átomos o absorber moléculas del aire, por eso usar uno para definir una unidad del SI es complicado. Como todas las balanzas del mundo se gradúan en función de este kilo original, cuando calculan el peso lo hace de forma incorrecta. En la vida cotidiana estas diferencias mínimas no tienen ninguna importancia, pero en cálculos científicos que requieren precisión extrema sí. La nueva unidad, en cambio, se medirá con la llamada "balanza de Watt", un instrumento que permite comparar la energía mecánica con la electromagnética utilizando dos experimentos separados. Esta forma de medir el kilo no cambia, y tampoco puede dañarse o perderse, como puede ocurrir en el caso de un objeto físico. Además, una definición basada en una constante -y no en un objeto- haría que la medida exacta del kilo, al menos en teoría, esté disponible para cualquier persona en cualquier parte del planeta y no solo para aquellos que tengan acceso al kilo original de Francia. La forma de definir el amperio (unidad de corriente eléctrica) también cambiará. Se medirá con una bomba de electrones que genera una corriente medible, en la que se pueden contar los electrones individuales. El kelvin (unidad de temperatura) se definirá a partir del nuevo sistema con termometría acústica. Esta técnica permite determinar la velocidad del sonido en una esfera llena de gas a una temperatura fija. El mol, la unidad utilizada para medir la cantidad de sustancia, actualmente se define como la cantidad de sustancia que hay en un sistema con tantas entidades elementales como átomos hay en 0,012 kilogramos de carbono-12. En el futuro se redefinirá con un instrumento que determina la cantidad precisa de átomos que hay en una esfera perfecta de silicio puro-28.
Computer scientists have developed artificial intelligence that can outsmart the Captcha website security check system. Captcha challenges people to prove they are human by recognising combinations of letters and numbers that machines would struggle to complete correctly. Researchers developed an algorithm that imitates how the human brain responds to these visual clues. The neural network could identify letters and numbers from their shapes. The research, conducted by Vicarious - a Californian artificial intelligence firm funded by Amazon founder Jeff Bezos and Facebook's Mark Zuckerberg - is published in the journal Science. The Captcha test, which means the "Completely Automated Public Turing test to tell Computers and Humans Apart", was developed in the late 1990s to prevent people from using automated bots to set up fake accounts on websites. When logging into a website, users prove that they are human by solving visual puzzles, which requires identifying letters, digits, symbols or objects that have been distorted or animated in some way. Computers usually struggle to pass such tests, and Google says that its reCaptcha test is so complicated that even humans can only solve it 87% of the time. However, researchers from Vicarious claim that their computer algorithm can pick out distorted letters and digits from images. To get computers to recognise images, computer scientists usually use neural networks, which are large networks of computers trained to solve complex problems. A neural network contains hundreds of layers, inspired by the human brain, and each layer examines a different part of the problem. Eventually, the answer from all the layers is combined together to produce one final result. However, neural networks have to be painstakingly trained using thousands of images that have been pre-labelled by humans, which makes it a very arduous task. The team from Vicarious developed Recursive Cortical Network (RCN), a software which mimics actual processes in the human brain while requiring less computing power than a neural network. The human brain has the ability to identify objects even if they are obscured by other objects, by recognising shapes and textures. Vicarious has been developing algorithms for RCN that aim to identify objects by analysing pixels in an image to see if they match the outline of an object. In 2013, Vicarious announced that it had cracked text-based Captcha tests used by Google, Yahoo, PayPal and Captcha.com with a 90% accuracy. Since then, Captcha designers have made their tests more difficult to beat, but the researchers said in their new paper that the software was now able to pass Google's reCaptcha test 66.6% of the time. The RCN software was also able to solve reCaptacha tests from Captcha generator BotDetect at a 64.4% success rate, Yahoo Captchas at a 57.4% success rate and PayPal at a 57.1% success rate. "We're not seeing attacks on Captcha at the moment, but within three or four months, whatever the researchers have developed will become mainstream, so Captcha's days are numbered," Simon Edwards, a cyber-security architect for data cyber-security firm Trend Micro Europe, told the BBC. "The very nature of big data analysis and machine learning is that if you give it enough data to play with, it will eventually work out most things." Mr Edwards said that typically within two months of security flaws being discovered, have-a-go hackers will start attacking every publicly-visible web server they can find, and so it is likely that Captcha tests on websites will soon be under siege. "The technology has been around for a long time - there needs to be a better version of Captcha," he said. "In my mind, the best form of authentication is two-factor. It's the only real way of getting around these problems."
As the latest touches are being put to the playing surfaces of the tennis courts at Wimbledon, so the finishing strokes are also being applied to the latest fundraising scheme to improve facilities at the historic sporting complex. The All England Lawn Tennis Club (AELTC), which hosts the world-famous tournament, has been pricing its latest debenture issue, with the cash raised going towards putting a roof over Court Number One. The new debenture, which runs from 2017 to 2021, will set back tennis lovers some £31,000. Sporting debenture holders pay a set sum of money, usually quite a sizeable amount, to be guaranteed the right to buy tickets to a top level sporting club or championship. The seats are among the best seats available in the stadium, and the money raised is then usually used for capital works, such as stadium development. At Wimbledon, debentures are issued in five year cycles, with separate schemes for the Centre and Number One "show" courts, which host the big-name matches. The AELTC say their schemes are a way of satisfying a certain high-end, niche, ticket market, while at the same time raising money without recourse to public expenditure. "The proceeds of the next Number One Court debenture issue will help to fund the implementation of the next stage of our Wimbledon master plan," says AELTC chairman Philip Brook. When complete, the facilities will include a remodelled Number One Court, with a retractable roof, two extra rows of seating, and increased hospitality boxes around the court. In addition a new public plaza will be built in place of Court 19, and a basement dining area for officials will also be constructed. "It is a big project, with the major work beginning after the 2016 tournament, and everything will be ready for the start of the 2019 championship," says Mr Brook. Debentures have a long history at Wimbledon, starting in 1920 when the first £100,000 issue was used to buy the current Church Road site and fund building of the Centre Court. Some £100m was raised from the last Centre Court debenture, with money from that directed towards that court's roof project. The Court Number One debenture provides tickets for nine days' play - the first week of Wimbledon and then until the Wednesday of the second week (when all remaining big matches move to Centre Court). An emergency extra day is also built into the package in case a day of play is lost to rain. Some sporting debentures offer an annual interest rate return to holders. That is not the case at Wimbledon but holders also get access to facilities such as bars, restaurants and car parks. Existing debenture holders get first chance to buy the next issue. On Court One there are 1,000 debenture seats out of the current 11,500 capacity, which will be expanded to 12,400 with the building work. "Raising funds through debenture issues means that we can keep our ticket prices for everybody else at very affordable levels," says Mr Brook. As well as providing access to must-see tennis matches, the tickets that come with the debenture - unlike other Wimbledon tickets - can be legally sold on, either through the AELTC or privately. The debentures themselves can also be traded via Numis Securities, with recent sale prices announced in the Financial Times. Such a fundraising method by UK sporting organisations is not as widespread as in the US. They are also generally pitched at such a price that only business people or the wealthy can afford them. In the UK, as well as Wimbledon tennis, the Rugby Football Union and Welsh Rugby Football Union have issued debentures, as have the MCC and Hampshire cricket clubs. In the early 1990s football club Arsenal issued a debenture to help fund a new stand at Highbury, while a similar proposed plan by West Ham United met with fan fury. Meanwhile, the business plan for the building of the new Wembley Stadium in the 2000s was heavily based on the issue of 10-year Club Wembley debenture packages. Alan Levett is managing director of Alad, a firm which publishes specialist magazine Pan Stadia & Arena Management. "The West Ham debenture plan brought a lot of protest from supporters," he says. "They reacted angrily, and thought it was fan exploitation." He adds: "A more recent and famous example would be with the Club seats at Wembley, it was a major part of the FA's funding of the new stadium. It will be fascinating to see how their renewals process goes, as those tickets were for 10 years from 2007." In the US the system of using supporter cash to build or improve infrastructure is commonly called the "personal seat licence" (PSL). They are in place in many baseball stadiums for the premier tier and luxury lounge seats, and are also becoming very common in American football at college and NFL level. For example, roughly one-third of the cost of building the Metlife Stadium in New Jersey was met by the two NFL teams which use the stadium, the Giants and the Jets, issuing PSLs. And despite often initially being met with fan outcry, persistent sales efforts usually mean the seats' licences sell out. Sports clubs in the US which are currently raising funds towards new stadiums through variants on the PSL include the American football teams the Minnesota Vikings and Atlanta Falcons. The Vikings's scheme is actually called a Stadium Builder's License (SBL), but is a similar beast to a debenture or personal seat licence; here you have to pay between $500 and $9,500 in order to secure the right to buy your season ticket. "Debenture schemes are more popular in the US, where the whole concept was invented," says Mr Levett. "It is taken as a norm over there." "In the US they were quicker to appreciate the quality of the seats being offered. However they have traditionally have had bigger stadiums and more space to offer these sorts of premium seats. "Furthermore, corporations there have always been keen to use sport as a method of entertaining clients, and so would snap up these debenture seats." Mr Levett, whose business also runs stadium trade shows, says there is scope to introduce this corporate seat model in other countries around the world, such as Japan. "But I don't think there is a great scope in the UK for widening this sort of arrangement. It works for what you call the elite sports and events like Wimbledon," he says. "I don't think we will see it being used as it is in the US, towards building new football stadiums."
A museum dedicated to artworks created by coal miners has opened its doors. The Mining Art Gallery in Bishop Auckland, County Durham, has 420 pieces including works by Norman Cornish, Tom McGuinness and Bob Olley. It part of a project aimed at creating a "a world-class visitor destination" in the market town. A colliery band played at Saturday's opening ceremony as the ribbon was cut by Dr Robert McManners and Gillian Wales, who donated hundreds of works. Dr McManners said: "Coal mining wasn't just a job, it was a way of life and in this gallery are the underground scenes the miners wanted to articulate alongside the community life, the long term-friendships and pride. "Heritage doesn't have to be something which is fossilised in the past, it's something we can take to the future and tell people about in this new gallery." Jonathan Ruffer, Chairman of The Auckland Project, said: "This is a very exciting day for Bishop Auckland and for The Auckland Project. "To understand why this area is so special we need to look back into its past and the miners were a significant part of that."
Northern Ireland will receive an extra £1bn over the next two years as part of the deal that will see the Democratic Unionist Party's 10 MPs back Theresa May's minority government in Commons votes. DUP leader Arlene Foster said the "wide-ranging" pact was "good for Northern Ireland and the UK" - so where will the money be spent? The heart of the financial package is infrastructure spending - £400m of it over two years. That is a significant sum given that Northern Ireland's annual infrastructure budget is about £1bn. The deal specifically mentions the York Street Interchange, a project to ease congestion where three major roads meet in Belfast. It is expected to cost about £150m, so there should be plenty left over for other major projects. They could include a planned transport hub in the centre of Belfast and other major roads schemes like the completion of the A5 or A6. On top of the £400m, there is a further £150m for ultra-fast broadband. This was a project which was already being scoped by the Department of the Economy before the collapse of Stormont. It is ultimately about improving the connectivity of rural businesses. Previous Stormont/Westminster deals have also included infrastructure but they typically involved allowing Stormont to borrow more. This time it is cold, hard, no-strings-attached cash. The money for health and education is more modest - given that a figure of £1bn for health alone was being mentioned during the negotiations. There is a minimum of £250m for health and and we can assume it will get about half the "immediate pressures" money, bringing it to a total of £300m. That will help ease the problems with waiting lists and give the system some breathing space ahead of a major reform programme. The "immediate pressures" money for education (about £50m) will go some way to easing a growing row with head teachers who have said they will not impose any more cuts. There is also £100m to be spent on deprived communities over five years. It will be interesting to see what the delivery mechanism for that money will be. Stormont's Social Investment Fund, which was also designed to help those communities, has been mired in controversy. Another part of this deal is to give flexibility to a previously agreed £500m fund for investment in shared education and housing projects. Stormont has struggled to spend this money, in its first year just £3m of a £50m allocation was spent. So its is possible that the new flexibility will allow all that money to go into general infrastructure spending.
A densely-populated country on the eastern shore of the Mediterranean Sea, Israel is the only state in the world with a majority Jewish population. It has been locked in conflict with the Palestinians and its Arab neighbours over ownership of land considered holy by many Jews, Christians and Muslims since its creation in 1948. The division of the former British Mandate of Palestine and the creation of the State of Israel in the years after the end of World War II was the culmination of the Zionist movement, whose aim was a homeland for Jews hitherto scattered all over the world. After the Nazi Holocaust, pressure grew for the international recognition of a Jewish state, and in 1948 Israel declared its independence following a UN vote to partition Palestine. Country profiles compiled by BBC Monitoring Much of the history of the area since that time has been one of conflict between Israel on one side and Palestinians - represented by the Palestine Liberation Organisation - and Israel's Arab neighbours, on the other. Hundreds of thousands of Palestinian Arabs were displaced in the fighting in 1948, during which Israel's Arab neighbours came to the aid of the Arab Higher Committee in Palestine. Israel lost one percent of its population in the fighting, which ended in a series of uneasy armistices. Israel has developed from an agrarian state run along collectivist lines into a hi-tech economy in the past 60 years. It has absorbed Jewish immigrants from Europe, the rest of the Middle East, North America and, most recently, the former Soviet Union and Ethiopia along the way. Its political life has nonetheless been dominated by the conflict with its Arab neighbours, including full-scale regional wars in 1948, 1967 and 1973, and many smaller-scale conflicts including the 1956 invasion of Egypt and the Lebanon wars of 1982 and 2006. Relations with the Palestinians have been a major factor in foreign and security policy. The Palestinians in the West Bank and eastern Jerusalem have lived under Israeli occupation since 1967. The settlements that Israel has built in the West Bank are home to nearly 500,000 people and are deemed to be illegal under international law, although Israel disputes this. Israel evacuated its settlers from the Gaza Strip in 2005 and withdrew its forces, ending almost four decades of military presence inside Gaza. Israel continues to control Gaza's air space and coastal approaches, on the basis of which the UN considers Gaza still to be occupied territory. After the militant Islamic group Hamas reinforced its power in Gaza in June 2007, Israel intensified its economic blockade of the Strip. In 2008 and in 2014 it launched major military assaults on Gaza to halt cross-border rocket attacks. In 1979 Egypt and Israel signed a peace agreement, but it wasn't until the early 1990s, after years of an uprising known as the intifada, that a peace process began with the Palestinians. Despite the handover of Gaza and parts of the West Bank to Palestinian control, a final agreement has yet to be reached. The main stumbling blocks include the status of Jerusalem, the fate of Palestinian refugees and their descendants, Jewish settlements, and attacks by Palestinian armed groups.
What was agreed as part of the Paris climate deal? The deal unites all the world's nations in a single agreement on tackling climate change for the first time in history. Coming to a consensus among nearly 200 countries on the need to cut greenhouse gas emissions is regarded by many observers as an achievement in itself and has been hailed as "historic". The Kyoto Protocol of 1997 set emission cutting targets for a handful of developed countries, but the US pulled out and others failed to comply. However, scientists point out that the Paris accord must be stepped up if it is to have any chance of curbing dangerous climate change. Pledges thus far could see global temperatures rise by as much as 2.7C, but the agreement lays out a roadmap for speeding up progress. What's in and what has been left out? The goal of preventing what scientists regard as dangerous and irreversible levels of climate change - judged to be reached at around 2C of warming above pre-industrial times - is central to the agreement. The world is already nearly halfway there at almost 1C and many countries argued for a tougher target of 1.5C - including leaders of low-lying countries that face unsustainable sea levels rises in a warming world. The desire for a more ambitious goal has been kept in the agreement - with the promise to "endeavour to limit" global temperatures even more, to 1.5C. Dr Bill Hare, CEO of Climate Analytics, says the objective is "remarkable". "It is a victory for the most vulnerable countries, the small islands, the least developed countries and all those with the most to lose, who came to Paris and said they didn't want sympathy, they wanted action." Meanwhile, for the first time, the accord lays out a longer-term plan for reaching a peak in greenhouse emissions "as soon as possible" and achieving a balance between output of man-made greenhouse gases and absorption - by forests or the oceans - "by the second half of this century". "If agreed and implemented, this means bringing down greenhouse-gas emissions to net zero within a few decades. It is in line with the scientific evidence we presented," says John Schellnhuber, Director of the Potsdam Institute for Climate Impact Research. Some have described the deal as "woolly" because some of the targets were scaled down during the negotiations. "The Paris Agreement is only one step on a long road, and there are parts of it that frustrate and disappoint me, but it is progress," says Greenpeace International executive director Kumi Naidoo. "This deal alone won't dig us out the hole we're in, but it makes the sides less steep." What about money? Money has been a sticking point throughout the negotiations. Developing countries say they need financial and technological help to leapfrog fossil fuels and move straight to renewables. Currently they have been promised US $100bn (£67bn) a year by 2020 - not as much as many countries would like. The agreement requires rich nations to maintain a $100bn a year funding pledge beyond 2020, and to use that figure as a "floor" for further support agreed by 2025. The deal says wealthy countries should continue to provide financial support for poor nations to cope with climate change and encourages other countries to join in on a voluntary basis. Dr Ilan Kelman of UCL, London, says the lack of time scales is "worrying". "The starting point of $100bn per year is helpful, but remains under 8% of worldwide declared military spending each year." Only elements of the Paris pact will be legally binding. The national pledges by countries to cut emissions are voluntary, and arguments over when to revisit the pledges - with the aim of taking tougher action - have been a stumbling block in the talks. The pact promises to make an assessment of progress in 2018, with further reviews every five years. As analysts point out, Paris is only the beginning of a shift towards a low-carbon world, and there is much more to do. "Paris is just the starting gun for the race towards a low-carbon future," says WWF-UK Chief Executive David Nussbaum. Prof John Shepherd of the National Oceanography Centre, University of Southampton, says the agreement includes some welcome aspirations but few people realise how difficult it will be to achieve the goals. "Since the only mechanism remains voluntary national caps on emissions, without even any guidance on how stringent those caps would need to be, it is hard to be optimistic that these goals are likely to be achieved."
The BBC has announced more than 50 hours of natural history programming, including follow-ups to hugely popular Blue Planet and Planet Earth series. Many shows will utilise new filming techniques, such as Countdown To The Rains, which will see 75 cameras along a stretch of Africa's Luangwa River. While Sleepover At The Zoo will feature a team of experts staying up all night at Bristol Zoo. They will be broadcast across BBC One, Two and Four over the next few years. New series Oceans will continue where the award-winning programme Blue Planet left off in 2001. It will look at some of the marine species that have been discovered over the past decade. These include the bizarre-looking blanket octopus, the "alarmingly hairy" yeti crab and the velvet belly lanternshark which uses a light-sabre style glowing spine to defeat its enemies. The Hunt will explore the competition between predators and their prey, including footage of polar bears filmed hunting bearded seals for the very first time. Tunacam and Squidcam Dolphins, tigers and kangaroos will all get their own dedicated series. Dolphin: Spy In The Pod uses spycams disguised as sea creatures - dubbed Tunacam, Turtlecam and Squidcam - to get even closer to some of the most loved animals in the world. A decade on from Planet Earth, the new six-part series One Planet will provide "the ultimate tour of an iconic ecosystem". It will look at how animals and plants evolve in response to areas as diverse as mountains, deserts, wild islands and man-made cities. "By using new filming techniques, peerless research and great storytelling, the next few years are all about shows that will delight our UK and global audiences," said the BBC's head of commissioning for natural history and science, Kim Shillinglaw. She continued: "From new discoveries in Oceans and never-before-filmed behaviour in The Hunt, to assembling 75 cameras in one place for Countdown To The Rains and the ground-breaking spirit of our Sleepover At The Zoo Event, we've never had as much range, scale and innovation to offer." Top Gear's Richard Hammond will front a three-part series called Big Weather, which will see him flying a light aircraft into a hailstorm and releasing robot drones into a hurricane. Three-part series Countdown to the Rains, which began filming from the moment the African dry season ended, will air on BBC Two from Sunday 3 November, presented by Kate Humble and Simon King. Other highlights include in-depth looks at Alaska, Japan, Patagonia and New Zealand; and Talk to the Animals, which will feature real life Dr Doolittle Lucy Cooke on a mission to understand how animals communicate.
جرمني کې يوې محکمې له حکومته غوښتي چې افغانستان ته شړل شوى يو افغان کډوال دې بېرته دغه هېواد ته ورستون کړي. محکمې د خپل حکم بې له ځنډه پلي کول غوښتي دي. دغه افغان کډوال چې قانوني دلايلو پر بنسټ يې نوم نه دى ښوول شوى د بلغاريا له لارې جرمني ته تللى او د تېر جون پر اتمې نېټې يې پناه غوښتې وه. د اروپايي ټولنې د قوانينو له مخې کډوال د دغې ټولنې هغه غړي هېواد کې پناه غوښتنې ته اړ وي چې لومړى يې خاورې ته ور ننوځي. دې اصل ته په پام سره د جرمني کډوالو ادارې د دغه ٢٣کلن افغان پناه غوښتنه رد کړه او په تېر سپتمبر کې يې بلغاريا ته ولېږه، ځکه هغه لومړى بلغاريا ته ورغلى و. محکمې د دغه کډوال د بېرته استنولو پرېکړه ځکه کړې چې هغه له شړل کېدو وړاندې د خپلې قضيې د ردېدا پر خلاف استېناف غوښتنه کړې وه او محکمې لا په دې اړه خپله پرېکړه نه وه اورولې. د جرمني د کډوالو ادارې وياند ويلي دوى ته د دغه افغان کډوال د استېناف غوښتنې خبر ډېر ناوخته رسېدلى و. وياند زياتوي وړاندې له دې چې وتوانېږو هغه بېرته جرمني ته را ستون کړو بلغاريايي چارواکو افغانستان ته شړلى و. د محکمې وياند وايي اوس به محکمه دا پرېکړه کوي چې د دغه افغان کډوال د قضيې واک کوم هېواد ته سپاري. دا په دې وروستيو کې د خپل ډول دويمه پېښه ده چې په اروپا کې پېښېږي. بريتانيا ته د يو افغان کدوال بېرته ستنول تېر سپتمبر کې يو بل افغان پناه غوښتونکی صمیم بېګزاد چې برتانیا کې د محکمې د حکم خلاف افغانستان ته شړل شوی و، بېرته لندن ته راوستل شو. د برتانیا د کورنیو چارو وزیره امبر رد له دې امله محکمې ته په سپکاوي تورنه شوې وه. ځکه ادعا کېده چې د ښاغلي بېګزاد تر استولو وړاندې دغه وزارت د محکمې له پرېکړې خبر شو و خو بیا یې هم بېګزاد کابل ته واستاوه. م. م- د نړۍ تر ټولو ډېر پناه غوښتونکی افغانان دي افغانستان: ایران دې د سوریې جګړې ته افغان کډوال نه لېږي "افغان کډوال د پاکستان تاوتریخوالي کې لاس نه لري، په زور اېستل کېږي" محکمې د ښاغلي بېګزاد د شړل کېدو پر ضد حکم کړی و ښاغلی بېګزاد د سپتمبر پر ١٧ نېټې پر ۱۰:۴۵ دقیقو لندن ته ورسېد او اجازه ورکړل شوه خپلې پالونکې کورنۍ ته ستون شي. صمیم بیګزاد دوه کاله وړاندې برتانیا ته له ناقانونه لارو رسېدلی و او لومړي سر کې یې د پناه غوښتنه رد شوې وه. د ده د پلار پناه غوښتنه لا وړاندې برتانیا کې منل شوې ده له ۱۰ کلونو راهیسې دغه هېواد کې ژوند کوي.
Thousands of previously classified documents relating to the assassination of President John F Kennedy in 1963 have been released by the US government. As people examine all 2,800 files, here are the most interesting points so far. NB many files contain unverified raw intelligence. In a memo written the day Oswald was killed, FBI director J Edgar Hoover expressed concern about the spread of conspiracy theories. "The thing I am concerned about is having something issued so that we can convince the public that Oswald is the real assassin," he said. A memo from the CIA, based on an intercepted phone call, suggests Oswald spoke with a KGB officer at the Russian embassy in Mexico City. It says that on 28 September 1963 he spoke with Valeriy Vladimirovich Kostikov, an "identified KGB officer" who worked for a department "responsible for sabotage and assassination". Oswald later called the embassy and, in "broken Russian", asked if there was "anything new concerning the telegram to Washington". Lee Harvey Oswald, who shot and killed President Kennedy, was quickly arrested and charged. But two days later Oswald was shot dead in the basement of the Dallas police department by Jack Ruby, a local nightclub owner. But could more have been done to protect him? One memo reveals the FBI had warned Dallas police of a death threat made against Oswald. FBI director J Edgar Hoover said: "We at once notified the chief of police and he assured us Oswald would be given sufficient protection. However, this was not done." The idea of a leaderless United States did not appeal to some Soviet officials. They "were fearful that without leadership, some irresponsible general in the United States might launch a missile at the Soviet Union", according to one memo. It also says the Soviets were "convinced the assassination was not the deed of one man" but rather a "carefully planned campaign in which several people played a part". An FBI memo from before Kennedy was elected president describes attempts by a private detective to spy on the then senator. It says a "high priced Hollywood call girl" told FBI agents that private detective Fred Otash had contacted her to ask about Senator Kennedy's involvement in "sex parties". The private detective also suggested equipping the woman with "a recording device" to take down any "indiscreet statements" from Senator Kennedy. She refused, and said she was unaware of any "indiscretions". One memo describes how a British local newspaper, the Cambridge News, received an anonymous call about "some big news" in the US, just 25 minutes before the assassination. "The caller said only that the Cambridge News reporter should call the American embassy in London for some big news and then hung up", it says. A copy of the memo was released by the National Archives in the US in July, but had gone unreported. An FBI report alleges that President Lyndon B Johnson, who took office after President Kennedy was killed, may have been a member of the KKK. An informant said the white supremacist group had "documented proof that President Johnson was formerly a member of the Klan in Texas during the early days of his political career". However, no proof was provided.
İngiltere'de yaşayan bir çift, alıkoydukları bir çocuğa cinsel taciz uygulayarak, bu görüntüleri Amerikalı bir pedofiliye Skype üzerinden izlettikleri iddiasıyla çıkarıldıkları mahkemede suçlu bulundu. 34 yaşındaki Sarah Gotham ve 36 yaşındaki Craig Forbes, ismi gizli tutulan kızı, 2012 yılı Aralık ayından, 2013 yılı Mart ayına kadar uyuşturucu ile yanlarında tuttu. Bu süre içinde de kızın görüntülerini internet üzerinden, California'da yaşayan 42 yaşındaki Kori Ellis isimli pedofili hükümlüsü ile paylaştı. OIayın İngiltere'de mahkeme aşamasına taşınması ise Ellis'in Nisan ayında ABD'de yakalanması ile gerçekleşti. Kişisel bilgisayarından çocuk pornosu kapsamında yüzlerce içerik çıkan Ellis, sorgusunda İngiliz çifte ilişkin de bilgiler verdi. Amerikan Federal Soruşturma Bürosu'nda (FBI) 4 ajanın gözetiminde İngiltere'ye getirilen Kori Ellis, burada çiftin aleyhine tanıklık etmesi için mahkemeye çıkarıldı. Ellis'in ayrıntılı ifadeşleri doğrultusunda İngiltere'deki mahkeme Sarah Gotham'ı 9 yıl, sevgilisi Craig Forbes'u ise 8 yıl hapse mahkum etti. Çiftin, Amerika'da yaşayan Ellis ile internetteki sohbet odalarında tanıştığı açıklandı. İngiltere'ye tanıklık için getirilen Ellis'in de ABD'de devam eden dava kapsamında 15 yıla kadar hapisle cezalandırılabileceği bildiriliyor.
අතුරුදහන් වූ සිය ඥාතීන් රඳවාගෙන සිටින ස්ථානයක් නොදන්නා නමුත් ඔවුන් පැහැරගෙන ගිය පුද්ගලයින්ගේ නම් ගම් ඇතුළු අනෙකුත් විස්තර තමන් සතුව තිබෙන බව අතුරුදහන් වූවන්ගේ ඥාතීහු පවසති. ත්‍රිකුණාමල මවුවරුන්ගේ සංවිධානයේ සභාපතිනි සෙබස්තියන් දේවී ඒ බව සඳහන් කළේ අතුරුදන් වූ සිය ඥාතීන් පිළිබඳව ජනාධිපති මෛත්‍රීපාල සිරිසේන සෙනසුරාදා (මැයි 20) කළ ප්‍රකාශයක් පිළිබඳව ප්‍රතිචාරය පළ කරමිනි. යුද සමයේ අතුරුදහන් වූවන් රඳවාගෙන සිටින ස්ථානයක් සම්බන්ධව තොරතුරුක් හෙළි කරන්නේ නම් ඒ පිළිබඳව සොයා බලන බව ජනාධිපති මෛත්‍රීපාල සිරිසේන සෙනසුරාදා සාම්පූර් හිදී ජනහමුවක් අමතමින් සඳහන් කළේය. සාම්පූර් නව දිසා රෝහල විවෘත කිරීමෙන් අනතුරුව ජනතාව ඇමතූ ජනපතිවරයා, අතුරුදහන් වූවන් සම්බන්ධයෙන් මෙතෙක් රැස්කර ඇති වාර්තා සැළකිල්ලට ගෙන කරුණු සොයා බැලීමට කමිටුවක් පත් කරන බව ද සඳහන් කළේය. "2015 දී මම යාපනේ හින්දු විද්‍යාලයේ සිසු දරුවන් පිරිසක් සමග ඡායාරූපයකට පෙනී සිටියා. එම ඡායාරූපය අන්තර් ජාලයට මුදාහැර තිබුනේ සිසුන් අතුරුදන්ව ඇති බව සඳහන් කරමින්," ජනාධිපතිවරයා පැවසීය. "මේක දේශපාළන අන්තවාදීන්ගේ කුමන්ත්‍රණයක්. අතුරුදහන් වූවන් සොයා ගැනීමට මම හැම විටම සහයෝගය දෙනවා." එසේ සිය ඥාතීන් අතුරුදහන් කළ පුද්ගලයන් පිළිබඳ සියලු තොරතුරු තමන් සතුව තිබෙන බව ඔවුන් සොයමින් වසර නමයක් මුළුල්ලේ අරගලයක නිරතව සිටින සෙබස්තියන් දේවී ඇතුළු ඥාතීහු පවසති. "මගේ පුතාගේ නම සෙබස්තියන් රේගන්. 2008 මාර්තු 19 වෙනිදා පිල්ලෙයාන්ගේ කල්ලියේ නාදන් හා නගුලේස් කියන දෙන්නා එයා පැහැරගෙන ගියා," සෙබස්තියන් දේවී බීබීසී සිංහල සේවයට පැවසීය. "ත්‍රිකුණාමල නාවික හමුදා කඳවුරේ ඉඳන් නාදන් මට කෝල් එකක් දුන්නා රුපියල් ලක්ෂයක් දුන්නොත් පුතා නිදහස් කරනවා කියලා. පස්සේ මම රුපියල් ලක්ෂයක් නාදන්ගේ අතටම දුන්නා. නමුත් පුතා නිදහස් කළේ නෑ," ඇය කියා සිටියාය. "නාදන් දැනටත් මට මුණ ගැහෙනවා. මම මේ තොරතුරු සංහිඳියා යාන්ත්‍රණයේ නිළධාරීන්ටත් ලබා දුන්නා," මවුවරුන්ගේ සංගමයේ සභාපතිනි සෙබස්තියන් දේවී පවසන්නීය. අතුරුදහන් වූවන් සම්බන්ධ කාර්යාලය (OMP) ඉතා ඉක්මනින් පිහිටුවීම ඇතුළු නිර්දේශ ගණනාවක් සංහිඳියා යාන්ත්‍රණ සඳහා වූ ප්‍රවිචාරන කාර්ය සාධක බලකාය ආණ්ඩුවට ඉදිරිපත් කළ නමුත් එම නිර්දේශ පිළිපැදීමට තමන් බැඳී නොසිටින බව කැබිනට් ප්‍රකාශක අමාත්‍ය රාජිත සේනාරත්න පැවසීය. පාර්ලිමේන්තුවේ සම්මත කරගත් පනත ප්‍රකාර OMP කාර්යාලය පිහිටුවන මෙන් යුරෝපා සංගමය, ගැටුම් නිරාකරණය පිළිබඳ ජාත්‍යන්තර කණ්ඩායම (ICG) ඇතුළු ජාත්‍යන්තර ප්‍රජාව ද ශ්‍රී ලංකා ආණ්ඩුවෙන් ඉල්ලීමක් කර තිබේ. ඒ පිළිබඳව සොයා බැලීමට කමිටුවක් පත් කරන බව ජනාධිපතිවරයා නිවේදනය කළේ ඒ අතරවාරයේය. OMP කාර්යාලය සම්බන්ධ පනත සම්මත වී තිබියදී, එම කාර්යාලය නොපිහිටුවා අලුත් කමිටුවක් පත්කිරීමේ අවශ්‍යතාවය කවරක් දැයි සමාජ මාධ්‍ය ජාල ඔස්සේ ඇතැමුන් ප්‍රශ්න කර තිබුණි. බීබීසී සිංහල සේවය සමග වැඩිදුරටත් අදහස් දැක්වූ සෙබස්තියන් දේවී: "අපේ සමිතියේ අම්මලා හැත්තෑ අට දෙනෙක් සිටියා. පහළොස් දෙනෙක් මේ වන විට මිය ගිහින්," යනුවෙන් සිය අරගලයේ ඉතිහාසය සිහිපත් කළාය. "අතුරුදන් වූවන් වෙනුවෙන් ලංකාවේ තිබුණු සෑම උද්ඝෝෂණයකටම මම සහභාගි වුනා. අපේ ඥාතීන් පැහැරගෙන ගිය බොහෝ දෙනෙකුගේ නම් අපි ඒ තැන්වලදී හෙලි කළා. රුපියල් කෝටියකට වඩා උන් අපෙන් කප්පම් ගත්තා. අපි ජනාධිපතිතුමාට කියන්නේ තවමත් යහතින් ජීවත්වෙන මේ මිනීමරු කප්පම් කාරයෝ අත් අඩංගුවට ගෙන ප්‍රශ්ණ කරන්න කියලයි," ඇය බැගෑපත් ඉල්ලීමක් කරන්නීය.
With its high literacy rate and traditional mercantile culture, Lebanon has traditionally been an important commercial hub for the Middle East. It has also often been at the centre of Middle Eastern conflicts, despite its small size, because of its borders with Syria and Israel and its uniquely complex communal make-up. Shia Muslims, Sunni Muslims, Christians and Druze are the main population groups in a country that has been a refuge for the region's minorities for centuries. Population 4.3 million Area 10,452 sq km (4,036 sq miles) Major language Arabic Major religions Islam, Christianity Life expectancy 71 years (men), 75 years (women) President: Michel Aoun Michel Aoun was elected by parliament in October 2016, ending a political stalemate which had left the country without a head of state since May 2014. He is the founder of the mainly Maronite Christian political party, the Free Patriotic Movement (FPM). He was army commander-in-chief from 1984 until 1989 and was appointed prime minister of the interim military government in 1988. He launched an unsuccessful "liberation war" against the presence of Syrian forces in 1989 and fled to France in 1990. When Syrian troops left in 2005, he returned to form an alliance with pro-Syrian parties. Prime minister: Saad Hariri Saad Hariri - a Sunni Muslim leader and businessman - was nominated to form a government by President Aoun in November 2016. He previously held the post between 2009 and 2011, after which he lived outside the country citing safety concerns. Following the assassination of his father and former Prime Minister Rafik Hariri in 2005, he entered politics and founded the Future Current political party. He was born in Saudi Arabia in 1970 and has spent much of his adult life there. His construction company, Saudi Oger, is based in Saudi Arabia and Mr Hariri is considered one of Lebanon's richest individuals. Lebanon's broadcasting scene is developed, lively and diverse, and reflects the country's pluralism and divisions. It was the first Arab country to permit private radio and TV. These outlets dominate the broadcasting scene and air some of the most outspoken TV talk shows in the region. News websites have emerged as a key information source. Some key dates in Lebanon's history: 1516-1918 - Lebanon is part of the Ottoman Empire. 1920 - The League of Nations grants the mandate for Lebanon and Syria to France, which creates the State of Greater Lebanon out of the provinces of Mount Lebanon, north Lebanon, south Lebanon and the Bekaa. 1926 - Lebanese Representative Council approves a constitution and the unified Lebanese Republic under the French mandate is declared. 1944 - France agrees to transfer power to the Lebanese government on 1 January. 1975-1990 - Lebanese civil war 1992 - After the first elections since 1972, wealthy businessman Rafik Hariri becomes prime minister. 2000 - Israel pulls out of south Lebanon 2005 - Former prime minister Rafik Hariri is killed by a car bomb in Beirut, sparking anti-Syrian rallies and a political crisis.
تقول الحكاية التي راجت على الألسنة مؤخرا في أربيل والسليمانية، إن قاسم سليماني، قائد فيلق القدس في الحرس الثوري الإيراني، قال لزعماء أكراد عندما التقاهم في السليمانية "لو تمسكتم بموقفكم سوف نجعلكم تعودون للجبال". كثيرون يتمسكون بصدق الرواية وآخرون ينفونها تماما، لكن المؤكد الآن أن كردستان العراق و منذ عام الفين وثلاثة لم تعد تلك المناطق الجبلية التي ينشط فيها مقاتلو البيشمركة في عمليات الكر والفر التي انخرطوا فيها مع الجيش العراقي لعقود وفي ظل أنظمة حكم عراقية مختلفة. تبدلت الأحوال، فأربيل الجديدة بأبراجها الشاهقة باتت أشبه في عمرانها وشوارعها بمدن الخليج وليس بأربيل القديمة بأسواقها وقلعتها، والسليمانية التي تضم مستشفيات وبنوك على أحدث طراز، لم تعد مدينة جبلية معزولة. هكذا تبدو صورة المحاربين في الجبال، التي لوح بها بعض الزعماء الأكراد في اجتماعاتهم الخاصة عندما رفضوا إنذارات بغداد ودول الجوار، أقرب إلى "الحلم الثوري" من الحقيقة التي يمكن تفعيلها. يحدثني "علي" وهو نادل مقهى قدم من حي الكفاح في بغداد للعمل في السليمانية منذ عام 2007 "كيف يعودون للجبال ويتركون البيوت والسيارات الفارهة؟ كل من يعملون معي هنا قادمون من بغداد وسوريا وبنغلادش ونيبال". والواقع أن الحكم الذاتي الكردي، ورغم المديونية الهائلة على حكومة أربيل (20 مليار دولار)، قد خلق نمطا اقتصاديا لا يقل تشابها عن النمط الخليجي تتوارى فيه الديمقراطية مع تقدم ريع النفط الذي يؤلف القلوب ويقدم الخدمات. لكن لهذا النمط عيوبه أيضا. فتجربة كردستان رغم حداثتها مع مؤسسات الدولة تتشابه إلى حد كبير مع العراق عموما، من حيث معدلات الفساد وتركز السلطة في ايدي عائلات وجماعات تقليلدية، أضف إلى ذلك سيطرة الأجهزة الأمنية والغموض المحيط بالعوائد الحكومية للنفط والجمارك، دون وجود اجهزة رقابية فعالة. كان أكراد العراق، وحتى استفتاء الخامس والعشرين من سبتمبر أيلول الماضي، رغم كل ذلك، قاب قوسين أو أدنى من شكل الدولة ووظائفها. قال لي زعيم كردي متحسرا على ما آل اليه الوضع "كنا قد تجاوزنا حتى مفهوم الفيدرالية، وأصبح لدينا مطاراتنا الدولية ومعابرنا الحدودية وأجهزتنا الأمنية". وتتعدد الروايات في تفسير موقف رئيس الاقليم مسعود بارزاني في قرار الاستفتاء، فالبعض يرجعه الى رغبته في وضع المطلب الكردي على الطاولة قبل انتهاء الحرب على تنظيم الدولة الإسلامية وانتفاء الحاجة الى جهود قواته. واخرون يرون أنه كان قفزة للأمام من المأزق الذي باتت تعانيه سلطته وحزبه (الديمقراطي الكردستاني). فبارزاني، الذي انتخب لفترتين متتاليتين منذ 2003، تم التجديد له لسنتين في عام الفين وخمسة عشر، ثم جُدد التجديد مرة أخرى بعدما افتى مجلس الشورى (أعلى هيئة قضائية) بعدم جواز شغور منصب الرئاسة وتأكيد مفوضية الانتخابات في 2015 عدم قدرتها على الدعوة الى انتخابات. وتفاقمت ازمة التجربة الكردية بانقسام الحزبين الرئيسيين ومعهما الحزب الإسلامي بعد الدعوة لانتخابات لبرلمان كان معطلا معظم الوقت عن اداء مهامه. ينفي البروفيسور جوتيار عادل استاذ العلوم السياسية المقيم في اربيل، هذه الفرضيات، مشيرا إلى أن الأحزاب الرئيسية قد وافقت على الاستفتاء في عام 2015 عندما طرح الموضوع لأول مرة. فلماذا تبدلت مواقفهم إذن؟ تداعيات الاستفتاء، الذي ايدته اغلبية المقترعين، لم تظهر جلية إلا عندما بدأت بغداد ودول الجوار في اتخاذ خطوات تصعيدية نحو أربيل. قبل ذلك كانت كل القوى السياسية بما فيها حركة التغيير "كوران" والاتحاد الوطني الكردستاني قد عدلت مواقفها في اللحظات الأخيرة وانضمت لركب المؤيدين حتى بالرغم من إجراء الاستفتاء في المناطق المتنناع عليها وما كان متوقعا لذلك من تعقيدات. لكن بافل طالباني، احد قادة الاتحاد الوطني، المنافس الرئيسي لحزب بارزاني، يقدم رواية أخرى في مقابلة مع بي بي سي عن محادثات الغرف المغلقة: "قلنا للرئيس بارزاني إن التحدي كبير ولن يقبله أصدقاؤنا لكنه لم يستمع الا لنصائح مقربيه". ومع دخول القوات العراقية إلى المناطق المتنازع عليها، وفي مقدمتها كركوك، وانسحاب البيشمركة منها خرج ما دار في الغرف المغلقة إلى العلن. وتوالت الدعوات الى البارزاني بالاستقالة وإعلان تحمله "الكارثة التي حلت بالكيان الكردي الوليد". فهل كان بارزاني هو الخاسر الوحيد من قراره ورد فعل بغداد ودول الجوار؟ المؤكد لا. فقد أدى ما حدث إلى تشظي مواقف القوى الكردية وانقسامها على نفسها. مثال ذلك هو الاتحاد الوطني، الذي بات منقسما بين أعضاء جناح طالباني، المتهمين بالوقوف وراء اصدار قرار الانسحاب من كركوك، والمتشددين الذين يؤيدون كوسرت رسول، احد قادة الحزب ونائب بارزاني الذي صدرت بحقه مذكرة اعتقال من بغداد. كما أن الحزب الديمقراطي، ورغم أنه يبدو الأكثر تماسكا حتى اللحظة، بات يتنازعه تياران، الأول يمثله مسرور بارزاني، نجل مسعود والمسؤول عن الملفات الأمنية والاستخباراتية، ونيجرفان بارزاني، ابن شقيق مسعود، الذي يتولى رئاسة الحكومة ويمثل صوت الاعتدال للتفاوض مع بغداد. يحدد جوتيار عادل "جينات الانقسام" في سياسة أكراد العراق بأنها تاريخية وليس من المتوقع تجاوزها قريبا. "مع كل أزمة يواجهها أكراد العراق، تزداد احزابهم انقساما بدلا من أن تتوحد". ولأن هذه الأحزاب ارتبطت بشخصيات كاريزمية مثل طالباني وبارزاني، اصبح نموها أقرب الى التركيبة العشائرية وليس الى تراث القاعدة الديمقراطية. لمست هذا الانقسام جليا في كركوك، أحد معاقل الاتحاد الوطني. فمن بقي فيها يشيد بقرار الانسحاب تأييدا لموقف الاتحاد الوطني لأنه جنب المدينة والبيشمركة خسائر كبيرة، ومن خرجوا منها يؤيدون موقف الحزب الديمقراطي ويعتبرون قرار الانسحاب "خيانة". حتى في مؤسسات الإقليم يتمثل هذا الانقسام بوضوح. فتركيبة الحكم ومسؤوليات البيشمركة والمناصب الأمنية تنتمي لعائلة حاكمة، وفي السليمانية نفس الشيء، الامر الذي يعزز المخاوف من قيام اقليمين كرديين بإدارتين مختلفتين إذا تعزز الانقسام الراهن. لكن استاذ العلوم السياسية يرى ان هذه التركيبة هي الأكثر انسجاما مع طبيعة المجتمع الكردي. غير أن جولة في شوارع أربيل والسليمانية تشير إلى ان المجتمع الكردي تغير كثيرا. وكبقية مجتمعات الشرق الأوسط ،باتت اغلبيته تنتمي الى الجيل الاصغر الذي حدد اختياراته وطموحاته في عصر العولمة والسماوات المفتوحة، وقد يهمه حلم الرفاه أكثر من تراث الماضي الذي يحدثه عنه الأباء المقاتلون. سألت بافل طالباني، الذي لا يشغل منصبا رسميا في حزبه، رغم دوره المؤثر في سياساته: هل سينتهي عصر التوريث لدى أكراد العراق قريبا؟ قال" لا أتوقع أن يحدث ذلك قريبا، فكثيرون يرتاحون لهذه الصيغة التي تضمن الأمن والاستقرار". لكن الأزمة الراهنة وحالة التشظي التي يعيشها التجمع السياسي في كردستان العراق ربما تثبت أن الاستقرار قد يكون صعب المنال الآن من دون تقديم الأكراد لتنازلات ضخمة للحكومة المركزية في بغداد، وهو ما انعكس في البيان الذي نشرته حكومة الاقليم أخيرا وأبدت فيه استعدادها لتعليق نتائج الاستفتاء والحوار مع بغداد. وعلى الرغم من أن مثل هذه المبادرة قد تؤدي إلى نزع فتيل الأزمة مع بغداد، عسكرياً على الأقل. إلا أن الثابت أن الأكرد الذين احتفلوا الشهر الماضي بولادة دولتهم القومية قد أصبحوا الآن في عداد الخاسرين إذا ما قورن موقفهم اليوم بموقفهم قبل الاستفتاء. سيكون من المثير للاهتمام متابعة المسار الذي ستتخذه الأمور في الأيام والأسابيع القادمة على صعيد علاقات الاقليم مع بغداد من جهة والمشهد السياسي داخل الاقليم نفسه من جهة أخرى. وفيما ستتواصل التكهنات حول الأسباب الحقيقية التي دفعت بارزاني إلى الدعوة إلى الاستفتاء فإن ما حدث منذ الخامس والعشرين من سبتمبر/ أيلول الماضي يطرح تساولات أعمق عما إذا كان توافر عوامل الثقافة واللغة والتاريخ المشترك وغيرها من عوامل النزعة القومية كافية لاعلان قيام الدول أم أن كل هذه العوامل مجتمعة لن تستطيع الصمود أمام الحسابات السياسية والاقتصادية محلية كانت أم إقليمية. من المؤكد أن الإجابة على مثل هذه التساؤلات ستكون موضع اهتمام يتجاوز إقليم كردستان العراق إلى (جيرانهم في سوريا) الذين قد تبدو الظروف مواتية لهم للاقدام على خطوة مماثلة في المستقبل القريب.
Sir David Attenborough will present the sequel to 2001's The Blue Planet, the BBC has announced. The seven-part series, to be shown later this year, will aim to highlight recent scientific discoveries. Filming innovations include suction cameras fitted to the backs of orcas. "I am truly thrilled to be joining this new exploration of the underwater worlds which cover most of our planet, yet are still its least known," Sir David said. The BBC's Natural History Unit spent four years filming off every continent and in every ocean for Blue Planet II, with support from marine scientists. James Honeyborne, the series' executive producer, said: "The oceans are the most exciting place to be right now, because new scientific discoveries have given us a new perspective of life beneath the waves. "Blue Planet II is taking its cue from these breakthroughs, unveiling unbelievable new places, extraordinary new behaviours and remarkable new creatures. Showing a contemporary portrait of marine life, it will provide a timely reminder that this is a critical moment for the health of the world's oceans." Among the recent discoveries caught on camera are a tuskfish that uses tools and a new species of crab with a hairy chest - nicknamed the "Hoff crab" after Baywatch star David Hasselhoff. The Natural History Unit's new filming techniques include "tow cams" that can capture predatory fish and dolphins head-on, suction cams which attach to the back of whale sharks and orcas for a creature's-eye view, and a probe camera that can record miniature marine life. The BBC said the crew caught unusual examples of marine behaviour on camera, such as a coral grouper and reef octopus with sophisticated hunting techniques, a giant trevally fish that catches birds in flight, and a dive with a sperm whale mother and her calf. It said the series would also explore new landscapes from methane volcanoes erupting in the Gulf of Mexico to the Antarctic deep at 1,000m, filmed using manned submersibles. The Blue Planet was watched by more than 12 million people in 2001 and won Baftas and Emmy awards for both cinematography and music. The sequel will be broadcast on BBC One later this year.
Internet es como una memoria infinita, perenne y colectiva que todo lo registra. Tus búsquedas más vergonzosas, tus comentarios más inapropiados, las fotos más bochornosas de tu pasado adolescente... todo queda grabado en la red. Muchas veces ni siquiera lo recordamos. ¡Fue hace tanto tiempo...! ¿Quién se acuerda de su perfil en MySpace o de los mensajes de Facebook que envió hace 10 años? La ilusión del anonimato y el efecto de la invisibilidad hacen que seamos más desinhibidos a la hora de expresar nuestra opinión, o no nos demos cuenta de que lo que ocurre en el ciberespacio, se queda en el ciberespacio. La memoria de internet no falla. Si no haces nada por evitarlo, todos tus recuerdos digitales se quedarán ahí para siempre. Pero hay cosas que puedes hacer para borrar esas publicaciones antiguas y evitar que tu pasado digital te persiga. A continuación, te damos algunas claves. Lo primero que debes hacer antes de cualquier limpieza en internet es tener muy claro qué es lo que quieres eliminar. Puedes comenzar por buscar tu nombre en Google y fijarte en qué resultados aparecen. Hazlo también con otros navegadores: Bing, Yahoo, Bipplex, Ask. Cuantos más, mejor. Es posible que no encuentres todos a la primera y tengas que hacer una búsqueda más profunda, navegando a través de varias páginas hasta encontrar el material. Dedícale tiempo. Una vez que encuentres lo que deseas borrar, accede directamente a las plataformas o sitios web donde colocaste ese contenido y comienza la limpieza. Es fundamental revisar los mensajes, incluso en plataformas que ya no utilizas, para asegurarte de que no dejas nada que más tarde pueda meterte en problemas. Hablamos de aplicaciones de mensajería, pero también de redes sociales, foros y páginas de internet. Incluso aunque no escribieras en ellas tu nombre real, piensa si la gente podría vincularte a esos mensajes. En algunos sitios web puedes hacer una búsqueda de los mensajes que enviaste a través de tu cuenta. También puedes ejecutar una búsqueda con los nombres que usaste para enviar esos mensajes y así asegurarte de que no te dejas nada en el tintero. ¿Te acuerdas de Myspace? Fue lanzado en agosto de 2003. Antes de que Instagram, Facebook, Twitter o Snapchat se alzaran como las favoritas, era el espacio predilecto de muchos internautas para compartir sus fotos. De hecho, todavía pueden encontrarse en su archivo fotos del pasado de cantantes como Taylor Swift o actores como Tom Hardy, para deleite de sus fans. Myspace sigue estando activo y tiene unos 38 millones de usuarios. Hay decenas de redes sociales "antiguas" que todavía existen: las plataformas fotográficas Fotolog y Flickr, la web profesional Xing, las redes de amigos Hi5 y Faceparty, apps de citas online... Muchas sufrieron un gran éxodo con la llegada de sitios nuevos, pero todavía pueden ser un baúl de tesoros de fotos vergonzosas. Revisa todos tus perfiles. Muchas secciones de comentarios en sitios web son gestionados por gigantes de internet, como Facebook y Disqus. Esta última anunció en 2012 que sufrió un hackeo masivo. Si has usado tu nombre real en algunos foros y sitios de comentarios y no quieres eliminar el contenido, puedes optar por cambiar tu nombre y la foto asociada a tu perfil. Busca un pseudónimo con el que nadie pueda identificarte. En algunos países, las empresas de internet tienen que cumplir con una serie de normas que garanticen el "derecho al olvido" de sus usuarios. El Tribunal de Justicia de la Unión Europea dictaminó en mayo de 2014 que Google, Bing y otros buscadores tienen que permitir que los internautas elijan si quieren que se borren los resultados que aparecen con las búsquedas que los vinculan. Esto significa que los posts antiguos en redes sociales pueden ocultarse de los resultados de los buscadores. Puede ser especialmente útil hacerlo si buscas empleo, pues cada vez son más las compañías que hacen búsquedas online de sus candidatos potenciales. También es importante para víctimas de violencia doméstica (los abusadores a menudo intentan encontrarlas) y aquellas personas con condenas prescritas. Algunos otros lugares donde hubo sentencias sobre este "derecho al olvido" son México, Brasil y Colombia. Conoce las leyes y ejerce tu derecho. Algunas redes sociales les complican la tarea a sus usuarios si quieren borrar su cuenta de forma permanente. En cambio, les animan a que la desactiven "temporalmente". Pero si quieres que tu limpieza sea efectiva, lo mejor es que borres las cuentas por completo. Facebook tiene una página para este propósito. En el caso de Twitter, la eliminación se hace efectiva después de 30 días. Al eliminar las cuentas en Facebook y Twitter, tus publicaciones públicas desaparecerán. No obstante, algunas copias podrían seguir apareciendo en los resultados de los buscadores. A menudo, el material que compartimos en internet a través de mensajes privados es más sensible y confidencial que lo que publicamos. Siempre es una buena idea proteger las cuentas con contraseñas fuertes y únicas. Si una página web te da la opción, elige la verificación en dos pasos. Así a los demás les resultará más difícil entrar en tu cuenta sin permiso, pues necesitarán la contraseña del sitio web y la de tu teléfono móvil. Nada de lo que compartes en internet es del todo privado. Una vez que se publica, no siempre se puede eliminar. De hecho, incluso existen sitios web, como Wayback Machine, que permiten "viajar en el tiempo" a través de los archivos viejos de la red. Eso incluye blogs y foros de internet. Si quieres estar a salvo, intenta no publicar contenido del que más adelante te puedas arrepentir. Y, de vez en cuando, haz una buena limpieza.
В обзоре российских газет: МВД предложило наказывать родителей и учителей за участие школьников в несанкционированных акциях. Неформально это уже происходит, но законодательно закрепить норму будет сложно, пишет газета "Ведомости". С предложением о наказании родителей и педагогов выступил на заседании Совета по правам человека (СПЧ) во вторник начальник Главного управления по борьбе с экстремизмом МВД Тимур Валиулин. Он предложил подумать над поправками в законодательство. Издание напоминает, что в мае против участия несовершеннолетних в несогласованных акциях высказалась председатель Совета Федерации Валентина Матвиенко, поручившая сенаторам изучить вопрос о законодательном запрете на вовлечение детей в подобные мероприятия. Смысла в таких поправках нет, проблему они решить не смогут, считает зампред комитета Госдумы по законодательству Рафаэль Марданшин: "Подростки могут просто не сказать родителям, куда они собираются. Школа же вообще ограничена в воспитательной функции, и то, что происходит за ее стенами, не входит в зону ответственности учителей". Инициатива очень резонансная, и МВД в состоянии само вынести ее на рассмотрение правительства, иначе получится ведомственный лоббизм, отмечает собеседник в аппарате Думы. Газета предполагает, чем была вызвана инициатива: в 2017 году прошли уже три митинга, организованные Алексеем Навальным (только часть была согласована). После этого во многих школах учителя провели "разъяснительные беседы", часть которых попала в интернет: в брянской школе, например, директор интересовалась, кто из школьников "против "Единой России", и объясняла: то, что делает Навальный, - "чистой воды провокация". В свою очередь руководитель штаба Навального Леонид Волков заявил, что в соцсетях появлялась социальная реклама, призывавшая школьников не участвовать в митингах. Предложение МВД высказано в контексте общих рассуждений об участии молодежи в несогласованных акциях и не носило характера конкретного проекта, считает председатель СПЧ Михаил Федотов: "Чтобы молодежь не участвовала в таких акциях, надо дать ей возможность обрести культуру легальной гражданской активности. Организаторам акций и местным властям нужно научиться находить общий язык. А вовлекать несовершеннолетних в нарушение закона неправильно". В редакционном комментарии "Ведомости" называют инициативу еще одной попыткой "создать неправовой закон". Предложение начальника главка МВД, по мнению обозревателя, отражает настроение власти, которая "боится политики и одновременно пытается вести политическую агитацию там, где она запрещена". Молодежь остро реагирует на несправедливость и коррупцию и хочет получить внятные ответы о причинах их распространения, но часто не получает их ни в семье, ни в школе, отмечает уполномоченный по правам ребенка в Москве Евгений Бунимович. Член СПЧ профессор права Илья Шаблинский считает предложения Валиулина нарушением конституции и избыточным законотворчеством. Родители и так платят штраф в случае задержания детей за нарушение правил проведения митингов. Есть также статья 5.35 КоАП за невыполнение обязанностей по содержанию и воспитанию несовершеннолетних, но, вероятно, генерала раздражает маленький (до 500 руб.) штраф. Попытка решить общественную проблему полицейскими запретами - путь в тупик, уверен Бунимович. Запреты повышают уровень риска и создают ореол привлекательности участия в митингах для подростков, говорит директор Центра молодежных исследований НИУ ВШЭ Елена Омельченко. Кремль реанимирует идею двухпартийной системы, предполагает "Независимая газета". Такие выводы изданию позволяют сделать "оживление и трансформация" партии "Справедливая Россия". Источник газеты среди эсэров рассказал, что предположительно Сергей Миронов партию покинет - он будет направлен в Совет Федерации по президентской квоте. Среди прочих ему на замену прочат и полпреда президента в Центральном федеральном округе (ЦФО) Александра Беглова. Хорошо зарекомендовавшему себя на всех должностях полпреду сейчас подыскивают новую должность. Ранее, в частности, СМИ писали о возможности его назначения преемником губернатора Московской области Андрея Воробьева. Опыт политической работы у Беглова имеется - он работал в руководстве Санкт-Петербурга и рассматривался в качестве преемника губернатора Валентины Матвиенко. В 2010 году его называли вероятным претендентом на пост мэра Москвы после уволенного Юрия Лужкова. В то же время Беглов 14 лет является членом "Единой России" (ЕР). Но его гипотетический переход в СР собеседник "НГ" предложил рассматривать как реализацию многоходового плана Кремля по созданию двухпартийной системы. По мнению главы Политической экспертной группы Константина Калачева, фамилия Беглова всплыла еще и потому, что тому, очевидно, подыскивают новое место работы: "Возможно, кто-то, зная об этом, и начинает фантазировать". Тем не менее, продолжил эксперт, вопрос реанимации СР действительно назрел: "И даже не из-за падения КПРФ, которая власти тем не менее тоже нужна, хотя левый электорат закрыт КПРФ лишь отчасти. Да, Миронова пора менять. Но менять его на Беглова бессмысленно - он глубоко православный, консервативный, совсем на современного левого не тянет. Если только просто надо освободить место полпреда под выборы, а Беглова некуда девать. Но СР это не оживит. Хотя элиты, конечно, могут подтянуться под такой системный проект, ведь ЕР не резиновая". Как стало известно "Коммерсанту", в черный список ЦБ попадут более 120 высокопоставленных сотрудников банка "ФК Открытие". Газета утверждает, что это самый массовый случай за всю историю санаций. Такая же участь ждет и топ-менеджеров "Бинбанка", правда, их будет гораздо меньше. Оказавшиеся в списке ЦБ банкиры не смогут в течение пяти лет занимать высокие должности в банках и компаниях финансового сектора. Банк "Открытие" находится на оздоровлении в фонде по консолидации банковского сектора ЦБ, и это самый крупный из проектов санации банков в РФ. Газета напоминает, что черный список банкиров регулятор ведет более 10 лет. В него попадают менеджеры банков, признанных банкротами после отзыва лицензии, а также тех кредитных организаций, в отношении которых осуществляются меры по предупреждению банкротства (санация). По словам экспертов, черный список ЦБ - реально работающий инструмент. "У меня в практике были случаи, когда кандидаты не проходили по данному квалификационному требованию, - рассказал владелец компании Mr. Hunt Арамис Каримов. - Например, один кандидат был зампредом правления банка, у которого отозвали лицензию в 2011 году. Ему приходилось работать на более низкой должности. Спустя пять лет он получил "бумажку", что он вновь может занимать в банках руководящие должности, но вернуться к руководящей работе не захотел". С учетом масштабных санаций последнего времени и вступления в силу новых норм большому количеству менеджеров придется забыть о финансовом рынке. Причем пострадать могут и невиновные сотрудники, предупреждают эксперты. В последнее время применение подобных мер получает все большую огласку, видимо, чтобы другим было неповадно, отмечает независимый юрист, эксперт по банкротству Игорь Зиневич. Однако, по его мнению, это слабо влияет на основную задачу - оздоровление банковского сектора. "Те, кто идет на махинации, осознают все риски, они не остановятся, - уверен он. - Но в списки, к сожалению, попадают и те, кто не имел прямого отношения к проблемам банка или выполнял указания вышестоящего руководства, не отдавая отчет в том, что это может привести к плачевным последствиям". Живущих за рубежом более полугода россиян избавят от валютного контроля Правительство внесло в Думу поправки в валютное законодательство. Валютными резидентами будут считаться абсолютно все граждане России, следует из них. Но тех, кто живет за рубежом более полугода, избавят от валютного контроля, пишет РБК. Законопроект разрешает валютные операции между российскими гражданами, более 183 дней в году проживающими за границей: этот пункт, в частности, узаконивает денежные переводы между членами одной семьи, уехавшей за рубеж. Законопроект можно только приветствовать, потому что он, наконец, устраняет неясности, из-за которых любой краткосрочный приезд на родину лишал живущего за рубежом россиянина нерезидентства, говорит РБК партнер Paragon Advice Group Александр Захаров. Теперь российские граждане, проживающие свыше 183 дней в году за пределами России, выводятся из-под ограничений на валютные операции и необходимости уведомлять ФНС как орган валютного контроля об иностранных счетах и движении средств по ним, у них не будет мотивации "сдавать российские паспорта". Следующим шагом, призывает юрист, должна стать отмена штрафов за неразрешенные валютные операции - такие штрафы, составляющие от 75 до 100% суммы операции, нарушают право собственности, с ними России трудно надеяться на автоматический обмен налоговой информацией с западными государствами. После принятия поправок россиянам, владеющим автомобилями, яхтами и самолетами за рубежом, можно будет свободно получать на свой иностранный счет деньги от продажи такого транспортного средства нерезиденту. "Лучший ресурс России расходуется в качестве штурмовой пехоты". Репортаж "Новой газеты" с открытия памятника "Героям Донбасса" в Ростове-на-Дону, на который неожиданно прилетел помощник президента РФ Владислав Сурков. Обзор подготовила Ольга Караулова, Служба мониторинга Би-би-си.
У четвер, 26 жовтня, міжнародна преса висвітлює такі теми: Для французьких круасанів настали непрості часи, пише Guardian. Франція, яка є світовим рекордсменом за рівнем споживання вершкового масла, переживає чи не найбільший дефіцит цього продукту з часів Другої світової. Зменшення постачання масла поставило у скрутне становище виробників випічки на кшталт круасанів, в яких частка масла може перевищувати 25%. У крамницях тим часом на полицях замість масла встановили таблички, де написано, що для його виробництва не вистачає молока. "Існує низка причин, що призвели до нинішньої кризи. Падіння виробництва молока, малі надої у 2016 році та зростання попиту на масло у світі спричинили перебої з постачанням та зростання оптових цін. Ціна тони промислового масла злетіла з 2500 євро у квітні 2016 року до 7000 євро цього літа", - пише видання. Газета цитує Клода Франсуа, який є власником невеликої компанії з виробництва випічки. Йому довелося на 70% скоротити робочі години, адже не вистачає масла. За словами Франсуа, від серпня він отримує лише тонну масла на тиждень, хоча потрібно три. Між тим онлайн-користувачі жартують, що готові продати пачку масла, яку вже наполовину з'їли, за 250 євро. А ще публікують короткі відео, де зображені жителі Бретані й Нормандії, що тиняються вулицями немов зомбі. У цих регіонах молочні продукти особливо популярні. Поки лідери й парламенти Іспанії та Каталонії вирішують, як діяти у складній ситуації з оголошенням незалежності регіону, рух за відокремлення поступово переходить із політичного на інші рівні, зокрема в освітні заклади. Як пише газета El Pais, студенти Каталонії готуються до дводенного страйку на підтримку незалежності. На думку іспанського міністерства освіти, це є одним з наслідків політики регіонального уряду із нав'язування молоді певних поглядів. Міністерство заявило про десятки випадків, коли дітям так чи інакше доносять думку про необхідність відокремлення. Одним із таких випадків нібито є ситуація у школі в місті Сант-Андреу-да-ла-Барка неподалік Барселони, коли після референдуму вчитель сказав одному з учнів, чий батько служить в іспанській гвардії: "Сподіваюсь, ти щасливий через те, що наробив твій батько". На думку міністерства освіти, шкільні години нерідко використовують для "занять, сповнених політичної ідеології". Однак більшість каталонських освітян такі звинувачення відкидають. Між тим, в іншій статті El Pais пише, що конфлікт глибоко проник і в правоохоронні органи. Відносини між іспанською й каталонською поліцією і раніше були не найкращими, але зараз вони у жахливому стані, наголошує видання. "Спільні операції призупинено, медалі повертають назад, а деякі офіцери Цивільної Гвардії більше не працюють інструкторами в поліцейській академії Каталонії", - зауважує газета. Журналісти пишуть, що погіршення стосунків видно й на базовому рівні, в ситуаціях, коли в їдальні представники регіональних і національних правоохоронних органів не сідають за один стіл. Якщо раніше для вирішення певного питання поліцейський телефонував колезі з іншого органу, то зараз комунікація перейшла в письмову форму. "Ніхто не заперечує, що відносини між правоохоронними органами не завжди були простими. Але раніше протистояння відчувалося лише на рівні вищого керівництва. Оперативники намагалися бути осторонь конфлікту", - додає El Pais. І зауважує, що конфлікти можуть поставити під загрозу антитерористичну діяльність, а це може дорого коштувати країні. Про виклики, що стоять перед Саудівською Аравією, пише New York Times. Газета описує амбітну мету 32-річного кронпринца Мохаммеда ібн Салмана лібералізувати суспільне життя, диверсифікувати економіку і звільнитися від нафтової залежності. Його тези, озвучені банкірам та бізнесменам у блискучій конференц-залі в Ер-Ріяді, де нещодавно відбувся масштабний форум, New York Times описує так: "Колись закрите королівство тепер відкрите для бізнесу". Та як зазначає газета, на шляху до великих цілей постануть ще більші перешкоди. "Поки що незрозуміло, як сильно видані нагорі укази й масштабні оголошення про плани зможуть справді змінити суспільство, яке впродовж довгого часу характеризувалося глибоким релігійним консерватизмом та значною залежністю від держави", - вважає видання. Але певні зміни вже відбуваються. Жінкам пообіцяли право керувати автомобілем, а права релігійної поліції суттєво звузили. Однак уряд поки що не досяг значних успіхів у перетворенні королівства із нафтової держави в продуктивну економіку, здатну рости в умовах низьких цін на паливо, пише газета. І зробити це буде надскладним завданням, зважаючи на те, що історично уряд Саудівської Аравії з його грошима від продажу нафти, масштабними проектами і здатністю працевлаштувати місцевих жителів у держструктурах був головним мотором економіки. Це означає, що навіть приватний сектор перебуває у значній залежності від держави і її витрат. Тепер же кронпринц пропонує збільшувати кількість громадян, залучених у приватний сектор, і спиратися на іноземні інвестиції. Чи можна одружитися на самому собі, а потім зрадити? Так, пише Independent. І наводить приклад Софі Таннер, яка у 2015 році побралася із самою собою, а тепер зізналася, що зрадила собі. Під час шоу This Morning Таннер визнала, що її стосунки із самою собою не є ідеальними. "Таннер "зрадила собі" з Руарі Барретом, поліамором, який тимчасово повернувся до моногамії, коли зустрічався з Софі протягом п'ятьох місяців", - пише Independent. Бути поліамором означає мати кількох коханців за згодою і схвалення всіх учасників цього любовного три- чи радше багатокутника. Баррет зрештою теж одружився із самим собою. А Таннер тим часом заявила, що не планує розлучатися із собою через подружню зраду: "Одружитися на собі означає взяти на себе обов'язок все життя бути відповідальним за власне щастя. Тож розлучення - не варіант". Огляд підготував Юрій Мартиненко, Служба моніторингу BBC.
It's easy to miss. The words "on purpose" are printed on a small label inside the tote bag alongside the name of the woman who made it. It sits inconspicuously next to the other handbags on the shelves at high-end fashion brand Kate Spade. There is nothing notably different about it. Yet it was made in a factory that doesn't have a reliable source of running water, where the electricity routinely cuts out, and where, until relatively recently, the workers didn't have the necessary manufacturing skills. It's in a tiny village called Masoro in landlocked Rwanda. There are no dependable roads, which means all the products made here have to be airlifted out - a much more expensive option than the usual way of sending them by ship. And perhaps most unusually, this factory didn't exist at all until global fashion firm Kate Spade decided to open it and fund its creation just over three years ago. The obvious question is: Why? "We like to stretch ourselves," laughs Mary Beech, chief marketing officer at the firm. She says as a brand that makes clothing and handbags for women, and whose employees are mainly female, doing something to help empower women "came very naturally". The branding of the product is subtle, says Ms Beech, because they don't want it to be a token charity product. "We want women to buy these bags because they walk into the store and love them. First and foremost it has to be a beautiful product which is completely natural and integrated," she adds. Rwanda's horrifying 1994 genocide, when 800,000 Rwandans were killed, continues to affect people today, and Kate Spade says this history was an added incentive for choosing the location. Of course, many brands undertake charitable projects. Fashion firm Asos, for example, sells a "Made In Kenya" range produced by local clothing manufacturer Soko, which it says aims to support local craftsmanship. Similarly, footwear firms Toms and Roma Boots both give away a pair of shoes to a child in need for each pair they sell. The difference with Kate Spade's charitable initiative On Purpose, the firm says, is that it's a business venture that had to make commercial as well as emotional sense. "It couldn't be a crafty aside done for corporate social responsibility that didn't tie back into economic sustainability," says Taryn Bird, senior manager of the On Purpose initiative. She said this was because the firm wanted to set up something that lasted and enabled the factory to be financially independent, eventually taking orders from other fashion brands and becoming part of the global supply chain. The only way to make sure this happened, was to set it up themselves, says Ms Bird. The factory is not owned by Kate Spade, but is an official supplier. The people who work there - around 150 - are employed by Abahizi Dushyigikirane Corporation, known as ADC. So is this just exploiting Rwanda's low-wage economy? Kate Spade says not, pointing out even the lowest paid worker's salary in the country is considerably higher than the median salary for private sector jobs in Rwanda. It has also set up a life skills programme at the company, offering counselling, information on health and nutrition and English language lessons. While the firm won't be drawn on how much exactly it ploughed into the factory to get it going, Ms Beech says it was "a minimal investment". Almost four years on she says they are "on track" to get their investment back and for the factory to become profitable. The staff retention rate is an impressive 98%. But Africa is not such an unusual choice for a firm looking to diversify its supplier base. Labour costs are already much lower than in China. According to Georgetown University in Washington, which studied the Kate Spade project, staff in factories in coastal China earned around $700 (£537) a month, over six times the average $113 monthly salary at the ADC factory. Africa also offers what Ms Bird describes as "a very business friendly climate for export companies". ADC does not have to pay duties on incoming raw materials and is also able to export the finished bags to the US without tariffs. In contrast, tariffs on handbags from Asian suppliers range from 4.5% to 17.5%, according to Georgetown University. So Africa has the potential to become the world's next low-cost manufacturing hub thanks to a cheap workforce and an abundance of raw materials. A lot of production has moved there already. Ms Beech, however, says that wasn't why Kate Spade chose Rwanda. The bags made there were additional orders reflecting increased demand for its products. Pietra Rivoli, a professor teaching finance and international business at Georgetown University, and part of the team which researched the project, says it proves it's possible to put a factory anywhere. "The set up was not terribly complex. It's not something that other companies could not do given the motivation and support from management," she says. She says the supportive factory set-up made ADC feel very different to any other factory she had visited. "I'm not saying other factories are somehow bad. But most supplier relationships tend to be very transactional. The relationship is one of monitoring for labour abuses, whereas the ADC approach is a much more positive philosophy." Typically, how cheaply and quickly something can be made are the main criteria a company uses for deciding where to locate a factory. Prof Rivoli says the Kate Spade example offers "a demonstrative case study" of an alternative approach. "What they have shown is that it can really be a win-win. The factory can pay the company back [for the set-up costs] and the firm can support the worker and their communities. So far it's one small-scale experiment. But Kate Spade says it is already planning to pilot a second factory in a different developing country in the next couple of years. "This time we'll make sure it has access to a port," laughs Ms Beech. More from the BBC's series taking an international perspective on trade: Where's hot? This summer's most popular holiday spots The lucrative world of 'the super tutor' How the 'better burger' is taking over the world What it takes to get Beyonce on a world tour The country losing out in the breakfast juice battle Why a $1.6bn car plant has been left to decay Read more global trade series here.
Spain has announced it is preparing to suspend Catalonia's regional autonomy, after the Catalan leader Carles Puigdemont threatened to declare independence. Even before this move, separatists had condemned the actions of the Spanish government and police during an outlawed independence referendum on 1 October. Some called those actions repressive - a sentiment expressed most clearly in a video produced by the Catalan cultural organisation Omnium Cultural. It's been viewed more than a million times. One of the most striking claims in the video was that police subjected Catalan voters to "a degree of force never seen before in a European member state". After Spain's constitutional court declared the poll illegal, police officers were authorised to stop it going ahead. They prevented some people from voting, and seized ballot papers and boxes at polling stations. Speaking to the BBC on Sunday, Spain's foreign minister Alfonso Dastis, claimed images of police violence were "fake". Who is correct? It is true that fake photos have been used but virtually all of the media coverage showing police violence was real - including all of that shown by the BBC. Photos which are six years old have been shared online purporting to show violence in Catalonia on 1 October. For example, this photo was shared in a manner that suggested a disabled Catalan voter was being hit with a baton. Been so many shocking images of Spanish police brutality denying democracy but this has to be most chilling #CatalanReferendum #Catalonia HH pic.twitter.com/eVFuBeC8OO End of Twitter post by @CelticGossip In fact, the photo was shared by bloggers in 2011, when police clashed with anti-austerity protesters in Barcelona. Various examples have been collected by Spanish fact-checkers Maldito Bulo ("damned hoax") - such as this use of a photo from a firefighters' protest in 2013 to suggest that firefighters were squaring up to police officers on October 1. Esta foto de policía contra bomberos no es del 1-OSon Mossos contra bomberos en 2013 pic.twitter.com/zJKZeW0Npv End of Twitter post by @malditobulo Just because some of the photos were fakes doesn't mean that all or even many of them were. Reality Check has spoken to journalists who witnessed police shoving people, grabbing them by the hair and throwing them down stairs. And photojournalists saw police firing rubber bullets, Indeed, the Spanish Government accepts there was some violence - and has apologised for it. So there was police violence on 1 October. Was it the worst ever seen in an EU member state? Some of the early reports of injuries were exaggerated. One woman had claimed that police had intentionally broken her fingers. In reality, her fingers weren't broken, just inflamed - as she explained to the Catalan state broadcaster TV3 after she'd received treatment. On 20 October, the Catalan department of health released revised figures of the number of people who had sought medical treatment because of police action on polling day. These figures were gathered by the various hospitals, clinics and paramedics who treated them. They say 1,066 people sought medical treatment, 991 on the day and 75 in the days that followed. Most people - 886 - were classed as having only a minor injury or condition. Five were considered to be seriously injured. These figures are from the Department of Health, which is a branch of the Catalan government. We have no way of independently verifying whether all 1,066 injuries were caused by police officers. This is the only data available, and has been used in arguments by both sides of the independence debate. Earlier totals had been disputed by Spanish ministers and newspapers - arguing that people might turn up at a clinic despite having no medical complaint. However, the Catalan health service insists everyone included in these latest figures received a diagnosis from a medical professional. Twelve police officers were also injured on polling day. This figure is agreed by both the Catalan department of health and the Spanish government. It is difficult to find examples where as many civilians were injured during clashes with police. Yet when assessing the level of violence, the degree of force is important, not just the number of injuries. There are various cases where police in EU member states used an equivalent or even higher degree of force in public. Here are some recent examples: It is worth noting that none of those events were votes. Read more from Reality Check Follow us on Twitter
"Tremendously important" is how rancher Coleman Locke describes the role of international trade to his cattle business. The 72-year-old has worked on his family's 10,000-acre ranch on the Gulf Coast of Texas for his whole life and has seen his fair share of struggles in the industry, including droughts and disease. But now he is gearing up for a new threat - the potential loss of trade deals that could cut off a huge slice of his ranch's yearly sales. "In 2016, 25% of the breeding stock that we sold here at this ranch went out of the United States, it's a tremendously important market for us," says Mr Locke. He's not alone. Last year the American beef industry earned over $6bn (£4.9bn) from overseas sales. Among the biggest purchasers are Canada and Mexico, partners with the US in the North American Free Trade Agreement (Nafta). President Trump's promise to renegotiate Nafta and possibly place tariffs on Mexico or other US trading partners has the industry worried. "Nafta is extremely important to us. It's one of the biggest trade deals that agriculture has ever had," says John Robinson from the National Cattlemen's Beef Association (NCBA). The beef industry is already reeling from the loss of the Trans-Pacific Partnership (TPP), which President Trump withdrew from in his first week in office. The free trade agreement with Pacific Rim countries, including many in Asia, was set to expand America's export market for beef. By some estimates, it could have added $400m in sales each year. "It makes the market very nervous when they hear we aren't going to do the TPP and we are going to change Nafta," says Jennings Steen, a cattle dealer based in Austin. Mr Steen says he and his partner have been fielding dozens of calls since President Trump's election, from ranchers desperate to know how changes to trade deals could affect their businesses. They are concerned about prices and hesitate to make long-term plans. American suppliers particularly wanted increased access to Japan's home market, where high tariffs on US beef have made it hard to compete with suppliers from Australia who can sell beef into Japan at lower rates. But President Trump's supporters say his experience in business will allow him to negotiate better deals for the US, focussing on bilateral agreements rather than bigger deals involving several countries. According to Texas agriculture commissioner Sid Miller, after 22 years Nafta is in need of a "facelift". Mr Miller was an outspoken and early supporter of President Trump. But since the election, he has spent a lot of time reassuring the ranching community that trade with Mexico won't disappear and new trade options will be opened up under the Trump administration. Mr Miller says he takes "a softer kinder approach [than Donald Trump]," stressing that Texas needs trading partners like Mexico, but also that it needs new deals with countries like China and better deals with its existing partners. President Trump's vision for changes to Nafta has focused on ensuring more products are made in the US and he has called for tariffs on manufactured goods imported into the US from Mexico. But such tariffs could result in retaliatory charges on US products sold into Mexico - including agricultural goods like cattle and beef. Mr Miller is unshaken by this prospect, though. He acknowledges that US farmers produce more than the country can consume - including beef - but sees this as giving the US leverage over other trading partners. "Agriculture is a good bargaining tool," he says. "People have to eat, they don't have to buy manufactured goods." President Trump's relationship with the cattle industry though isn't as simple as a beef over trade. Rural communities voted overwhelmingly in support of Mr Trump. Beef and cattle producers, like other members of the agricultural industry, would like to see the rollbacks on regulations that President Trump has promised. "I think cattle producers and rural America, in general, are optimistic about the Trump administration," says the NCBA's John Robinson. Within President Trump's first month, there were regulatory rollbacks that Mr Robinson calls "very encouraging". But he says he hopes the beef industry is given an equal seat to manufacturing when it comes to renegotiating Nafta. That seat is crucial because the US produces more beef than it consumes. Without international markets, suppliers will have to reduce production or see a significant drop in prices, as the market is flooded with local beef. There is no guarantee either that the bilateral deals President Trump has promised will be better than the ones he has walked away from. As a part of TPP, US beef producers who currently face import duties of up to 38.5% on fresh and frozen beef entering Japan would have seen those tariffs phased out over 16 years. Without that deal, many worry competition from countries that remained in TPP, like Australia, will increase. For Coleman Locke on his ranch in Texas, it's too soon to worry. No deals have been struck yet and business is still good. But if President Trump wants to claim his title as America's dealmaker in chief he's going to have to be sure he doesn't trade away this rancher's livelihood.
Philippines đang tiếp tục nói với dư luận về 'phán quyết' của Tòa Trọng tài thường trực quốc tế PCA sau khi nước này thắng kiện Trung Quốc tháng 7/2016. Nước này vẫn sẽ thực thi phán quyết trong nhiệm kỳ hiện nay của Tổng thống Rodrigo Duterte hay với một tổng thống kế nhiệm, một Thẩm phán Tòa tối cao của Philippines nói với BBC Tiếng Việt. Nói chuyện bên lề một hội thảo về tiếp cận mới cho xung đột ở Biển Đông ở một Đại học tại Oxford, Anh Quốc hôm 20/10/2017, ông Antonio Carpio nói về bước đi kế tiếp của Philippines: "Tổng thống [Duterte] của Philippines nói ông sẽ đưa vấn đề phán quyết của tòa trọng tài ra vào một thời điểm nào đó, ông cũng nói là ông không vội vàng. "Vì ông là Tổng thống của Philippines, vì ông là kiến trúc sư của chính sách đối ngoại, đó là đặc quyền của ông. Cấm đánh cá ở Biển Đông 'không để chống VN'? Quốc gia 'mắc kẹt' giữa Mỹ và Trung Quốc Diễn đàn ASEAN có lợi cho Trung Quốc? "Nhưng phán quyết này sẽ vẫn được bảo lưu dù là trong nhiệm kỳ của tổng thống hiện nay hay là của tổng thống kế tiếp, đó chỉ là vấn đề về thời điểm, phán quyết luôn còn đó và nó có thể được thực thi hiện nay, hay với tổng thống tiếp theo. "Điều mà chúng tôi đang làm hiện nay, như là tôi đang làm, là chúng tôi đang cố gắng truyền thông, giáo dục đến mọi người về phán quyết này để cho thế giới sẽ được biết về nó và khi nào đến lúc, phán quyết đó sẽ được thực thi." Thẩm phán Carpio đưa ra phát biểu trên khi được hỏi về thái độ của Philippines với phán quyết của Tòa PCA trong bối cảnh cả Philippines, Hoa Kỳ đều có thay đổi lãnh đạo. So với một năm trước, nay Philippines có Tổng thống Duterte, còn Trung Quốc đang tiếp tục củng cố vị thế của ông Tập Cận Bình. Cũng trong cuộc phỏng vấn hôm 20/10 với Quốc Phương của BBC Tiếng Việt, Thẩm phán Antonio Carpio bác bỏ việc sử dụng các quy chế mới như cùng khai thác ở Biển Đông trên các khu vực đang có tranh chấp, một đề nghị mà Trung Quốc đã, đang và tiếp tục đề nghị với từng nước có tuyên bố chủ quyền ở vùng biển, và theo ông cần áp dụng các quy định của luật pháp, công pháp quốc tế đang hiện hữu: Duterte ở Trung Quốc: Lãnh đạo Philippines là tư lệnh hòa giải? Biển Đông: VN có cần thay đổi chiến thuật? Tổng thống Philippines ca ngợi quan hệ với Bắc Kinh "Đã có các pháp luật về biển, Công ước quốc tế của Liên hợp quốc về luật biển, tất cả các quốc gia có tranh chấp ở Biển Đông đã phê chuẩn nó và họ đều đã đồng ý về cơ chế giải quyết tranh chấp và nếu anh cố gắng sáng tạo ra một cái mới, anh sẽ có thể không bao giờ đạt được một đồng thuận. "Do đó, tôi nghĩ chúng ta có lẽ phải tiếp tục trung thành với các luật pháp hiện hành về biển hơn là sáng tạo ra luật mới, đã phải mất hơn một thập niên để đàm phán về luật biển vào thời điểm đó. Bây giờ nếu bây giờ anh cố gắng đàm phán về một luật mới bây giờ, tôi nghĩ rằng sẽ mất ba đến bốn thập niên. "Do vậy, tôi nghĩ trung ta hãy tiếp tục dựa vào các luật pháp hiện nay và hãy thực thi chúng," Thẩm phán Antonio Carpio nói với BBC. Ông Antonio Carpio là Phó Chánh án Tòa án Tối cao của Philippines. Ông được bổ nhiệm làm Thẩm phán của Tòa này từ thời của Tổng thống Gloria Macapagal-Arroyo 16 năm trước. Chuyên gia pháp luật hàng đầu này của Philippines từng giữ vai trò quyền Thẩm phán chính của Tòa Tối cao, một cơ chế trong hệ thống tư pháp của nước này, vào năm 2012. Hồi tháng 5/2017, Thẩm phán Antonio Carpio từng lên tiếng cảnh báo Trung Quốc về những lời lẽ và lập trường được cho là 'cứng rắn' của nước này đối với vấn đề tranh chấp biển đảo giữa Trung Quốc và Philippines. Vị thẩm phán này đã cảnh báo có thể sẽ kiện Trung Quốc 'ra tòa quốc tế một lần nữa', nếu Trung Quốc tiếp tục có những lời lẽ 'đe dọa' và động thái 'xâm phạm chủ quyền' Philippines và vi phạm luật pháp quốc tế, vẫn theo truyền thông quốc tế. Phản ứng các bên sau phán quyết PCA Tòa trọng tài ra phán quyết ngày 12/7" Ông Antonio Carpio là một trong những người đóng vai trò chính để tổ chức, tư vấn chiến lược cho vụ kiện từ phía Philippines nhắm vào Trung Quốc. Tại phiên tòa, phán quyết đưa ra hồi tháng 7/2016 đã bác yêu sách "đường lưỡi bò" là vô căn cứ, do Trung Quốc đơn phương vạch ra trên Biển Đông. Việt Nam giữ vai trò 'quan sát', dù từng lên tiếng phản đối yêu sách mà Trung Quốc thể hiện qua Đường chín đoạn gây tranh cãi ở vùng biển.
A difficult and disgusting operation to clear London's largest "fatberg" from a London sewer raises a number of issues about our approach to waste disposal. Fatbergs are not natural - they are creatures of the modern age - and the blockages they cause can lead to raw sewage flowing up into shops, offices and people's homes. It is not a subject for the faint-hearted but there are 10 large fatbergs in London right now and hundreds of smaller ones across the country. They form when oil and grease, poured down drains, coagulates around the likes of tampons, baby wipes and condoms flushed down toilets. The result is the creation of a pale, tough substance with the strength of rock - a form of artificial geology that in the case of the Whitechapel fatberg has choked 80% of the flow of the sewer.
Every five years, the eyes of the world turn to China as the ruling Communist Party holds its congress. The event determines who will lead the Party. Those people will go on to lead the 1.3 billion people of China - most of whom don't get a say - and helm the world's second largest economy. The 19th congress will begin on 18 October and while significant leadership changes are expected current Party leader and Chinese President Xi Jinping is widely expected to stay in the top job. In mid-October, Communist Party of China (CPC) delegates from across China will meet at the Great Hall of the People in Beijing. The party has 2,300 delegates - although only 2,287 have been elected to attend, with reports suggesting the remaining 13 delegates were disqualified because of "improper behaviour". Behind closed doors, those CPC delegates will elect the powerful Central Committee, which has about 200 members. This committee in turn elects the Politburo and from that, the Politburo Standing Committee is chosen. Those are China's real decision-making bodies. The Politburo currently has 24 members, while the Standing Committee has seven, although these numbers have varied over the years. While there is a vote, in reality many of these people have already been handpicked by the current leadership, and the committee just approves their edict. The Central Committee also elects the Party's top leader - the general secretary - who becomes the country's president. That is, and will most likely continue to be, Xi Jinping. The 19th Congress will be closely watched for two main things. First, Mr Xi will deliver a lengthy report that will be scrutinised by analysts for signs on China's political policy direction for the next five years. Secondly, the Politburo Standing Committee is expected to be nearly completely refreshed. In recent years, the party has set informal term and age limits on certain posts. Most Politburo members are expected to step down as they are past the informal retirement age of 68. They include Wang Qishan, head of the anti-corruption agency, although as a key Xi ally he may be persuaded to stay. Mr Xi and Premier Li Keqiang are in their early 60s. We would normally expect to see a new line-up of future leaders presented to the public at the congress - including a possible eventual successor to Mr Xi - who would take over in five years' time. However, there is some speculation Mr Xi might break with tradition this time round and delay this step. It's likely there'll be a further overall consolidation of power by Mr Xi. He has assumed an unprecedented number of positions since coming to power in 2012, including the title of a "core" leader of China, which puts him on par with past political giants like Mao Zedong and Deng Xiaoping. There are likely to be more of his allies placed in leadership positions at the congress, and we may see the enshrining of his policies, known as "Xi Jinping Thought", in the party charter. That move would again place him on the level of Mao in Chinese political history. Some believe he may even announce a move that would extend his rule past the traditional two-term limit for the presidency. Since becoming president in 2012, Mr Xi has spearheaded a sweeping anti-corruption campaign which has seen more than a million officials disciplined. It has been seen by some as a massive internal purge of opponents. A movement dubbed by some as "the cult of Xi" has also emerged, with propaganda songs dedicated to him and a deluge of positive press in state media, who have coined a nickname aimed at endearing him to citizens - "Xi Dada", or Uncle Xi. Analysts believe that while a major reshuffle of the Standing Committee could herald some policy changes, by and large China would continue on the same track, with Mr Xi still at the helm to ensure stability. At home, China's five-year economic reform plan is still in play, as is Mr Xi's anti-corruption campaign and growing authoritarian rule. China's push for the spotlight on the global stage, fronted by Mr Xi, is also expected to continue. This ranges from the controversial South China Sea expansion and the One Belt One Road trade project, to China's positioning as the alternative superpower compared to the US under President Donald Trump. But one tricky question that remains is North Korea and its ongoing nuclear crisis. Some analysts believe that China would continue to hold back from taking decisive action as, even after the congress, its new leadership would still be "mired in internal debate" on how to handle its hot-tempered neighbour.
अमेरिकी राष्ट्रपति डोनल्ड ट्रम्पले आफ्ना समकक्षी चिनियाँ राष्ट्रपति सि जिनपिङले कम्युनिष्ट पार्टीको महाधिवेशनमा शक्ति संगठित गरेर पाएको 'असाधारण उचाइ' का लागि उनलाई बधाई दिएका छन्। कुनै स्पष्ट उत्तराधिकारी नभएपछि पुन: निर्वाचित भएका सिले अर्को पाँच वर्षका लागि आफ्नो पकड बलियो बनाएका छन्। उनको नाम र उनका सिद्धान्तहरु संविधानमा लेखिएका छन्। गत जुलाईमा जी-ट्वान्टी सम्मेलनमा भेट भएपछि अब अर्को महिना चीनमा हुने राजकीय भ्रमणका बेला दुवै नेताहरुले वार्ता गर्नेछन्। राष्ट्रपति ट्रम्पले ट्वीट गर्दै सिलाई बधाई दिएको र त्यसक्रममा उत्तर कोरिया र व्यापारबारे पनि छलफल गरेको बताए। ट्रम्पसँगको टेलिफोन संवादमा सिले अमेरिकाका राष्ट्रपतिसँग चीन-अमेरिकी सम्बन्धको भविष्यको विकासबारे संयुक्त रुपमा खाका बनाएर काम गर्ने इच्छा व्यक्त गरेको चिनियाँ सरकारी सञ्चारमाध्यमले जनाएका छन्। चीन अमेरिकापछि विश्वको दोस्रो ठूलो अर्थतन्त्र भएको मुलुक हो। जसको सबैभन्दा ठूलो व्यापारिक साझेदारी पनि अमेरिकासँग नै छ। यद्यपी, साउथ चाइना सी र इस्ट चाइना सीबारे बेइजिङ र इस्ट सीमा रहेका वासिङ्टनका समर्थकको क्षेत्रीय विवादका कारण यी दुई देशबीचको सम्बन्ध भने तनावपूर्ण रहेको छ। यसैबीच, उत्तर कोरियाको सरकारी सञ्चारसंस्था केसिएनएले त्यहाँका नेता किम जोङ-अनले सि लाई बधाईको सन्देश पठाएको बताए।
A former BBC journalist, Vinod Verma, has been arrested in the northern Indian state of Uttar Pradesh. His arrest is connected to a scandal about a supposed sex tape involving a Chhattisgarh state politician. A police spokesman told the BBC that Mr Verma was suspected of extortion, and another said 500 CDs had been recovered from his house. Mr Verma denies the extortion allegation, saying he is being "framed" as he has a copy of a sex video. He says he has it on a pen drive. "I don't have any CDs," he said. Reports suggest that the alleged sex tape concerns a member of the ruling Bharatiya Janata Party (BJP). It was a member of the BJP that filed a complaint that led to Mr Verma's arrest. The BJP said the sex tape was a "fake" that had been engineered by its opponents for "narrow political gains", and accused Mr Verma of trying to tarnish the image of the party. "We are open to any investigation," said spokesman Dharamlal Kaushik. But an opposition Congress Party spokesman, Bhupesh Baghel, told the Hindustan Times newspaper that the BJP was "trying to snuff out the issue". "Possessing a CD is not a crime," he said. "I also have the CD, but it was not released since we are examining the forensic credibility of the CD." He said the scandal had erupted last week. Mr Verma, who was arrested in the early hours of Friday at his home in Ghaziabad, has reported extensively from insurgency-affected Chhattisgarh. Chhattisgarh is a stronghold of armed Maoist rebels who say they are fighting for the rights of the poor. Journalists often face intimidation both from the authorities and the rebels in the state.
د پاکستاني طالبانو یوې بېلې شوې ډلې جماعت الاحرار تېره شپه یو پیغام خپور کړی، چې ادعا کوی د دوی د مشر عمر خالد خراساني دی. اسلام اباد کې د بي بي سي خبریال هارون رشید وايي، په دغه پیغام کې د تېرې یکشنبې ورځې یادوونه شوې او پیغام کې د پاکستاني طالبانو دره ادم خېل د مشر خلیفه عمر منصور پر مړینه په کې خواشیني څرګنده شوې ده. د بي بي سي خبریال وايي، داسې ښکاري دغه پیغام سره دغه ډله غواړي ثابته کړې، چې مشر یې لږ تر لږه تېرې یکشنبې پورې ژوندی و. مخکې داسې رپوټونه وو، چې عمر خالد خراسانی کورمې ایجنسۍ قبایلي سیمې ته نژدې ډرون برید کې وژل شوی دی. د جماعت الاحرار ډلې یوه ویاند اسد منصور ویلي و، چې عمر خالد د امریکايي پوځ یوه برید کې له نهوو نورو ملګرو سره یو ځای وژل شوی دی. د عمر خالد خراساني په نامه د پیغام له خپرېدو یوه ورځ مخکې د پاکستان دفاع وزارت سکرتر ضمیر الحسن د دغه هېواد د پارلمان دفاعي کمېټۍ ته ویلي و، د جماعت الاحرار نومې وسله والې ډلې د مشر عمر خالد خراساني وژل کېدل نه دي تایید شوي. د پاکستان دفاع وزارت سکرتر وايي، هغه تصویر چې د خالد خراساني په نامه رسنیو کې خپور شوی دی، د طارق ګیدړ ډلې د مشر عمر نري دی، چې مخکې یوه ډرون برید کې وژل شوی و. جماعت الاحرار د خپل مشر وژل کېدل ومنل د پاکستاني طالبانو ویاند له دندې ګوښه کړل شو پاکستان کې د طالبانو نوې ډله جوړه شوې عمر خالد خراسانی د جماعت الاحرار مشر و او په پاکستان کې یې د څو چاودنو مسوولیت منلی و. د بي بي سي خبریال فرحت جاوید په خپل رپوټ کې د پاکستان دفاع سکرتر له قوله وايي: ''زموږ خپلو سرچینو هم د خراساني وژل کېدل نه دي تایید کړي '' د خراساني د وژل کېدو خبر په داسې مهال دی چې د اکتوبر وروستیو کې قبایلي سیمې کورمې ایجنسۍ سره نږدې د امریکا د بې پیلوټه الوتکو په دریو بریدونو کې له ۳۰ ډېر وسلوال وژل شوي دي. خو د پاکستان دفاع وزارت سکرتر وايي، دا وروستیو کې پاکستان کې کوم ډرون برید نه دی شوی. د عمر خالد خراساني په نامه خپاره شوي پیغام کې د ادم خېل درې د قومندان پر مړینه خواخوږي څرګنده شوې او ویل شوي دي، چې دښمنان یې باید یاد وساتي، چې دغه ډول 'شهادتونه ' به د دوی پر مورال اغېز و نه کړي. د پیغام پای کې د ۲۰۱۷ کال اکتوبر ۲۲ یکشنبې ورځ یادوونه شوې. عمر خالد خراسانی چې اصلي نوم یې عبد الولي و په ۲۰۱۵ کال کې د ناټو ځواکونو په یوه هوايي برید کې سخت ټپي شوی و. دغې ډلې کوټه کې د یوې چاودنې مسوولیت منلی و، چې ۷۴ کسان په کې وژل شوي وو او دغه راز د پاکستان پنجاب ایالت مرکزي ښار لاهور یوه پارک کې تېر کال یوې بمي چاودنه کې لږ تر لږه ۷۰ کسان وژل شوي وو، چې ۲۹ ماشومان هم په کې شامل وو او دغې ډلې ویلي و، هغه برید دوی کړی و. د عمر خراساني وژل کېدو په تړاو له دې مخکې هم ناتایید شوي رپوټونه خپاره شوي وو. پاکستاني طالبان د نوي مشر پر ټاکلو غور کوي 'د پېښور پر پوځي ښوونځي د برید پلانونکی ډرون برید کې وژل شوی' جماعت الاحرار له قبایلي سیمې مومند ایجنسۍ فعالیت پیل کړی و او یو مهال یې ځان د پاکستاني طالبانو برخه هم باله. دا وروستیو کې د دغې ډلې ویاند احسان الله احسان د یوې هوکړې له مخې له پاکستاني پوځ سره یوځای شوی دی.
"Para llegar a la escuela tenía que cruzar un puente y solía pararme allí y pensar 'qué fácil sería saltar'. La sensación era abrumadora y sentía que estaba sola. Estaba en un punto tan, tan bajo, que no podía ver la manera de salir". Calleigh, una británica que ahora tiene 18 años, empezó a autolesionarse a los 11 años y pensó por primera vez en suicidarse a los 13. "No quería decírselo a mis padres porque pensé que los preocuparía o los decepcionaría, o que no lo entenderían". Esta joven forma parte del creciente número de niños que en años recientes llamaron por teléfono a la línea de apoyo de la organización británica sin ánimo de lucro Childline, para pedir consejo sobre sus pensamientos suicidas. Ahora los organizadores dicen que solo pueden contestar a tres de cada cuatro llamadas que reciben y están pidiendo voluntarios con urgencia. Según sus datos, entre 2016 y 2017 le ofrecieron casi 22.500 sesiones a niños que estaban considerando quitarse la vida, casi 3.000 más que en el año anterior. El 72% de esas sesiones fueron para niñas. Además, estiman que más de 2.000 contactos fueron de jóvenes que ya habían dado algún paso para acabar con sus vidas, como escribir una carta de despedida, deshacerse de pertenencias significativas o incluso planear su muerte. En paralelo, un estudio publicado en octubre en el British Medical Journal (BMJ) evidencia un gran aumento en el número de niñas en la adolescencia temprana, de 13 a 16 años, que se autolesionan en Reino Unido. Según ese estudio, las autolesiones son el factor de riesgo más alto para el suicidio, que después de los accidentes de tráfico es la causa de muerte más común en el mundo entre los 10 y los 24 años. De hecho la mitad de los adolescentes que se quitan la vida en Reino Unido tienen un historial de autolesión. La tasa de suicidio entre 15 y 19 años pasó de 3,2 en 2010 a 5,4 en 2015 por cada 100.000, según el estudio del BMJ. En Colombia, un informe sobre el suicidio de 2011 del Instituto de Medicina Legal decía que "existe una preocupante relevancia del fenómeno a edades cada vez más tempranas". Ese año 193 menores de 18 años se suicidaron en Colombia, 52 de los cuales tenían entre 10 y 14 años. El número se elevó a 57 en 2014 y a 70 en 2015. Pero poco se sabe sobre los factores detrás de esta tendencia que se repite en varios países. A Calleigh la hundió su carácter perfeccionista combinado con la presión académica excesiva que sentía en su escuela. Para ella contactar con Childline fue, literalmente, un salvavidas. "Fui capaz de hablar con alguien. Me dijeron, 'ok, ¿qué es lo que está haciendo que te sientas así?' 'Ve dando un paso y después otro'. Son súper comprensivos". "Yo los llamaba cuando quería autolesionarme. Les enviaba un mensaje de texto. Tienen unos centros de mensajes increíbles, como foros pero seguros, ahí nadie te va a enviar malos comentarios y hay mucha gente que se siente igual que tú". Ahora Calleigh dice que es importante pedir ayuda y no tragarse los problemas, "porque eso los agrava". "Habla con alguien, aunque sea en internet", recomienda. Lo importante, dice, es "hablar con alguien que no forma parte del problema, que sabes que no te va a juzgar o que no se va a preocupar. Porque mi principal problema era 'no quiero preocupar a mis padres, hay ya tanto estrés'. Y saber que no estás sola y que no es culpa tuya". Y también, apunta, "que no siempre tiene por qué haber una razón, no tiene que ser porque sufriste acoso escolar, no tiene que ser por presión... puede ser que estés deprimido porque sí, porque estás deprimido". Para la fundadora y presidenta de Childline, Esther Rantzen, es vital averiguar por qué tanta gente joven se está sintiendo tan desesperada. "Cuando lanzamos Childline hace 30 años recuerdo que los niños normalmente tenían pensamientos suicidas porque alguien les estaba haciendo daño". "Ahora la gente joven nos dice que se siente sobrepasada por cuestiones de salud mental que los llevan al borde del suicidio". "Tenemos que descubrir por qué tantos jóvenes se sienten tan aislados que necesitan contactar con Childline porque sienten que a nadie más les importan". Algunos psicólogos y sociólogos dicen que el acceso constante a las redes sociales puede tener un impacto negativo en la salud mental de los adolescentes, porque puede distorsionar su percepción de la realidad. En los casos de acoso escolar, por ejemplo, muchos niños sienten que no pueden desconectar de la presión, que antes se limitaba a los horarios y el espacio de la escuela pero ahora puede ser omnipresente. "Yo creo que los profesores, los padres y los trabajadores de apoyo necesitan saber más sobre los problemas de la salud mental y necesitan estar atentos a los indicios", dice Calleigh.
North Korea says it will release a South Korean fishing boat it seized six days ago for "illegally" sailing into its waters, state media report. The vessel and its crew will be released "at the military boundary in the East Sea", North Korean state news agency KCNA reported. The decision was made after the crew apologised for the "offence", it added. It comes at a time of heightened tension in the region with both sides running a series of military exercises. North Korea said the release of the fishing vessel, due later on Friday, follows an admission of wrongdoing from those on board, who it said had "repeatedly asked for leniency". An investigation, the North added, had "proved" that the fishermen had entered North Korean waters last Saturday. A South Korean government spokesman said it was a "relief" that the crew would be returned. The release is expected to take place at 09:30 BST. It is not uncommon for fishing boats from both sides to drift into waters not under their country's control. In August 2010, a South Korean fishing boat went missing in the Sea of Japan and was temporarily detained by North Korea. The North said it was seized because it was poaching in its exclusive economic zone. The latest incident comes amid ongoing military exercises in the region as North Korea seeks to realise its nuclear ambitions and the South deploys a US-backed missile defence system. Earlier this month, the US and South Korea also began joint military exercises in waters surrounding the Korean peninsula, involving fighter jets, destroyers and aircraft carriers. The drills regularly anger the North, and Pyongyang has in the past denounced them as a "rehearsal for war". On Friday, US Defence Secretary James Mattis flew into Seoul for annual defence talks with South Korea, as part of a tour of Asia. He earlier told reporters that his Asia visit was about keeping the North Korean effort "firmly in the diplomatic lane for resolution". Separately, the US has imposed sanctions on seven North Koreans and three entities over "flagrant" human rights abuses. Treasury secretary Steven Mnuchin said those sanctioned included diplomats placed in China and Vietnam who had taken part in the forced repatriation of North Korean asylum-seekers. Military officials and "financial facilitators" who channel "foreign currency earned through forced labour operations" back to North Korea were also targeted, he added.
سوشل میڈیا پر MeToo# نامی ہیش ٹیگ کے تحت جاری مباحثے سے یہ پتہ چلتا ہے دنیا میں جنسی ہراسانی کس وسیع پیمانے پر پھیلی ہوئی ہے۔ بی بی سی کی رجنی ویدیاناتھن نے بھی اپنا تجربہ بیان کیا ہے۔ میں اس وقت 25 سال کی تھی۔ ایک کہانی پر ہم اپنا کام ختم کرنے کے بعد نیویارک کے ایک اطالوی ریستوراں میں تھے۔ اس وقت میں ایک حوصلہ مند پروڈیوسر تھی اور حال میں رپبلکن پارٹی کے کنونشن کے لیے مین ہٹن گئی تھی۔ میرے دیگر ساتھی جا چکے تھے اور میں اپنے ایک ساتھی کے ساتھ عشائیے کے لیے رک گئی تھی۔ ہم ایسٹ ویلج کے ایک اطالوی ریستوران گئے جہاں ہم نے جارج ڈبلیو بش اور جان کیری کے بارے میں مختصر بات کی۔ اسی وقت اس نے کہا۔ 'میں ناقابل یقین حد تک جنسی طور پر تم پر فدا ہوں۔ میں تمہارے بارے میں سوچنا ترک نہیں کر سکتا۔' میرے ہاتھ سے کانٹا چھوٹ کر پلیٹ میں گر گیا جس میں ابھی بھی سپیگیٹی الجھی ہوئی تھی۔ خدا کا شکر ہے ایشوریہ بچ گئیں ’سارے مرد ایک جیسے نہیں ہوتے؟‘ جنسی ہراس کا الزام لگانے والی خواتین کون ہیں؟ وہ مجھ سے عمر میں دگنے اور میرے لیے قابل احترام شخص تھے جن کی ایک گرل فرینڈ بھی تھی۔ پہلے بھی دفتر میں جنسیت سے میرا سابقہ پڑا تھا لیکن اتنے کھلے انداز میں نہیں۔ مجھے یاد نہیں ہے کہ میں نے اس وقت کیا کہا تھا لیکن میرا جواب بہت مہذب تھا کیونکہ میں نے بات کا رخ موڑنے کی کوشش کی تھی۔ لیکن وہ میری خوبصورتی کی تعریف کرتے رہے اور میں نے کسی طرح جلدی جلدی پاستا ختم کیا۔ اس وقت مجھے اس بات کا یقین نہیں تھا کہ اس نے جو کچھ کہا اس کے بارے میں ٹھیک طور پر شکایت کر سکتی ہوں لیکن وہ بہت ناخوشگوار تھا اور میں نے بہت برا محسوس کیا۔ اب میں جانتی ہوں کہ وہ قطعاً ناقابل قبول تھا جو اس بات کی یاددہانی تھی کہ کس طرح کچھ لوگ دفاتر میں خواتین کو لبھانے، پریشان کرنے اور ان کا استحصال کرنے کے لیے اپنے اختیارات کا استعمال کرتے ہیں۔ ہاروی وائن سٹین کے متعلق جاری مباحثے نے ہماری خاتون دوستوں کے درمیان بے شمار مباحثے کو جنم دیا ہے کہ ان حالات میں خط فاصل کیا ہے اور کہاں ہمیں بولنے کی ضرورت ہے۔ کیا اسے شمار کرنے کے لیے ہاتھ لگایا جانا ضروری ہے؟ اگر ان کے ساتھ آپ کی دوستی ہے تو کیا ہوگا؟ ہراسگی کب شروع اور کب ختم ہوتی ہے؟ ہاروی وائن سٹین کے معاملے نے ہالی وڈ میں اس نفرت انگیز عمل پر روشنی ڈالی ہے لیکن یہ اس جانب بہت ہی مایوس کن اشارہ جس سے دنیا بھر میں زندگی کے مختلف شعبوں میں روزانہ عورتیں گزرتی ہیں۔ چند سال قبل ایک شادی شدہ سابق دوست نے مجھے اپنی جنسی خواہشات کے واضح پیغامات بھیجنے شروع کردیے۔ انھوں نے لکھا: 'میں خود کو محظوظ کرنے کا عادی ہوگیا ہوں۔ میرا خود پر قابو نہیں رہا۔' میں ڈر گئی۔ میں نے سوچـا کہ مجھے مہذب رہنا چاہیے کیوں ہو سکتا ہے کہ ہم مستقبل میں پھر سے ایک بار ساتھ کام کر رہے ہوں۔ (ایسے حالات میں خواتین ہی کیوں سوچتی ہیں کہ انھیں نرمی اختیار کرنی چاہیے؟) اس کا جواب کیا دوں مجھے واقعی علم نہیں تھا اس لیے میں نے اس سے کہا کہ بعض مردوں کے لیے یہ عام بات ہے۔ امید تھی کہ وہ پیغام بھیجنا بند کر دیں گے۔ لیکن ان کے پیغامات جاری رہے اور وہ مزید گھٹیا ہوتے گئے۔ انھوں نے بتایا کہ انھیں طاقتور خواتین کے ساتھ جنسی تعلق رکھنے کا خیال آتا ہے اور وہ اپنی بیوی کو دھوکہ دینا چاہتے ہیں۔ میں نے ان سے کہا کہ اس بارے میں مجھے سے بات نہ کریں اور کسی سے مدد حاصل کریں۔ پہلے پہل اس کے بارے میں نے کسی کو نہیں بتایا۔ مجھے بہت برا لگا تاہم میں نے اسے خود تک محدود رکھا۔ کچھ مہینے بعد جب میں ایک خاتون ساتھی سے بات کر رہی تھی تو اس نے مجھے بتایا کہ ایک شخص برسوں سے اسے گندے پیغامات بھیج رہا تھا۔ وہ وہی شخص تھا۔ میں نے اطمینان کا سانس لیا کہ اب کوئی تو ہے جس سے بالآخر میں اپنی کہانی بیان کر سکتی ہوں۔ کچھ دنوں بعد میں نے سنا کہ اسے ملازمت سے نکال دیا گیا۔ کسی نے ان کے خلاف شکایت کر دی تھی۔ استحصال کی سطح خواہ کچھ بھی ہو لیکن جب یہ پتہ چلتا ہے کہ کوئی اس طرح کے واقعے سے دوچار ہوا تو پھر بولنا آسان ہو جاتا ہے۔ بل کوسبی کے معاملے کو ہی لے لیں۔ میں نے امریکہ کے کالج کیمپسز میں جنسی حملے کا شکار بہت سی لڑکیوں کے انٹرویو کیے ہیں جو یہ سوچ کر سامنے نہیں آتیں کہ ان پر یقین نہیں کیا جائے گا۔ بہت مرتبہ مرد یہ سمجھ نہیں پاتے کہ اس سے کیسے نمٹیں کیونکہ انھیں اس کا سابقہ نہیں ہوتا ہے۔ انھیں وہ باتیں سننے کو نہیں ملتیں جو عام طور پر خواتین کو سننی پڑتی ہیں۔ بہت سے واقعات میں سے یہ دو واقعات صرف مثال کے لیے ہیں جس سے میرا سابقہ پڑا۔ میں اپنے ہوٹل کے کمرے پر اپنے ایک شادی شدہ دوست کے کھٹکھٹانے اور معنی خیز پیغام بھیجنے کے واقعے کا ذکر کرنا بھول گئی۔ اس بار میں نے باتھ روم میں بھاگ کر اپنے ایک دوستانہ مرد ساتھی کو فون کیا جس نے کہا کہ اگر مجھے پھر خوف محسوس ہو تو میں اسے فون کروں۔ اس واقعے سے مجھے یہ یاد آتا ہے کہ بہت سے مہذب مرد ہیں جو آپ کی اس جنگ میں آپ کے ساتھ ہیں۔ جب میرے دوست بتاتے ہیں کہ کس طرح کشتیوں پر کام کرتے ہوئے ان کو ٹٹولا جاتا ہے، انھیں کام صرف اس لیے نہیں دیا جاتا کہ وہ فلرٹ نہیں کرتیں تو پتہ چلتا ہے کہ بہت سی چیزوں کو بدلنے کی ضرورت ہے۔ لیکن ہالی وڈ اور اس کے سوا جو خوفناک کہانیاں سامنے آ رہی ہیں ان کا ایک مثبت پہلو یہ ہے کہ جتنا لوگ اس کے بارے میں بات کریں گے یہ اتنا ہی ناقابل قبول ہوگا۔
Nigeria's two main presidential candidates have signed an agreement to prevent violence in tightly contested elections due on Saturday. Ex-military ruler Abdulsalami Abubakar brokered the deal in talks between President Goodluck Jonathan and his main challenger Muhammadu Buhari. The two promised to respect the outcome of a credible poll and urged their supporters to refrain from violence. Some 800 people were killed after the 2011 contest between the two rivals. Mr Jonathan is facing a strong challenge from Gen Buhari, with some analysts predicting a photo-finish. Thursday is the final day of campaigning and the government has closed its land and sea borders to ensure a peaceful election. The meeting between the two candidates came after Nigeria's National Peace Committee, chaired by Gen Abubakar, warned on Monday that campaigning had been marred by hate speech that could trigger a crisis in the oil-rich state. Goodluck Jonathan in profile Muhammadu Buhari in profile Exodus as election looms The BBC's Tomi Oladipo reports from the capital, Abuja, that both candidates shook hands and hugged. They called on their supporters to embrace peace, regardless of who won. But concern remains in Nigeria over whether the electoral commission is ready for the huge logistical exercise in sub-Saharan Africa's most populous state, our correspondent says. The polls were due on 14 February, but were postponed to 28 March to give the commission more time to prepare for the polls and for regional forces to regain territory from militant Islamist group Boko Haram in the north-east. Campaign group Human Rights Watch says Boko Haram had killed some 1,000 people this year alone. On Wednesday, army chief Kenneth Minimah said adequate security arrangements had been made for the polls. Anyone who caused conflict would meet "organised violence" from the security forces, he added. Meanwhile, Doha-based al-Jazeera reports that two of its journalists, Ahmed Idris and Ali Mustafa, have been detained by government forces in the city of Maiduguri, the former headquarters of Boko Haram. It quoted the military as saying the journalists, both Nigerian nationals, were operating without "protection, accreditation or due clearance". Al-Jazeera said both men had been accredited by the electoral commission to report from anywhere in Nigeria and it demanded their unconditional release.
Nuestro desafío fotográfico semanal fue #TostadoBBC. Y por la respuesta que recibimos, vemos como un poco de calor puede crear delicias. Como la imagen con la que empezamos esta selección, enviada por Yoel Delgado a nuestro correo electrónico susimagenes@bbc.co.uk "Cuando fui a ciudad de Guatemala con esta presentación ya estaba disfrutando estas tostadas con fresas", nos cuenta. Las siguientes imágenes nos llegan vía Instagram, a través de la etiqueta #TostadoBBC Personas observan granos de café secados al sol, en una finca del volcán Quezaltepec, de San Salvador, que luego serán tostados y molidos, para preparar con el resultado exquisitas bebidas #TostadoBBC #TusFotosBBC #BBCMundo A post shared by Guillermo Martínez (@martinore25) on Oct 25, 2017 at 9:11pm PDT Final de la publicación de Instagram número de martinore25 A post shared by Natalia (@nattyzart) on Oct 24, 2017 at 5:26am PDT Final de la publicación de Instagram número de nattyzart Av Constitución Cc Sesquicentenario Chicharrón #Valencia #carabobo #food #photo #Venezuela A post shared by Saúl Zerpa (@saulzerpa) on Nov 7, 2015 at 4:35pm PST Final de la publicación de Instagram número de saulzerpa Un joven vende tostadas de plátano (entre otros), en su negocio itinerante de bocadillos típicos en una colonia de San Salvador #TostadoBBC #TusFotosBBC #BBCMundo A post shared by Guillermo Martínez (@martinore25) on Oct 25, 2017 at 7:00pm PDT Final de la publicación de Instagram número 2 de martinore25 Y aquí vemos otras que nos llegaron vía correo electrónico. Esta viene desde Colombia, con un pregunta: "La foto enseña el proceso de tostado y cómo libera sus aromas", nos cuenta Alex Camacho. Sin embargo, Nilson Alfredo Cataño Arenas nos habla de un método más tradicional. Pero no solo con café nos deleitamos... También está el chocolate. #cacao #chocolate #cocoa #puertorico #TostadoBBC A post shared by JCC (@janina_costa) on Apr 28, 2017 at 12:58pm PDT Final de la publicación de Instagram número de janina_costa ¡Muchas gracias a todos los participantes! Esta es apenas una selección. Aprovechamos para invitarlos desde ya a nuestro próximo desafío fotográfico: #HuellasBBC. Puedes compartirlas vía Instagram o a través de nuestro correo electrónico susimagenes@bbc.co.uk
The Chinese Communist party voted this week to enshrine President Xi Jinping's ideology into its constitution, elevating him to the same level as founder Mao Zedong. "Xi Jinping Thought", according to Mr Xi himself, is the belief that it is time for "socialism with Chinese characteristics for a new era". But that sounds similar to Mr Deng's "socialism with Chinese characteristics". So just what are those Chinese characteristics, and while it might be unfair to compare them as they are operating in different times - is what President Xi has achieved so far comparable to Deng Xiaoping's accomplishments for the economy? When Deng Xiaoping launched China's "reform and open up" programme in 1979, China's gross domestic product (GDP) was: The annual average income of a Chinese person was less than $100 (£76.21). Today, China's economy is the world's second largest, and by some estimates could overtake the US's by 2029. All of this has happened largely due to a state-driven, managed economic system that Deng helped to put in place. But all of that came at a huge price. Air and water pollution from factories producing goods in China has soared. This has led to health problems for millions of Chinese families. And while hundreds of millions of people have been lifted out of poverty, there's still a huge gap between the rich and the poor, leading to rising resentment against the elites in the Chinese Communist party and their children. Deng's legacy was also tarnished by the Tiananmen Square massacre which reinforced the West's belief that even if China followed Western methods to expand its economy, it would never follow a similar political system. When President Xi Jinping came to power in 2012, the Chinese people had already experienced three decades of double digit growth. But Mr Xi has also inherited a country with massive public and private debts, bloated state-owned companies and higher expectations from a new and confident Chinese population who wanted the Communist party to deliver public goods and improvements in welfare. So here's how President Xi is trying to put a stamp on China's economy: While it's clear Mr Xi will go down in China's Communist Party constitution as the most elevated leader since Mao Zedong, it's not as clear whether he will be able to match the economic achievements that Deng Xiaoping had. Deng was always going to come out better in this competition, just based on the hard numbers. Starting from scratch is much simpler than trying to refashion the Chinese economy, as Mr Xi is attempting. Mr Xi's economic achievements are important, but will never be revolutionary. There is no way they could be. The biggest revolution is a philosophical one - Mr Xi wants the world to recognise that China is a global force - not just economically, but ideologically as well. He's offering China's way as an alternative model to the West's - a way for other countries to grow their economies but "preserve their independence". So expect Mr Xi's China is to continue on its assertive and confident path. Expect steady but slowing economic growth - but most importantly expect an economy that's still heavily controlled from the top down, not growing from the bottom up.
"Me llamo Chris Packham. Lo que probablemente no sepas, porque lo he escondido durante casi toda mi vida, es que mi cerebro es diferente al tuyo, porque soy autista". Esta presentación podría corresponder a cualquiera de los millones de personas que viven con este trastorno. Pero esta declaración logró captar la atención de buena parte de Reino Unido cuando se emitió en televisión esta semana. El motivo es que Chris Packham es uno de los naturalistas y presentadores de la BCC más queridos por la audiencia. Muchos descubrieron las maravillas de la vida salvaje durante más de tres décadas gracias a sus programas. Packham decidió hablar a corazón abierto en un documental de BBC Two sobre la realidad con la que vive, pero que no le diagnosticaron hasta pasados los 40 años (hoy tiene 56). Tenía síndrome de Asperger. Y fue gracias a ese diagnóstico que todas las piezas inconexas de su vida comenzaron a encajar como un puzle. Con un honesto y poderoso testimonio, Packham quiso mostrar a la audiencia cómo es su mundo. Un mundo que experimenta de manera distinta, con sensaciones y sentidos intensificados al máximo y una mente que salta constantemente de un tema a otro. El síndrome de Asperger es un tipo de autismo que afecta a las personas de por vida sobre cómo perciben el mundo e interactúan con los demás. Las personas con asperger tienen una inteligencia media o por encima del promedio. Con el tipo de apoyo adecuado, pueden vivir una vida satisfactoria con sus propias elecciones. Las estimaciones sobre el número de casos en el mundo son muy variables, pero se cree que más de la mitad de los casos alcanzan la edad adulta sin diagnóstico. "Soy un poco raro -resumió con calma-. Hay mucho de mí que es bastante normal. Hay muchas otras cosas que no son tan normales". El presentador narró cómo este síndrome ha definido en cierto modo casi toda su existencia. Cómo le obliga a hacer un gran esfuerzo en las situaciones sociales y cómo complica sus relaciones con otras personas. Y lo que explica, por ejemplo, que no haya querido ir a una fiesta en los últimos diez años. Las dificultades comenzaron ya en la escuela, donde el resto de niños lo marginaban por considerarlo diferente. "Lo que me molestaba era que no lo entendía. No entendía por qué me señalaban y excluían. Esa confusión era una agonía. Si estás aislado, entonces es aún más difícil que encuentres ayuda cuando la necesitas", recordó visiblemente emocionado. Su refugio para sobrevivir fue, precisamente, la vida salvaje. Así, el presentador habló con nostalgia de su afición por coleccionar calaveras de zorro, lamer escarabajos o comer renacuajos vivos. Poco podía imaginar que su afición -y salvación frente a los acosadores- sería a lo que acabaría dedicando de manera apasionada su vida profesional. Un día, su hermana le sugirió "ir a la televisión y aburrir al resto del mundo con los animales, no solo a la familia". Y ahí comenzaría su exitosa carrera. Por eso, está convencido, el asperger también le ha beneficiado y ayudado a ser quien es hoy. "Si hago mi programa (de televisión) es por el asperger, por mis diferencias neuronales. Eso permite ver las cosas con quizá mayor claridad, ver el mundo de modo diferente, en mi caso de modo muy visual". Honesto, directo y sin rodeos, Packham continuó hablando ante la cámara y compartiendo algunas de sus preocupaciones -su terror a perder las cosas que ama o su fijación con el orden- o cómo vivir solo en el bosque le ayuda a convivir con el asperger. También confesó haber pensado en quitarse la vida en el pasado y cómo sus perros, en cierto modo, lo salvaron. "Me querían y no pude abandonarlos". Durante el documental, el presentador viaja a Estados Unidos para conocer radicales terapias que intentan eliminar los rasgos más problemáticos del síndrome. Pero, tras conocerlas, no ocultó sus dudas e incertidumbres. "Lo que he visto me deja claro que necesitamos entender mejor a las personas autistas, no intentar cambiar quiénes son". Tanto que, aunque reconoce que durante su adolescencia podría haber preferido no tener asperger por creer que su vida sería más fácil, su posición ahora es distinta. "Si me ofrecieras una cura, desde mi propia perspectiva en la que estoy, te diría que no, gracias".
میانمار کی فوج نے سخت مظالم ڈھاتے ہوئے پانچ لاکھ روہنگیا مسلمانوں کو ملک بدر کرنے پر مجبور کر دیا ہے جہاں وہ رخائن ریاست میں رہائش پزیر تھے۔ اقوام متحدہ کے انسانی حقوق کے ادارے کے مطابق ان مسلمانوں کے گھر بار، گاؤں، مویشی جانور اور کھیت تمام نذر آتش کر دیے گئے ہیں تاکہ وہ ملک میں واپس نہ آئیں۔ وہ روہنگیا مسلمان جو ان مظالم سے بچنے کے لیے پڑوسی ملک بنگلہ دیش کی راہ کو نکلے کہتے ہیں کہ میانمار کے حکام نے سیکورٹی نافذ کرنے کے لیے آپریشن کے نام پر شہریوں کا قتل عام کیا اور تشدد اور جنسی پامالی کی۔ روہنگیا مسلمانوں کا درد روہنگیا جائیں تو جائیں کہاں؟ دوسری جانب میانمار کی فوج نے ان الزامات کی تردید کی ہے اور کہا کہ وہ صرف روہنگیا شدت پسندوں کے خلاف کاروائی کر رہے ہیں۔ لیکن وہ روہنگیا جو بے گھر ہیں، ان کے لیے یہ سب صرف لفظوں کا کھیل ہے۔ بنگلہ دیش میں اقوام متحدہ کے تعینات سفیر کے مطابق اکتوبر سے لے کر اب تک چھ لاکھ افراد سرحد عبور کر کے میانمار سے بنگلہ دیش داخل ہو چکے ہیں۔ یہ پناہ گزین بھوک و افلاس کے مارے ہوئے ہیں اور تھکے ہوئے ہیں۔ کئی صدمے کا شکار ہیں اور ان میں سے کئی کے ساتھ بچے بھی ہیں۔ بی بی سی کے فوٹوگرافر سلمان سعید نے بنگلہ دیش میں موجود ان پناہ گزینوں کے مختلف کیمپوں کا دورہ کیا اور تصاویر بنائیں۔ . ان روہنگیا پناہ گزینوں کو ایک ہفتے سے زائد عرصے تک غذا کے بغیر پیدل چلنا پڑا جس کے بعد بالآخر وہ بنگلہ دیش تک پہنچے۔ اپنے ساتھ وہ صرف کچھ کمبل اور بہت کم سامان لا سکے تھے۔ تیرہ سالہ مبین 12 دن پیدل سفر طے کرنے کے بعد محفوظ مقام پر پہنچ سکے۔ اقوام متحدہ کے ماہرین کے مطابق 'بہت ممکن' ہے کہ میانمار کے سیکورٹی اہلکاروں نے جان بوجھ کر روہنگیا پناہ گزینوں کے پیدل چلنے والے سرحدی راستے میں بارودی سرنگیں نصب کی تھیں جس سے ان کا سفر اور بھی خطرناک ہو گیا تھا۔ ماہرین کے مطابق چند روہنگیا مسلمانوں کو تین ہفتے تک مسلسل چلنا پڑا تھا جس کے بعد وہ بنگلہ دیش میں حکومت کی جانب سے قائم کیے گئے پناہ گزین کیمپ تک پہنچ سکے تھے۔ میانمار کی رخائن ریاست سے بچنے کے لیے روہنگیا مسلمان ہر طرح کا ذریعہ استعمال کر رہے ہیں۔ کچھ لوگ سرحد سے متصل دریائے ناف کو عبور کرنے پر مجبور ہیں جبکہ کچھ دوسری راستے استعمال کر رہے ہیں۔. درجنوں لوگ اب تک اس سفر میں ہلاک ہو چکے ہیں۔ اخبار ڈھاکہ ٹریبیون کے مطابق 24 اگست سے اب تک 28 کشتیاں ڈوب چکی ہیں جن میں 184 افراد ہلاک ہو چکے ہیں۔ جن کشتیوں میں روہنگیا مسلمان دریا عبور کرتے ہیں وہ نہایت خستہ حال اور خطرناک ہوتی ہیں جن میں گنجائش سے زیادہ افراد کو بٹھانے سے ان کی جانیں شدید خطرے سے دوچار ہوتی ہیں اور ان میں سے کئی کو تو پیراکی بھی نہیں آتی۔ یہ شخص، ابو طابل بنگلہ دیش اپنے ساتھ بہت تھوڑا سامان ساتھ لا سکا۔ رخائن سے یہاں تک کے سفر میں اس کا ساتھ صرف اس کی پنجرے میں بند مرغی نے دیا۔ جب یہ افراد پناہ گزینوں کے کیمپ میں پہنچتے ہیں تو اپنے لیے خود رہنے کا انتظام کرتے ہیں۔ کاکس بازار میں قائم اس کیمپ کی حالت زار ہے۔ وہ کیچڑ سے بھرا ہوا ہے اور لوگوں سے بھرا ہوا ہے اور یہاں صاف پینے کا پانی بھی میسر نہیں ہے۔ صفائی ستھرائی کا نظام نہ ہونے کے برابر ہے اور بارشوں کی وجہ سے زندگی مزید دشوار ہو گئی ہے۔ بہت سے پناہ گزینوں کے رشتے دار پہلے سے کاکس بازار کے کیمپ میں موجود ہیں جو میانمار میں گذشتہ چند برسوں میں روہنگیا مسلمانوں پر ہونے والے ظلم کے بعد جان بچانے کے لیے بنگلہ دیش بھاگ گئے تھے۔ اس سال 16 اکتوبر کو انٹرنیشنل ریڈ کراس تنظیم نے کاکس بازار میں 60 بستروں پر مشتمل ایک ہسپتال قائم کیا ہے جو دو فٹبال گراؤنڈ کے برابر ہے۔ یہ نو عمر روہنگیا لڑکا دوسروں کے مقابلے میں زیادہ خوش قسمت ہے کیونکہ اسے کچھ طبی امداد مل چکی ہے۔ . بنگلہ دیش کی حکومت نے اعلان کیا ہے کہ وہ روہنگیا مسلمانوں کے لیے پناہ گزین کیمپ قائم کریں گے جہاں 80000 روہنگیا کو رہنے کی جگہ میسر ہو سکے گی۔ یہ اپنی نوعیت کا دنیا کا سب سے بڑا کیمپ ہوگا۔ . اس خاندان کی تصاویر اس وقت لی گئیں جب ان کو کئی دن کے بعد کھانا میسر ہوا۔ میانمار سے جان بچا کر بھاگنے والوں کے مطابق رخائن ریاست میں کھانے کی قلت کی وجہ سے ان کو بھاگنا پڑا تھا کیونکہ وہاں موجود کھانے کی دکانیں بند کر دی گئی تھیں۔. نو ماہ کی حاملہ رسیدہ ان ہزاروں خواتین میں شامل ہیں جو حاملہ ہیں اور کسی بھی وقت اولاد کو جنم دے سکتی ہیں۔ اقوام متحدہ کے مطابق کیمپوں میں ڈیڑھ لاکھ کے قریب خواتین موجود ہیں جو ماں بننے کی عمر میں ہیں۔ ان میں سے 24000 خِواتین حاملہ ہیں اور ان کے پاس روڈ پر اولاد جنم دینے کے علاوہ اور کوئی ذریعہ نہیں ہے۔ 17 اکتوبر کو اقوام متحدہ نے خبردار کیا کہ ہزاروں روہنگیا مسلمان ابھی بھی بنگلہ دیش اور میانمار کی سرحد پر پھنسے ہوئے ہیں۔ انھوں نے بنگلہ دیش پر زور دیا کہ وہ جلد از جلد ان متاثرہ افراد کو ملک میں لائیں تاکہ ان کی امداد کی جا سکے۔ روہنگیا مسلمانوں کا یہ انخلا اب بھی جاری ہے اور لاکھوں کی تعداد میں پناہ گزین بنگلہ دیش داخل ہو رہے ہیں۔ تمام تصاویر سلمان سعید نے بنگلہ دیش کے کاکس بازار میں کھینچی ہیں۔
ශ්‍රී ලංකාවේ වේලාවෙන් දිනපතාම රාත්‍රී 9:15 ට කෙටි තරංග 19 (15690 kHz), කෙටි තරංග 22 (13630 kHz) සහ කෙටි තරංග 41 (7435 kHz) ඔස්සේ බීබීසී සිංහල සේවයේ සංදේශය වැඩසටහන ගුවන්ගත වේ. බ්‍රිතාන්‍යයේ දී 16:45 GMT සවුදි අරාබිය සහ ජෝර්දානයේ දී 7:00 pm කුවේටයේ දී 7:30 pm ඩුබායි හිදී 8:30 pm ශ්‍රී ලංකාවේ දී 9:45 pm සිංගප්පූරුවේ දී 12:30 pm ඒ හැරුණු විට www.bbcsinhala.com වෙබ් අඩවිය ඔස්සේ සවසේ පැය විසිහතර පුරාම ඔබට සංදේශයට කන්දිය හැකියි. අපේ වැඩසටහන් පිළිබඳ ඔබේ අදහස් උදහස් දැනගැනීමට අපි කැමැත්තෙමු. කරුණාකර පහත ලිපිනයට අපට ලියන්න. Sandeshaya BBC Sinhala Service New Broadcasting House, Portland Place London W1A 1AA නොඑසේනම් පහත ලිපිනයට අපට ඊමේල් පණිවුඩයක් එවන්න. sinhala@bbc.co.uk
President Donald Trump's announcement that the US is withdrawing from the 2015 Paris climate agreement has drawn strong reaction from supporters and opponents inside America and around the world. "The nations that remain in the Paris Agreement will be the nations that reap the benefits in jobs and industries created. I believe the United States of America should be at the front of the pack. But even in the absence of American leadership; even as this Administration joins a small handful of nations that reject the future; I'm confident that our states, cities, and businesses will step up and do even more to lead the way, and help protect for future generations the one planet we've got." "I tell you firmly tonight: We will not renegotiate a less ambitious accord. There is no way. Don't be mistaken on climate; there is no plan B because there is no planet B." "I would not want to condemn President Trump now, because President Obama took the relevant decision... In my view, it was not necessary to pull out of the Paris agreements... [But] we still have time for this if we work constructively, we have time to agree something. Don't worry - be happy!" "Am departing presidential councils. Climate change is real. Leaving Paris is not good for America or the world," @elonmusk "At this moment, when climate change is already causing devastating harm around the world, we do not have the moral right to turn our backs on efforts to preserve this planet for future generations." "President Trump can turn his back on the world, but the world cannot ignore the very real threat of climate change. This decision is an immoral assault on the public health, safety and security of everyone on this planet. On behalf of the people of New York City, and alongside mayors across the country, I am committing to honour the goals of the Paris agreement with an executive order in the coming days, so our city can remain a home for generations to come." "The president who promised "America First" has taken a self-destructive step that puts our nation last. This is an unprecedented forfeiture of American leadership which will cost us influence, cost us jobs, and invite other countries to walk away from solving humanity's most existential crisis. It isolates the United States after we had united the world." "The Paris climate agreement was simply a raw deal for America. Signed by President Obama without Senate ratification, it would have driven up the cost of energy, hitting middle-class and low-income Americans the hardest. "I commend President Trump for fulfilling his commitment to the American people and withdrawing from this bad deal." "President Trump's decision to withdraw from the Paris Climate Agreement is a devastating failure of historic proportions. Future generations will look back on President Trump's decision as one of the worst policy moves made in the 21st century because of the huge damage to our economy, our environment and our geopolitical standing." "I applaud President Trump and his administration for dealing yet another significant blow to the Obama administration's assault on domestic energy production and jobs. President Obama made commitments in this deal based off a costly power plan that we knew at the time was on shaky legal ground. By withdrawing from this unattainable mandate, President Trump has reiterated his commitment to protecting middle class families across the country and workers throughout coal country from higher energy prices and potential job loss." "Peabody supports the administration's decision to withdraw from the Paris Agreement. We believe that abiding by the accord, without significant changes, would have substantially impacted the US economy, increased electricity costs and required the power sector to rely on less diverse and more intermittent energy. Peabody continues to advocate for greater use of technology to meet the world's need for energy security, economic growth and energy solutions through high efficiency low emissions coal-fuelled power plants and research and development funding for carbon capture." "We support President Trump's decision to withdraw from the Paris agreement. The previous administration volunteered to meet one of the most stringent goals of any country in the world, while many other countries do far less to reduce their emissions. Meeting President Obama's goal would have led to more regulations, higher energy prices, and dependence on less reliable energy sources." "The Prime Minister expressed her disappointment with the decision and stressed that the UK remained committed to the Paris Agreement. "The Paris Agreement provides the right global framework for protecting the prosperity and security of future generations, while keeping energy affordable and secure for our citizens and businesses." "We need the Paris agreement to protect all of creation. Nothing can and nothing will stop us... To everyone who cares about the future of our planet, I say let's continue on this path together to succeed in protecting Mother Earth." "The decision by the United States to withdraw from the Paris Agreement on climate change is a major disappointment for global efforts to reduce greenhouse gas emissions and promote global security. It is crucial that the United States remains a leader on environmental issues." "We are deeply disappointed that the United States federal government has decided to withdraw from the Paris Agreement. Canada is unwavering in our commitment to fight climate change and support clean economic growth." "Today is a sad day for the global community, as a key partner turns its back on the fight against climate change. The EU deeply regrets the unilateral decision by the Trump administration to withdraw the US from the Paris Agreement." "No matter what decision is made by the White House, cities are honouring their responsibilities to implement the Paris Agreement. There is no alternative for the future of our planet." "The decision by the Trump Administration to withdraw from the Paris Agreement on climate change is deeply disappointing, especially for the citizens of vulnerable nations throughout the world. "As incoming President of COP23, I did what I could - along with many leaders around the world - to try to persuade President Trump to remain standing shoulder-to-shoulder with us as, together, we tackle the greatest challenge our planet has ever faced. While the loss of America's leadership is unfortunate, this is a struggle that is far from over." "Today's decision is not only disappointing but also highly concerning for those of us who live on the front line of climate change. "The rest of the world remains firmly committed to the Paris Agreement and our own commitment to it, and that of our wider Pacific family, will never waiver."
في عصر العولمة الذي نعيشه، قد يعتمد أداؤك الوظيفي على نسبة الذكاء الثقافي لديك. فما هو الذكاء الثقافي؟ تخيل لقاءك للمرة الأولى بشخص يأتي من بلد بعيد ولكنه يجيد لغتك. قد يبدو أنه لا يوجد حاجز يحول دون اتصال مباشر بينكما، فهل تكيف نبرة وإيقاع صوتك، أو تباعد فترات التوقف في كلامك، من أجل سهولة التواصل معه؟ وماذا عن تغيير لغة جسدك وسلوكياتك، وتعابير وجهك وفقا لخلفية الشخص الذي أمامك؟ هل تجلس أو تقف بطريقة مختلفة، وتنتبه للغة إشارة يديك؟ هذه ليست سوى مجموعة من التحولات الدقيقة في السلوك التي يمكن أن تساهم في تحديد مستوى ما يعرف بـ"الذكاء الثقافي" (سي كيو) لدى المرء. وهناك أدلة متزايدة تشير إلى أنه يستحق التعلم. ويكتب عالم الاجتماع ديفيد ليفرمور في كتابه "اختلاف الذكاء الثقافي" قائلا: إن "أول ما يتنبأ بنجاحك في عالم بلا حدود هذه الأيام ليس نسبة ذكائك، ولا سيرتك الذاتية، ولا حتى خبرتك. إنه ذكاؤك الثقافي". ووفقا لأحدث الاستنتاجات، فإن مستوى مرتفعا من الذكاء الثقافي يمكن أن يكون عنصرا حاسما في مجموعة واسعة من المهن، بداية من المصرفيين، إلى الجنود، والعلماء، والمدرسين، أو أي شخص يتعامل بانتظام مع أناس من خلفيات متعددة. إذن ما هو الذكاء الثقافي؟ ولماذا يكون أعلى لدى البعض مقارنة بالآخرين؟ وكيف يمكن لنا تعزيز هذه القدرات؟ أجرت سون آنغ، أستاذة الإدارة في جامعة نانيانغ التكنولوجية في سنغافورة، الكثير من الأبحاث حول الذكاء الثقافي. وفي أواخر التسعينيات، كان عملها يتعلق بتحديث أنظمة الكمبيوتر في سنغافورة لمعالجة الخلل الشهير الذي كان يعرف بمشكلة "Y2K"، وهو خلل في برامج الكمبيوتر كان يخشى أن يؤدي إلى القضاء على شبكة الحواسيب العالمية في مطلع الألفية. وقد شكلت آنغ فريقا من المبرمجين لحل هذه المشكلة. وكان الفريق يضم ألمع العقول في مجال البرمجيات، ومع ذلك فقد وجدت آنغ أنها لا يمكنها العمل مع أعضاء هذا الفريق. فقد كانت مجموعات العمل غير فعالة، وفشلت في الاتفاق. وكثيرا ما كان يبدو أن الأفراد توصلوا إلى حل، ولكنهم كانوا ينفذونه بطرق مختلفة تماما ودون جدوى. من الواضح أن المسألة لم تكن مسألة خبرة أو حوافز. وبدلا من ذلك، رأت أن هؤلاء الموظفين ذوي القدرات العالية يتعثرون أمام الاختلافات الثقافية لدى كل منهم، وهو ما أدى إلى انهيار التواصل والتفاهم فيما بينهم. وقد قادت هذه الأفكار آنغ إلى التعاون مع عالم النفس التنظيمي بي كريستوفر إيرلي، الذي كان يعمل حينئذ في كلية لندن للأعمال، وهو الآن عميد كلية الأعمال والاقتصاد في جامعة تزمينيا، بأستراليا. وقد عملا سويا على بناء نظرية شاملة للذكاء الثقافي، والتي يعرفانها على أنها "القدرة على العمل بفاعلية في مجموعة متنوعة من السياقات الثقافية". وعادة يقاس الذكاء الثقافي من خلال سلسلة من الأسئلة التي تقيم أربعة مكونات مختلفة. الأول هو "محرك الذكاء الثقافي"- أي الدافع لمعرفة المزيد عن الثقافات الأخرى. ثم هناك "معرفة الذكاء الثقافي"، أي فهم بعض الاختلافات الثقافية العامة التي قد تواجهها. أما "استراتيجية الذكاء الثقافي"، فهي تدرس كيفية تعاملك مع التحديات الصعبة والتعلم منها، بينما ينطوي "تنفيذ الذكاء الثقافي" على مرونتك السلوكية، وما إذا كان بإمكانك تكييف سلوكك وفقا لكل موقف. قد يكون لشخص لديه ذكاء ثقافي منخفض ميل لرؤية سلوك الجميع من خلال عدسته الثقافية. وإذا كان يأتي من بيئة أكثر كياسة ولطفا، على سبيل المثال، ويلاحظ أن زملاءه اليابانيين أو الكوريين يلزمون الصمت كثيرا في اجتماع ما، قد يفترض أنهم عدائيون أو ضجرون. وفي مجال الطيران، تسببت مثل هذه الاختلافات الثقافية أحيانا في انهيار الاتصالات بين الطيارين ومراقبي الحركة الجوية، وهو ما أدى إلى وقوع حوادث تحطم مميتة. لكن شخصا يمتلك أعلى مستوى من الذكاء الثقافي قد يدرك أن الصمت في مثل هذا الاجتماع هو علامة على الاحترام، وأن ردود الفعل لن تقدم ما لم تطلب صراحة. ونتيجة لذلك، فإنه يتأكد من إتاحة فرص مناسبة في الاجتماع كي يدلي الآخرون بآرائهم. ولعله من غير المستغرب أن العديد من الدراسات قد استكشفت كيفية تكيف المغتربين مع الحياة في الخارج، وأظهرت أن أولئك الذين لديهم أعلى مستوى أولي من الذكاء الثقافي سوف يجدون التأقلم مع حياتهم الجديدة أسهل. إلا أن الذكاء الثقافي يمكن أن يشير إلى جوانب أكثر موضوعية من الأداء الوظيفي، مثل أداء المبيعات الدولية، ومهارات التفاوض، والقدرة القيادية الشاملة. إحدى الدراسات التي أجريت في عام 2011 عملت على قياس نسبة الذكاء (IQ)، والذكاء العاطفي (EQ)، والذكاء الثقافي (CQ) لنحو 126 ضابطا يدرسون في الأكاديمية العسكرية السويسرية، وهم يشاركون في مهام مختلفة تدعم الأمم المتحدة في أراض أجنبية، وفي تدريبات دولية. ورغم أنه بدا أن جميع أشكال الذكاء الثلاثة ساهمت في أدائهم الكلي، إلا أنه تبين أن الذكاء الثقافي كان أفضل عامل تنبؤ، إذ كان مسؤولا عن 25 في المئة من نسبة نجاح الضباط في المهام الدولية. وفي حين أن الأشخاص من ذوي الذكاء الثقافي العالي قد ينجذبون بشكل طبيعي لوظائف دولية، فإن هذه الدراسات تشير إلى أن الاختلافات في الذكاء الثقافي يمكن أيضا أن تتنبأ بأدائهم في حال تعيينهم في وظائف معينة. وهذا التقييم يقود العديد من الشركات إلى النظر في اختبار الذكاء الثقافي ومعرفة كيفية تعزيز درجات ذكاء الموظفين على مقياس الذكاء الثقافي. وقد استخدمت مؤسسات، مثل ستاربكس وبلومبرغ وجامعة ميشغان، الخدمات التي يقدمها مركز الذكاء الثقافي في ميشغان، والذي يقدم اختبارات عبر الثقافات المختلفة، ومجموعة من الدورات. والأمر المهم، كما يقول رئيس المركز ليفرمور، أنه يمكن تعلم الذكاء الثقافي. ولكن لا يوجد بديل للخبرة المباشرة الشخصية في بلد آخر، رغم أنه يبدو أن الناس يتعلمون في الغالب من التعرض لمجموعة متنوعة من الثقافات المختلفة إذا أردوا تعلم تلك المهارات القابلة للتعميم. ويقول "في حين أن فهم ثقافة معينة يمكن أن يكون مفيدا، فإنه قد لا يتنبأ إطلاقا بكل قدراتك على الانخراط بفاعلية في مكان جديد". ويضيف "في الواقع، توصلت أبحاثنا إلى أن الأفراد الذين أمضوا وقتا مطولا في مواقع متعددة يكون لديهم على الأرجح معرفة ذكاء ثقافي أعلى من أولئك الذين عاشوا عقودا عديدة في بيئة واحدة في الخارج". لكن يبدو أن تعليم بعض المفاهيم الأساسية بشكل واضح يسهل تلك العملية. فيمكن للموظفين الخضوع لاختبار الذكاء الثقافي، ثم العمل مع مدرب لتحديد التحديات المحتملة. وفيما بعد، يناقشون تلك التجارب والطرق التي يمكن لهم تطويع سلوكهم من خلالها في المستقبل. وباستخدام هذه الاستراتيجية، بدا أن المصرفيين المغتربين الذين ينتقلون إلى الشرق الأوسط، وآسيا، تكيفوا تماما مع حياتهم الجديدة خلال ثلاثة أشهر فقط، بينما استغرق الموظفون المغتربون الذي لم يحصلوا على أي تدريب ثقافي تسعة أشهر كي يصبحوا قادرين على العمل بكامل قدراتهم. بيد أن الذكاء الثقافي لا ينمو لدى الجميع بالخبرة فقط. وحتى بعد سنوات من العيش في الخارج، يبدو أن فهم بعض الناس للثقافة الأخرى لا يزيد كثيرا، وقد يبدون مقاومة للتدريب أيضا. ويحاول الباحثون الآن اكتشاف أسباب هذه الاختلافات. وتعتقد ميلودي تشاو، عالمة النفس الاجتماعية في جامعة هونغ كونغ للعلوم والتكنولوجيا، أن إحدى الإجابات عن ذلك تكمن في عقلية الفرد. وقد استلهمت هذه الفكرة من أعمال عالمة النفس التربوي كارول دويك، التي بينت أن معتقدات الناس حول قدراتهم غالبا ما تصبح نبوءات لإرضاء الذات. فمن ناحية، ينظر بعض الناس إلى قدراتهم على أنها "ثابتة" وغير قابلة للتغيير. فيما قد يكون لدى آخرين "عقلية النمو"، وهو ما يعني أنهم ينظرون إلى قدراتهم على أنها أكثر مرونة، لذا من المرجح أن يصمدوا خلال المعاناة ويتقبلوا تحديات جديدة. وتتراكم هذه الاختلافات بشكل سريع، ما يعني أن الشخص ذا العقلية الثابتة قد ينطلق مع موهبة طبيعية أفضل، ليتخلف سريعا وراء شخص يتمتع بعقلية النمو. أعمال دويك نظرت في المفاهيم التقليدية للذكاء، ولكن تشاو أظهرت أن هناك عملية مماثلة تكمن خلف التغيرات في الذكاء الثقافي أيضا. فإذا كان شخص ما يعتقد أن الصفات الثقافية ثابتة، على سبيل المثال، فقد يواجه توترا أكبر أثناء تفاعله مع السكان المحليين، وقد يتعثر بعد لقاء مربك أو صعب دون التفكير في طرق للتكيف في المستقبل. ونتيجة لذلك، قد تبدو هذه الاختلافات الثقافية وكأنها حدود يستحيل التغلب عليها. تقول تشاو "إن معتقدات الأفراد تخلق 'حقيقة' بالنسبة لهم". وتقول إن الشركات يمكن أن تقيس هذه المعتقدات الضمنية إضافة إلى الدرجات الأولية للذكاء الثقافي لموظفيها، من أجل تحديد من الأكثر ترجيحا للاستفادة من خبرة دولية مقترحة. وتحذر تشاو من أنه رغم هذه الطرق الجديدة من التفكير بشأن الذكاء الثقافي، فإن البحوث في هذا المجال لا تزال في مهدها. وتقول "الديناميكيات الدولية وديناميكيات ما بين الثقافات تتغير بسرعة كبيرة، ولا يزال لدينا الكثير لتعلمه بشأن كيفية تعزيز الكفاءة الثقافية للأفراد". وفي عالم تتوثق صلاتنا العالمية أكثر من أي وقت مضى، لا يمكن لذلك الفهم الجديد أن يأتي بسرعة كافية. يمكنك قراءة الموضوع الأصلي على موقع BBC Capital. اضغط هنا لتنزيل تطبيق بي بي سي عربي الخاص بمستخدمي نظام أندرويد تابع أحدث الأخبار من بي بي سي عربي ومن شبكة صحفييها العالمية في تطبيق جديد خاص بمستخدمي نظام #أندرويد. حمل التطبيق الآن! http://bit.ly/2ikGmBK نهاية فيسبوك الرسالة التي بعث بها BBC Arabic
තායිලන්තයේ හිටපු රජු පූමිපොන් අදුන්යදේජ් වෙත අවසන් ගෞරව දැක්වීම සඳහා ලක්ෂ සංඛ්‍යාත ජනකායක් බැංකොක් නුවරට පැමිණ සිටියහ. හමුදා ගෞරව සහ තුර්ය වාදන කණ්ඩායම්වල සංගීත හඬ මැද සංකේතාත්මක අවමංගල්‍ය මංජුසාව රැගත් රථය ආදාහනගාරය වෙත ළඟා විය. බ්‍රහස්පතින්දා (ඔක් 26) පැවතියේ දින පහකින් සමන්විත අවමංගල්‍ය උත්සවයේ ප්‍රධාන අංගයයි. සිය රජතුමා වෙත ගෞරව දැක්වීමක් වශයෙන් මාර්ග දෙපස රැස්ව සිටි ජනතාව කළු පැහැති ඇඳුම්වලින් සැරසී සිටියහ. තායිලන්ත ජනතාව අතර ගෞරවාදරයට පත්‍ර වූ පූමිපොන අදුන්යදේජ් රජතුමා මෙලොවින් සමුගත්තේ 2016 වසරේ ඔක්තෝබර් මාසයේදීය. මිය යන විට ඔහු 88 වෙනි වියේ පසු විය. අවමංගල්‍ය උත්සවය රාජකීය මාලිගයේ දී බදාදා නිල වශයෙන් ආරම්භ කෙරුණේ බෞද්ධ ආගමික පිළිවෙත් සහිත පිංකම් උත්සවයකිනි. අවමංගල්‍ය පෙරහැර ආරම්භ කිරීමට පෙර රාජකීය මාලිගය තුළ දී බෞද්ධ ආගමික වතාවත් මාලාවක් සිදු කෙරිණි. අදුන්යදේජ් රජුගේ දේහය සහිත රාජකීය චිතකයට ඔහුගේ පුත් වචිරාලොන්ගෝන් රජු විසින් පසුව ගිනි දැල්වීමට නියමිතය. සංකේතාත්මක මංජුසාව ගෙන යාම සඳහා භාවිත කරන ලද රථය 18 වෙනි ශතවර්ෂයට අයත්ය. ටොන් 14 බරැති එම රථය ඇදගෙන යනු ලැබුවේ 200 අධික හමුදා භටයන් පිරිසක් විසිනි. ලෝකයේ වැඩිම කාලයක් සිහසුන දැරූ රාජ්‍ය පාලකයා ලෙස පූමිපොන් අදුන්යදේජ් රජු ඉතිහාසයට එක් වේ. තායිලන්තය තුළ දැඩි ගෞරවාදරයට පාත්‍රව සිටි ඔහුගේ පාලන කාලය තුළ හමුදා කුමන්ත්‍රණ රැසක් සිදුවිය. දේශපාලන අධිකාරියට ඉහළින් පෙනී සිටි පීතෘවරයෙකු බඳු චරිතයක් හිමිව සිටි ඔහු දේශපාලන කැළඹීම් සහිත අවස්ථාවන් වල දී ඒවාට මැදිහත්වී කටයුතු කළේය. තායිලන්ත ව්‍යවස්ථාවට අනුව රාජ්‍යත්වයට හිමිවන්නේ සීමිත බලයක් වුවද බොහෝ තායි ජාතිකයන් අතර ඔහු දේවත්වයෙන් පිදුම් ලැබීය. සබැඳි යොමු:
ලොව පුරුෂයන් හා සැසඳීමේ දී සාක්ෂරතාව අතින් කාන්තාවන් පසු පසින් සිටින බව නිල වාර්තා පෙන්වා දෙයි. කාන්තාවන්ගෙන් ආසන්න වශයෙන් තුනෙන් දෙකකට අකුරු ලිවීමට හෝ කියවීමට නොහැක. ඒ අනුව අකුරු ලිවීමට හෝ කියවීමට නොහැකි කාන්තාවන්ගේ සංඛ්‍යාව හතළිස් හත් කෝටි අනූ ලක්ෂයකි. පුරුෂයන් සහ කාන්තාවන් අතර සාක්ෂරතාවයේ පවතින වෙනස දශක ගණනාවක සිට එලෙසම පවතී. මෙම තත්ත්වය ආරම්භ වන්නේ පාසල් අධ්‍යාපනය තුළිනි. පිරිමි ළමුන් හා සැසඳීමේ දී ගැහැණු ළමුන් ප්‍රාථමික අධ්‍යාපනය ලබන්නේ අඩු වශයෙනි. නිල වාර්තාවලට අනුව ලොව එක් කෝටි පනස් ලක්ෂයක් ප්‍රාථමික වයසේ දැරියන් කිසිදාක පාසලකට පය තබා නොමැත. ඉන් අඩකට වැඩි පිරිසක් අයත් වන්නේ උප සහරා අප්‍රිකානු කලාපයටය. ඒ සඳහා ප්‍රධාන වශයෙන් බලපාන කරුණු: කෙසේනමුත් පසුගිය දශකය තුළ එහි යම් වෙනසක් දක්නට ලැබෙන අතර ගැහැණු ළමුන් ලක්ෂ ගණනකට පාසල් අධ්‍යාපනය ලැබීම සඳහා අවස්ථාව හිමිව ඇත. 2014 වසරේ සංඛ්‍යා ලේඛනවලට අනුව පිරිමි ළමුන්ගෙන් 94% ද ගැහැණු ළමුන්ගෙන් 83% ද වශයෙන් ප්‍රාථමික අධ්‍යාපනය සම්පුර්ණ කර ඇත. 2002 වසරේ දී ප්‍රාථමික අධ්‍යාපනය සම්පුර්ණ කර ඇති ගැහැණු ළමුන්ගේ ප්‍රතිශතය 83% කි. කෙසේ නමුත් සමස්තයක් වශයෙන් ලොව කාන්තාවන් සාක්ෂරතාව අතින් පසුපසින් සිටිය ද ශ්‍රී ලංකාවේ පවතින්නේ ඊට ඉඳුරා වෙනස් තත්ත්වයකි. 2013 වසර දක්වා වන දත්ත අනුව සකස් කළ යුනිසෙෆ් ආයතනයේ වාර්තාවලට අනුව ශ්‍රී ලංකාවේ අවුරුදු 15 - 24 අතර වයස් ඛාණ්ඩයේ ගැහැණු ළමුන් සහ තරුණියන් සාක්ෂරතාව අතින් එම වයස් ඛාණ්ඩයේ පුරුෂයන්ට වඩා ඉදිරියෙන් සිටිති. නමුත් ප්‍රාථමික පාසල් සහභාගීත්වය අතින් ශ්‍රී ලංකාව තුළ ද ගැහැණු ළමුන් පසුවන්නේ පසුපසිනි. බාල සහ තරුණ වයස් ඛාණ්ඩවල කාන්තාවන්ගේ තත්ත්වය එසේ වුවද ලොව වැඩිහිටි කාන්තාවන්ගේ සාක්ෂරතාව පවතින්නේ ඉතාමත් පහළ මට්ටමකය. වයස 65 ඉක්මවූ ලොව සෑම කාන්තාවන් දස දෙනෙකුගෙන්ම කියවීමට හැකියාව ඇත්තේ හත් දෙනෙකුට පමණි. කාන්තාවන්ගේ සාක්ෂරතාව ඉහළ නැංවීම සඳහා තවත් දුරක් යා යුතුව ඇත.
There was blood, there was sweat and, if not tears, plenty of cheers. Ultimate Fighting Championship (UFC) has been one of sport's most high-profile successes of recent years - thrilling television audiences and drawing crowds to fight nights with its combination of wrestling, boxing, jiu-jitsu and kick boxing. The mixed martial arts (MMA) brand has made household names of Irish fighter Conor McGregor and female champions Ronda Rousey and Holly Holm. But when the UFC jamboree came to Singapore, it was just the latest effort by the brand to try and replicate the success it has in the US in Asia, after years of setbacks and struggles. The league wants to make this wealthy South-East Asian city state an annual stopover on its international tour - along with the likes of Macau, Manila, Tokyo and Seoul. With a 12-bout fight card, its event drew a crowd of more 8,000 spectators, doubling its debut showing in 2014. And for local fans of the controversial combat sport, it was a rare opportunity to experience fight night in the flesh. "Since most of the shows are in the US, it's great to be able to watch such a big event live here in Singapore with such big names coming here," one fan told me. Of course, growing popularity goes hand-in-hand with growing profits. UFC expects income of about $50m (£38.8m) from the region this year. That would be about 6% to 8% of its global revenues. "Soccer is always going to be on top, but UFC is the fastest-growing sports organisation in the world," says Joe Carr, UFC's senior vice president of international and content. "There's no reason why UFC can't be up there with other sporting heavyweights like the National Basketball Association or the National Football League in this market." For most other sports though, cracking Asia involves cracking China. Critics note UFC's big push to enter the Chinese market back in 2014. Within a year, it was forced to shut its Beijing operations without a fight being held, and relocate to Singapore. Not deterred, the league is trying again with its first bout in mainland China, scheduled for November in Shanghai. China does have a growing MMA market, one dominated by rival leagues, including the local Kulun Fight tournament. "It will be an absolute uphill battle because they don't bring their A-game to Asian cities. Their events in Asia are typically smaller shows," said Marc Raimondi, assistant editor at MMAFighting.com. "The UFC makes the bulk of its money in the US and Canada. So from a business perspective, it makes sense for them to put their biggest stars on those cards. "But they really need bigger stars and bigger shows in Asia. They just don't have the kind of Asian talent to compensate and draw a ton of interest in the local markets." Most in the sport agree that developing local heroes is a sure fire way of creating local fans. But will UFC be able to produce an Asian star to compare with the likes of McGregor, Rousey and Holm? "An Asian world champion, a man or woman who becomes a world UFC champion, will be the catalyst to Asia going mainstream, just like Europe did with Conor McGregor," says UFC's chief executive, Dana White. "Women all over the world got into this sport through Ronda Rousey. If we can find a talented man or woman from Asia, and they become a world champion, the market will explode." But the league currently only has 40 Asian fighters on its roster. The hopes of finding the next superstar rest on the likes of aspiring champion, Rolando Dy from the Philippines - the son of a former world champion boxer. He made his UFC debut in Singapore, and despite a defeat, cannot be accused of lacking confidence. "I am a Filipino fighter, and you don't underestimate fighters from the Philippines," he said, referring to the achievements of his father, Rolando Naverette, as well as boxing legend, Manny Pacquiao. "It's my time. I believe I am one of the best in the world, and just have to prove it so that people will also believe in me." Rolando Dy will get his next shot at proving himself when he fights in Japan in September. UFC estimates that a third of its fanbase is based in Asia. This is, after all, the region where most martial arts - on which this sport is based - began. But with its other regional rivals having already spent years nurturing home-grown talent, the battle for commercial success will have to be fiercely fought.
Five Australian politicians have been disqualified from parliament for having dual citizenship when they were elected in 2016. Among them is the deputy prime minister Barnaby Joyce, whose disqualification threatens the government's voting majority. The nation's highest court found five of seven MPs under scrutiny were in breach of Australia's constitution which requires candidates for federal office to not be a "subject or citizen of a foreign power". Most of the politicians said they had not known of their second citizenship when they were elected, and the government argued that only those who had "voluntarily obtained, or retained" their foreign citizenship should be disqualified. However the court decided against that argument, and only ruled in favour of two MPs who they said did not attain citizenship. So who are the affected politicians? Dual citizenship: New Zealand (renounced in August) How did he acquire it? Mr Joyce was born in Australia but his father is from New Zealand, which automatically awarded the politician citizenship. His team argued Mr Joyce was "not aware of the possibility he might be a New Zealand citizen under New Zealand law." What was his defence? Mr Joyce cannot be held to account for having only the "mere knowledge" of his father's birthplace, his legal team argued. Unlike the other six, who are senators, Mr Joyce sits in the lower House of Representatives - meaning his ineligibility leaves the government's one-seat majority up in the air. What did the court say? The court stuck to a literal reading of the constitution: if a politician had held actual dual citizenship at the time of their election, the election was invalid - regardless of whether they were aware of their dual citizenship or not. In the case of Mr Joyce, the court acknowledged that at the time of his election in 2016, he believed the clause in question did not apply to him because he thought he was an Australian citizen only. The court also said Mr Joyce "has never applied to become a New Zealand citizen" and has "not sought or accepted any privileges as a citizen of New Zealand". However, the court nonetheless ruled that because he was a citizen of New Zealand, he was "incapable of being chosen or sitting as a member of the House of Representatives". More: NZ confirms Joyce is citizen Dual citizenship: UK (renounced in August) How did she acquire it? Australian-born Ms Nash became a UK citizen by descent through her Scottish-born father, to whom she was estranged for much of her life. Her older sisters were born in England and have UK citizenship. What was her defence? That like Mr Joyce she had no previous knowledge of her citizenship. "Her parents had informed her that unlike in the case of her sisters, who were British citizens by birth, she could only become a British citizen upon making an application, which had not occurred," her submission said. Her lawyer said laws that provided citizenship by descent were "exorbitant", and would disqualify MPs who had only a "slender connection" to a foreign power. What did the court say? Fiona Nash's election was invalid because she held dual citizenship at the time of her election More: Nash caught up in citizen saga Dual citizenship: Italy (renounced in August) How did he acquire it? Mr Canavan has Italian grandparents. In July, he said his mother had organised his citizenship - without his knowledge - when he was 25. But he later said his mother had not done this. His lawyers said Mr Canavan gained his dual status through an Italian court decision on citizenship by descent in 1983. What was his defence? His lawyers argued this was a "quirk of history" and said it was questionable whether Mr Canavan had even received Italian citizenship in the first place. His lawyers also argued that if he did have citizenship, he should not be disqualified because he had no knowledge of his status. They said a strict interpretation of the rule would lead to political opponents conducting "genealogical witch hunts". What did the court say? Matt Canavan's election was valid. The court concluded that "given the potential for Italian citizenship by descent to extend indefinitely - generation after generation - into the public life of an adopted home", full Italian citizenship required the taking of "positive steps [...] as conditions precedent to citizenship". More: How Canavan learned of predicament Dual citizenship: UK (renounced in December) How did he acquire it?: Mr Roberts was born in India to a Welsh father in 1955, making him a UK citizen. He was naturalised as an Australian in 1974. UK authorities said he revoked his citizenship five months after he was elected in Australia's July 2016 election. What is his defence? Mr Roberts claimed he took "bona fide" steps to relinquish his citizenship, but it was not made official until 5 December. His lawyers argued he had the strongest case of all the MPs because he had made clear attempts to rid himself of his citizenship prior to his election. However a court in September found that Mr Robert's efforts to do this had failed, and included attempts such as sending renunciation queries to the wrong email address. What did the court say? Malcolm Robert's election was invalid because he held dual citizenship at the time of his election. Dual citizenship: UK (British Overseas Citizenship) How did he acquire it? Mr Xenophon's father was born in Cyprus when it was a UK colony, and the politician inherited British Overseas Citizenship. He has played down the "third-class citizenship" as not even allowing him to live in the UK, describing it as a "colonial peculiarity". What was his defence? In addition to lack of knowledge, his lawyers argued that the unusual form of British citizenship did not include the "core" elements of citizenship. A few days prior to the court hearings, Mr Xenophon flagged he would step down from office to re-enter state politics. What did the court say? Nick Xenophon's election was valid. While the court confirmed that Mr Xenophon did hold British Overseas Citizenship (BOC) at the time of his election, it ruled that it did not give him the full rights and privileges usually linked to full citizenship - most importantly the right to live and enter the UK without immigration control as a normal UK citizen would be able to. The court concluded he was "not a subject or a citizen of the United Kingdom at the date of his nomination and election as a senator. Nor was he entitled to the rights and privileges of a subject or citizen of the United Kingdom." Larissa Waters, former Greens senator Dual citizenship: Canada How did she acquire it? Ms Waters was born in Canada but left as a baby with her Australian parents. She said she was oblivious to her Canadian status until July. What was her defence? Unlike the previous five MPs, Ms Waters resigned over her dual citizenship. Her team did not try to defend her eligibility and instead said she had "properly complied" with the constitution. Her lawyers argued the other politicians should have taken the same actions and urged the court not to reward "negligence" for those who had not investigated their citizenship status diligently. The government included Ms Waters in its submission, a move she said was "pretty clear self-interest in trying to save their own, and a few extras". What did the court say? Larissa Waters' election was invalid because she held dual citizenship at the time of her election. More: History-making breastfeed senator quits Dual citizenship: New Zealand How did he acquire it? Mr Ludlam was born in New Zealand but his family left the country when he was three. He said he had always believed - wrongly - that his New Zealand citizenship had expired when he became an Australian citizen in his teens. What was his defence? Like Ms Waters, Mr Ludlam resigned and maintains he was right to do so. Ms Waters' legal team also acted for him. The government argues that Mr Ludlam voluntarily retained his citizenship, and, along with Mr Roberts, should be ruled ineligible. What did the court say? Scott Ludlam's election was invalid because he held dual citizenship at the time of his election. More: NZ citizenship costs senator his job
The death of the baby chimpanzee Nemley Jr, rescued from wildlife traffickers only to fade away in a zoo in Ivory Coast, has provoked outrage. And after a BBC investigation that lasted more than a year, those of us involved in the work are finding his loss upsetting and also incredibly frustrating. In the wild, infant chimps have a poor survival record. And youngsters rescued from traffickers have endured the trauma of losing their mothers and then being thrust into the unfamiliar world of humans, so many of them do not make it either. In his last few weeks, Nemley Jr was given intensive care and dedicated support, so who or what is to blame for his shocking demise, and how best to save endangered animals such as chimpanzees from extinction? This long and sad story involves the harsh economics of the black market, the corroding influence of corruption, and the impact on the natural world of the mass consumption of which we are all a part. Add to that an indifference to wildlife among some in West Africa that is bewildering to outsiders, and you have a context in which an infant chimp's chances are slim. The tale begins in the jungles where poachers know there is good money to be made out of chimpanzees. The adults are sold for bushmeat, and an infant - seized alive - is like gold in the illegal pet trade. So, poverty plays a part, along with the knowledge that wealthy buyers in the Gulf states and Asia pay handsomely for a baby chimp that is cute and amusing, before it becomes too strong and has to be put down or abandoned. Next, the criminal middlemen have the contacts to match that demand with supply. The men we dealt with bought Nemley Jr for 300 euro (£264) and were offering him to our undercover reporter for $12,500 (£9,630). They had been selling baby chimps and other endangered animals for years, operating out of several West African countries, boasting on social media, casually using the same bank account for years, lubricating their way through pliable bureaucracies, and untroubled by the law. It was our investigation that led to a jail sentence for Ibrahima Traore and his uncle Mohamed, and what is notable is that these were the first convictions for wildlife crime in the history of Ivory Coast. The Ivorian detectives are rightly proud of that, as are the courts. But the maximum penalty is only 12 months in prison, and the two traffickers are out already. Tougher penalties are being discussed but are not in force yet. You might think that there would be a more vigorous response in a country that has seen its chimpanzee population decline by 90% in the past 20 years. Only an estimated 2,000 still live in the wild, in a few supposedly protected areas. I say "supposedly" because Nemley Jr may have been captured in one of them. This is why an indifference to wildlife matters. After the traffickers were arrested last year, and taken to the Interpol office in Abidjan, an official photographer was summoned. Looking at Nemley Jr cowering on the floor, he asked me what the fuss was all about. "Animals," he told me, "that's something white people care about." I replied that wildlife was part of his country's heritage and it risked being lost. The photographer raised a cynical eyebrow and turned back to his camera. And that might explain the attitude of some government officials in Ivory Coast. Wildlife is not a high priority. While Ivorian detectives responded swiftly, messages to the Ministry of Water and Forests often went unanswered. Requests to film Nemley Jr took months to be approved. Our proposal for an internationally-recognised vet to be sent in to check him over and to recommend a plan for his care was delayed and eventually refused. One idea did receive a very swift reply. Several specialist sanctuaries caring for baby chimpanzees - in Liberia, Uganda and Kenya - had offered to take Nemley Jr. But when we wrote to the ministry, suggesting that he be allowed to leave - if only to lessen the burden on Abidjan zoo - a senior official refused to accept our letter. Nemley Jr was from Ivory Coast, he said, and he would stay in Ivory Coast, hinting that to move him would be neo-colonialist thinking. It is true that the government of Ivory Coast faces multiple challenges: the aftermath of a civil war, mutinous army units demanding their unpaid wages, an all-pervading poverty. But under the international CITES treaty, any country that promises to tackle wildlife trafficking must also set up a facility to care for confiscated animals. Some neighbouring countries have done this. Ivory Coast instead relies on Abidjan zoo. It is easy to be critical of a zoo in a developing country: too few staff, extremely poor pay, no money for repairs, not enough food for the animals, animals in often distressing condition. And being critical raises the awkward question of whether the animals should be fed if the keepers can't afford food for their own families. But Abidjan zoo is a disturbing place, underfunded and overcrowded and unable to cope with each new influx of animals. An enclosure for adult chimpanzees is damaged, which means they have to remain in cages. A cheetah is kept in a hut the size of a kennel. Lions go hungry. And caring for an animal as delicate as an infant chimpanzee requires 24-hour attention. Several have died in the years before Nemley Jr was brought there. Sarah Crawford, the volunteer who cared for Nemley Jr to the very end, says she was struck by the difficulty of caring for an orphaned chimp when "they need TLC 24/7, which is almost impossible in a zoo setting". She and others are pushing to create a new sanctuary, in Nemley's name, to be dedicated to caring for chimpanzees. Some wildlife experts wonder whether the zoo could be transformed into a refuge for rescued animals with conservation at its heart. From our experience, any response from Ivory Coast will be slow and possibly unwilling. Pride is a factor if outsiders are seen to be issuing commands. And any centre for rescued chimps needs to be managed not for years but for decades so funding has to keep flowing, and not go astray. But it is not impossible: there are successful examples in other countries. So do we blame Ivory Coast for what went wrong? Maybe, but then consider this: nearly half of the world's cocoa comes from Ivory Coast. Cocoa and palm oil and timber have all encroached on the country's jungles, shrinking the habitats of the chimpanzees and limiting their chances of survival. We can condemn the rich buyer who pays for a baby chimp whose family has been slaughtered. We can criticise indolent officials. But we might also ask whether the products we're buying and eating and using might contain ingredients grown on land where dense forest was once home to chimpanzees. Follow David on Twitter.
Ünlü fizikçi Albert Einstein'ın "mutluluk formülleri" içeren iki notu Kudüs'teki açık artırmada 1 milyon 560 bin dolara satıldı. Nobel ödüllü fizikçi, mutluluk tavsiyelerini içeren notları, Japonya ziyareti sırasında, bir kuryeye bahşiş karşılığında vermişti. Notları satan kişinin de kuryenin yeğeni olduğu duyuruldu. 1922 yılında Tokyo'daki Imperial Oteli'nde yaşanan olayda, Einstein'in kuryeye, "notların ileride çok değerlenebileceğini" söylediği de belirtiliyor. Hayatını bilime adayan fizikçinin kuryeye verdiği Almanca notlardan biri şu şekilde: "Başarı peşinde koşmak ve bununla beraber gelen sürekli huzursuzluğa karşın, sakin ve alçak gönüllü bir yaşantı daha fazla mutluluk getirecektir." 240 bin dolara satılan ikinci notta ise şu kısa ifade yer alıyor: "Eğer istek varsa, bir yolu vardır" Ünlü fizikçinin bu olayın gerçekleştiği sırada Japonya'da akademik bir gezide olduğu ve Nobel ödülü aldığını henüz öğrendiği belirtiliyor. Kudüs'te satışa çıkarılan el yazısı notların, ulaştığı değerin açık artırma öncesi tahmin edilenin üzerinde olduğu da ifade edildi. Alıcılardan birinin Avrupalı olduğu ancak isminin gizli kalmasını istediği belirtildi. "Problemlerimizi, o problemleri ortaya çıkardığımız düşünce şekliyle çözemeyiz. "Zekanın asıl göstergesi bilgi değil hayal gücüdür. "Henüz doğanın bize sunduğunun 1000'de 1'ini bile bilmiyoruz. "Tatlı bir kızla iseniz bir saat bir saniye gibi gelir. Ancak eğer kızgın bir cismin üzerine oturursanız bir saniye bir saat gibi gelecektir. İşte bu göreceliktir."
بي بي سي العربية هي شبكة لنقل الاخبار والمعلومات الى العالم العربي عبر عدة وسائط، تشمل الانترنت والراديو والتلفزيون والهواتف المحمولة. وتعد بي بي سي العربية أكبر وأقدم خدمة اعلامية تطلقها بي بي سي بلغة غير الإنجليزية ، وقد واصلت تطورها منذ انطلاقها في 3 يناير/ كانون الثاني عام 1938 حتى صارت في مقدمة المحطات الإعلامية في العالم. تبث بي بي سي العربية أخبارا غير متحيزة ودقيقة، ومعلومات مبنية على الخبرة و التحليل المعمق. وتضع بي بي سي العربية اهتمامات وحاجات المستمعين في بؤرة اهتماماتها. ولقد أثبتت استطلاعات الرأي المستقلة أن مستمعي بي بي سي يعتبرونها الأكثر مصداقية والأكثر نزاهة وموضوعية في العالم العربي إلى جانب سمعتها الراسخة في جودة الخدمة المقدمة، كما اكتسب موقع بي بي سي العربية على الأنترنت، والذي حصل على العديد من الجوائز، مستويات عالية من الثقة. تعمل بي بي سي العربية على إشراك مستمعيها ومشاهديها في برامجها التفاعلية، الامر الذي شجع على نقاش وحوار معمقين حول كثير من القضايا. وتهدف إلى توسيع أجندتها الأخبارية للمستمعين في المنطقة، وتشرك مشاهدين ومستمعين في برامجها بالسماح لهم بالنقاش والتعليق ومحاورة بعضهم البعض. فهي خدمة إخبارية يمكن للمستمعين والمشاهدين المشاركة الفعلية فيها مما يثري محتوى برامجها. تبث احدث أخبار بي بي سي الآن على الهواتف الجوالة وأجهزة الكمبيوتر المحمولة وغيرها من الأجهزة اللاسلكية. ويمكن الإشتراك في خدمة أخبار بي بي سي العربية العاجلة أيضا على الهاتف المحمول في البحرين ومصر والأردن والكويت وعمان وقطر والمملكة العربية السعودية والسودان ودولة الإمارات المتحدة. كما أن شركات الهاتف المحمول في العراق ومصر يعرضون نشرات إخبارية على الهاتف تدوم دقيقتين ويتم تحديثها كل نصف ساعة. يكمن السر في تغطية البي بي سي لشؤون الشرق الأوسط في توفر شبكة واسعة من المراسلين المتميزين في العالم العربي. وبالرغم من أن إنتاج البرامج يتم في استوديوهات لندن والقاهرة، فإن بي بي سي العربية لها مراسلوها في أهم المواقع المحورية في المنطقة، وفي أهم العواصم العالمية. ورغم أن التغطية الإخبارية لقضايا العالم العربي تظل أمرا أساسيا، فإن بي بي سي تحرص على نقل وجهة النظر العالمية الأرحب لمستمعيها ومشاهديها في كل مكان. وتعتمد بي بي سي العربية على مصادر بي بي سي الواسعة في جمع الأخبار في سائر أنحاء العالم. ويمكن للمهتمين بتغطية البي بي سي الاخبارية الاعتماد على النقل الحي من عين المكان، والخبرة في التحليل المقدمة من 250 مراسلا على الأقل منتشرين في 72 مكتبا لبي بي سي في مختلف أنحاء العالم. كما يوجد مراسلون لبي بي سي العربية في الكثير من الدول خارج العالم العربي، منها فرنسا وألمانيا وإيطاليا وكندا والولايات المتحدة. يزور موقع bbcarabic.com أكثر من 21 مليون شخص شهريا، إلى جانب نحو مليون ونصف المليون مستخدم منفرد للموقع. واوضحت التجارب ان الاقبال على زيارة موقع بي بي سي العربية يرتفع في اوقات الازمات والحروب، وغيرها من الاحداث الكبرى التي تؤثر على المنطقة، مثل الحرب في العراق في مارس/آذار 2003، والحرب بين حزب الله واسرائيل في 2006، والحرب في غزة في نهاية 2008 ومطلع 2009، والازمة التي اعقبت الانتخابات الايرانية في منتصف 2009. ويرجع هذا الى الثقة التي حاز عليها موقع بي بي سي العربية بين زواره، اذ انهم يبحثون في اوقات الازمات عن مصدر يثقون به للحصول على الاخبار والمعلومات، ويطمئنون الى حياديته في تغطية التطورات الهامة، فيتوجهون الى موقع بي بي سي العربية. كما تعكس أعداد المستمعين المرتفعة لراديو بي بي سي العربية التقدير العالمي الذي تتمتع به، إذ يزيد عدد المستمعين إليه عن 13 مليون شخص اسبوعيا حسب استطلاعات الرأي المستقلة. ويشكل هؤلاء جزءا من 233 مليون شخص يستعملون واحدة أو أكثر من خدمات الأخبار العالمية للبي بي سي عبر التلفزيون أو الإذاعة أو الانترنت. وبين هؤلاء يستمع 183 مليون اسبوعيا الى الإذاعة العالمية باللغة الانجليزية "وورلد سيرفيس" (BBC World Service) ويشاهد 76 مليون قناة بي بي سي التلفزيونية باللغة الانجليزية "بي بي سي وورلد" ويطلع حوالي 12 مليون اسبوعيا على موقعها على الانترنت. ويذكر أن أعدادا كبيرة تستخدم أكثر من واسطة واحدة.
A university's decision to expel a student for posting a comment online saying homosexuality was a sin was lawful, a court has ruled. Devout Christian Felix Ngole, 39, from Barnsley, was removed from a post-graduate social work course at the University of Sheffield. He argued that throwing him out breached his human rights. But Deputy High Court judge Rowena Collins Rice ruled that university bosses acted within the law. More stories from across South Yorkshire After the hearing Mr Ngole said he intended to appeal against the judge's decision. "To me it sends a chilling message that if you are a Christian and you hold traditional Christian views you should be careful not to express them because you might end up losing your job," he said. Mr Ngole was thrown off the two-year MA social work degree course in 2015 after he expressed the view that "the Bible and God identify homosexuality as a sin". He made the comments in an online discussion about Kim Davis, a state official in the US state of Kentucky, who refused to issue licences for same sex marriages. The University of Sheffield said he was taking a "professionally qualifying degree" with the aim of becoming a social worker and argued what he had said would affect gay people he might work with. Dismissing Mr Ngole's claim for judicial review, Judge Collins Rice said: "Social workers have considerable power over the lives of vulnerable service users and trust is a precious professional commodity." Andrea Williams, chief executive of the Christian Legal Centre, which is supporting Mr Ngole, said: "The court has ruled that though Mr Ngole is entitled to hold his Biblical views on sexual ethics, he is not entitled to express them. "But freedom to believe without freedom of expression is no freedom at all. "This ruling will have a chilling effect on Christian students up and down the country who will now understand that their personal social media posts may be investigated for political correctness."
Looking from Yangon, you would never know that a major humanitarian crisis has been unfolding for more than a month in Myanmar's western region of Rakhine. More than half a million Rohingya Muslims have fled across the border to Bangladesh since militants attacked police posts on 25 August, unleashing a massive military crackdown. The Burmese authorities have been under mounting pressure to end the violence, address instability in Rakhine, and grant humanitarian access. But the country's biggest city is a picture of calm on the surface, with clean roads, plenty of greenery and orderly - if congested - traffic. Well-dressed men and women get on with their daily lives. People here don't use the term Rohingya. They are portrayed in the media as "Bengali Muslims" and some even describe them as illegal Bengali immigrants from Bangladesh. When I have raised the Rohingya issue, people were either forthright in their opinion or tried to gloss over the topic, saying "there are many other issues in this country". This includes senior journalists, like U Aung Hla Tun, vice-chairman of the Myanmar Press Council. "The problem is the political motive behind the term [Rohingya]. I used to have a number of Bengali friends when I was young. They never claimed they were Rohingya… They first coined the term a few decades ago," he said. "They [Rohingya] do not belong to the ethnic minorities [of this country]. This is a fact." Rohingya and others dispute that. While the crisis has dominated headlines around the world for weeks, newspapers here have hardly any mention of the plight of Rohingya now living in squalid conditions in camps in Bangladesh. Instead, articles have given prominence to reports of the army finding mass graves of Hindus allegedly killed by Arakan Rohingya Salvation Army (Arsa) militants. At the University of Yangon I wondered if I would find a different mood among students. Their links with the outside world through social media are much better than those from earlier generations. In the university café some students were reluctant to talk. Some did not want to give their names. But when I broached the Rakhine issue, the response was instant. "This issue is seen from outside as a religious problem. But it is not. The violence is an act of terrorism. The international community is getting wrong information about the situation in the Rakhine state," a female student said. "From abroad, you think you are right, but from our side we are right." Similar views were expressed by two of her friends. A few days later I went to a commemorative event marking the 10th anniversary of the 2007 pro-democracy protests. Thousands of Buddhist monks joined the demonstrations, which became widely known as "the Saffron Revolution". The pictures of saffron-clad monks revolting against the military junta caught the world's imagination. The anniversary event was held inside a monastery in southern Yangon, decorated with banners recalling the momentous protests. Buddhist monks, pro-democracy activists and union members who took part in the 2007 protests turned out in large numbers. I was expecting that as many of them were former political prisoners, who had been jailed for supporting human rights and democracy, there would have been a divergent view on the Rohingya issue. Shwe Toontay Sayar Taw was one of the leading monks in the Saffron Revolution. I asked him as a young democracy, isn't it Myanmar's responsibility to treat all communities, including the Rohingya, equally? "In democracy all are equal," he said, adding "but not terrorists". "If they take up terrorism [then] all the people of the world should unite to destroy terrorism. Otherwise they will destroy our generation." No doubt the Rohingya Muslim issue has boosted support among the majority Burmese for Aung San Suu Kyi, whose protracted silence over the issue has drawn condemnation from around the world. Rallies are held in front of the city hall in Yangon supporting the country's de-facto leader. Senior UN officials have described the violence against Rohingya Muslims as "ethnic cleansing" - a charge denied by the Myanmar government. Myanmar has witnessed the mass exodus of people before. In the 1960s, soon after the military seized power, it ordered tens of thousands of people of Indian origin to leave the country. The Indians had lived in Burma for centuries, and many had been brought to the country by colonial rulers when the country was part of British India, during the 19th and early 20th Centuries. It is estimated that more than 300,000 people were forced to leave and their properties and lands were nationalised. The Burmese Indian refugees went back to India. I wondered whether Yangon and the mainstream Burmese media is in a state of denial about the violence against Rohingya Muslims. A senior editor and a former political prisoner who did not want to be named gave me the answer. "Everyone is scared and everyone is reluctant to touch on this issue. First, there is security problem in going there [Rakhine state]. So, much of the reporting is based only on official press releases," he said. He pointed out that there is also public pressure. If you go against the mainstream views, he said, "even your relatives and friends will dislike you".
Abu Anis only realised something unusual was happening when he heard the sound of explosions coming from the old city on the western bank of the Tigris as it runs through Mosul. "I phoned some friends over there, and they said armed groups had taken over, some of them foreign, some Iraqis," the computer technician said. "The gunmen told them, 'We've come to get rid of the Iraqi army, and to help you.'" The following day, the attackers crossed the river and took the other half of the city. The Iraqi army and police, who vastly outnumbered their assailants, broke and fled, officers first, many of the soldiers stripping off their uniforms as they joined a flood of panicked civilians. It was 10 June 2014, and Iraq's second biggest city, with a population of around two million, had just fallen to the militants of the group then calling itself Islamic State in Iraq and al-Sham/the Levant (Isis or Isil). Four days earlier, black banners streaming, a few hundred of the Sunni militants had crossed the desert border in a cavalcade from their bases in eastern Syria and met little resistance as they moved towards their biggest prize. Rich dividends were immediate. The Iraqi army, rebuilt, trained and equipped by the Americans since the US-led invasion of 2003, abandoned large quantities of armoured vehicles and advanced weaponry, eagerly seized by the militants. They also reportedly grabbed something like $500m from the Central Bank's Mosul branch. "At the beginning, they behaved well," said Abu Anis. "They took down all the barricades the army had put up between quarters. People liked that. On their checkpoints they were friendly and helpful - 'Anything you need, we're here for you.'" The Mosul honeymoon was to last a few weeks. But just down the road, terrible things were already happening. As the Iraqi army collapsed throughout the north, the militants moved swiftly down the Tigris river valley. Towns and villages fell like skittles. Within a day they had captured the town of Baiji and its huge oil refinery, and moved on swiftly to seize Saddam Hussein's old hometown, Tikrit, a Sunni hotbed. Just outside Tikrit is a big military base, taken over by the Americans in 2003 and renamed Camp Speicher after the first US casualty in the 1991 "Desert Storm" Gulf war against Iraq, a pilot called Scott Speicher, shot down over al-Anbar province in the west. Camp Speicher, by now full of Iraqi military recruits, was surrounded by the Isis militants and surrendered. The thousands of captives were sorted, the Shia were weeded out, bound, and trucked away to be systematically shot dead in prepared trenches. Around 1,700 are believed to have been massacred in cold blood. The mass graves are still being exhumed. Far from trying to cover up the atrocity, Isis revelled in it, posting on the internet videos and pictures showing the Shia prisoners being taken away and shot by the black-clad militants. In terms of exultant cruelty and brutality, worse was not long in coming. After a pause of just two months, Isis - now rebranded as "Islamic State" (IS) - erupted again, taking over large areas of northern Iraq controlled by the Kurds. That included the town of Sinjar, mainly populated by the Yazidis, an ancient religious minority regarded by IS as heretics. Hundreds of Yazidi men who failed to escape were simply killed. Women and children were separated and taken away as war booty, to be sold and bartered as chattels, and used as sex slaves. Thousands are still missing, enduring that fate. Deliberately shocking, bloodthirsty exhibitionism reached a climax towards the end of the same month, August 2014. IS issued a video showing its notorious, London-accented and now late executioner Mohammed Emwazi (sardonically nicknamed "Jihadi John" by former captives) gruesomely beheading American journalist James Foley. In the following weeks, more American and British journalists and aid workers - Steven Sotloff, David Haines, Alan Henning, and Peter Kassig (who had converted to Islam and changed his name to Abdul Rahman) - appeared being slaughtered in similar, slickly produced videos, replete with propaganda statements and dire warnings. In the space of a few months, IS had blasted its way from obscurity on to the centre of the world stage. Almost overnight, it became a household word. Seven-and-a-half thousand miles (12,000km) away, then Australian Prime Minister Tony Abbott summed up the breathtaking novelty of the horror. It was, he said "medieval barbarism, perpetrated and spread with the most modern of technology". IS had arrived, and the world was taking notice. But the men in black did not appear out of the blue. They had been a long time coming. The theology of murder The ideological or religious roots of IS and like-minded groups go deep into history, almost to the beginning of Islam itself in the 7th Century AD. Like Christianity six centuries before it, and Judaism some eight centuries before that, Islam was born into the harsh, tribal world of the Middle East. "The original texts, the Old Testament and the Koran, reflected primitive tribal Jewish and Arab societies, and the codes they set forth were severe," writes the historian and author William Polk. "They aimed, in the Old Testament, at preserving and enhancing tribal cohesion and power and, in the Koran, at destroying the vestiges of pagan belief and practice. Neither early Judaism nor Islam allowed deviation. Both were authoritarian theocracies." As history moved on, Islam spread over a vast region, encountering and adjusting to numerous other societies, faiths and cultures. Inevitably in practice it mutated in different ways, often becoming more pragmatic and indulgent, often given second place to the demands of power and politics and temporal rulers. For hardline Muslim traditionalists this amounted to deviationism, and from early on, there was a clash of ideas in which those arguing for a strict return to the "purity" of the early days of Islam often paid a price. The eminent scholar Ahmad ibn Hanbal (780-855), who founded one of the main schools of Sunni Islamic jurisprudence, was jailed and once flogged unconscious in a dispute with the Abbasid caliph in Baghdad. Nearly five centuries later, another supreme theologian of the same strict orthodox school, Ibn Taymiyya, died in prison in Damascus. These two men are seen as the spiritual forefathers of later thinkers and movements which became known as "salafist", advocating a return to the ways of the first Muslim ancestors, the salaf al-salih (righteous ancestors). They inspired a later figure whose thinking and writings were to have a huge and continuing impact on the region and on the salafist movement, one form of which, Wahhabism, took his name. Muhammad ibn Abd al-Wahhab was born in 1703 in a small village in the Nejd region in the middle of the Arabian peninsula. A devout Islamic scholar, he espoused and developed the most puritanical and strict version of what he saw as the original faith, and sought to spread it by entering pacts with the holders of political and military power. In an early foray in that direction, his first action was to destroy the tomb of Zayd ibn al-Khattab, one of the Companions of the Prophet Muhammad, on the grounds that by the austere doctrine of salafist theology, the veneration of tombs constitutes shirk, the revering of something or someone other than Allah. But it was in 1744 that Abd al-Wahhab made his crucial alliance with the local ruler, Muhammad ibn Saud. It was a pact whereby Wahhabism provided the spiritual or ideological dimension for Saudi political and military expansion, to the benefit of both. Passing through several mutations, that dual alliance took over most of the peninsula and has endured to this day, with the House of Saud ruling in sometimes uneasy concert with an ultra-conservative Wahhabi religious establishment. The entrenchment of Wahhabi salafism in Saudi Arabia - and the billions of petrodollars to which it gained access - provided one of the wellsprings for jihadist militancy in the region in modern times. Jihad means struggle on the path of Allah, which can mean many kinds of personal struggle, but more often is taken to mean waging holy war. But the man most widely credited, or blamed, for bringing salafism into the 20th Century was the Egyptian thinker Sayyid Qutb. He provided a direct bridge from the thought and heritage of Abd al-Wahhab and his predecessors to a new generation of jihadist militants, leading up to al-Qaeda and all that was to follow. Born in a small village in Upper Egypt in 1906, Sayyid Qutb found himself at odds with the way Islam was being taught and managed around him. Far from converting him to the ways of the West, a two-year study period in the US in the late 1940s left him disgusted at what he judged unbridled godless materialism and debauchery, and his fundamentalist Islamic outlook was honed harder. Back in Egypt, he developed the view that the West was imposing its control directly or indirectly over the region in the wake of the Ottoman Empire's collapse after World War One, with the collaboration of local rulers who might claim to be Muslims, but who had in fact deviated so far from the right path that they should no longer be considered such. For Qutb, offensive jihad against both the West and its local agents was the only way for the Muslim world to redeem itself. In essence, this was a kind of takfir - branding another Muslim an apostate or kafir (infidel), making it justified and even obligatory and meritorious to kill him. Although he was a theorist and intellectual rather than an active jihadist, Qutb was judged dangerously subversive by the Egyptian authorities. He was hanged in 1966 on charges of involvement in a Muslim Brotherhood plot to assassinate the nationalist President, Gamal Abdel Nasser. Qutb was before his time, but his ideas lived on in the 24 books he wrote, which have been read by tens of millions, and in the personal contact he had with the circles of people like Ayman al-Zawahiri, another Egyptian who is the current al-Qaeda leader. Another intimate of the al-Qaeda founder Osama Bin Laden said: "Qutb was the one who most affected our generation." He has also been described as "the source of all jihadist thought", and "the philosopher of the Islamic revolution". More than 35 years after he was hanged, the official commission of inquiry into al-Qaeda's 9/11 attack on the Twin Towers in 2001 concluded: "Bin Laden shares Qutb's stark view, permitting him and his followers to rationalise even unprovoked mass murder as righteous defence of an embattled faith." And his influence lingers on today. Summing up the roots of IS and its predecessors, the Iraqi expert on Islamist movements Hisham al-Hashemi said: "They are founded on two things: a takfiri faith based on the writings of Muhammad ibn Abd al-Wahhab, and as methodology, the way of Sayyid Qutb." The theology of militant jihadism was in place. But to flourish, it needed two things - a battlefield, and strategists to shape the battle. Afghanistan was to provide the opportunity for both. Rise of al-Qaeda The Soviet invasion in 1979, and the 10 years of occupation that followed, provided a magnet for would-be jihadists from around the Arab world. Some 35,000 of them flocked to Afghanistan during that period, to join the jihad and help the mainly Islamist Afghan mujahideen guerrillas turn the country into Russia's Vietnam. There is little evidence that the "Afghan Arabs", as they became known, played a pivotal combat role in driving the Soviets out. But they made a major contribution in setting up support networks in Pakistan, channelling funds from Saudi Arabia and other donors, and funding schools and militant training camps. It was a fantastic opportunity for networking and forging enduring relationships as well as tasting jihad first hand. Ironically, they found themselves on the same team as the Americans. The CIA's Operation Cyclone channelled hundreds of millions of dollars through Pakistan to militant Afghan mujahedeen leaders such as Golbuddin Hekmatyar, who associated closely with the Arab jihadists. It was in Afghanistan that virtually all the major figures in the new jihadist world cut their teeth. They helped shape events there in the aftermath of the Soviet withdrawal in 1989, a period that saw the emergence of al-Qaeda as a vehicle for a wider global jihad, and Afghanistan provided a base for it. By the time the Taliban took over in 1996, they were virtually in partnership with Osama Bin Laden and his men, and it was from there that al-Qaeda launched its fateful 9/11 attack in 2001. The formative Afghan experience provided both the combat-hardened salafist jihadist leaders and the strategists who were to play an instrumental role in the emergence of the IS of today. Most significant was the Jordanian jihadist Abu Musab al-Zarqawi, who more than anybody else ended up being the direct parent of IS in almost every way. A high-school dropout whose prison career began with a sentence for drug and sexual offences, Zarqawi found religion after being sent to classes at a mosque in the Jordanian capital, Amman. He arrived in Pakistan to join jihad in Afghanistan just in time to see the Soviets withdraw in 1989, but stayed on to work with jihadists. After a stint back in Jordan where he received a 15-year jail sentence on terrorist charges but was later released in a general amnesty, Zarqawi finally met Bin Laden and Ayman al-Zawahiri in 1999. By all accounts the two al-Qaeda leaders did not take to him. They found him brash and headstrong, and they did not like the many tattoos from his previous life that he had not been able to erase. But he was charismatic and dynamic, and although he did not join al-Qaeda, they eventually put him in charge of a training camp in Herat, western Afghanistan. It was here that he worked with an ideologue whose radical writings became the scriptures governing subsequent salafist blood-letting: Abu Abdullah al-Muhajir. "The brutality of beheading is intended, even delightful to God and His Prophet," wrote Muhajir in his book The Theology of Jihad, more generally referred to as the Theology of Bloodshed. His writings provided religious cover for the most brutal excesses, and also for the killing of Shia as infidels, and their Sunni collaborators as apostates. The other book that has been seen as the virtual manual - even the Mein Kampf - for IS and its forebears is The Management of Savagery, by Abu Bakr Naji, which appeared on the internet in 2004. "We need to massacre and to do just as has been done to Banu Qurayza, so we must adopt a ruthless policy in which hostages are brutally and graphically murdered unless our demands are met," Naji wrote. He was referring to a Jewish tribe in seventh-century Arabia which reportedly met the same fate at the hands of early Muslims as the Yazidis of Sinjar did nearly 14 centuries later: the men were slaughtered, the women and children enslaved. Naji's sanctioning of exemplary brutality was part of a much wider strategy to prepare the way for an Islamic caliphate. Based partly on the lessons of Afghanistan, his book is a detailed blueprint for provoking the West into interventions which would further rally the Muslims to jihad, leading to the ultimate collapse of the enemy. The scenario is not so fanciful if you consider that the Soviet Union went to pieces barely two years after its withdrawal from Afghanistan. Naji is reported to have been killed in a US drone strike in Pakistan's Waziristan province in 2008. Iraq fiasco The fallout from the 9/11 attacks changed things radically for the jihadists in late 2001. The US and allies bombed and invaded Afghanistan, ousting the Taliban, and launching a wider "War on Terror" against al-Qaeda. Bin Laden went underground, and Zarqawi and others fled. The dispersing militants, fired up, badly needed another battlefield on which to provoke and confront their Western enemies. Luck was on their side. The Americans and their allies were not long in providing it. Their invasion of Iraq in the spring of 2003 was, it turned out, entirely unjustified on its own chosen grounds - Saddam Hussein's alleged production of weapons of mass destruction, and his supposed support for international terrorists, neither of which was true. By breaking up every state and security structure and sending thousands of disgruntled Sunni soldiers and officials home, they created precisely the state of "savagery", or violent chaos, that Abu Bakr Naji envisaged for the jihadists to thrive in. Iraq was on the way to becoming what US officials came to call the "parent tumour" of the IS presence in the region. Under Saddam's tightly-controlled Baath Party regime, the Sunnis enjoyed pride of place over the majority Shia, who have strong ties with their co-religionists across the border in Iran. The US-led intervention disempowered the Sunnis, creating massive resentment and providing fertile ground for the outside salafist jihadists to take root in. They were not long in spotting their constituency. Abu Musab Zarqawi moved in, and within a matter of months was organising deadly, brutal and provocative attacks aimed both at Western targets and at the majority Shia community. Doctrinal differences between the two sects go back to disputes over the succession to the Prophet Muhammad in the early decades of Islam, but conflict between them is generally based on community, history and sectarian politics rather than religion as such. Setting himself up with a new group called Tawhid wa al-Jihad (Tawhid means declaring the uniqueness of Allah), Zarqawi immediately forged a pragmatic operational alliance with underground cells of the remnants of Saddam's regime, providing the two main intertwined strands of the Sunni-based insurgency: militant Jihadism, and Iraqi Sunni nationalism with Baathist organisation at its core. His group claimed responsibility for several deadly attacks in August 2003 that set the pattern for much of what was to come: a suicide truck bomb explosion at the UN headquarters in Baghdad that killed the envoy Sergio Vieira de Mello and 20 of his staff, and a suicide car bomb blast in Najaf which killed the influential Shia ayatollah Muhammad Baqir al-Hakim and 80 of his followers. The bombers were salafist jihadists, but logistics were reportedly provided by underground Baathists. The following year, Zarqawi himself was believed by the CIA to be the masked killer shown in a video beheading an American hostage, Nicholas Berg, in revenge for the Abu Ghraib prison abuses of Iraqi detainees by members of the US military. As the battle with the Americans and the new Shia-dominated Iraqi government intensified, Zarqawi finally took the oath of loyalty to Bin Laden, and his group became the official al-Qaeda branch in Iraq. But they were never really on the same page. Zarqawi's provocative attacks on Shia mosques and markets, triggering sectarian carnage, and his penchant for publicising graphic brutality, were all in line with the radical teachings he had imbibed. But they drew rebukes from the al-Qaeda leadership, concerned at the impact on Muslim opinion. Zarqawi paid little heed. His strain of harsh radicalism passed to his successors after he was killed by a US air strike in June 2006 on his hideout north of Baghdad. He was easily identified by the tattoos he had never managed to get rid of. The direct predecessor of IS emerged just a few months later, with the announcement of the Islamic State in Iraq (ISI) as an umbrella bringing the al-Qaeda branch together with other insurgent factions. But tough times lay ahead. In January 2007, the Americans began "surging" their own troops in Iraq from 132,000 to a peak of 168,000, adopting a much more hands-on approach in mentoring the rebuilt Iraqi army. At the same time, they enticed Sunni tribes in western al-Anbar province to stop supporting the jihadists and join the US-led Coalition-Iraqi government drive to quell the insurgency, which many did, on promises that they would be given jobs and control over their own security. By the time both the new ISI and al-Qaeda leaders were killed in a US-Iraqi army raid on their hideout in April 2010, the insurgency was at its lowest ebb, pushed back into remote corners of Sunni Iraq. They were both replaced by one man, about whom very little was publicly known at the time, and not much more since: Ibrahim Awad al-Badri, better known by his nom de guerre, Abu Bakr al-Baghdadi. Six eventful years later, he would be proclaimed Caliph Ibrahim, Commander of the Faithful and leader of the newly declared "Islamic State". Territorial takeover Baghdadi's career is so shrouded in mist that there are very few elements of it that can be regarded as fact. By all accounts he was born near Samarra, north of Baghdad, so the epithet "Baghdadi" seems to have been adopted to give him a more national image, while "Abu Bakr" evokes the first successor to (and father-in-law of) Prophet Muhammad. Like the original Abu Bakr, Baghdadi is also reputed to come from the Prophet's Quraysh clan. That, and his youth - born in 1971 - may have been factors in his selection as leader. All accounts of his early life agree that he was a quiet, scholarly and devout student of Islam, taking a doctorate at the Islamic University of Baghdad. Some even say he was shy, and a bit of a loner, living for 10 years in a room beside a small Sunni mosque in western Baghdad. The word "charismatic" has never been attached to him. As a youth, Baghdadi had a passion for Koranic recitation and was meticulous in his observance of religious law. His family nicknamed him The Believer because he would chastise his relatives for failing to live up to his stringent standards. Who is Islamic State leader Abu Bakr al-Baghdadi? What has happened to Baghdadi? But by the time of the US-led invasion in 2003, he appears to have become involved with a militant Sunni group, heading its Sharia (Islamic law) committee. American troops detained him, and he was reportedly held in the detention centre at Camp Bucca in the south for most of 2004. Camp Bucca (named after a fireman who died in the 9/11 attacks) housed up to 20,000 inmates and became a university from which many IS and other militant leaders graduated. It gave them an unrivalled opportunity to imbibe and spread radical ideologies and sabotage skills and develop important contacts and networks, all in complete safety, under the noses and protection of their enemies. Baghdadi would also certainly have met in Camp Bucca many of the ex-Baathist military commanders with whom he was to form such a deadly partnership. The low-profile, self-effacing Baghdadi rang no alarm bells with the Americans. They released him, having decided he was low-risk. But he went on to work his way steadily up through the insurgent hierarchy, virtually unknown to the Iraqi public. By the time Baghdadi took over in 2010, the curtains seemed to be coming down for the jihadists in the Iraqi field of "savagery". But another one miraculously opened up for them across the border in neighbouring Syria at just the right moment. In the spring of 2011, the outbreak of civil war there offered a promising new arena of struggle and expansion. The majority Sunnis were in revolt against the oppressive regime of Bashar al-Assad, dominated by his Alawite minority, an offshoot of Shia Islam. Baghdadi sent his men in. By December 2011, deadly car bombs were exploding in Damascus which turned out to be the work of the then shadowy al-Nusra Front. It announced itself as an al-Qaeda affiliate the following month. It was headed by a Syrian jihadist, Abu Mohammed al-Jawlani. He had been sent by Baghdadi, but had his own ideas. Jostling with a huge array of competing rebel groups in Syria, al-Nusra won considerable support on the ground because of its fearless and effective fighting skills, and the flow of funds and foreign fighters that support from al-Qaeda stimulated. It was relatively moderate in its salafist approach, and cultivated local relationships. Al-Nusra was slipping out of Baghdadi's control, and he didn't like it. In April 2013, he tried to rein it back, announcing that al-Nusra was under his command in a new Islamic State in Iraq and al-Sham (Syria or the Levant). Isis, or Isil, was born. During the short and turbulent period over which it has imposed itself as a major news brand, so-called Islamic State has confused the world with a series of name changes reflecting its mutations and changing aspirations, leaving a situation where there is no universal agreement on how to refer to it. But Jawlani rebelled, and renewed his oath of loyalty to al-Qaeda's global leadership, now under Ayman al-Zawahiri following Bin Laden's death in 2011. Zawahiri ordered Baghdadi to go back to being just the Islamic State in Iraq (ISI) and leave al-Nusra as the al-Qaeda Syria franchise. It was Baghdadi's turn to ignore orders from head office. Before 2013 was out, Isis and al-Nusra were at each other's throats. Hundreds were killed in vicious internecine clashes which ended with Isis being driven out of most of north-west Syria by al-Nusra and allied Syrian rebel factions. But Isis took over Raqqa, a provincial capital in the north-east, and made it its capital. Many of the foreign jihadists who had joined al-Nusra also went over to Isis, seeing it as tougher and more radical. In early 2014, al-Qaeda formally disowned Isis. Isis had shaken off the parental shackles. But it had lost a lot of ground, and was bottled up. One of its main slogans, Remaining and Expanding, risked becoming empty. So where next? Fortune smiled once more. Back in Iraq, conditions had again become ripe for the jihadists. The Americans had gone, since the end of 2011. Sunni areas were again aflame and in revolt, enraged by the sectarian policies of the Shia Prime Minister, Nouri Maliki. Sunnis felt marginalised, oppressed and angry. When Isis decided to move, it was pushing at an open door. In fact, it had never really left Iraq, just gone into the woodwork. As it swept through Sunni towns, cities and villages with bewildering speed in June 2014, sleeper cells of salafist jihadists and ex-Saddamist militants and other sympathisers broke cover and joined the takeover. With the capture of Mosul, Isis morphed swiftly into a new mode of being, like a rocket jettisoning its carrier. No longer just a shadowy terrorist group, it was suddenly a jihadist army holding large stretches of territory, ruling millions of people, and not only threatening the Iraqi state, but challenging the entire world. The change was signalled on 29 June by the proclamation of the "Islamic State", replacing all previous incarnations, and the establishment of the "caliphate". A few days later, the newly anointed Caliph Ibrahim, aka Abu Bakr al-Baghdadi, made a surprise appearance in Mosul in the pulpit of the historic Grand Mosque of al-Nuri, heavily laden with anti-Crusader associations. He called on the world's Muslims to rally behind him. By declaring a caliphate and adopting the generic "Islamic State" title, the organisation was clearly setting its sights far beyond Syria and Iraq. It was going global. Announcing a caliphate has huge significance and resonance within Islam. While it remains the ideal, Bin Laden and other al-Qaeda leaders had always shied away from it, for fear of failure. Now Baghdadi was trumping the parent organisation, setting IS up in direct competition with it for the leadership of global jihadism. A caliphate (khilafa) is the rule or rein of a caliph (khalifa), a word which simply means a successor - primarily of the Prophet Muhammad. Under the first four caliphs who followed after he died in 632, the Islamic Caliphate burst out of Arabia and extended through modern-day Iran to the east, into Libya to the west, and to the Caucasus in the north. The Umayyad caliphate which followed, based in Damascus, took over almost all of the lands that IS would like to control, including Spain. The Baghdad-based Abbasid caliphate took over in 750 and saw a flowering of science and culture, but found it hard to hold it all together, and Baghdad was sacked by the Mongols in 1258. Emerging from that, the Ottoman Empire, based in Constantinople (Istanbul), stretched almost to Vienna at its peak, and was also a caliphate, though the distinction with empire was often blurred. The caliphate was finally abolished by Ataturk in 1924. So when Baghdadi was declared Caliph of the Islamic State, it was an act of extraordinary ambition. He was claiming no less than the mantle of the Prophet, and of his followers who carried Islam into vast new realms of conquest and expansion. For most Islamic scholars and authorities, not to mention Arab and Muslim leaders, such claims from the chief of one violent extremist faction had no legitimacy at all, and there was no great rush to embrace the new caliphate. But the millennial echoes it evoked did strike a chord with some Islamic romantics - and with some like-minded radical groups abroad. Four months after the proclamation, a group of militants in Libya became the first to join up by pledging allegiance to Baghdadi, followed a month later by the Ansar Beit al-Maqdis jihadist faction in Egypt's Sinai. IS's tentacles spread deeper into Africa in March 2015 when Boko Haram in Nigeria took the oath of loyalty. Within a year, IS had branches or affiliates in 11 countries, though it held territory in only five, including Iraq and Syria. It was in those two core countries that Baghdadi and his followers started implementing their state project on the ground, applying their own harsh vision of Islamic rule. To the outside world, deprived of direct access to the areas controlled by IS, one of the most obvious and shocking aspects of this was their systematic destruction of ancient cultural and archaeological heritage sites and artefacts. Some of the region's best-known and most-visited sites were devastated, including the magnificent temples of Bel and Baalshamin at Palmyra in Syria, and the Assyrian cities of Hatra and Nimrud in Iraq. It wasn't just famous archaeological sites that came under attack. Christian churches and ancient monasteries, Shia mosques and shrines, and anything depicting figures of any sort were destroyed, and embellishments removed even from Sunni mosques. Barely a month after taking over Mosul, IS demolition squads levelled the 13th Century shrine of the Imam Awn al-Din, which had survived the Mongol invasion. All of this was absolutely in line with IS's puritanical vision of Islam, under which any pictorial representation or shrine is revering something other than Allah, and any non-Muslim structures are monuments of idolatry. Even Saudi kings and princes to this day are buried without coffins in unmarked graves. By posting videos of many of these acts which the rest of the world saw as criminal cultural vandalism, IS also undoubtedly intended to shock. In that sense, it was the cultural equivalent of beheading aid workers. And there was a more practical and profitable side to the onslaught on cultural heritage. In highly organised manner, IS's Treasury Department issued printed permits to loot archaeological sites, and took a percentage of the proceeds. That was just the tip of the iceberg of a complex structure of governance and control put in place as IS gradually settled into its conquests, penetrating into every aspect of people's lives in exactly the same way as Saddam Hussein's intelligence apparatus had done. Captured documents published by Der Spiegel in 2015 give some idea of the role of ex-Baathist regime men in setting up and running IS in a highly structured and organised way, with much emphasis on intelligence and security. Residents of Sunni strongholds like Mosul and Falluja in Iraq, and Raqqa in Syria, found that IS operatives already knew almost everything about everybody when they moved in and took over in 2014. At checkpoints, ID cards were checked against databases on laptops, obtained from government ration or employee registers. Former members of the security forces had to go to specific mosques to "repent", hand over their weapons and receive a discharge paper. "At first, all they did was change the preachers in the mosques to people with their own views," said a Mosul resident who fled a year later. "But then they began to crack down. Women who had been able to go bare-headed now had to cover up, first with the headscarf and then with the full face-veil. Men have to grow beards and wear short-legged trousers. Cigarettes, hubble-bubble, music and cafes were banned, then satellite TV and mobile phones. Morals police [hisba] vehicles would cruise round, looking for offenders." A Falluja resident recounted the story of a taxi-driver who had picked up a middle-aged woman not wearing a headscarf. They were stopped at an IS checkpoint, the woman given a veil and allowed to go, while the driver was sent to an Islamic court, and sentenced to two months' detention and to memorise a portion of the Koran. If you fail to memorise, the sentence is repeated. "They have courts with judges, officials, records and files, and there are fixed penalties for each crime, it's not random," said the Falluja resident, speaking when IS still controlled the city. "Adulterers are stoned to death. Thieves have their hands cut off. Gays are executed by being thrown off high buildings. Informers are shot dead, Shia militia prisoners are beheaded." An activist based in Raqqa from a group called Al-Sharqiya 24 has been keeping a diary of what life is like under Islamic State group rule. Life under 'Islamic State': Diaries IS departments carried the organisation's grip into every corner of life, including finance, agriculture, education, transport, health, welfare and utilities. School curricula were overhauled in line with IS precepts, with history rewritten, all images being removed from schoolbooks and English taken off the menu. "One thing you can say is this," said the Mosul resident after IS took over. "There is absolutely no corruption, no wasta [knowing the right people and pulling strings]. They are totally convinced they are on the right track." One story tells a lot about IS and its ways. As Iraqi security forces were pressing forward in areas around Ramadi in early 2016, civilians were fleeing the battle - and IS fighters, losing the day, were trying to sneak out too. Two women, running from the combat zone, approached a police checkpoint. As they were being waved through to safety, one of the women suddenly turned to the police, pointed at the other, and said : "This is not a woman. He's an IS emir [commander]." The police investigated, and it was true. The other woman was a man, who had shaved, and put on makeup and women's clothes. He turned out to be top of the list of wanted local IS commanders. "When IS arrived, he killed my husband, who was a policeman, raped me, and then took me as his wife," the woman told the police. "I put up with him all this time, waiting to avenge my husband and my honour," she said. "I tricked him into shaving and putting on makeup, then denounced him to the police." "Nour" is a woman from Raqqa, the so-called Islamic State's (IS) former capital inside Syria. She managed to escape the city and became a refugee in Europe, where she met up with the BBC. This story is based on her experiences and those of her two sisters, who were still inside the city when it was held by IS. Taking on the world Having taken over vast swathes of territory in Iraq with their lightning offensive in June 2014, the militants might have been expected to calm down and consolidate their gains. But, like a shark that has to keep moving or else it will die, IS barely paused before initiating a new spiral of provocation and reprisals that was predictably to draw it into active conflict with almost all the major world powers. Already, the June offensive had threatened the approaches to Baghdad, prompting the Americans to start bringing in hundreds of military advisers and trainers to see how to help the struggling Iraqi army. Just two months later, the attack on Kurdish areas in the north triggered US air strikes in defence of the Kurdistan capital, Irbil, and then to help stave off the threat of genocide to the Yazidis. Fourteen other nations were to join the air campaign. Ten days later, IS beheaded James Foley and the others followed, in line with the doctrine of exemplary brutality as punishment, deterrent and provocation. The most shocking was to come some months later, with the burning alive of the downed Jordanian pilot Moaz al-Kasasbeh. Shock intended. The US-led bombing campaign was extended to Syria in September 2014 after IS besieged the Kurdish-held town of Kobane on the Turkish border. Coalition air strikes turned the tide there. IS lost hundreds of fighters killed at Kobane and elsewhere. More revenge was called for. IS turned abroad. In the three years following the declaration of the "caliphate" in 2014, at least 150 attacks in 29 countries across the globe were either carried out or inspired by IS, with well over 2,000 victims killed. The attacks carried the same message of punishment, deterrence and provocation as the hostage beheadings, while also demonstrating IS's global reach. At the same time, they carried through the militants' doctrine of distracting the enemy by setting fires in different locations and making him squander resources on security. For IS, "the enemy" is everybody who does not embrace it. The world is divided into Dawlat al-Islam, the State of Islam, and Dawlat al-Kufr, the State of Unbelief. The most consequential of these atrocities were the downing of a Russian airliner over Sinai on 31 October 2015 and the Paris attacks on 13 November, provoking both Russia and France to intensify air strikes on IS targets in Syria. The lone-wolf massacre at a gay club in Orlando, Florida, on 12 June 2016, while apparently inspired rather than organised by IS, would undoubtedly further stiffen the US's already steely resolve to finish the organisation. Had IS gone mad? It seemed determined to take on the whole world. It was goading and confronting the Americans, the Russians, and a long list of others. By its own count, it had a mere 40,000 fighters at its command (other estimates went as low as half that). Could it really challenge the global powers and hope to survive? Or would President Barack Obama and his successor Donald Trump be able to fulfil Mr Obama's pledge to "degrade and ultimately destroy" the organisation? Final showdown If there seemed to be something apocalyptic about IS's "bring it on" defiance, that's because there was. When the organisation first brought out its online magazine - a major showcase and recruitment tool - just a month after the "caliphate" was declared, it was not by chance that it was named Dabiq. A small town north of Aleppo in Syria, Dabiq is mentioned in a hadith (a reported saying of the Prophet Muhammad) in connection with Armageddon. In IS mythology, it is the scene where a cataclysmic showdown will take place between the Muslims and the infidels, leading to the end of days. Each issue of Dabiq begins with a quote from Abu Musab Zarqawi: "The spark has been lit here in Iraq, and its heat will continue to intensify - by Allah's permission - until it burns the crusader armies in Dabiq." The prospect of taking part in that final glorious climax, achieving martyrdom on the path of Allah and an assured place in paradise, is one of the thoughts inspiring those heeding the IS call to jihad. That could help explain why the organisation seemed to enjoy an endless supply of recruits willing to blow themselves to pieces in suicide attacks, which it calls "martyrdom-seeking operations" (suicide is forbidden in Islam). Hundreds have died in this way, and they happen virtually daily. It's been one of the elements that made IS a formidable fighting force hard to destroy even in strictly military terms. IS is in many respects a project of former Iraqi President Saddam Hussein's outlawed Baath party, but now with a different ideology. Former agents or officers of Saddam Hussein's regime dominate its leadership... They represent a battle-hardened and state-educated core that would likely endure (as they have done through US occupation and a decade of war) even if the organisation's middle and lower cadres are decimated. What made IS so formidable? The head of security and intelligence for the Kurdistan Regional Government (KRG) in northern Iraq, Masrour Barzani, tells the story of a frustrated would-be suicide bomber who screamed at his captors: "I was just 10 minutes away from being united with the Prophet Muhammad!" "They think they're winners regardless of whether they kill you or they get killed," says Barzani. "If they kill you, they win a battle. If they get killed, they go to heaven. With people like this, it's very difficult to deter them from coming at you. So really the only way to defeat them is to eliminate them." Probably for the first time in military history since the Japanese kamikaze squadrons of World War Two, suicide bombers are used by IS not only for occasional terrorist spectaculars, but as a standard and common battlefield tactic. Virtually all IS attacks begin with one or several suicide bombers driving explosives-rigged cars or trucks at the target, softening it up for combat squads to go in. So much so that the "martyrdom-seekers" have been called the organisation's "air force", since they serve a similar purpose. Formidable though that is, IS as a fighting force is much more than a bunch of wild-eyed fanatics eager to blow themselves up. For that, they have Saddam Hussein to thank. "The core of IS are former Saddam-era army and intelligence officers, particularly from the Republican Guard," said an international intelligence official. "They are very good at moving their people around, resupply and so on, they're actually much more effective and efficient than the Iraqi army are. That's the hand of former military staff officers who know their business." "They are very professional," adds Masrour Barzani. "They use artillery, armoured vehicles, heavy machinery etc, and they are using it very well. They have officers who know conventional war and how to plan, how to attack, how to defend. They really are operating on the level of a very organised conventional force. Otherwise they'd be no more than a terrorist organisation." The partnership with the ex-Baathists, going back to Zarqawi's early days in Iraq, was clearly a vital component in IS success. But that did not mean its fighters were invincible on the battlefield, even in the early days of stunningly rapid expansion. The Kurds in north-east Syria were fighting IS off with no outside help for a year before anybody noticed. And even now, IS makes what would conventionally be seen as costly mistakes. In December 2015, for example, they lost several hundred fighters in one abortive attack east of Mosul alone, and probably 2,500 altogether that month alone. Pentagon officials said coalition air strikes killed some 50,000 IS militants in Iraq and Syria between August 2014 and the end of 2016. But IS initially seemed to have little difficulty making up the numbers. With a population of perhaps 10 million acquiescent Sunnis to draw on, in Iraq and Syria, most recruiting was done locally. Clearly, had it remained in place, there would soon have been a new generation of young militants drawn from local sources. "I didn't join out of conviction," says Bakr Madloul, a 24-year-old bachelor who was arrested in December at his home in a Sunni quarter in southern Baghdad and accused of taking part in deadly IS car bomb attacks on mainly Shia areas, which he admits. Bakr says he was working as a construction foreman in Kurdistan when IS took over Mosul. He was detained for questioning by Kurdish security, and met a militant in jail who persuaded him to go to Mosul, where he joined up with IS and manned a checkpoint until it was hit by a Coalition air strike. He was then sent back to his Baghdad suburb to help organise car bombings. The explosives-packed vehicles were sent from outside Baghdad, and his job was to place them where he was told by his controller, usually in crowded streets or markets. "Only one of the five car bombs I handled was driven by a suicide bomber," he says. "I spoke to him. He was 22 years old, an Iraqi. He believed he would go to paradise when he died. It's the easiest and quickest way to Heaven. They strongly believe this. They would blow themselves up to get to Heaven. There were older ones in their 30s and 40s." "I asked my controllers more than once, 'Is it OK to kill women and children?' They would answer, 'They're all the same.' But to me, killing women and children, I didn't feel at all comfortable about that. But once you're in, you're stuck. If you try to leave, they call you a murtadd, an apostate, and they'll kill you or your family." Bakr knows he will almost certainly hang. Since we spoke, he has in fact been given two death sentences. I asked him if he would do the same things over if he had his life again. He laughed. "Absolutely not. I would get out of Iraq, away from IS, away from the security forces. I took this path without realising the consequences. There is no way back. I see that now." But up in Kurdistan, another IS prisoner, Muhannad Ibrahim, has no such regrets. A 32-year-old from a village near Mosul with a wife and three children, he was a construction worker for a Turkish company when IS took over the city. Two of his older brothers had died fighting the Americans there in 2004 and 2006. He joined IS without hesitation and was commanding a small detachment when he was captured in a battle with the Kurds. "We were being oppressed by the Shia, they were always insulting and bothering us," he says. "But that's not the main motivation, religious conviction is more important. All my family is religious, praise be to Allah. I came to IS through my faith and religious principles." "If I had my time over again, I would take the same path, the same choices. Because I am convinced by this thing, I have to go to the end. Either I am killed, or Allah will decree some other fate for me." Rising to the challenge Just as the 9/11 Twin Towers atrocity in 2001 had left the US and its allies with no alternative but to strike back with extreme force, the challenge mounted by IS through its numerous provocative outrages in the region and around the world could not be ignored - nor was it meant to be. But rooting out the militants from Iraq and Syria was always going to be much more complex than the campaign unleashed more than a decade earlier against al-Qaeda and its Taliban hosts in Afghanistan. There was never any real question of a wholesale Coalition invasion of either country. Air strikes were one thing, but putting in vast numbers of troops on the ground would be something else. Syria was embroiled in a bewilderingly complicated civil war. Iraq was also in turmoil. US forces had only pulled out three years earlier. There was no appetite for a repeat of an invasion which was almost universally seen as a disastrous blunder with lasting consequences. But uprooting the militants could not be done by air power alone. Reliable, motivated partner forces on the ground would be needed. In both countries, they were in short supply. In Syria, the US and its allies were already engaged with some of the motley array of Syrian rebel groups. But they never amounted to the kind of focused, cohesive forces that the Coalition was looking for - they were fragmented, fractious, increasingly Islamist in tone, and largely bent on overthrowing the Assad regime rather than turning on IS. In Iraq, the regular armed forces were in disarray after collapsing like a house of cards in the face of the onslaught on Mosul by a few hundred IS militants. Much work would have to be done to weld them into a motivated and competent fighting force. In both countries it was to the Kurds in the north that the Americans and their Coalition partners first turned as their most hopeful immediate allies. The Kurdish Peshmerga forces in northern Iraq had a long relationship with the Western Coalition powers. In 2003, US special forces fought alongside them to clear Islamist militants from mountain positions near the Iranian border just before the invasion against Saddam Hussein, in which they were partners. Humiliated by the loss of vast areas of territory to the lightning IS assault in early August 2014, the Peshmerga needed no encouragement to hit back. Less than two weeks later, with Coalition air support, they recaptured the strategic Mosul dam. In the months that followed, they slowly clawed back much of the ground they had lost, including Sinjar in November 2015, in operations closely co-ordinated with Coalition air strikes. But in the rest of Iraq, the picture was much messier. Iraqi government forces were able to halt the IS thrust southwards towards the capital, Baghdad, but made little early progress pushing back into the mainly Sunni areas where the militants had dug in. It was Iranian-backed Shia militias, whose emergence was consolidated under the IS threat, that made the running in the initial phases of the campaign to oust the militants, driving them out of areas north-east of Baghdad near the Iranian border and pursuing them westwards until the eventual recapture of Saddam Hussein's hometown Tikrit in the Tigris river valley in March 2015. "If it weren't for Iran, the democratic experiment in Iraq would have fallen," said Hadi al-Ameri, leader of the Iranian-backed Badr Organisation, one of the biggest Shia fighting groups, known as the Hashd al-Shaabi or Popular Mobilisation (PM), that rose in defence of Baghdad and the south. "Obama was sleeping, and he didn't wake up until IS was at the gates of Irbil. When they were at the gates of Baghdad, he did nothing. Were it not for Iran's support, IS would have taken over the whole Gulf, not just Iraq." But in the Sunni heartlands of Anbar province to the west of Baghdad the Iraqi state forces were struggling. In May 2015, IS militants captured the provincial capital, Ramadi. At the same time, they spread their grip in Syria, taking the iconic city of Palmyra (Tadmur) in the desert east of Homs. It was a clear signal that while the organisation may have been dealt some setbacks it was still at the height of its powers and capable of exploiting any weaknesses it found. But the Americans were quietly busy preparing for the real war on IS. They had poured billions into rebuilding the Iraqi army after 2003, only to see much of it go to pieces under pressure because so much was wrong with its foundations. Now, putting in several thousand advisers, they focused on training and equipping the key Iraqi special forces - the Counter-Terrorism Service (CTS), otherwise known as the Golden Division - that was to play a crucial role spearheading the drive against the militants. The systematic lashback began with Anbar province and the eventual recapture of Ramadi at the end of 2015 and early 2016, a grinding and costly operation with close Coalition air support. There was huge destruction and the displacement of most of the city's largely Sunni population. There were also tensions over the deployment of Iranian-backed, mainly Shia militias in core Sunni areas, though they were largely kept out of the city itself. The recapture of Ramadi tightened the noose around the even more iconic centre of Sunni sentiment at nearby Falluja, where militants had fought two major battles with the Americans in 2004. Government and PM forces began closing in around the city in early 2016, soon after taking Ramadi. By now, after a lot of testing and assessing, the Americans and their allies, working closely with local forces, were clearly embarked on a comprehensive strategy to "degrade and ultimately destroy" IS wherever it could be found. The broad lines were spelled out in February 2016 by Lt Gen Sean McFarland, then the commanding general of the Coalition's Combined Joint Task Force - Operation Inherent Resolve. "The campaign has three objectives: to destroy the ISIL parent tumour in Iraq and Syria by collapsing its power centres in Mosul and Raqqa; two, to combat the emerging metastases of the ISIL tumour worldwide; and three, to protect our nations from attack." Next step on the road to Mosul, the battle for Falluja was joined in late May 2016 and took just over a month of assaults, bombardments and air strikes to complete, with civilians again paying a heavy price. IS fighters deployed their full range of battle tactics, with snipers, booby-traps and suicide bombers making advance difficult and dangerous for the attacking forces. Despite the attrition suffered by the Iraqi forces, especially the elite CTS forces, it was not long before eyes turned to the big prize - Mosul. With President Obama due to bow out early in the new year, the Americans were getting impatient. In peacetime roughly 10 times the size of either Falluja or indeed the IS "capital" Raqqa, Mosul was never going to be an easy nut to crack. It had fallen to the militants in a matter of hours in 2014. By the time the government and Coalition campaign to dislodge them was finally launched in mid-October 2016, IS had had nearly two-and-a-half years to dig in and prepare its defences. There is a moment in the journey into Raqqa when you leave the real world behind. After the bombed-out Samra bridge, any signs of normal life vanish. Turn right at the shop that once sold gravestones - its owner is long gone - and you are inside the city. Ahead lies nothing but destruction and grey dust and rubble. This is a place drained of colour, of life, and of people. In six days inside Raqqa, I didn't see a single civilian. The city fit for no-one Marshalled against a band of militants variously estimated at between 2,000 and 12,000 with a hard core probably closer to 4,000 or 5,000, was a vast assembly of government and auxiliary forces, estimated at around 100,000, counting regular army and federal police units, Kurdish Peshmerga forces, and the Popular Mobilisation, including some Sunni and minority volunteers as well as Shia militias. It was an epic battle that was to last nine months. Government forces slowly battered their way in around the city through dozens of outlying villages and finally into Mosul's eastern half, which was declared "liberated" towards the end of January 2017. Then it was on to the western side of the river and the old city, with its dense warren of narrow streets. The area around the ancient Great Mosque of al-Nuri, where Abu Bakr al-Baghdad had made his only public appearance as the newly-anointed "caliph", was the last to fall. The mosque was blown up, almost exactly three years after the declaration of the IS "caliphate". The evidence was that IS itself had destroyed it, rather than let it fall into "infidel" hands. The Iraqi Prime Minister, Haider al-Abadi, saw this as "official recognition of defeat" by the militants. It signalled, he said, "the collapse of the IS caliphate and a grand military victory". It was indeed a monumental achievement, a massive body-blow to the IS state project. The city had been, as a senior Western official in northern Iraq put it, "the beating heart of IS", in real terms much more important than Raqqa in Syria. But it came at huge cost. The years of preparation and months of battering that it took to dislodge a few thousand militants stood in stark contrast to the ease with which they had rolled into the city virtually unopposed in June 2014. Some estimates put the number of civilians killed at more than 40,000. At least 1,200 Iraqi security personnel also died in battle. The damage was estimated at $50bn. Hundreds thousands of mainly Sunni inhabitants were displaced, and there were widespread allegations of abuses. The weeks that followed saw a further rapid erosion of the group's territorial position in Iraq. By the end of August 2017, it had been driven out of Tal Afar, an important town controlling the main road from Mosul towards Syria. A month later, another long-standing IS pocket in and around the mainly Sunni town of Hawija, west of Kirkuk, was also largely overrun by government and auxiliary forces. In Iraq, that left IS in control only of the area in and around the town of al-Qaim, on the River Euphrates by the Syrian border in the far west of Anbar province. Its presence in the country had been very radically degraded. But the organisation was still far from destroyed. Across in Syria, the overall picture by the autumn of 2017 was roughly the same, despite the country's very different, extremely complex and fast-moving situation. In 2014 and 2015, IS had substantial holdings in Syria - it looked as though someone had spilled a bottle of black ink on its map. They controlled virtually the whole of Syria's stretch of the Euphrates, from Albu Kamal on the Iraqi border, up through Deir al-Zour and Raqqa, the Tabqa dam, and on to Jarablus on the border with Turkey, one of several crossings that were lifelines for the militants. They held towns and villages to the east and north of Aleppo (including the near-mythical Dabiq) and other pockets further south, including Palmyra and nearby oilfields. But this heyday did not last. In Syria, IS found itself facing, not one motley coalition of enemies as in Iraq, but three. The Americans, despairing of Syrian rebel groups whose interests lay elsewhere, adopted the experienced Syrian Kurdish fighters of the YPG, the Popular Protection Units, as their main on-the-ground partners. They added on as many Arab and minority fighters as they could find to produce the Syrian Democratic Forces (SDF), their favoured vehicle against IS in Syria. This did not go down at all well with the US's Nato ally Turkey, which sees the YPG and their parent political body, the Democratic Unity Party (PYD), as terrorists because of their affiliation to Turkey's own Kurdish rebels, the Kurdistan Workers' Party (PKK). Often seeming to be working at cross-purposes to the Americans, Ankara set up its own coalition from among the Syrian opposition groups it had been backing and facilitating for years. IS also received attention from a third coalition, grouping Syrian government forces, Iran and Russia. The Russians carried out air strikes against IS positions partly with the same kind of motivation as the Western Coalition - revenge for the downing by IS of the Russian airliner over Sinai in October 2015 - but their real strategic interest was different. The Russians and Iranians were bent on securing their investment in the Assad regime, helping it restore its authority in the country, and pre-empting any move by the Americans and their allies to block a link-up between eastern Syria and western Iraq that would give Tehran a direct land connection from Iran all the way to Lebanon. That thought may have been somewhere in Washington's head, but its primary concern was hitting and destroying IS. Turkey for its part had a different overriding preoccupation: to prevent the Syrian Kurds from expanding and joining up the areas they controlled along the southern side of the Turkey-Syria border. Despite these conflicting motivations, for IS the result was the same - pressure on many fronts. The US-backed SDF made the most headway, systematically whittling away IS assets step-by-step, but Turkey and Syrian government forces were also on the march. As early as September 2014, US air strikes had helped prevent IS taking over the Kurdish-held town of Kobane on the border with Turkey. After that, the SDF were pushing forward. By October 2016, IS had lost all access to the Turkish border, a huge logistical setback - virtually all foreign jihadists bound for both Syria and Iraq had come that way, apart from other advantages. The Turkish-backed Syrian rebels also played their part, taking over IS-held areas north and east of Aleppo - including Dabiq, which fell in a mundane enough manner with none of the apocalyptic "burning of the Crusader armies" heralded in IS mythology. Gradually the militants' tide receded further and further down the Euphrates valley, with the SDF, backed by perhaps 2,000 US special forces with artillery and air power, doing most of the pushing. By November 2016, the SDF were in a position to launch a campaign to isolate and eventually attack the IS "capital", Raqqa. The assault on the city itself began in early June 2017. By then, much of the population and many IS fighters had already fled, with most of the militants heading further downstream to the final major city largely under their control - another provincial capital, Deir al-Zour. But before the recapture of Raqqa had been completed, Russian- and Iranian-backed Syrian government forces were already thrusting towards Deir al-Zour, where a military base and airport had held out against the IS militants for almost three years. To get there, the government forces had recaptured Palmyra (for the second time) in March and pushed eastwards along the road to take Sukhna in August before reaching Deir al-Zour itself in September. US-backed SDF forces had already bypassed the yet-to-fall Raqqa and moved into oil-rich areas to the east of Deir al-Zour, laying claim to oil and gasfields that would greatly bolster the Kurds' ambitions to run their own area in the north of the country - or at least strengthen their hand in eventual negotiations with Damascus. So as 2017 moved into its final months, IS territorial control in Syria seemed to be as doomed as it was in Iraq - bottled up in a small patch straddling the border around al-Qaim in western Iraq and Albu Kamal in Syria. Rooting the militants out from there would not necessarily be a simple task in a fiercely tribal area prone to defying governments. But to all intents and purposes, the IS dream of administering and expanding a thriving Islamic state in the two countries as the core of a growing global caliphate had crashed in flames. So had IS been virtually destroyed as well as severely degraded? Was it time to celebrate its demise? It had certainly been dealt crippling blows in terms of functioning as a territorial state. That project lay in ruins. The administrative structures it had set up had been swept away. Major sources of finance had been cut off - from the oilfields it had controlled, taxes imposed on the millions of Iraqis and Syrians it had ruled, and cash coming in across the border with Turkey. It could no longer attract thousands of foreign jihadists or recruit locals to replace the 60,000 IS fighters the Americans believe have died since the heady days of June 2014. With virtually all of their urban holdings lost, the militants were shrinking back into the shadows and deserts. Many of their leaders had also been killed, although Abu Bakr al-Baghdadi himself apparently eluded the hunt, issuing a defiant audio statement in September 2017. Among the known dead were Mohammed Emwazi, "Jihadi John", killed by a drone strike in Syria in late 2015. But all of this had been long foreseen by the leadership. In May 2016, the man regarded as the organisation's real Number Two, spokesman and head of external operations Abu Muhammad al-Adnani, made a lengthy statement already foreshadowing the next phase of IS existence. "You will never be victorious. You will be defeated," he told the Americans. "Do you think that victory comes by killing one leader or another? That would be a fake victory!" "Or do you consider defeat to be the loss of a city or the loss of territory? Were we defeated when we lost the cities in Iraq [in 2007-8] and were in the desert without any city or land? And would we be defeated, and you victorious, if you were to take Mosul or Sirte or Raqqa, or even all the cities, and we were to return to our previous situation? Absolutely not! True defeat is the loss of will and desire to fight." Adnani, who as spokesman had announced the birth of "Islamic State" and the caliphate in June 2014, may not have lost the will and desire to fight. But he did lose his life. He was killed by an American air strike near Aleppo in August 2016. He was right to suggest that the targeted killing of militant leaders has in general had little discernible impact on the course of movements, psychologically important though it may be. But the Iraqi expert on radical movements, Hisham al-Hashemi, believes the case of Abu Bakr al-Baghdadi might be different. The Americans are unlikely to rest until they have killed Baghdadi, not least because of their belief that he personally repeatedly raped an American NGO worker, Kayla Mueller, and then had her killed in early 2015. "IS's future depends on Baghdadi," Hashemi said, speaking at a time when IS still controlled huge swathes of territory in Iraq and Syria. "If he is killed, it will split up. One part would stay on his track and announce a new caliphate. Another would split off and return to al-Qaeda. Others would turn into gangs following whoever is strongest." "The source of his strength is that he brought about an ideological transformation, blending jihadist ideas with Baathist intelligence security methods, enabling him to create this quasi-state organisation." Baghdadi's death might not have such an impact in the new situation. But his special talents could come into their own again should conditions in either or both of those countries, or elsewhere, once again favour a comeback by the militants. That is not so fanciful, even amid the smoking wreckage of the IS above-ground infrastructure. In Iraq, the burning Sunni grievances against the Shia-dominated Baghdad government that allowed IS to make its astonishing advances in 2014 have not been seriously addressed. American officials are already referring to the danger of an "AQI-2" emerging - a second al-Qaeda in Iraq. It has happened before. The wholesale destruction of Sunni towns and cities in the drive against IS and the displacement of hundreds of thousands of Sunnis may even have aggravated those grievances, providing fertile ground for militants to infiltrate back. There is an optimistic argument that the united cross-sectarian effort that it took to drive the militants out may have sown the seeds of a new Iraqi nationalism. But the fact remains that the Sunni community has been crushed, and the Shia majority dominates both politically and through the proliferation of its powerful militias. Political leaderships in Baghdad have signally failed to promote any serious national reconciliation since 2003. "IS was essentially an Iraqi creation," said a senior Western intelligence official, speaking shortly before the militants were ousted from Mosul. "The tragic reality is that at the moment, it is the main Sunni political entity in Iraq. From the West, it's looked at as a kind of crazed cult. Here in Iraq it represents an important constituency. It represents a massive dissatisfaction, the alienation of a whole sector of the population." A young man wearing a shabby, brown prisoner's outfit stands before three black-robed judges in a tiny, provincial courtroom, shaking nervously. After sipping some water, he confirms his name: Abdullah Hussein. He is accused of fighting for so-called Islamic State (IS). "The decision of the court has been taken according to articles 2 and 3 of the 2005 Counterterrorism Law," states the judge. "Death by hanging." And then Hussein - who, like many suspects here, was picked up on the Mosul frontline - breaks down crying. Inside the Iraqi courts sentencing IS suspects to death Much work remains to be done if that sobering assessment is to be reversed. And Baghdad meanwhile faces multiple challenges that might help tip it back into the state of chaos in which the militants could thrive. The state's coffers are empty at a time when the reconstruction bill is estimated conservatively at $100bn. Corruption is endemic. Apart from the Sunni issue, Baghdad politics is in turmoil, with deep rivalries between Shia factions with greater or lesser attachment to Iran. And the threat of secession by the Kurds in the north, after the September 2017 independence referendum, could bring further instability. The very least that could be expected post-Mosul was an indefinite period of low-level insurgency, with bomb blasts and suicide attacks in different parts of the country, especially aimed, as before, at mainly Shia areas. It was already happening. The US military's Combating Terrorism Center reported that by mid-2017 there was already an average of 130 insurgent attacks taking place monthly in the "liberated" eastern half of Mosul. And it was already happening next door in Syria too, with IS carrying out random deadly explosions in Damascus and elsewhere despite its stark loss of territory. Although it was obvious by late 2017 that the Assad government with its Russian and Iranian backers were prevailing, the final pattern of control and governance country-wide remained uncertain. There were many ways in which further turmoil could ensue, not least the fact that, with US support, Kurdish forces had spread well beyond their own demographic comfort zone, causing huge resentment among some Sunni elements. As in Iraq, many Syrian Sunnis were bound to feel aggrieved by everything that had happened since the civil war broke out in 2011. And where there were grievances, IS or its successors would surely be there to build on them. Capitalising on chaos IS had in any case been busy spreading its bets and developing other territorial possibilities beyond the "parent tumour" of Iraq and Syria. Libya initially proved the most promising. It had just the kind of failed-state anarchy, the state of "savagery", that left room for the jihadists to move in, forging alliances with local militants and disgruntled supporters of the overthrown regime of Muammar Gaddafi, just as they had done in Iraq. IS signalled its arrival there in typical style, issuing a polished video in February 2015 showing a group of 21 bewildered Egyptian Christian workers in orange jumpsuits being beheaded on a Libyan beach, their blood mingling with the waters of the Mediterranean as a warning to the "Crusader" European countries on the other side of the sea that radical Islam was on the way. The man who voiced that warning was believed to be the IS leader in Libya, an Iraqi called Wissam al-Zubaydi, also known as Abu Nabil. By coincidence, Zubaydi was killed in a US air strike on the same day IS struck in Paris, 13 November 2015. The militants took over a big stretch of the coast and the central city of Sirte, which was to Muammar Gaddafi what Tikrit was to Saddam Hussein. Another American air strike in February killed (among nearly 50 other people) Noureddine Chouchane, reputedly an IS figure responsible for the deadly attacks on Western tourists in his native Tunisia. But the IS presence in Libya soon came under pressure, with militias loyal to the Government of National Accord, which been born out of UN efforts, dislodging the militants from Sirte in the second half of 2016. But they did not disappear. The Americans launched an air strike on IS elements south of Sirte in October 2017, their first such action in Libya since President Trump took over. The militants were undoubtedly on the defensive in Libya. But it remained a deeply fragmented country, and its new government far from powerful or universally accepted. There would likely continue to be pockets of chaos there for the jihadists to exploit. And there was no shortage of other possibilities being actively explored and developed - Yemen, Afghanistan, Pakistan, Somalia, the Philippines, Nigeria... wherever there were dysfunctional states and angry Muslims, there would be opportunities for IS, competing strongly with a diminished al-Qaeda as a dominant brand in the jihadist market. Adding the extra risk for the West, that that competition could be another spur for spectacular terrorist attacks which they know are being actively plotted. Long before IS lost almost all its territorial gains in Iraq and Syria, it was clear that the organisation, while trying its best to hold ground wherever it could, was trying to stay alive and assert itself ("Remaining and Expanding") in other ways - renewed insurgency in the lost lands, constant propaganda and proselytising on the internet, and above all, a revitalised push to carry out acts of terror in the West, the more shocking the better. As early as September 2014, just as IS was embarking on its provocative confrontation with the West, spokesman Abu Muhammad al-Adnani urged the movement's followers in graphic detail to kill the hated infidels. "If you can kill a disbelieving American or European - especially the spiteful and filthy French - or an Australian, or a Canadian, or any other of the unbelievers waging war, including the citizens of the countries that entered a coalition against the Islamic State, then rely upon Allah, and kill him in any manner or way however it may be. Smash his head with a rock, slaughter him with a knife, run him over with your car, throw him down from a high place, choke him or poison him." In his statement in May 2016, al-Adnani signalled the organisation's new stress on attacks inside Western countries in response to the drive against it in Iraq and Syria. "Truly, the smallest act you do in their lands is more beloved to us than the biggest act done here; it is more effective for us and more harmful to them... Know that your targeting those who are called "civilians" is more beloved to us and more effective, as it is more harmful, painful, and a greater deterrent to them." Attacks in Europe and elsewhere intensified almost in direct proportion to IS' loss of terrain in Iraq and Syria. Among the more notable were the truck assault in Nice, France, in July 2016 (at least 86 killed) and a similar attack in Berlin in December (12 killed), the Istanbul nightclub bombing in January 2017 (39 killed), and two vehicle and knife attacks in London in March and June 2017 (15 killed). The attacks in London broke new ground for IS, and even more so the suicide bomb attack at the Manchester Arena in May 2017 in which more than 20 people died. A van attack in Barcelona in August in which 13 people were killed was also seen as an advance for the militants. These kinds of attacks, often carried out by "lone wolves" and involving everyday implements that are impossible to control, were clearly a nightmare for security services. Their job was made all the more challenging by studies showing that fewer than 20% of "successful" attacks in Europe and North America were carried out by jihadists who had gone to Syria or Iraq, and that most were perpetrated by citizens of the countries under attack. While IS had managed to plant a small number of activists in the crowds of refugees and asylum seekers besieging the gates of Europe and the West, simply vetting them carefully would obviously not be enough. Clearly, IS internet messaging was still powerful, resonating among the disaffected, the resentful, the alienated and disempowered. The Americans, focusing largely on the military defeat of the militants, seemed taken aback by IS's ability to keep up and even expand the challenge. "When I consider how much damage we've inflicted and they're still operational, they're still capable of pulling off things like some of these attacks we've seen internationally, we have to conclude that we do not yet fully appreciate the scale or strength of this phenomenon," said Lt Gen Michael Nagata, one of the top US Special Operations officers, quoted by the Combating Terrorism Center. "We spend an inordinate amount of time and resources as the United States, but also as our partners, trying to not only defeat ISIS and their control of the physical caliphate, but their virtual space that they own," added Thomas P Bossert, President Trump's adviser on homeland security and counter-terrorism adviser. "They're proselytizing. It's troubling." Clearly, tackling such a vague, ethereal and pervasive threat was a far cry from the clear-cut task of confronting IS fighters on the battlefield. The threat was not going to go away. Cyber-inspired lone wolf attacks could materialise at almost any time, any place. The price of relative safety would be eternal vigilance. Battle for minds The US and its allies were starting to come to grips with the cyber dimension of the challenge - and giving much less priority to the crucial problem of poor governance in the countries whose dysfunctionalities provided opportunities for the radicals to take root. But there were other parts of IS' complicated root system that were even harder to get at. The New York-based security consultancy Soufan Group estimated that more than half of the 27,000 foreign jihadists making their way to Syria and Iraq in the first 18 months of the "Islamic State" were from the Middle East and North Africa. Clearly, the "Caliphate" had appeal, despite - perhaps in some cases, because of - its graphically publicised brutality. While vowing to degrade and destroy the organisation, President Obama put his finger on the real challenge: "Ideologies are not defeated with guns, they are defeated by better ideas, a more attractive and more compelling vision," he said. On a relatively normal day... there was a total of 50 distinct pieces of propaganda. The photo reports and videos included depictions of an IS offensive in northern Syria and eulogies for the dead in Salahuddin... Overwhelmingly, though, the propagandists were preoccupied with a carefully refined view of 'normal' life. Fishing and ultraviolence The problem is that when disenchanted people in the region look around them - especially the young, the idealistic, or the hopeless unemployed who have no future - they see scant evidence of "better ideas" or attractive and compelling visions. They see the ruins of an "Arab Spring" which raised hopes only to dash them cruelly. The brutal, corrupt dictatorships which it shook have either fragmented into chaos and sectarian and tribal upheaval, like Syria itself, Libya, Yemen and (with Western intervention) Iraq, or the sinister "deep states" of their former regimes came back, even more harshly in the case of Egypt, less so in the case of Tunisia. While many of the European jihadists may have heeded the call for other reasons, socio-economic factors play an important part in radicalising some of the Arab jihadists, and will continue to do so unless addressed. Mohammed is giddy with excitement as he films the discovery of three IS fighters on his mobile phone. "Shoot him," he shouts, gesturing at one of them. His nervousness gives him away as the unit's cook. He's unarmed, but his fellow soldiers from the Iraqi police special forces - known as the Emergency Response Division - are armed to the teeth and are not taking any chances. The secret lives of young IS fighters One of the biggest contingents is from Tunisia, where a detailed survey in the poorest suburbs of the capital Tunis showed clearly that the radicalisation of young people there had far less to do with extreme Islamic ideology as such than it did with unemployment, marginalisation and disillusion after a revolution into which they threw themselves, but which gave them nothing, and left them hopeless. IS is also filling a desert left by the collapse of all the political ideologies that have stirred Arab idealists over the decades. Many used to travel to the Soviet Union for training and tertiary education, but communism is now seen as a busted flush. Arab socialism and Arab nationalism, which caused such excitement in the 1950s and 1960s, mutated into brutal, corrupt "republics" where sons were groomed to inherit power from their fathers. In this vacuum, IS took up the cause of punishing the West and other outsiders for their actions in the region over the past century: The roots of IS also lie in a crisis within Islam. "Isil is not Islamic," said President Obama, echoing statements by many Western leaders that "IS has nothing to do with Islam". But it has. "It is based on Islamic texts that are reinterpreted according to how they see it," says Ahmad Moussalli, professor of politics at the American University of Beirut. "I don't say they are not coming out of Islamic tradition, that would be denying facts. But their interpretation is unusual, literal sometimes, very much like the Wahhabis." Hisham al-Hashemi, the Iraqi expert on radical groups, agrees. "Violent extremism in IS and the salafist jihadist groups is justified, indeed blessed, in Islamic law texts relied on by IS and the extremist groups. It's a crisis of religious discourse, not of a barbaric group. Breaking up the religious discourse and setting it on the right course is more important by far than suppressing the extremist groups militarily." Because ancient texts can be interpreted by extremists to cover their worst outrages does not implicate the entire religion, any more than Christianity is defined by the Inquisition, where burning at the stake was a stock penalty. Extremist ideas remain in the dark, forgotten corners of history unless their time comes. And IS time came, with Afghanistan, Iraq, and everything that followed. "Salafism is spreading in the world, in Afghanistan, Pakistan, the Arab countries," says Prof Moussalli. He blames the Saudis for stifling the emergence of a moderate, democratic version of Islam, the "alternative Islamic discourse" to salafism that President Obama wanted to see. "A moderate Islamic narrative today is a Muslim Brotherhood narrative, which has been destroyed by the Gulf states supporting the military coup in Egypt," says Prof Moussalli, referring to the Egyptian military's ousting of the elected President Mohammed Morsi, a senior Muslim Brotherhood figure, in July 2013. "We lost that opportunity with Egypt. Egypt could have paved the way for real change in the area. But Saudi Arabia stood against it, in a very malicious way, and destroyed the possibility of changing the Arab regimes into more democratic regimes that accept the transfer of power peacefully. They don't want it." Saudi Arabia's ultra-conservative Wahhabi religious establishment and its constant propagation have raised ambiguity over its relations with radical groups abroad. Enemies and critics have accused it of producing the virulent strain of Wahhabism that inspires the extremists, and even of supporting IS and other ultra-salafist groups. But Jamal Khashoggi, a leading Saudi journalist and writer who spent time in Afghanistan and knew Bin Laden, says that simply is not true "We are at war with IS, which sees us as corrupt Wahhabis." he says. "IS is a form of Wahhabism that has been suppressed here since the 1930s. It resurfaced with the siege of the Grand Mosque in Mecca in 1979 and spread here and there. But Saudi Arabia didn't back it at all, it saw it as a threat. So it's true that salafism can turn radical, just as the US right-wing produces some crazy lunatics." Hundreds of people died in a two-week siege when extremist salafists took over the Grand Mosque, the holiest place in Islam, in protest at what they saw as the Kingdom's deviation from the true path. More recently, Saudi Arabia's security forces and its Shia minority have in fact been the target of attacks by IS, and the kingdom has executed captured militants. It has an active deradicalisation programme. But the Kingdom's extreme conservatism, its distaste for democracy, and its custodianship of the shrines in Mecca and Medina to which millions of Muslims make pilgrimage every year, have made it one of the main targets for calls for a hard-to-achieve reformation within Islam as part of the battle to defeat IS and other extremist groups. The winds of change do now seem to be starting to blow through the desert kingdom, with cautious reforms behind which the young Crown Prince, Muhammad Bin Salman, is seen as the driving force. Although the 2017 decree allowing women to drive caused a stir, it remains to be seen how deep such changes can go in a country where the grip of the ultra-conservative clergy is still strong, and where official primary schoolbooks still teach that all religions apart from Islam are "false". Changing some of the fundamental interpretations of religion is a monumental undertaking that could take generations. But it cannot come fast enough for a senior Sunni politician in Iraq. "We must accept the fact that Islam has a crisis," he says. "IS is not a freak. Look at the roots, the people, the aims. If you don't deal with the roots, the situation will be much more dangerous. The world has to get rid of IS, but needs a new deal: reformation, in Saudi Arabia, Afghanistan, al-Azhar [the ancient seat of Sunni Islamic learning and authority in Cairo]." "You can't kill all the Muslims. You need an Islamic reformation. But Saudi and Qatari money has been blotting out the voices so we can't get anywhere. It's the curse of the Arab world - too much oil, too much money." Sunni Axis v Shia Crescent The demise of the IS as a "state" straddling Iraq and Syria has huge geo-strategic implications, few of them positive for the US and its regional allies. While President Trump railed and tweeted against the evil of Iran and its sponsorship of terrorism, Tehran was quietly benefitting from everything the Americans were doing against IS. They were non-speaking, arms-length partners in the campaign against the militants in Iraq. US air power, training and hardware directly helped the official Iraqi forces. But the Iranian-backed Shia militias played their part in a series of campaigns ending in a victory which greatly expanded their presence. The rise and fall of the IS phenomenon in Iraq left Iran's influence there stronger than ever. While the distance between the American and Iranian roles in Syria was even bigger, with Iran on the side of the regime and the US originally backing the rebels, both were fighting IS, and its defeat would ultimately benefit the Assad regime and its Iranian backers. The Americans and their Coalition allies will not be around forever. Iran and its local allies will. The US had little choice but to do what it did. The superpower could not allow itself to be goaded and provoked with impunity. But it had earlier opened the floodgates to Iranian influence through a war that was purely elective, a war of choice and ambition rather than necessity: the invasion of Iraq in 2003, launched on pretexts (Saddam Hussein's possession of weapons of mass destruction and his support for terrorism) that turned out to be totally spurious. By dismantling the Iraqi state in 2003, the US-led coalition was breaking down the bulwark that had contained Iran, the region's Shia superpower, seen as a threat by the Saudis and most of their Sunni Gulf partners since the Islamic Revolution in 1979. The empowerment of the majority Shia community in Iraq after 2003 gave Iran unrivalled influence over Iraqi politics. For years, it had been backing anti-Saddam Iraqi Shia factions in exile. Now they came home to rule the roost. The arrival of the IS threat led to even more Iranian influence, through the arming, training and directing of the burgeoning Iraqi Shia militias. For Saudi Arabia and its allies, Iranian penetration in Iraq threatens to establish, indeed largely has, a Shia crescent linking Iran, Iraq, Syria under its minority Alawite leadership, and Lebanon dominated by the Iranian-created Shia faction, Hezbollah. From the outset of the war in Syria in 2011, the regional Sunni powers - the Saudis and their Gulf partners, and Turkey - backed the Sunni rebels in the hope that the overthrow of Assad would establish Sunni majority rule. A north-south Sunni axis running from Turkey through Syria to Jordan and Saudi Arabia would split the Shia crescent and foil the Iranian project, as they saw it. That is essentially what IS did in 2014, when it moved back into Iraq, took Mosul and virtually all the country's Sunni areas, and established a Sunni entity that straddled the suddenly irrelevant border with Syria, blocking off Shia parts of Iraq from Syria. Now that Sunni stake through the heart of the Shia crescent has been removed by the military defeat of IS and the failure of the Saudis, Turks and others - all American allies - to bring about regime change in Damascus. It's intriguing to wonder what would have happened had IS halted its advances and provocations after the seizure of Mosul in 2014, toned down its rhetoric, perhaps made some local compromises and accommodations. Just after the fall of Mosul, I asked the Iraqi Kurdistan President, Masoud Barzani, whether he could live with his new neighbours. "You don't choose your neighbours," was his reply. But five weeks later, IS attacked and overran his areas, threatening the Kurdistan capital Irbil, and inflicting genocide on the Yazidis. "Had they not become international terrorists and stayed local terrorists, they could have served the original agenda of dividing the Arab east so there would be no Shia crescent," says Prof Moussalli. We may never fully understand why IS did it. Perhaps its virulent strain of Salafism just had to keep pushing outwards: "Remaining and Expanding". The Islamic State in its original form has been smashed. But for all the reasons that brought it about, IS and everything it represented will still be around in one form or another for a very long time to come. Author: Jim Muir Editor: Raffi Berg Production: Ben Milne, Susannah Stevens Graphics: Henry Clarke Price, Alison Trowsdale All images are subject to copyright
O maior incêndio que já atingiu o Parque Nacional da Chapada dos Veadeiros, uma das mais importantes unidades de conservação do Brasil, já dura oito dias e destruiu 64 mil hectares, ou 26% de sua área total - o equivalente à metade da área do município do Rio de Janeiro. Ao menos 200 pessoas trabalham 24 horas por dia no local na tentativa de conter as chamas, ainda sem controle. Em entrevista à BBC Brasil, o chefe do parque, Fernando Tatagiba, afirma que o início do fogo foi um ato criminoso. "Não existe a possibilidade de combustão espontânea nessa região e 100% dos incêndios na seca no Cerrado são provocados pelo homem. O local onde ele começou deixa claro que o incêndio foi uma ação humana", disse. O chefe do parque se refere ao ponto de início das chamas, à margem da rodovia GO-239, que liga a cidade de Alto Paraíso ao vilarejo São Jorge. Além de ser um ponto estratégico para a fuga do suposto autor do incêndio, o local facilitou a propagação das chamas. "O que mais chamou a atenção foi que o fogo começou justamente dentro do aceiro (retirada de vegetação) que fizemos para evitar que incêndios externos atingissem o parque, no momento em que o vento estava soprando na direção do parque", explica. Segundo Tatagiba, não existe causa natural possível para as chamas, o que significa que a tragédia foi provocada. "A única causa (natural) de incêndios no cerrado são raios. E a época de incidência deles é no período de chuvas, mas não tivemos tempestades nesse último mês ou queda de raios", afirma Tatagiba. O combate às chamas foi mais eficaz no último dia. Duas das linhas de fogo foram controladas na região do Rio das Cobras e outra linha segue para uma área que já foi atingida, próxima ao Morro da Baleia. Restam três frentes de trabalho: duas ao norte do parque e outra na região do Rio São Miguel. Além dos 110 brigadistas e mais de 90 pessoas que auxiliam a logística do combate às chamas, ajudam no trabalho cinco aviões-tanque do ICMBio, helicópteros do Ibama, Polícia Rodoviária Federal, Corpo de Bombeiros de Goiás e Polícia Militar do Distrito Federal. Tatagiba conta que mesmo quando não é proposital, incêndios do tipo são considerados crime, que gerou indiciamento de moradores locais por suposta participação na proliferação das chamas. O chefe do parque diz que não tem elementos para dizer quem é o autor do incêndio atual e que a identificação será estabelecida após perícias e investigações. O incêdio acontece após a expansão do parque, em junho deste ano, quando passou de 65 mil para 240 mil hectares. A área destruída agora já equivale, em tamanho, às antigas dimensões da unidade. Ambientalistas veem o incêndio como uma possível retaliação ao fato de o parque ter sido expandido, mas ainda não há comprovação. Embora o inventário de perdas não tenha sido completado, o chefe do local assegura que as dimensões da tragédia são impressionantes e que algumas áreas demorarão anos para se recuperar. "A regeneração natural é muito heterogênea. É um mosaico com diferentes formações vegetais. Algumas espécies até convivem bem com o fogo, enquanto outras são extremamente sensíveis. A resposta de cada uma é diferente, mas é certo que algumas delas necessitarão de cuidados a longo prazo para voltar ao que eram antes", diz Fernando Tatagiba. Por outro lado, o chefe do parque diz que a mobilização pública e nas redes sociais em torno do incêndio deixará um legado para os próximos anos. "Essa catástrofe vai deixar um saldo de organização pública que vamos usar numa ação de longo prazo. Vamos construir brigadas comunitárias com mais equipamentos de proteção, comunicação e treinamento", afirma. A página Rede contra fogo - Chapada dos Veadeiros, no Facebook, concentra a maior parte as doações feitas pelos voluntários e ambientalistas que atuam contra o incêndio. Além de combustíveis e alimentos para os combatentes, o dinheiro arrecadado ali é usado para comprar equipamentos modernos, como os turbosopros, que apagam as chamas com a velocidade equivalente a dez brigadistas. O Parque Nacional da Chapada dos Veadeiros tem centenas de nascentes, cursos d'água e rochas com mais de um bilhão de anos. Segundo o ICMBio, o local é abrigo de espécies ameaçadas de extinção ou endêmicas (que só existem no local), como o cervo-do-Pantanal, lobo-guará, pato-mergulhão e a onça-pintada - maior mamífero carnívoro da América do Sul.
Eran menores y eran millones. A comienzos del siglo XX, un 20% de toda la fuerza laboral de Estados Unidos estaba conformada por niños. Tenían entre 10 y 15 años, pero realizaban muchas de las tareas más duras y peligrosas a lo largo de toda la geografía del país: desde trabajar en las minas de carbón de Pensilvania hasta manipular la maquinaria de las hilanderías en el sur del país, pasando por las riesgosas fábricas de vidrio de Nueva Jersey. Casi dos millones de niños formaban parte de esa población trabajadora que requería la pujante economía estadounidense. Esta situación llamó la atención de un grupo de activistas que crearon el Comité Nacional del Trabajo Infantil (NCLC, por sus siglas en inglés), una ONG que desde entonces trabaja en la defensa y protección de los niños. En 1908, el NCLC encargó al fotógrafo Lewis Hines recorrer el país documentando con su cámara la situación del trabajo infantil en Estados Unidos. Hines se tomó el trabajo a pecho recorriendo más de 80.000 kilómetros cada año para retratar esta realidad, según comentó a The New York Times Alison Nordstrom, el curador de una exposición sobre este fotógrafo realizada en 2011 en la Fundación Henri Cartier-Bresson en París. Ese y otros esfuerzos terminarían por hacer que en la actualidad se le considere como el padre de la fotografía documental estadounidense. "Cuando empezó a hacer el trabajo pudo hacerlo con relativa facilidad, pero a medida que fue aumentando su fama como un fotógrafo que destapaba escándalos se le hizo cada vez más difícil entrar en las fábricas", comentó a la BBC el historiador y crítico de arte Anthony D. Lee. "Entonces, él empezaría a hacerse pasar por vendedor de biblias o de postales y esa excusa daba forma a su permanencia allí y a la forma cómo él se relacionaba con los niños porque él sabía que tenía que estar allí poco tiempo. Él conocía a los niños y se ganaba su amistad lo más rápido que podía porque, después de todo, él era un extraño para ellos", agregó. Hines retrataría el trabajo infantil en campos y ciudades. Dejando sus imágenes como testigo de las duras y peligrosas condiciones en las que laboraban los pequeños. "Él nunca antes había visto el tipo de trabajo que se hacía en las hilanderías. Todo estaba sucio, lleno de aceite. Las máquinas necesitaban ser lubricadas constantemente, entonces el piso estaba siempre sucio con el aceite. Era una experiencia increíble para él", apuntó Lee. "Él no halló un único tipo de trabajo infantil. Encontró una presencia generalizada de niños a lo largo de toda la industria estadounidense de comienzos del siglo XX", señaló. Entonces, el trabajo de los niños en las fábricas no solo representaba una mano de obra barata sino también útil para determinadas tareas pues su pequeños dedos y brazos podían llegar a lugares normalmente inaccesibles para un adulto y así ayudar a poner en marcha una maquinaria imperfecta y rústica. Pero, en esos esfuerzos, los pequeños también se jugaban su salud y su integridad física. Las imágenes de Hines causarían estupor y rechazo en la sociedad y fueron utilizadas para persuadir a algunos legisladores estadounidenses sobre la necesidad de regular el trabajo infantil. "Lo que Hines estaba haciendo visualmente, otras personas también lo hacían políticamente. Él era parte de una gran ola de pensamiento progresista", explicó Lee. Nordstrom indicó que Hines se convirtió en fotógrafo con la finalidad de hacer avanzar sus objetivos políticos y sociales. "Él dijo que 'tenía que mostrar las cosas que necesitaban ser cambiadas'", apuntó. En 1916 el Congreso de Estados Unidos aprobó la primera ley federal sobre trabajo infantil. Las imágenes de Hines y el activismo de muchos otros empezaban entonces a rendir sus frutos.
Cumhurbaşkanı Recep Tayyip Erdoğan, Reuters haber ajansına verdiği röportajda, Suriye'deki çatışmasızlık bölgeleri kapsamında, ülkenin kuzeybatısındaki İdlib eyaletine asker gönderileceğini açıkladı. Birleşmiş Milletler (BM) Güvenlik Kurulu toplantısı kapsamında New York'ta bulunan Erdoğan röportajda "Çatışmasızlık bölgeleri anlaşması umut vaadeden bir fikirdi… Rusya İdlib'in dışında, Türkiye de İdlib'in içinde güvenliği koruyacak" dedi. Erdoğan, Rusya Devlet Başkanı Vladimir Putin'in gelecek hafta Ankara'ya gerçekleştireceği ziyaret sırasında konunun gündeme geleceğini söyledi. Cumhurbaşkanı "Görev kolay değil… Barışı sağlamak için teröristlerin kökünü kesin olarak kurutma konusunda ne gibi ek tedbirler alınması gerektiğini Putin ile görüşeceğiz" diye konuştu. Anadolu Ajansı'na (AA) konuşan AKP Grup Başkanvekili Mustafa Elitaş da, TBMM Genel Kurulu'nun "Irak ve Suriye'ye sınır ötesi operasyon konusunda hükümete verilen yetkinin uzatılmasına" ilişkin Başbakanlık Tezkeresi için, 23 Eylül'de olağanüstü toplanacağını açıkladı. Suriye'deki çatışmasızlık bölgeleri anlaşması Türkiye, Rusya ve İran'ın girişimleriyle kabul edilmişti. Cumhurbaşkanı Erdoğan, Irak Kürdistan Bölgesel Yönetimi'nin (IKBY) Pazartesi günü gerçekleştireceği referandum nedeniyle, IKBY'ye yaptırımlar uygulamak da dahil olmak üzere karşı tedbirler almanın gözden geçirildiğini de söyledi. IKYB, referandumun yerini tutacak bir alternatif sunulmadığı takdirde referandumu yapmakta kararlı olduğunu söylüyor. Türkiye, İran ve Irak ise bağımsızlık referandumunun Irak Şam İslam Devleti'ne (IŞİD) karşı mücadeleyi zayıflatabileceği ve bölgede yeni çatışmalar çıkarabileceğini savunuyor. ABD de IKBY'ye referandumu erteleme çağrısı yapmıştı. Türk Silahlı Kuvetleri'nin (TSK) Irak sınırında tatbikatı sürerken, Türkiye Büyük Millet Meclisi (TBMM) Genel Kurulu'nun Irak ve Suriye tezkeresi için Cumartesi günü saat 16.00'da olağanüstü toplanacağı açıklandı. Süresi 30 Ekim'de dolan tezkerenin görüşülmesinin öne çekilmesi, IKBY'ye bir mesaj olarak yorumlanıyor. Cuma günü ise Milli Güvenlik Kurulu Cumhurbaşkanı Erdoğan başkanlığında toplanacak. Ardından Bakanlar Kurulu toplantısı gerçekleştirilecek. Erdoğan röportajda "Ne tür yaptırımların uygulanması ve ne zaman uygulanması gerektiğini gecikmeden ele alacağız" dedi. Yaptırımların içeriği konusunda detay vermedi. BM Genel Kurulu toplantısı dolayısıyla New York'ta bulunan Dışişleri Bakanı Mevlüt Çavuşoğlu, Irak Dışişleri Bakanı İbrahim Caferi ve İran Dışişleri Bakanı Muhammed Cevad Zarif Perşembe günü gerçekleştirdikleri üçlü görüşmenin ardından yayımladıkları bildiride, karşı-önlemleri eşgüdüm içinde almayı gözden geçirme konusunda mutabakata vardıklarını açıklamışlardı.
The Donald Trump condolence-call story is a White House headache that shows no signs of abating. It started badly for the president, as he responded to a question about US military casualties in Niger by questioning how his predecessors dealt with the families of war dead. It got worse, as the story morphed into one of an allegedly callous presidential call to Myeshia Johnson, a grieving widow of one of the US soldiers killed in Niger. Now it's devolved into a he-said, she said debate, with Democratic Congresswoman Frederica Wilson - who knew the slain soldier - and Ms Johnson and her family claiming the president mishandled the call, while Mr Trump and chief of staff John Kelly insist everything went smoothly. Needless to say, arguing with a war widow is a no-win situation, regardless of who has facts on their side. President George W Bush notably withstood harsh criticism from some bereaved families during the Iraq War without swiping back. This president is different, which should come as a surprise to no one at this point. His choices could come at a political high price, however. Here are five reasons why. Mr Trump campaigned on being a defender of the US military and, in particular, US veterans. Time and again he said those in the armed services weren't being treated well and railed against ongoing evidence of bureaucratic bungling in the veterans' health system. As a candidate and as president, he has boasted of how much the military loves him and regularly surrounded himself with soldiers and martial symbolism - a way of burnishing his credentials as a strong commander-in-chief. He appointed ex-generals to his administration and lined his redecorated Oval Office with flags. Now he has to deal with accusations that he is dishonouring the memory of service member who died on his watch. Questions are already swirling about why these soldiers were put in harm's way and whether enough was done to ensure their safety. Reporters are digging into other contacts Mr Trump has had with the families of slain soldiers. One widow has released a recording of her call with the president. According to The Atlantic, at least 11 of the 46 families had received neither a letter nor a call from the president. One father told the Washington Post Mr Trump had promised him a personal cheque for $25,000 (£18,900) but hadn't delivered. The White House has since announced the money is on the way. Some families who have heard nothing said they were angry. The next time the president surrounds himself with soldiers, the public might be reminded of this - and become angry, too. An important job of a modern US president is to serve as "consoler-in-chief"; a stable, reassuring voice in times of national distress or tragedy. This can take place on a large scale - when visiting the site of a natural disaster or high-profile accident - or small, in comforting a family member grieving over their loss. It's a skill that successful politicians learn early on - the human touch - and anti-politician Trump is having a difficult time with it. In the days after Puerto Rico was struck by a massive hurricane, he was tweeting about the territory's pre-existing financial mismanagement and escalating a feud with San Juan's mayor. In the hours after a white supremacist rally in Charlottesville led to violent clashes and the death of a counter-protester, Mr Trump gave a statement about how there was blame on both sides. Mr Trump responded to the militant attack on London Bridge by criticising the city's mayor. He's responded to other attacks, foreign and domestic, by claiming they vindicated his policy proscriptions. The president has also developed a reputation for getting embroiled in petty disputes. His counter-puncher mentality, while it has served him well against his presidential rivals, also has led him into spats with a former beauty queen, celebrities, sports stars, major companies, prominent journalists, members of his own party and the parents of a Muslim-American soldier killed in Iraq. That last one seems pretty relevant at this point. It's worth remembering that this whole swirling story started because Mr Trump was asked why four US soldiers had died in Niger and why it took him so long to respond. In fact, it had been 12 days and the president had issued no statement - tweet, comment or White House release - about the incident whatsoever. Mr Trump defended himself by taking an (inaccurate) shot at his predecessors for not making similar calls. Although he later backed away from such a sweeping statement, the following day he told a reporter to ask his chief of staff, John Kelly if he had received a call from President Obama. Mr Kelly's son had been killed in Afghanistan, and the ex-general has been reluctant to publicly discuss details of his grief. The White House said he hadn't been called, but it was later revealed that he attended an event for Gold Star families - parents of slain soldiers - hosted by the Obama administration. Then the president called Johnson's widow, and ... didn't help the situation. Now he's in a war of words with a sharp-tongued Democratic congresswoman over a story that, however one slices it, does not paint the president in a good light. When Mr Kelly defended the president later that week, he insisted the president handled a difficult call well - although he confirmed that Mr Trump did say the slain soldier "knew what he signed up for". Since then, the president has seemingly enjoyed trading barbs with Congresswoman Wilson, calling her "wacky" and a "disaster" for Democrats. When Ms Johnson insisted in a television interview that Ms Wilson's account was correct - and that the president didn't even know her husband's name - the president took to Twitter within hours to say she was incorrect. Mr Trump once again has shown that he doesn't believe in the Law of Holes - that when you're in a hole, you stop digging. Instead he seems to think that if he keeps digging long enough, he'll come out on the other side. This story could have been nipped in the bud early, with some sort of presidential statement of condolence shortly after the 4 October Niger incident. In fact, according to Politico, a release had been drafted and circulated within the National Security Council on 5 October - but it never saw the light of day. During Wednesday's White House press conference, Sarah Huckabee Sanders said that there were administration protocols that had to be followed before the names of slain US servicemen could be released - but that wouldn't have applied to the draft statement responding to reports, which didn't mention the soldiers' names. "Somebody screwed up here, OK?" Leon Panetta, who served as defence secretary and CIA chief in the Obama administration, told The Washington Post. "You don't let that amount of time pass when our men and women in uniform have been killed." Compounding matters was that it appears Mr Trump went into the conversation with Johnson's widow without a clear script. It's not outside the realm of possibility that while Mr Trump's intentions were good, his preparation was poor - and he misspoke or made comments open to misinterpretation. Since Mr Trump first brought up his contacts with the Gold Star families, the White House has reportedly been scrambling to send out presidential letters of condolences to those who had not yet received them. According to a leaked Pentagon document, the administration didn't even have a current list of slain military personnel when the president told reporters he had spoken with "virtually" all of them. All of this could have been avoided with more careful planning. It's a(nother) distraction This is a big month for Mr Trump. If he wants to see Congress pass a tax cut before the end of the year, the coming weeks will be when it gets off the ground. Democrats are pushing hard to paint the proposal as an unaffordable sop to the rich - and Republicans need to get their message out before public opinion is solidified. The president also took a high-risk gamble in ending cost-sharing subsidies that help insurance companies provide affordable policies to less affluent Americans. Without congressional action, some premiums could skyrocket. If Mr Trump isn't vigorous in defending his decision, he'll be the one that takes the brunt of the blame. The federal budget process is heating up as well. Although the day of fiscal reckoning was pushed back to the end of December thanks to a deal with the Democrats, that deadline is growing closer every day. If the president wants to see funds for his priorities, like the Mexican border wall, he'll need to be fully engaged in congressional negotiations. Speaking of negotiations, talks with Mexico and Canada to modify the North America Trade Agreement are hanging by a thread. If they fall apart, the president may have to make the case to the public that pulling out of the deal won't do lasting harm to the US economy. All the oxygen in Washington is being sucked up by the condolence-call story, however. Although Mr Trump likes to tout his presidential accomplishments, his record so far is bereft of legislative victories. Recent events have done little to help his cause.
Compartilhe isto permite que você compartilhe o conteúdo a partir do site para celular da BBC via e-mail ou através do seu site favorito de mídia social. O que é Compartilhe isto via e-mail? Compartilhe isto permite que você compartilhe o conteúdo do website BBC Mobil usando uma conta de e-mail que você tenha registrada no seu celular. Como funciona? Caso você veja alguma página do BBC Mobile que queira compartilhar, clique no logo de e-mail existente na área Compartilhe isto localizada na parte inferior da página. Isto abrirá um e-mail dentro da seção de e-mail do seu cellular para que você possa acessar facilmente sua lista de contatos e possa escrever uma mensagem para acompanhar a página que deseja compartiilhar. O que preciso fazer para que isto funcione? Para que você possa usar o Compartilhe isto através de e-mail, precisa ter uma conta de e-mail registrada no seu telefone celular. Para fazer isto, consulte o manual do seu telefone. Quanto custa? A BBC não cobra pelo uso do Compartilhe isto via e-mail. Entretanto, pode ser que a sua operadora de telefone celular cobre pela quantidade de dados utilizada. Caso não tenha certeza quanto custa a utilização de dados de acordo com sua tarifa, deve consultar sua operadora. A BBC retém alguma informação a meu respeito? Não. Como você vai estar usando a sua própria conta de e-mail, nós não teremos acesso a nenhum dado pessoal ou mesmo a sua mensagem. Para maiores informações sobre a política de privacidade da BBC você deve consultar Privacy & Cookies Policy. O que é Compartilhe isto via rede de mídia social? Compartilhe isto permite que você compartilhe o conteúdo do website BBC Mobile através de sua página no Facebook, ou sua conta no Twitter ou Google +. Como funciona? Caso você veja alguma página do BBC Mobile que queira compartilhar, clique no logo de rede mídia existente na área Compartilhe isto localizada na parte inferior da página. Você precisará estar conectado à sua conta. Você poderá adicionar uma mensagem e, no caso do Facebook e Google +, também será postada uma imagem da página. A página que você deseja compartilhar sera exibida no seu mural do Facebook, na sua linha de tempo do Twitter ou Google +. Eu tenho que dar à BBC os detalhes do meu login nas redes de mídia social? Não. Ao clicar no logo do site de mídia social da sua escolha,você sairá imediatamente do site BBC Mobile entrando na página de acesso da rede social, portanto, em nenhum momento a BBC terá acesso aos seus detalhes de log in. Porque serei direcionado diretamente à tela de postagem sem que sejam pedidos novamente meus detalhes de log in? Em alguns telefones seus detalhes de log in ficam armazenados no browser do seu celular, o que significa que você não precisa se conectar a cada vez que desejar fazer um post em seu perfil. A BBC retém alguma informação a meu respeito? Não. Como você vai estar saindo do site da BBC e se conectando à sua conta da rede de mídia social, não teremos acesso a nenhum detalhe do seu login pessoal ou mesmo à sua mensagem. Para maiores informações sobre a política de privacidade da BBC você deve consultar Privacy & Cookies Policy..
قال خبراء إن الأشخاص الذين يقضون سنوات أطول في التعليم أقل عرضة لخطر الإصابة بأمراض القلب بما في ذلك النوبات القلبية وفشل القلب. ووفقا لدراسة حديثة، إن من يقضون فترات أطول من عمرهم في التعليم أقل عرضة بنسبة تصل إلى 30 في المائة لتطور أمراض القلب التاجية. واختبر الباحثون 162 متغيرا وراثيا ترتبط بالاستمرار في التعليم. وخلصت الدراسة، التي نشرت في دورية "ذابريتش ميديكال جورنال" إلى أن زيادة عدد السنوات التي يقضيها الناس في التعليم قد تقلل من خطر الإصابة بأمراض القلب التاجية بمعدل "كبير جدا". وأجرى فريق الباحثين الدولي من جامعة لندن، وجامعة لوزان في سويسرا، وجامعة أكسفورد بتحليل المتغيرات الوراثية بين 543 ألفا و733 رجلا وإمرأة في أوروبا. ووجد الباحثون أن قضاء 3.6 سنوات إضافية في التعليم، وهو ما يعادل فترة الحصول على درجة جامعية، تساهم بتقليل حوالي الثلث من خطر الإصابة بأمراض القلب التاجية. كما أن وجود استعداد وراثي لقضاء وقت أطول في التعليم ارتبط أيضا بانخفاض مؤشر كتلة الجسم، أى المؤشر الذي يربط وزن الجسم بالطول ويكشف الإصابة بالسمنة والبدانة أو النحافة. وكان هؤلاء الناس أيضا أقل عرضة للتدخين وكان لديهم نسبة مناسبة من الدهون في الدم. وتشير النتائج إلى أن قضاء المزيد من الوقت في التعليم قد يؤدي إلى "فوائد صحية كبيرة". وقال الباحثون إن "زيادة عدد السنوات التى يقضىها الناس فى النظام التعليمى قد يقلل من خطر الإصابة بمرض القلب التاجى بدرجة كبيرة فى وقت لاحق "، مشيرين إلى أن هذه النتائج يجب أن تحفز النقاشات حول زيادة التحصيل العلمي لدى عامة السكان لتحسين الصحة. ويحدث مرض القلب التاجي عندما تضيق الشرايين التاجية عن طريق تراكم تدريجي للدهون في تلك الشرايين، وتشمل أعراضها الرئيسية الذبحة الصدرية والنوبات القلبية وفشل القلب. وتعليقا على هذه الدراسة، قال تيم فرايلينغ، أستاذ علم الوراثة البشرية، جامعة إكستر: "هناك روابط قوية بين الصحة والثروة، وهو ما يعني بالتأكيد وجود علاقة بين الصحة والتعليم". وأضاف "هذه الدراسة مهمة لأن الباحثين اعتمدوا طريقة عشوائية فعالة مع أشخاص يحملون مؤهلات تعليمية مختلفة، من خلال مقارنة ميلهم الجيني لمواصلة فترة أطول في التعليم". وقال الدكتور مايك كنابتون، المدير الطبي المساعد في مؤسسة القلب البريطانية: " هذا البحث يمكننا من إضافة تحسين صحة القلب إلى قائمة فوائد البقاء في التعليم لفترة أطول، بجانب فوائده في التوظيف والاستقلال المالي". وأوضح أن "هذه النتائج لا تمثل مفاجأة لأن قضاء المزيد من الوقت في التعليم يرتبط مع انخفاض معدلات التدخين وانخفاض مؤشر كتلة الجسم، والتي هي عوامل خطر كبيرة للإصابة بأمراض القلب التاجية"، مضيفا أن البحث ركز أيضا على تحليل التصرف الجيني للناس. وتابع "هذا أمر مثير للاهتمام حقا، فمن خلال النظر في كيفية تأثير الجينات في الإضابة بأمراض القلب، يمكننا أن نقترب خطوة واحدة لاكتشاف دواء جديد لعلاج أمراض القلب التاجية، وهي مسؤولة عن 70 ألف حالة وفاة في بريطانيا".
It's all about the money. The UK and the EU have managed together to make a tiptoe forward in the Brexit talks. But listening to EU leaders this afternoon it is abundantly clear that unless they change their minds, the UK is going to have to budge on the cash to make enough progress by December to be able to truly get on to the next phase of talks. Certainly public money is tight in this administration, but frankly a hefty Brexit bill in exchange for a good deal would be the one big payment that the Chancellor Philip Hammond would be happy to sign off. A move on the money is, therefore, primarily a political problem rather than anything to do with the actual funds.
Thống đốc Carles Puigdemont của Catalonia đang phải đối mặt với áp lực ngày càng tăng về việc phải hủy bỏ nghị trình độc lập. Có nhiều suy đoán cho rằng ông có thể sẽ tuyên bố độc lập sau một cuộc trưng cầu dân ý gây tranh cãi vừa qua. Pháp và Đức đều thể hiện sự ủng hộ cho một Tây Ban Nha thống nhất. Thị trưởng Barcelona kêu gọi ông Puigdemont và Thủ tướng Tây Ban Nha Mariano Rajoy "phải làm giảm căng thẳng" cuộc khủng hoảng. Catalonia tuyên bố độc lập 'vào thứ Hai tới' Catalonia và lá cờ vàng bốn sọc đỏ Trước khi bài diễn văn của ông Puigdemont tại quốc hội Catalonia diễn ra vào tối thứ Ba, thị trưởng Ada Colau đã kêu gọi ông ngừng việc tuyên bố độc lập, và cũng kêu gọi ông Rajoy ngừng sự kiểm soát từ Madrid. Bà Colau nói: "Tôi yêu cầu họ ngừng đưa ra bất kỳ quyết định nào có thể làm xóa sổ khả năng đối thoại và hòa giải. "Đó là hành động can đảm nhất mà họ có thể làm bây giờ." Nhà lãnh đạo đối lập Đảng Xã hội Chủ nghĩa Tây Ban Nha, Pedro Sanchez cũng phản đối việc độc lập. Ông nói với các phóng viên ở Barcelona rằng ông ủng hộ chính quyền Madrid "trước bất kỳ nỗ lực nào nhằm phá vỡ sự ổn định xã hội" nếu việc độc lập được tuyên bố đơn phương. Chính phủ Tây Ban Nha đã đe dọa sẽ đình chỉ quyền tự trị của khu vực đông bắc. Áp lực kinh tế cũng đang gia tăng đối với các nhà lãnh đạo ủng hộ độc lập vùng Catalonia với việc các công ty lớn dự định chuyển các văn phòng chính ra khỏi khu vực. Công ty cơ sở hạ tầng Abertis, tập đoàn bất động sản Inmobiliaria và hãng viễn thông Cellnex đã công bố kế hoạch chuyển đến Madrid. Các ngân hàng lớn Caixabank và Sabadell cũng thông báo họ đang chuyển văn phòng ra khỏi khu vực. Catalonia là một trong những vùng giàu có nhất của Tây Ban Nha, chiếm 1/4 sản lượng xuất khẩu của cả nước. Người phát ngôn của Thủ tướng Đức Angela Merkel hôm Thứ Hai cho biết bà "khẳng định sự ủng hộ của bà đối với sự thống nhất của Tây Ban Nha" trong một cuộc điện đàm với ông Mariano Rajoy. Bộ trưởng phụ trách các vấn đề Châu Âu của Pháp Nathalie Loiseau nói nếu có tuyên bố độc lập thì "nó sẽ không được công nhận". Liên minh Châu Âu cũng đã nêu rõ quan điểm rằng nếu Catalonia tách ra khỏi Tây Ban Nha, khu vực này sẽ không còn là một phần của EU. Quốc hội Catalonia đã dự kiến họp vào thứ Hai với dự định thông qua tuyên bố độc lập, dựa trên đa số phiếu "Thuận" hôm 1/10. Tuy nhiên, phiên họp đã bị Tòa án Hiến pháp Tây Ban Nha chặn lại. Tòa Hiến pháp cũng từng tìm cách ngăn chặn cuộc trưng cầu dân ý. Có nhiều suy đoán xoay quanh bài phát biểu sắp tới của ông Puigdemont. Ông có thể yêu cầu Quốc hội tuyên bố độc lập trên cơ sở luật trưng cầu dân ý đã thông qua hồi tháng trước, và điều này có thể dẫn đến việc chính phủ Tây Ban Nha đình chỉ nghị quyết, theo điều 155 của Hiến pháp. BBC nhận định dù ông Puigdemont nói gì trong bài phát hiểu, tuyên bố của ông cũng khiến các nghị sĩ phải tuyên bố độc lập trong vòng 48 tiếng, theo luật của Catalan. Tuy nhiên, một nghị sĩ đảng của ông Puigdemont đã nói với BBC vào hôm Chủ nhật rằng kế hoạch hiện tại là chấm dứt tuyên bố đơn phương như vậy và thay vào đó là "tuyên bố tượng trưng". Đã có nhiều cuộc biểu tình quy mô lớn xảy ra ở Barcelona, từ cả phe ủng hộ và cả phe phản đối việc ly khai. Ít nhất 350.000 người đã tham gia biểu tình ủng hộ sự thống nhất hôm Chủ nhật. Kết quả cuối cùng từ cuộc trưng cầu dân ý cho thấy 43% cử tri Catalonia đã đi bầu và 90% ủng hộ độc lập. Tuy nhiên, cử tri bỏ phiếu "Chống" đã tẩy chay cuộc trưng cầu dân ý này.
El fútbol en Chile es de extremos. No hay punto medio. Pero lo que ha sido una tónica a lo largo de su historia, ahora alcanzó un nivel nunca visto. La llamada generación dorada del fútbol chileno sacó a la Roja del ostracismo internacional hasta convertirla en una de las selecciones más admiradas del mundo. Con un fútbol dinámico, de presión, ofensivo, liderados por figuras como Alexis Sánchez y Arturo Vidal, Chile pasó de estar en el lugar 45 de la clasificación FIFA al cuarto puesto en menos de diez años. En ese período clasificó a la Copa del Mundo de Sudáfrica 2010 finalizando en segundo lugar en las eliminatorias y luego se convirtió en una de las sensaciones en el Mundial de Brasil 2014 tras vencer y eliminar a España y poner contra las cuerdas a la selección anfitriona, con el disparo de Mauricio Pinilla contra el travesaño en el último minuto de la prórroga. Eso sólo fue el preámbulo de la gloria que llegaría después con los títulos obtenidos en la Copa América 2015 y en la edición centenario al año siguiente. Desde Europa llovieron elogios para la Roja sudamericana que en la Copa Confederaciones venció a la Portugal de Cristiano Ronaldo y le plantó cara a Alemania en la final, perdiendo con el dolor del error de Marcelo Díaz. Pero en ese mundo de extremos Chile quedó por fuera del Mundial de Rusia 2018 con la misma generación de futbolistas que le dieron las mayores alegrías de su historia. La eliminación no sólo transformó los elogios en críticas, sino que también mostró cómo la selección que una vez fue admirada se había convertido en una que generaba sentimientos de antipatía en toda América Latina. Algo que fue evidente con las celebraciones que se multiplicaron por el continente y la mayoría de los comentarios dejados por aficionados en cada uno de los artículos publicados por BBC Mundo relacionados con las eliminatorias sudamericanas. Incluso hubo un periodista chileno, Juan Cristóbal Guarello, de ADN Radio, que hizo una afirmación que se hizo viral en las redes sociales: "somos la selección más odiada de Sudamérica". En 2013 en BBC Mundo nos hicimos una pregunta parecida sobre si México era la selección más antipática del continente cuando los aficionados de muchos países celebraban los problemas que estaba teniendo el Tri para clasificar al Mundial de Brasil. Sin tratarse de un estudio científico, no hubo dudas entre las personas consultadas en que ese era el caso. Pero como en el fútbol la memoria es selectiva y lo que importa es el presente, ahora la etiqueta de "antipático" se posa sobre Chile. Lo más fácil es culpar de ese cambio de percepción a los títulos que obtuvo Chile en 2015 y 2016, pero lo cierto es que no se trata simplemente de los triunfos, sino la forma en que se consiguieron. Guarello enumeró junto a otros compañeros una serie de hechos para sustentar su tajante afirmación. Habló de la soberbia de algunos jugadores, del polémico mensaje dejado en el comienzo de las eliminatorias en los vestuarios del estadio Nacional en Lima ("Respeto, por aquí pasó el Campeón de América") y de la constante alusión a los títulos en las redes sociales. En la tertulia también se mencionó el incidente del dedo de Gonzalo Jara al uruguayo Edinson Cavani y de cómo los futbolistas presumían continuamente de los logros que habían conseguido frente a sus rivales en el campo. Una de sus víctimas favoritas fue México tras la contundente victoria 7-0 en la Copa América Centenario que fue bautizada como "la masacre de Santa Clara". También apuntaron a la afición chilena, que terminó siendo la más multada por la FIFA de todas las eliminatorias a Rusia 2018, incluyendo los procesos clasificatorios de la seis confederaciones del organismo. "No respetamos las diferentes culturas. No respetamos a las personas en sus propios países. En Sudáfrica se me cayó la cara de vergüenza de cómo los chilenos trataban a los locales. El racismo, el clasismo. Y eso también se trasladó a los jugadores", fue el comentario de Guarello. Un hecho que se resaltó fue la invasión que protagonizaron aficionados chilenos a la sala de prensa del estadio Maracaná previo al partido frente a España en el mundial de Brasil. Y por último está el hecho del reclamo de Chile a la alineación indebida del jugador Nelson Cabrera en Bolivia, que puso en pie de guerra a Argentina, Ecuador, Colombia, Paraguay y Uruguay. Lo irónico es que debido a ese recurso la selección chilena no clasificó al repechaje contra Nueva Zelanda debido a que la sanción a Bolivia benefició aún más a Perú. Chile no estará en Rusia 2018 y no parece que habrán muchos en América Latina que lamentarán su ausencia.
Earlier this week, it was reported that some of the close-up shots in Blue Planet II, which returns on Sunday, were filmed in a lab, rather than in the wild. The Guardian said some crucial footage could only have been captured on film in "controlled laboratory conditions". Attenborough defended the use of these shots, saying they are "not in anyway misleading", and makers say the series was overwhelmingly shot on location. It's not the first time this issue has come up - back in 2011, a Frozen Planet programme, narrated by Sir David Attenborough, used some film footage of polar bear cubs in a Dutch animal park. One segment of Blue Planet II includes close-up lab footage of coral bleaching, which producers said could only be filmed with lights and specialised cameras. We spoke to executive producer James Honeyborne about how much is filmed in the wild and the techniques involved in capturing those critical moments. The overwhelming majority of Blue Planet II has been filmed in the wild. Blue Planet II is a natural history series, led by the latest scientific discoveries and we've collaborated with hundreds of scientists around the world's oceans. When working in the field, studying the smaller marine creatures, scientists sometimes set-up marine labs. We've been lucky enough to access these for our 'macro' filming, to bring the full wonder and detail of marine life to our audience. In the episode Coasts, we filmed rock pools with a marine lab in Vancouver. To film in the wild would have been too disruptive for the wildlife, and it would have been impossible to film close-ups of this magical world, so we worked with scientists to accurately recreate a rock pool in the controlled conditions of the lab. In the episode Deep, by collaborating with scientists based on a number of research vessels who were sampling the deep sea, we were able to film portraits of creatures such as fangtooth, that would otherwise be impossible to see. Filming took place at sea in pitch-black, refrigerated filming chambers on board the ships. And in the episode Green Seas, the underground burrow of a zebra mantis was recreated by scientists and film makers, to reveal the full story of the mantis shrimp's behaviour. Macro-filming is done on location - on board boats, or by the coast. We have made short films for those who are interested, and because as you'll see, it's still a real challenge for the filmmakers! You can check out the Making Of... films on the programme page for those who wish to delve deeper into the filming techniques. To compile a full portrait of the oceans, we need to tell the amazing story of tiny creatures, as well as the big ones. Sometimes we have to film in controlled conditions to protect the welfare of the animals. In others instances, it's to protect the safety of the scientists and crew. The vast majority of our audience prefer for us not to 'break the spell' in the commentary, so we don't explain how we achieved shots during the film itself. And we only have time for one making-of sequence at the end of each episode. We try to choose the one which was the most challenging to achieve, or the one in which the story of the crew's endeavours is most likely to engage the audience. But online, we share in-depth insight into all of our filming techniques, through 'making of' films, blogs, interviews and Q&As. That way we can maintain the trusting relationship with our audience that we enjoy. Absolutely not. On every episode we have a minimum of half a dozen scientific advisors who help us ensure that what we show is true to nature. That's the point of it all. To represent nature the best we can. Blue Planet II returns to BBC One from Sunday. Follow us on Facebook, on Twitter @BBCNewsEnts, or on Instagram at bbcnewsents. If you have a story suggestion email entertainment.news@bbc.co.uk.
Zimbabwe's First Lady Grace Mugabe has warned of a possible coup plot amid growing tensions in the fight to succeed her husband. She says allies of Vice-President Emmerson Mnangagwa are threatening the lives of those who don't support him to replace President Robert Mugabe, 93. Mrs Mugabe herself and Mr Mnangagwa are the front-runners and their rivalry has split the governing Zanu-PF. The row comes after Mr Mnangagwa claimed that he was poisoned in August. His supporters have suggested that rivals within Zanu-PF were responsible, although Mr Mnangagwa has distanced himself from such claims. He has told state media that he remains loyal to President Mugabe. An angry Grace Mugabe departed from a prepared speech at an event in Harare to attack Mr Mnangagwa. "We are being threatened night and day that if a particular person does not become president we will be killed," she said. "We will not bow to that pressure. They say there will be a coup, but no-one will recognise you. The African Union will not recognise you, the SADC [Southern African Development Community] will not." Mr Mnangagwa fell ill at a political rally led by President Mugabe in August and had to be airlifted to South Africa for treatment. His supporters suggested a rival group within Zanu-PF had poisoned him and appeared to blame ice cream from Mrs Mugabe's dairy firm. But on Thursday, Mrs Mugabe dismissed the suggestions. She said: "Why would my dairy business prepare a single poisoned ice cream cup just for him? Why would I want to kill him? I am the wife of the president. Who is Mnangagwa, who is he? What do I want from him?" Addressing reporters earlier, Mr Mnangagwa said that while doctors had confirmed that he was poisoned, it was "false and malicious" to suggest that it was at the hands of the first lady. Shingai Nyoka, BBC News, Harare The tension between 93-year-old Zimbabwean President Robert Mugabe's possible successors is growing. And in his characteristic fashion, President Mugabe has stayed out of the factional fights, refusing to take sides - publicly at least. It is his wife, Grace Mugabe, who has taken the lead in voicing concerns about the vice-president. Even though she doesn't officially speak for the president, her candid utterances reflect the anxiety within the first family over the vice-president's influence. Mr Mnangagwa, who has worked with President Mugabe for more than 40 years, has been influential in previous election victories. It is inconceivable that President Mugabe would want to sack such a key figure ahead of elections next year. But as Zimbabweans are seeing, in Zanu-PF politics anything is possible and no position is guaranteed. Mr Mnangagwa pledged unflinching loyalty to the party and to the president. Earlier this week, Zimbabwe's other vice-president, Phelekezela Mphoko, publicly reprimanded Mr Mnangagwa, accusing him of trying to "destabilise" the country. Mr Mphoko said doctors had confirmed to the president that stale food and not poison was to blame. He said there was an agenda to "undermine the authority" of the president and fuel tensions within the party.
Если вы слишком опытны и чересчур знающи для своей нынешней работы, от вас работодателю может быть мало проку. Или все-таки вашей избыточной квалификации можно найти применение? Когда Аманда Хиберт, директор по связям с общественностью из Калгари (Канада), несколько лет назад заняла эту должность в фирме, продающей витаминные добавки, она уже тогда понимала, что ее квалификация слишком высока. Однако ее привлекли высокая зарплата и возможность работать в крупной компании. Приступив к исполнению обязанностей, вскоре она обнаружила, что работа слишком проста для нее. "Было скучно, задачи были слишком легкими для меня, и мне казалось, что работа не имеет смысла", - вспоминает она. Через пару лет она уволилась. И подобные случаи нередки. Примерно каждый шестой работник в Британии имеет избыточное для своей нынешней должности образование, и 58% выпускников университетов занимают должности, на которых не требуется университетского диплома. В США примерно один из четырех работников со степенью бакалавра имеет слишком высокую для своей текущей должности квалификацию. Многие компании сейчас сделали высшее образование неотъемлемым требованием к поступающим на работу - даже на тех должностях, где ранее университетское образование было не нужно. Это привело к своего рода "инфляции должностей", когда те или иные позиции занимают работники, для которых эти обязанности скучны и слишком легки для исполнения. Вроде бы эта тенденция не должна пугать работодателей - ведь они в любом случае получают высокообразованную, умелую рабочую силу. Однако в реальности все не так радужно. Одно из исследований показало, что компании вредят сами себе, нанимая сотрудников, чья квалификация слишком высока для их должностей. Казалось бы, это должно быть преимуществом - иметь в своих рядах умелого и высокообразованного сотрудника с опытом работы. Однако если эта работа слишком проста для такого человека, этот сотрудник - потенциальный источник негативных настроений в коллективе, подчеркивает Беррин Эрдоган, профессор менеджмента из университета в Портленде, штат Орегон (США). Среди таких настроений может быть и чувство недовольства, возникающее вследствие скуки, и чувство излишнего самоуважения, и ожидание того, что вам, такому умному и опытному, все должны быть благодарны. Эти настроения неизбежно разносятся по всему офису, отравляя рабочую атмосферу, подчеркивает Беррин Эрдоган. "Это самое чувство излишнего самоуважения разрушительно действует внутри коллектива, особенно там, где необходима слаженная работа в команде", - отмечает она. Исследование Эрдоган показало, что если чья-то квалификация слишком высока для занимаемой должности, этот человек чувствует себя чужаком в коллективе, не таким, как все, что в итоге может привести к его изоляции и одиночеству. Кроме того, такие люди как правило не полностью погружаются в ту работу, которую должны выполнять, считая, что они "выше этого", подчеркивает Брюс Талгэн, специалист по подготовке руководящих кадров и автор книги "27 проблем, с которыми сталкиваются руководители" (The 27 Challenges Managers Face). "Низкий моральный дух ведет к тому, что они просто скучают и даже не выполняют в должной степени ту работу, которую обязаны делать", - говорит он. Такая ситуация, ведущая к возникновению проблем в коллективе, особенно характерна для молодых сотрудников, считает Талгэн. У этого поколения, у миллениалов, говорит он, ожидания в отношении себя особенно высоки. Исследование, проведенное в начале этого года учеными из Флоридского Атлантического университета, показало, что молодые сотрудники более склонны считать, что они талантливей, чем предполагает та должность, которую они занимают. Что ведет к разочарованию в работе. Такие сотрудники более склонны к вызывающему поведению, что выражается в регулярных опозданиях, уходе с работы раньше положенного и даже кражах на рабочем месте и травле коллег, отмечает Майкл Харари, доцент на факультете менеджмента этого университета. Правда, такое происходит не всегда. Еще одно недавнее исследование - Эрдоган и доцента бизнес-школы Дарэмского университета Хон Дена - выявило определенные черты характера у работников с избыточной квалификацией, которые крайне важны для того, чтобы без особых проблем влиться в любой коллектив и добросовестно работать. "Работники, квалификация которых излишнее высока, но обладающие хорошими коммуникативными способностями и талантом влияния на других, вполне могут вести себя приемлемо в коллективе, и их считают компетентными и приятными в общении", - говорит Ден. "Такие работники пользуются среди коллег популярностью, им рады, в результате чего они чувствуют, что их ценят, и как результат работают с позитивным настроем". Позитивное влияние при межличностном общении сводится к тому, что человек приспосабливается к окружению, поддерживает дружеские отношения с коллегами и воздерживается от критики как работы, так и руководства. Сотрудники, которые придерживаются такого поведения, трудятся более продуктивно, добавляет Хон Ден. И вот тут-то крайне важна позиция руководства. Чтобы работники с излишней квалификацией не заскучали, начальство должно давать им более творческие и требующие напряжения задания, поручать сложные проекты, для выполнения которых требуется тесное сотрудничество с коллегами, говорит Элизабет Килан, профессор Крэнфилдской школы управления (Британия). Впрочем, "руководители должны иметь в виду, что это может привести к недовольству других сотрудников и зависти с их стороны", предупреждает Килан. "Поэтому важно открыто обсуждать внутри коллектива, почему тому или иному сотруднику поручено особое задание". Еще один способ победить негативные настроения среди излишне квалифицированных работников - быть с ними откровенными в вопросах продвижения по карьерной лестнице. Эрдоган говорит, что однажды имела беседу с менеджером, который принял на должность человека, заведомо гораздо более умелого и опытного, чем требовалось. Тот менеджер рассказал, что откровенно обрисовал новому сотруднику его перспективы и попросил проявить терпение. "Он сказал тому сотруднику: если вы проработаете на этой должности хотя бы год, вас ждет продвижение на более высокую должность, - рассказывает Беррин Эрдоган. - И тот ответил: "Отлично! Я не хотел бы остаться на этой должности навсегда". Итак, что делать, если в подобной ситуации оказались вы? Возможно, вам поможет такая же откровенность. Не стесняйтесь честно объяснить своему будущему работодателю, что вы умеете гораздо больше, чем требует ваша должность, но вы хотите получить ее, чтобы затем сделать карьеру, советует Талгэн. "Не принижайте своих достижений - ни в резюме, ни на собеседовании, - говорит он. - Будьте откровенны и естественны". Прочитать оригинал этой статьи на английском языке можно на сайте BBC Capital.
මියන්මාර හමුදාව සිය හමුදා භටයන් විසින් ස්ත්‍රී දූෂණ සහ මනුෂ්‍ය ඝාතන සිදු කරනු ලැබ ඇති බවට එල්ල වන චෝදනා ප්‍රතික්ෂේප කරයි. පසුගිය වසරේ දී රෝහින්ග්‍යා මුස්ලිම් ජාතිකයන් බහුතරයක් වෙසෙන "රකායින්" ප්‍රාන්තයේ කළ වැටලීමක දී මියන්මාර හමුදා භටයන් විසින් ඉහත කී අපරාධ සිදු කරනු ලැබ ඇති බවට එක්සත් ජාතීන්ගේ සංවිධානය චෝදනා කරයි. ඒ සම්බන්ධයෙන් පරීක්ෂණයක් සිදුකළ මියන්මාර හමුදාව පවසන්නේ එම චෝදනා "අසත්‍ය සහ නිර්මාණය කරන ලද" ඒවා බවය. ගම්වාසීන් තුන්දහසක් සහ හමුදා සාමාජිකයන් එකසිය අසූ හතර දෙනෙකුගෙන් එහිදී ප්‍රකාශ ලබා ගත් බවත් මියන්මාර හමුදාව පවසයි. පොලිස් මුරපොලකට එල්ල වූ ප්‍රහාරයකින් අනතුරුව මියන්මාර යුද හමුදාව සෝදිසි මෙහෙයුමක් දියත් කිරීමත් සමග රෝහින්ග්‍යා මුස්ලිම් වැසියන් හැට පන්දහසකට ආසන්න පිරිසක් බංග්ලාදේශය වෙත පළා ගියහ. ඕස්ට්‍රේලියාව බලා යාමට උත්සාහ දරමින් සිටියදී ශ්‍රී ලංකාවේ මුහුදු තීරයට ඇතුළු වූ රෝහින්ග්‍යා මුස්ලිම් ජාතිකයන් 30 දෙනෙකු පසුගිය අප්‍රේල් 30 වෙනි දින කන්කසන්තුරේ ආසන්න මුහුදේදී ශ්‍රී ලංකා නාවික හමුදාව විසින් අත්අඩංගුවට ගනු ලැබිණ. තමන් එක්සත් ජාතීන්ගේ සංවිධානයේ හෝ සංක්‍රමණිකයන් පිළිබඳ ජාත්‍යන්තර ආයතනයේ (IOM) පාලනය යටතට පත්කරන මෙන් එම පිරිස පසුගියදා ඉල්ලා සිටියහ. කෙසේවුවද, යතුරුපැදියක් සොරකම් කිරීම සහ ගින්නක් මැඩ පැවැත්වීමට අසමත් වීම හේතුවෙන් ගැමියන්ට පහර දීම සම්බන්ධයෙන් චෝදනා එල්ල වූ හමුදා සාමාජිකයන්ට එරෙහිව තමන් විනය ක්‍රියාමාර්ග ගත් බව මේ අතර මියන්මාර පොලිසිය පවසයි. මියන්මාරයේ රෝහින්ග්‍යා මුස්ලිම්වරුන් සහ එරට බහුතරය වන බෞද්ධ ප්‍රජාව අතර වසර ගණනාවක තිස්සේ ගැටුම් වර්ධනය වෙමින් පවතී. මියන්මාරය තුළ රෝහින්ග්‍යා ප්‍රජාව සලකනු ලබන්නේ බංග්ලාදේශයෙන් පැමිණි නීති විරෝධී සංක්‍රමණිකයන් ලෙසය. ඔවුහු එරට රජයේ ආයතන සහ පොදු ජනතාව අතරත් වෙනස්කම් කිරීමට ලක්වෙති. මියන්මාරයේ 2012 වසරේ ඇති වූ ප්‍රචණ්ඩ ක්‍රියා හේතුවෙන් රෝහින්ග්‍යා වැසියන් දස දහස් ගණනක් තවමත් අනාථ කඳවුරුවල වෙසෙති.
Google's headquarters in Zurich has a massage room, aquarium and a slide to deliver engineers smoothly and quickly to the canteen. Deloitte's Amsterdam office was designed with one empty room on each floor for employees to put what they wanted in them - most have gone for games such as table football. At LinkedIn's Californian HQ there is a music room, stocked with keyboards, drums, guitars and audio equipment. And allowing employees to bring their pets to work is increasingly common. So when did our offices turn into playgrounds, and does this represent the new way of working? Technological advances mean that staff can avoid the drudgery of commuting and work from home, coffee shops, or any number of exotic locations. So some companies are working extra-hard to make their offices more attractive places to be. A recent report from US software giant Citrix forecast that by 2017, some 50% of businesses would have a mobile working policy, and by 2020, 70% of people would work away from the office as often as they worked at a desk. "Offices are expensive and office space will decline," says Citrix vice president Jacqueline de Rojas. This is partly due to bosses realising not all jobs need to be done from an office, but also because employees are increasingly demanding a better work-life balance, she adds. That doesn't mean that the office will die, though. "Offices will become places of collaboration and connection because culturally we need touch points as we are social animals," she says. Citrix has installed "genius benches" at its London headquarters - essentially higher and longer shared desks that come with stools, not chairs. There are also moveable desks, like the ones at headphone maker Skullcandy's office in Zurich. The desks can be configured to work individually or collaboratively, fitting together like puzzle pieces. Meanwhile, marketing firm Barbarian Group has created a "super-desk" at its New York office which sits up to 170 people, and includes archways where staff can go for private chats. And Lego has taken hot-desking to the next level at its London and Singapore offices, introducing a system called activity-based working, which means that no-one has a fixed desk any more. Space is divided into flexible work zones with no fixed seating and no offices for managers. Employees who leave their workspace for more than one-and-a-half hours need to take all their stuff with them. Lego even has a department for "new ways of working" and, says senior director Sophie Patrikios, the experiment has gone well. "In our May 2016 survey, 88% of staff said they liked the choice of where to work. They get a choice of different settings to suit their activity or mood, including a quiet library, a buzzing social area with background music, comfy chairs in cosy corners or big banks of desks to share with team-mates," she says. Offices are also getting smarter. Research firm Gartner says commercial buildings are already at the forefront of the "internet of things" revolution. Smart lighting, heating, and even sensors that measure how many people are in an office, are becoming commonplace. Such technology plays a vital role in making buildings work more efficiently, but also raises questions about employee privacy and what happens to the data being collected. More energy-efficient buildings can offer employee benefits too, says Theo Maessen, a senior partner at Dutch-based building design firm BOB (BOB stands for Best Office Building). "We are building healthier offices that use more daylight, have systems that maintain a constant temperature that eliminates mould and dust, and therefore reduces the rate of illness among employees," he tells the BBC. Using computer simulation, Mr Maessen can work out the optimum number of windows for a building - no more than 40% of it should be glass, apparently - as well as factors such as the ideal air flow. The buildings he designs have no air-conditioning, using instead a geothermal system that takes advantage of the constant temperatures found underground. Warm water is pumped in over winter and cooler water during the summer months. The company uses wood-fibre bricks that breathe better and, as they are made from by-products from saw mills, are also more environmentally-friendly than traditional bricks. Occupants of his offices can use an online tool to provide feedback on their welfare and make complaints. Positive feedback has been "very high", Mr Maessen says. Hot-desking will become standard, he says, and buildings will have to adapt to different uses. "Over several decades, the occupancy will change. What was an office may become flats or retail space. Clients will also want to experiment with different configurations of their interiors," he says. "In 20 years maybe we won't work a five-day week, it may be that we work just three days a week, and we have to try to design a building that can accommodate those changes." In future, office spaces will also be closer to where people live, he believes. And communities will have communal office space that can be used by anyone, he predicts, cutting down on the need for travel. Lego's Ms Patrikios agrees that big changes are on the way. "We've already seen that work is no longer somewhere you go, but something you do," she says. A greater shift towards flexible working and people having multiple part-time roles, rather than a job for life, will exacerbate the change. In the future, "going to the office" will mean much more than just "going to work". Follow Technology of Business editor @matthew_wall on Twitter Click here for more Technology of Business features
اتهمت السلطات الكردية القوات العراقية بشن هجوم على مواقع قوات البيشمركة قرب الحدود مع تركيا. وقال "مجلس أمن كردستان" إن الجيش العراقي مدعوما بالحشد الشعبي "قصف مواقع عدة للبيشمركة من مدينة زمار شمالي غربي الموصل" وأضاف المجلس أن "تلك القوات تتقدم باتجاه موقع البيشمركة". وكان مجلس أمن كردستان قد طالب قبل ساعات القوات العراقية بالانسحاب من المناطق القريبة وقبول عرض حكومة اقليم كردستان بإجراء حوار غير مشروط ووقف العمليات القتالية لحل الأزمة الناتجة عن استفتاء الانفصال. وكانت حكومة كردستان قد تقدمت بعرض يشمل ثلاث نقاط هي تجميد نتائج الاستفتاء على انفصال الإقليم وبدء حوار مع الحكومة المركزية في بغداد ووقف الأعمال القتالية. واستعادت القوات العراقية الأسبوع الماضي سيطرتها على عدد من المدن، بينها كركوك الغنية بالنفط، من يد البيشمركة الكردية، التي سيطرت عليها في عام 2014 عقب هجمات تنظيم الدولة الإسلامية على الجيش العراقي.
د بي بي سي نړيوالې خپرونې د ريښتونې نړيوالې خپرندويې رسنۍ په توگه په ټوله نړۍ کې تر ١٥٠ ميليونو ډير اوريدونکي لري . هره مياشت تر ٧٥ ميليونو ډير وگړي زموږ اينټرنېټ پاڼې گوري . په نړيوالو اوريدونکو کې د بي بي سي د گرانښت يو دليل د دې راديو له لورې د مسايلو هر اړخيز ه څېړنه او ناپېيلې کتنه ده . په همدې دليل موږ گڼ نړيوال انعامونه گټلي دي . بي بي سي په ٣٢ ژبو خپرونې لري چې ټولې د اينټرنېټ له لارې هم خپريږي . د بي بي سي خپرونې په ټوله نړۍ کې د لنډو څپو ، منځنۍ څپو او په ځينو هيوادونو کې د ايف ايم په څپو اوريدلى شئ . دغه راز د سپوږمکۍ او ديجيتل په مټ هم زموږ خپرونې موندلى شئ او يا يې هم د اېنټرنېټ له لارې اوريداى شئ . د بي بي سي په وېبپاڼو کې تاسو د خپرونو څپې او د خپرونو مهال وېش هم موندلى شئ . له موږ سره د اړيکو د ټينگولو يوه بله لار د ليک ليکنې ده ، پته مو ده : BBC Pashto, World Service New Broadcasting House Zone A, 5th Floor Great Portland Place, W1A 1AA London, United Kingdom د بي بي سي پښتو څانگې د ١٩٨٢ کال د اگست له مياشتې په خپرونو پيل کړى دى . له هغه پيل څخه پښتو څانگې په افغانستان ، پاکستان او خليج کې گڼ شمير اوريدونکي وموندل . په پيل کې پښتو څانگې تر ډيره خبرونو او د سياسي چارو شنننې ته پام کاوۀ . وروسته وروسته يې اوونيز پروگرامونه هم پيل کړل چې د ځوانانو ، ميرمنو ، لوبو ، ساينس ، ادبياتو او موسيقي لپاره بېل شوي و . له بي بي سي پښتو څانگې سره په ٢٠٠٣ کال کې دري خپرونه هم گډه شوه او بي بي سي د افغانستان لپاره خپرونې يې پيل کړې . د بي بي سي پښتو څانگې وېبپاڼه د بي بي سي پښتو وېبپاڼه له ١٩٩٦ کال څخه په محدوده کچه پيل شوه چې يوازې به يې په غږ کې زموږ ځينې خپرونې ليدونکو ته وړاندې کولې . په ٢٠٠١ کال کې بي بي سي پښتو وېبپاڼه په نړۍ کې لومړنۍ پښتو وېبپاڼه شوه چې په متن کې يې د خبرونو لنډيز ورکاوۀ . په ٢٠٠٤ کال کې د بي بي سي وېبپاڼه لا وغوړيده چې پکې زموږ ځينې اوونيز پروگرامونه ، د موسيقي دوه جلا خپرونې او د خبرونو لا مفصله بڼه پکې کاروونکي لوستى شي . د ٢٠١٠ کال د مارچ له مياشتې راهيسته د بي بي سي پښتو ويبپاڼه لا پراخه شوه چې پکې له کور پاڼې سره جوخت د افغانستان ، نړۍ او لوبو لپاره ځانگړې برخې زياتې شوې .
British scientists exploring an underwater mountain in the Atlantic Ocean have discovered a treasure trove of rare minerals. Their investigation of a seamount more than 500km (300 miles) from the Canary Islands has revealed a crust of "astonishingly rich" rock. Samples brought back to the surface contain the scarce substance tellurium in concentrations 50,000 times higher than in deposits on land. Tellurium is used in a type of advanced solar panel, so the discovery raises a difficult question about whether the push for renewable energy may encourage mining of the seabed. The rocks also contain what are called rare earth elements that are used in wind turbines and electronics. Known as Tropic Seamount, the mountain stands about 3,000m tall – about the size of one of the middle-ranging Alpine summits – with a large plateau at its top, lying about 1,000m below the ocean surface. Using robotic submarines, researchers from the UK's National Oceanography Centre found that the crust is dark and fine-grained and stretches in a layer roughly 4cm thick over the entire surface of the mountain. Dr Bram Murton, the leader of the expedition, told the BBC that he had been expecting to find abundant minerals on the seamount but not in such concentrations. "These crusts are astonishingly rich and that's what makes these rocks so incredibly special and valuable from a resource perspective." He has calculated that the 2,670 tonnes of tellurium on this single seamount represents one-twelfth of the world's total supply. And Dr Murton has come up with a hypothetical estimate that if the entire deposit could be extracted and used to make solar panels, it could meet 65% of the UK's electricity demand. He says he is not advocating deep-sea mining, which has yet to start anywhere in the world and is likely to be highly controversial because of the damage it could cause to the marine environment. But Dr Murton does want his team's discovery, part of a major research project called MarineE-Tech, to trigger a debate about where vital resources should come from. "If we need green energy supplies, then we need the raw materials to make the devices that produce the energy so, yes, the raw materials have to come from somewhere. "We either dig them up from the ground and make a very large hole or dig them from the seabed and make a comparatively smaller hole. "It's a dilemma for society - nothing we do comes without a cost." Scientists are now weighing up the relative risks and merits of mining on land as opposed to on the seabed. Mines on land often require forests and villages to be cleared, overlying rocks to be removed and roads or railways to be built in order to extract ores with relatively weak concentrations of minerals. By contrast, mines on the seabed would extract far richer ores, covering a smaller area and with no immediate impact on people - but instead killing marine life wherever digging machines are deployed and potentially devastating a far wider area. One major concern is the effect of plumes of dust, stirred up by excavation of the ocean floor, spreading for long distances and smothering all life wherever it settles. To understand the implications, the expedition to Tropic Seamount conducted an experiment, the first of its kind, to mimic the effects of mining and to measure the resulting plume. Deploying from the UK research ship James Cook, a remotely operated vehicle deliberately pumped out hundreds of litres of sediment-filled water every minute while other robotic sensors were positioned downstream in the ocean current. According to Dr Murton, early results indicate that dust was hard to detect 1km away from the source of the plume, suggesting that the impact of mining could be more localised than many fear. But this comes as different disciplines within marine science are coming up with a range of perspectives on this emerging development. A study led by Dr Daniel Jones, also at the NOC, reviewed evidence of seabed exploration and found that in the wake of mining many marine creatures would be likely to recover within a year but that few would return to their previous levels even after two decades. Another study focused on tiny organisms on the floor of the Pacific Ocean in a region known as the Clarion-Clipperton Zone, which stretches in a belt south of Hawaii. Much of this zone has been licensed by the UN's International Seabed Authority to companies from more than a dozen countries to search for minerals in the potato-sized rocks or "nodules" lying on the seabed. Prof Andy Gooday, also of the NOC, and colleagues found that among the metals-rich nodules, there is a far greater diversity of single-celled organisms called xenophyophores than previously thought. Their research identified as many as 34 species of these lifeforms that are new to science. These organisms occupy one of the lower rungs in the food chain and also play an important role by forming hard shell-like structures, like miniature coral reefs, that provide habitats for other creatures. Prof Gooday says that the range of life in the sediments of the deep ocean can be compared with that of a tropical rainforest and that "life on the ocean floor is more dynamic" than anyone expected. He believes it is unlikely that seabed mining would cause species to go extinct but that the impact locally would be severe. "If you eliminate these xenophyphores, which are very fragile and would certainly be destroyed by mining, it would destroy habitat structure for other organisms. "It's difficult to predict and, like everything in the deep sea connected with the effects of mining, we need to learn more – we still know so little about what's going on down there."
په برتانيا کې دننه او دباندې د بي بي سي د وېبپاڼو ليدنه او کارونه په دې شرايطو کيږي : د بي بي سي وېبپاڼو په کارولو تاسو منلې چې درو شرايطو ته غاړه ږدئ چې په لومړي ځل زموږ ويبپاڼې ته په راتلو عملي کيږي. که چيرې تاسو دغه شرايط نه منئ نو لطفآ د بي بي سي وېبپاڼو ته مه راځئ ، مه يې کاروئ او يا مطالب مه ورته راليږئ. بي بي سي وخت نا وخته دغه شرايط بدلولى شي نو بايد تاسو دغه شرايط تل وگورئ . ستاسو له خوا په پرله پسې توگه د بي بي سي د ويبپاڼو کارول په دې مانا بلل کيږي چې تاسو زموږ له نويو شرايطو سره جوړ ياست . که چيرې تاسو له نويو شرايطو سره نه ياست جوړ نو بايد د وېبپاڼې له کارولو لاس واخلئ . که چيرې د دغو شرايطو او يا د نورو ځانگړو محلي شرايطو چې د بي بي سي په نورو ويبپاڼو کې ليدل کيږي، ترمنځ توپير وي نو وروستۍ بڼه يې پر ځاى ده بي بي سي د ويبپاڼو د کارولو لپاره د نورو شرايطو د لوستلو په نيت دا ځاى کېکاږئ چې په انگليسي ژبه يې ولولئ
People living in northern Iraq voted overwhelmingly in favour of independence for the Kurdistan Region in Monday's controversial referendum. The electoral commission said 92% of the 3.3 million Kurds and non-Kurds who cast their ballots supported secession. The announcement came despite a last-minute appeal for the result to be "cancelled" from Iraq's prime minister. Haider al-Abadi urged Kurds to instead engage in dialogue with Baghdad "in the framework of the constitution". Kurdish leaders say the "Yes" vote will give them a mandate to start negotiations on secession with the central government in Baghdad and neighbouring countries. Iraq's parliament meanwhile asked the prime minister to deploy troops to the oil-rich region of Kirkuk and other disputed areas held by Kurdish forces. Kurdish Peshmerga fighters took control of Kirkuk, a multi-ethnic region claimed by the Kurds and Arab-led central government, when jihadist militants from so-called Islamic State (IS) swept across northern Iraq in 2014 and the Iraqi army collapsed. The referendum was held in the three Iraqi provinces that make up the Kurdistan Region, as well as "areas of Kurdistan outside the region's administration". Electoral commission officials told a news conference in Irbil on Wednesday afternoon that 2,861,000 people had voted "yes" to independence and 224,000 had voted "no". Turnout was 72.61% among those eligible to vote. In a speech to parliament before the result was announced, Mr Abadi insisted that he would "never have a dialogue" about the referendum's outcome with the Kurdistan Regional Government (KRG). The vote was vehemently opposed by Baghdad and much of the international community, which expressed concern about its potentially destabilising effects, particularly on the battle against IS. Mr Abadi said his priority now was to "preserve citizens' security" and promised to "defend Kurdish citizens inside or outside" the Kurdistan Region. "We will impose Iraq's rule in all districts of the region with the force of the constitution," he added. The prime minister also reaffirmed his threat to prevent direct international flights to the Kurdistan Region if Baghdad was not given control of Irbil and Sulaimaniya airports by Friday afternoon. The KRG's transport minister said he was seeking clarification from Baghdad. "We don't understand how to give them the two airports," Mowlud Murad told reporters. "They are already subject to the Iraqi Civil Aviation Authority." The United States, which was "deeply disappointed" that the referendum was held, has also questioned Mr Abadi's threat to ban international flights. State department spokeswoman Heather Nauert said on Tuesday that such a move "would not be an example of engaging constructively". Lebanon's Middle East Airlines and EgyptAir meanwhile warned customers they would halt flights to Irbil from Friday until further notice. Mr Abadi has also demanded control of all border crossings and oil revenues. Kurds are the fourth-largest ethnic group in the Middle East but they have never obtained a permanent nation state. In Iraq, where they make up an estimated 15% to 20% of the population of 37 million, Kurds faced decades of repression before acquiring autonomy in 1991.
قلصت الكاتبة مادلين دوور من نشاطاتها الاجتماعية مع أصدقائها لترى إن كان ذلك سيجعلها أكثر إنتاجية، وكانت النتائج مفاجئة‫ بالنسبة لها. ‬ يمكن أن يكون الطريق إلى النجاح سهلاً للغاية‫.‬ فقد توصلت من تجربتي الشخصية من خلال مقابلة فنانين وكتاب ناجحين وأصحاب أعمال مبدعين إلى جواب عن سؤالي حول كيفية تمكنهم من أن يكونوا منتجين إلى هذا الحد، وهو‫:‬ "‬لا حياة اجتماعية لدينا‫". ‬‬ الوقت كالسيف!‬‬ من خلال عملي الحر الذي أقوم به من المنزل، وفي الوقت الذي يخرج فيه زملائي في السكن، أرى أن النشاط في الحياة الاجتماعية أمرا ضروريا للإنسان. ومع ذلك، فإنه عندما يطلع علي الفجر أكتشف كم من الوقت أضعت وأنا أتواصل مع الآخرين، وأن الموضوع خرج عن حده.‬ وحسب تقديراتي، فإنني أضيع 22 ساعة أو أكثر في المتوسط أسبوعيا على النشاطات الاجتماعية، ولكي أرى تأثير ذلك على قدرتي الإنتاجية في العمل، وعلى صحتي العامة، قررت أن أجرب إلغاء حياتي الاجتماعية تماماً لفترة. كنت أعلم أنني في بعض الأحيان أملأ جدولي ليس فقط كي لا يفوتني شيء، بل لوجود رغبة داخلية لدي في تأجيل عملي أو صرف تركيزي عنه. ‬ ‬قلصت نشاطاتي الاجتماعية مع الأصدقاء لمدة شهر كامل، مثل الخروج للاستمتاع بالمشروبات، ولقاءات تناول القهوة ووجبات العشاء، والحفلات، وكافة الأحداث غير المرتبطة ‫بالعمل‬، لأرى إن كان هذا سيجعلني أكثر إنتاجاً، أو يساعدني في التركيز وتحقيق أهدافي المهنية‫.‬ كان عليَّ في اليوم الأول من ذلك الاختبار أن أواجه اضطرابي العميق فيما يتعلق بخوفي من أن أفوّت شيئاً‫.‬ هذا الاضطراب هو نتيجة ‫تعدد الخيارات أمامي،‬ بمعنى أنه عندما يكون لدي عدة خيارات مُغرية لقضاء ليلة السبت، فكيف لي أن أعرف أيهم الخيار الصحيح، لذا أجربها جميعها.‬ لكن مع مرور الأيام، بدأ هذا الاضطراب لدي يتلاشي، وأصبحت أكثر استرخاءً، لأنه ببساطة ليس لدي سوى خيار واحد الآن، وهو البقاء في المنزل ليلة السبت، وعندما حددت نفسي بذلك أصبحت أكثر رضا عن قراري‫.‬ كنت ألوم نفسي سابقاً إذا مكثت في المنزل خلال عطلة الأسبوع، أو غادرت السهرة مع الأصدقاء مبكرا، أما خلال تجربتي هذه، شعرت برضا أكثر خلال أداء العمل، والقراءة، ومشاهدة التلفاز، بدلاً من الانشغال بأشياء أخرى‫.‬ ومنحني ذلك الجدول الخالي من المرح الذي ألزمت به نفسي القدرة على "‬العمل العميق‫"‬ ‫(وهو شيء عرّفه أستاذ علوم الحاسب، كال نيوبورت، بالقدرة على التركيز دونما تشتت بمهمة عمل أخرى بشكل متواصل)‬، فلم أعد أتشتت بالتفكير فيما سوف أقوم به، أو كيف يمرح الآخرون، وأصبحت لدي القدرة على تنفيذ عدة أعمال مكثّفة خلال الأسبوع في أوقات كانت عادةً مخصصة للنشاطات الاجتماعية. إضافة إلى إيجاد وقت أكبر للعمل، فقد لاحظت كذلك تغيراً في صحتي، ونمط حياتي بشكل عام، إذ أصبحت أطهو أكثر في البيت، وأمارس التمرينات اليومية، وأذهب للنوم مبكرا، وكذلك أقرأ أكثر، واستمتع بلحظات الراحة والفراغ خلال ساعات النهار‫.‬ إن عدم وجود حياة اجتماعية لدي منحني، إضافة إلى الطهي والتمرينات، وقتاً أكثر مما أتصور، وكذلك أصبحت أقدر أهمية عدم وجود شيء يلزمني القيام به، وهو شيء ارتبط عادة بالوحدة والملل‫.‬ بدأت أقدّر فكرة عدم القيام بشيء والاستمتاع بلحظات العزلة، وأصبحت أذهب للمشي في طرقات طويلة ومتعرجة، وأجلس في مقاهي دون أي وسائل تكنولوجيا، ووجدت نفسي أشرد بشكل متكرر لأنني لم أعد أحاول جاهدة أن أملأ كل لحظة في حياتي‫.‬ وتعد لحظات خمول كهذه أساسية للإبداع، إذ يرتبط إطلاق العنان للأ‫فكار ‬بإيجاد حلول خلّاقة للمشاكل‫، فعندما تسمح لأفكارك بالتدفق فإن دماغك يدخل إلى الذكريات والعواطف ومقاطع عشوائية في خزينة معرفتك، حسبما تقول آمي فرايز، مؤلفة كتاب "أحلام اليقظة في العمل: أيقظ قدراتك الإبداعية‫"‬، وهي كاتبة ومحررة في مجلة ‫‬سيكولوجي توداي"‬ المختصة بعلم النفس‫.‬ وجدت نفسي خلال هذه التجربة أستنبط أفكاراً جديدة بشكل متكرر، أو أفكر في تغييرات لمشاريع قائمة. وقد يكون عدم القيام بشيء محفزاً للطاقة تماماً مثل قضاء وقت مع الناس خارج المنزل، وهي حالة ضرورية في الحقيقة من أجل إعادة شحن الطاقات، حسبما يقول بيدرو دياز، المدير التنفيذي لمعهد ‫"‬الصحة النفسية في العمل‫"‬ في سيدني‫.‬ وهنالك دراسة تدعم وجهة نظره أجريت عام 2016 على 48 شخصاً تم خلالها قياس حالتهم العقلية، ومزاجهم، ومدى تعبهم وتوترهم على مدى 12 يوماً. وخلصت الدراسة إلى أن الانطلاق الاجتماعي زاد في مستوى المزاج والطاقة، لكن هذا السلوك أدى كذلك إلى نسب أعلى من الإرهاق بعد ثلاث ساعات‫ فقط.‬ وقد أثارت ملاحظةُ ذلك الأمر مسألة مهمة أيضا، إذ ربما ليست كمية التواصل مع الناس أو العمل هي التي تقود للإرهاق، بل السبب هو عدم أخذ استراحات من أي من تلك النشاطات‫. ويقول دياز: "نحن لا نهتم بشكل كاف بضرورة وجودنا وحدنا، بل إن أغلب الناس لا يعرفون ماذا عليهم أن يفعلوا لإراحة عقلهم وجهازهم العصبي". وفي مجتمع يعتقد أن الانشغال الدائم هو مبعث فخر، من الصعب معرفة ما إذا كانت قلة أو انعدام الحياة الاجتماعية هي نتيجة حتمية لنمط عملنا، أو أنها طريقة لتسليط الضوء على أهميتنا أمام الآخرين‫.‬ وتقول سيلفيا بيليتزا، المؤلفة المشاركة في دراسة ذات صلة أجريت في كلية هارفارد للأعمال:‬ "‬عندما تُظهر أنك مشغول، فأنت تقول للآخرين إن لديك أهمية كبيرة، ليس لأن ملابسك باهظة الثمن، بل لأنك مرغوب كثيراً، وعليك طلب كبير".‬ وتنتقد هذه الدراسة فكرة الانشغال الدائم، ونمط الحياة المعاصر الذي بات رمزاً يُحتذى به‫، والذي يُبذل فيه مجهود كبير، بدلا من التوجه نحو الترفيه والمتعة. التأثير الإيجابي للعزلة، مثل وضوح الأفكار بصورة أكبر، وتجديد الطاقة، قد يكون مقلقاً إذا بقيت معزولة في فقاعتي الخاصة في المنزل لوقت طويل‫.‬ فالتواصل الاجتماعي في بيئة عمل مكتبية يعتبر من أهم العناصر في حياة العمل، واتضح أن الموظفين الذين يعملون مع أعزّ أصدقائهم ينغمسون في العمل سبع مرات أكثر من غيرهم، كما أن زملاء العمل يخلقون شعوراً بوحدة الهدف، ويشكلون شبكة دعم اجتماعي تقود إلى تبادل النصح المهني، وسرعة الترقي‫.‬ إن النشاط الاجتماعي خارج أوقات العمل ضروري بالطبع لبناء علاقات عمل‫ جيدة، ورغم أن شهراً كاملاً خاليا من العلاقات الاجتماعية لم يؤثر سلباً على زبائني، إلا أنني لو بقيت على هذا الحال، كان يمكن أن يقلل ذلك من قدرتي على استقطاب زبائن جدد. ‬ ربما من الأفضل لنا، ‬بدلا من إيجاد توازن واضح بين العمل والحياة الخاصة‫، أن نحاول إدخال حياتنا الاجتماعية إلى في حياة العمل‫،‬ فقد رأيت أن السر في النجاح المهني ربما لا يكمن في إلغاء الحياة الاجتماعية، بل في دمج الاثنين معاً‫.‬ وقد توصلت إلين غالينسكي، وهي مؤسسة مشاركة في "‬معهد العائلات والعمل‫"، إلى أن الأشخاص الذين لديهم غايتان،‫‬ وهم الذين يولون نفس القدر من الأهمية لمسارين في حياتهم أو أكثر، هم الأكثر سعادةً‫. وتقول: "نجد أن الأشخاص 'ثنائيي الغاية' يتمتعون بحياة صحية، ويبلون بلاء حسناً في عملهم ومنزلهم. فإن كان لديك طريق واحد في الحياة، وحدث خلل ما فيه، سيكون ذلك مدمراً. أما إذا كان لديك أكثر من شيء بذات الأهمية، سواء كان نشاطا إبداعياً، أو رياضياً، أو مجتمعياً، أو وجود دائرة أصدقاء حولك، فسوف تكون في وضع أفضل عموماً". وخلال تجربتي، لم أملأ وقت فراغي الذي استطعت إيجاده بأعمال أكثر، لكنني أصبحت 'ثنائية الغاية'‫.‬ فقد استطعت توفير أوقات أكثر تركيزاً في العمل، ولم أكن أستطع فعل ذلك سابقاً‬، بل وأصبحت أكثر انجذاباً لنشاطات كنت قد أهملتها، مثل ممارسة التمارين الرياضية، وعزف البيانو، والتأمل‫.‬ لقد تعلمت أن أقتطع مساحةً من حياتي لدفع مساحة أخرى إلى الأمام، وتعلمت أن التواصل مع الناس يرتبط ارتباطاً وثيقاً بعملنا، ويساعدنا في التعامل مع منعطفات الحياة السلبية والإيجابية‫.‬ وبعد التجربة، أعدت تعريف النجاح بالنسبة لي، وهو باختصار‫:‬ لا يتعلق الأمر بالعمل فقط، أو بالتسلية فقط، ولا حتى بإيجاد توازن بينهما، ولكن بتحقيق مزيج من النشاطات المختلفة يومياً، وأخذ فترات استراحة قصيرة ومتكررة أثناء كل ما نقوم به‫.‬ يمكنك قراءة الموضوع الأصلي على موقع BBC Capital.
Que un exestafador advierta que otros están estafando.... puede sonar más divertido que serio. Pero hay que ver quién es el personaje: Jordan Belfort, conferencista motivacional y excorredor de bolsa, pasó 22 meses en la cárcel por fraudes financieros. Belfort, inmortalizado en la película "El Lobo de Wall Street" (interpretado por Leonardo DiCaprio) utiliza ahora su detallado conocimiento de cómo funcionan los mercados para analizar el mundo de las finanzas y hacer recomendaciones. En una entrevista con el Financial Times, Belfort advirtió sobre el peligro de las divisas virtuales o criptomonedas como el Bitcoin o el Ethereum. "Una gigantesca estafa está por explotar en la cara de muchísimas personas", aseguró, y agregó que "es, por mucho, peor que cualquier otra que yo haya hecho". Belfort dijo que el mayor riesgo está en las ofertas públicas iniciales de criptomonedas (ICO, por sus siglas en inglés), un mecanismo utilizado por empresas emergentes para recaudar dinero mediante la venta de fichas digitales a cambio de criptomonedas. Estas "ICO" también son vistas como una forma de juntar fondos parecida al crowfunding: un emprendedor anuncia su idea, crea una criptomoneda y la vende para conseguir el dinero con el que hará realidad su negocio. La ventaja para las startups es que, a diferencia de las tradicionales rondas de financiación, quien le compra sus monedas no recibe a cambio acciones de la futura empresa. La promesa es que cuando la compañía esté en marcha alguna vez en el futuro, podrá canjear su moneda virtual por dinero de verdad. Se estima que hay más de 700 divisas virtuales circulando en internet, la más famosa de ella es el bitcoin, que cuesta aproximadamente US$2.700 por moneda. El excorredor de bolsa comparó estas ofertas con la moda de los "fondos ciegos" (blind pools, en inglés) en los años 70 y 80, cuando las compañías recaudaban dinero de los inversores sin especificar cómo se gastaría. Muchos fondos de este tipo se disolvían sin hacer una sola inversión y los recaudadores desaparecían con grandes sumas. Pero muchos de los que defienden esta forma de recaudación virtual dicen que es un modo legítimo de juntar dinero sin depender de los grandes bancos o los fondos de inversiones. "Preparar una ICO tan sólo requiere unas semanas y puede dirigirse directamente a inversionistas y a clientes, sin pasar por los fondos de riesgo", le dijo a la BBC Michael Marcovici, director del fondo Digital Developers Fund (DDF). Rory Cellan-Jones, corresponsal de Tecnología de la BBC, dice que "estamos en el medio de una nueva burbuja" de alto riesgo. "Pareciera que el uso de la etiqueta Bitcoin o criptomoneda en cualquier proyecto, es el equivalente actual a agregarle el "punto.com" a cualquier negocio antiguo a finales de los 90. Los inversionistas que están interesados en participar, deberían recordar qué le pasó a muchos de esos negocios unos años después". Algunos de sus argumentos se refieren a dos esquemas que actualmente están operando en los mercados virtuales: uno en el que tu dinero real se convierte en la moneda virtual Ethereum y a cambio recibes Wild coins (en inglés) o "monedas salvajes". El otro esquema es aquel que le permite a los dueños de Bitcoins invertir en propiedades, como está ocurriendo en Dubai. Cellan-Jones habla de una "cripto locura" que podría afectar a muchos consumidores. Gobiernos y entidades reguladoras han lanzado advertencias Expertos y gobiernos han expresado su preocupación por los pequeños inversionistas que arriesgan su dinero en estas operaciones a cambio de presuntos retornos de gran magnitud.El Banco Central de China, prohibió el mes pasado este tipo de transacciones, argumentando que son ilegales y que "perturban seriamente el equilibrio económico y financiero". En el Reino Unido, la entidad reguladora (Financial Conduct Authority) advirtió a la gente sobre los peligros de invertir en estas fichas. Lo mismo hizo la Comisión de Bolsa y Valores en Estados Unidos (SEC, por sus siglas en inglés) sobre las "falsas ICO" y otras entidades reguladoras en Singapur, Hong Kong y Canadá. Con todo, hay startups que siguen financiándose con "ICO" e inversionistas dispuestos a correr riesgos a la espera de grandes retornos en un terreno que aún no ha sido regulado por las entidades financieras.
Não é a apenas a popularidade do presidente Michel Temer que está em queda. O peemedebista tem, aos poucos, perdido apoio no Congresso e contabilizando cada vez menos votos em sessões que discutem projetos de interesse do governo, ainda que continue tendo apoio relevante entre deputados e senadores. Nesta quarta-feira, o presidente novamente conseguiu escapar de responder a um processo no Supremo Tribunal Federal (STF) no exercício do mandato por 251 votos a 233. Na primeira denúncia, tinha vencido por 263 a 227. Apesar de a diferença relativamente pequena entre a primeira votação, que aconteceu em agosto, e a de quarta, analistas ouvidos pela BBC Brasil acreditam que a tendência é que Temer comece a ver sua base encolher à medida que a eleição de 2018 se aproxime. Tudo indica que o peedembista começa a enfrentar um fenômeno chamado "lame duck", ou "pato manco". Trata-se de um político em fim de mandato, enfraquecido e com popularidade muito baixa, considerado praticamente "uma carta fora do baralho" do jogo político. "Ele está entrando nessa fase de 'lame duck' um pouco cedo", observa cientista político David Fleischer, professor da UnB. Fleischer observa que a tendência é que deputados e senadores comecem, a partir de agora, a se afastar de Temer, e isso significa que antigos aliados podem começar a votar contra os interesses do governo. "Os parlamentares ficam apreensivos com a eleição. Acham que estar ao lado de um presidente impopular pode diminuir suas próprias chances de vitória", explica. "Vão se distanciar do presidente para tentar garantir sua própria salvação", acrescenta o professor. Ainda assim, ele acredita que haverá um elevado índice de renovação na composição da Câmara e do Senado na eleição do ano que vem. A perda de apoio, contudo, não representa necessariamente uma ameaça à continuidade de Temer no comando do governo. O professor Francisco Panizza, da universidade britânica London School of Economics (LSE), avalia que uma nova mudança na Presidência neste momento seria ainda mais traumática do que foi o impeachment da presidente Dilma Rousseff, sacramentado em agosto de 2016. "Apesar de Temer estar enfraquecido, não há interesse do sistema político em tirá-lo do cargo", afirma Panizza, que também vê uma tendência de ver os políticos cada vez mais se afastando do presidente. "Vão continuar jogando esse jogo de mantê-lo e ao mesmo tempo dando menos apoio, em especial porque a popularidade dele está muito baixa entre os cidadãos", avalia. Esse movimento deve impactar, por exemplo, a votação da Reforma da Previdência, proposta extremamente impopular que exige 308 votos para ser aprovada na Câmara. No caso das mudanças no sistema de aposentadorias e pensões, David Fleisher acredita que Temer terá condições de fazer passar "apenas uma microrreforma". Se passar, diz, serão mudanças diluídas, apesar de consideradas essenciais pelo governo do peemedebista para reduzir o deficit público a longo prazo. Mas, ainda que sua base esteja encolhendo aos poucos, o presidente ainda conta com apoio suficiente para fazer passar alguns projetos de interesse do governo, em especial aqueles em que não são necessários votos de uma maioria qualificada. Os analistas ouvidos pela BBC Brasil apontam para a disparidade entre o que acontece no Congresso e nas ruas - onde apenas 3% dos brasileiros aprovam o governo Temer, segundo pesquisa feita em setembro pela Confederação Nacional da Indústria (CNI) em parceria com o Ibope. "O jornal britânico Guardian fez recentemente uma pergunta retórica questionando como Temer ainda está no cargo, apesar das denúncias de corrupção e rejeição da população", lembra David Fleischer. Os deputados mais próximos do presidente, contudo, continuam dizendo que Temer não está fragilizado. Afirmam ainda que a diferença de votos no placar entre as análises da primeira e a segunda denúncias foi residual. "Quem resiste a cinco meses de ataques sórdidos, a conspirações e ainda se mantém no cargo sai é fortalecido", diz Carlos Marun (PMDB-RS) à BBC Brasil. Temer perdeu oito votos, se comparada a análise das denúncias pelo plenário da Câmara. Na sessão de quarta, os deputados Abel Mesquita Jr (DEM-RR), Cícero Almeida (PODE-AL), Delegado Éder Mauro (PSD-PA), Heuler Cruvinel (PSD-GO), Jaime Martins (PSD-MG), João Campos (PRB-GO), Mauro Mariani (PMDB-SC) e João Paulo Kleinünbing (PSD-SC) votaram pela continuidade da denúncia contra Michel Temer - no mês passado, tinham votado pelo arquivamento. Já os deputados Carlos Gomes (PRB-RS), César Halum (PRB-TO) e Ronaldo Martins (PRB-CE) foram favoráveis ao Planalto desta vez, apesar de terem apoiado a primeira denúncia apresentada pela Procuradoria-Geral da República. Com as decisões do plenário da Câmara, a Justiça só poderá analisar as acusações da Procuradoria-Geral da República contra Temer - corrupção passiva, obstrução de Justiça e organização criminosa - depois que ele deixe o Palácio do Planalto.
Коалу в Австралии спасли и отпустили на волю, после того как животное забралось за колесо автомобиля и проехало 16 км в таком положении. Коала залезла под машину, припаркованную в горах в окрестностях австралийского города Аделаида. Когда машина тронулась с места, животное держалось за ось. Водитель автомобиля заметил, что к машине прицепилась коала, только когда остановил автомобиль и услышал крики животного. Он вызвал спасателей, которые смогли освободить коалу. "Я чувствовала по запаху, что у нее мех загорелся", - рассказала агентству Рейтер Джейн Бристер из благотворительного фонда по спасению животных Fauna Rescue . Спасатели животных несколько дней кормили и ухаживали за коалой, а затем выпустили ее на волю. Коалы - коренные обитатели Австралии. Они относятся к категории уязвимых видов животных. В дикой природе осталось менее 100 тысяч особей этих сумчатых, посчитали в "Австралийском фонде коал".
We continue to buy new clothes at an incredible rate. How can manufacturers reduce fashion's environmental footprint? According to the Valuing Our Clothes report analysing the contents of British wardrobes by the Waste Resources Action Programme (WRAP), we purchased 1,130,000 tonnes of new clothing last year in the UK. Meanwhile, an estimated £30bn worth of our clothing hangs about gathering dust because we simply don't have time to wear it all or don't really like what we're buying. This is the epoch of "fast fashion" - a rapid production system that promises quick turnaround of trends and low prices, with a supply chain that snakes through some of the lowest wage economies on Earth. Fast fashion brands dominate not just high streets, but our wardrobes and represent the three trillion dollar global fashion industry's greatest success story. But at what cost? The environmental footprint of today's fashion industry is extraordinary, making it one of the top five most polluting industries on earth, alongside the petrochemical industry. Many fashion industry insiders are seriously worried, not necessarily because they fret over greenhouse gases caused by the supply chain, but because there is now so much over-supply of fashion that it's becoming difficult to have a successful season - particularly as we now have 50 seasons rather than the traditional two of spring/summer and autumn/winter. Some commentators refer to today's relentless cycle as a "supermarket of style". But according to fashion theory, there are 101 steps to producing a garment from processes such as dyeing and finishing to pressing the garment ready for retail. If you're a pessimist that's 101 chances to introduce pollution, exploitation and planetary degradation. If however you're an optimist, that's 101 opportunities to take the impact out of fashion! So for a new episode of BBC Radio 4's Costing the Earth, I travelled to Milan Fashion week to meet some disruptors (and definitely optimists) who believe we are on the cusp of a green revolution that can turn the industry around. At the Green Carpet Fashion Awards Italia, that took place at the famous La Scala opera theatre during Milan Fashion Week it was difficult not to be blinded by the super star wattage pacing the deliberately "green" carpet (manufactured from old fishing nets and carpets). But among the stars - Gisele Bundchen, Naomi Campbell, Colin Firth, Giorgio Armani were all in attendance - were a number of eco innovation show stoppers. One model wore an eye catching dress made from apple leather and creating by emerging designer, Matje Benedetti who explained how waste apple pulp from the apple industry is mixed with polyurethane to develop the fibre. The inclusion of ecological innovative fibres at this level - awards on the night also went to Orange Fibre, a company spinning yarn from citrus waste - points to serious investment in revolutionary new materials. Case and point is provided by New York biotech start-up Modern Meadows. Here biologists work alongside creative director, Suzanne Lee and fermentation engineers to bio-fabricate leather in the laboratory. This research and development promises a future where cows will not be required for a handbag and where fashion design intersects with biology. Meanwhile, Californian start up Bolt Threads has raised millions of dollars to bring its brewed spider silk to market (Stella McCartney has designed with the material) and fashion entrepreneur Miroslava Duma recently launched a $50 million fund and accelerator dedicated to bringing new sustainable fibres and fabrics to market. In many ways this fibre revolution is long overdue. The fashion industry, for all its claims of being cutting edge, is remarkably conservative when it comes to fabrics. Humanity is almost exclusive clothed in polyester and cotton fibres, both of which have shocking environmental profiles. This also means that the last significant innovation in materials was polyester, circa 1943! But what we're also seeing here are levels of and investment in disruptive technology and innovation that have previously been applied to the technology and transport sector, applied to fashion. This is potentially a game changer. However, we do still need to address the issue of our own over consumption, an area where we've made little headway. But there's innovation here too: designer Danit Peleg 3D prints her collections and thinks in the foreseeable future we will be able to effectively design out shopping for fashion by 3D printing to order. It's another innovation to get excited by and a disruption that could represent an enormous gift to the biosphere given the impact of our consumption. But I'd have to concede it's early days for all of this innovation. So amid such headline-grabbing, tech-fuelled disruption is there a more immediate, human, low-tech answer right in front of us? Psychologist Professor Carolyn Mair has observed that we're inclined to keep stuff circulating in our wardrobe to which we've attached a strong personal narrative. Mair told me about her favourite example: "a pair of lucky pants". Many people secretly own a pair to which they attach talismanic significance and they have huge longevity! Behaviours like these can turn fashion green. WRAP research shows that extending the life of clothes by an extra nine months of active use, in the UK, reduces the carbon, water and waste impacts of that garment by around 20-30%. Standby then for a wardrobe future where you'll be able to access cutting edge bio-fabricated novel material that's been 3D printed in a pair of very lucky pants. That's what I call fashion forward. Costing the Earth is available now and on BBC Radio 4 on Thursday 11th Oct at 9pm
يعيش فيدل مبيراباغابو في منزل متواضع بني يدويا من الطين والإسمنت وتحيط به من الجانبين تلال خضراء منخفضة الارتفاع. وكمعظم الناس في هذا الجزء من ضاحية رواماغانا الريفية في رواندا، يعمل مبيراباغابو مزارعا. ومثلهم أيضا، يعيش أوضاعا مالية صعبة، فهو لا يعرف أبدا كم سيجني من المال في أي شهر. ومع ذلك، باتت حياة مبيراباغابو تختلف الآن عن حياة العديد من جيرانه، لأن لديه كهرباء. ومن المسلمات بالنسبة للسكان في العالم المتقدم أن تكون لديهم كهرباء في منازلهم تمكنهم من شحن أجهزتهم الكهربائية وتشغيل أجهزة تكييف الهواء للحفاظ على درجة الحرارة المناسبة للمعيشة. وكما يرى أي شخص عانى من آثار إعصار مدمر أو وجد نفسه وسط ظلام دامس، فإن الحياة تتوقف إلى حد كبير إذا غابت هذه المرافق الثمينة. ورغم اعتمادنا بشكل كامل على الطاقة بمختلف صورها، لا يحصل ما يقرب من 1.2 مليار شخص حول العالم ـ أي 16 في المئة من سكان العالم ـ على الطاقة مطلقا. وبالعودة إلى رواندا، على سبيل المثال، فإن أقل من 20 في المئة من السكان يعيشون في منازل بها كهرباء ـ وهي حقيقة تعيق التنمية وتعزز الفقر، كما أنها مشكلة ضخمة تعكس الكثير من المشاكل التي تواجهنا في القرن الحادي والعشرين. ومع ذلك، فبالنسبة للبعض، فإن مثل هذه الإحصاءات لا تشير إلى اليأس، وإنما تشير إلى وجود فرص جديدة. يقول لوران فان هوك، كبير موظفي العمليات في شركة "بيبوكس" التي تتخذ من لندن مقرا لها: "هذه سوق غير مستغلة. وهناك فرص هائلة لإقامة مشروعات جديدة، فضلا عن إمكانيات كبيرة للتأثير على حياة الناس". ولا يتعامل فان هوك وزملاؤه مع سكان المناطق الريفية مثل مبيراباغابو على أنهم يستحقون مشروعات خيرية ولكن على أنهم عملاء حقيقيون. وبناء على ذلك، فإن الحل الذي يقدمونه يتمثل في إقامة شركة هادفة للربح تعمل على تصنيع وتركيب شواحن عالية الكفاءة تعمل بالطاقة الشمسية وإتاحتها للعملاء بأسعار معقولة. وفي غضون أربعة أعوام فقط، جرى توصيل الكهرباء لنحو 130 ألف منزل وشركة في 35 بلدا ـ وتهدف الشركة إلى إيصال الطاقة إلى أكثر من مليون منزل بحلول عام 2020. بدأت القصة في كلية إمبيريال لندن.فبينما ركز البعض على تلميع سيرهم الذاتية بمهن المستقبل في القطاع المصرفي أو قطاع الاستشارات، قرر طالب الهندسة الكهربائية فان هوك وشريكاه كريستوفر بيكر بريان ومنصور هامايون تأسيس جمعية "إكوينوكس" الخيرية التي تكرس جهودها لتوصيل الكهرباء لعدد من المجتمعات المحلية في رواندا. وفي صيف عام 2009، سافر فان هوك وزميلاه إلى العاصمة الرواندية كيغالي لرؤية كل شيء على أرض الواقع. وقد تمكنوا، بفضل نقاط المراقبة العديدة من أعالي الهضاب بالمدينة، من رؤية المباني الجذابة التي تتخللها الحدائق، بالإضافة إلى بعض العمارات الشاهقة. ولكن بعد غروب الشمس، حل الظلام على كل شيء. لكن السؤال الآن هو: كيف يمكن لرواندا أن تحقق هدفها في أن تصبح "سنغافورة أفريقيا" إذا كان العديد من سكانها لا يزالون يفتقرون إلى الكهرباء؟ بدلا من البقاء في العاصمة كيغالي، أمضى الفريق معظم وقته في منطقة ريفية تضم نحو 200 أسرة. وبعد معاينة الطرق المختلفة لتوصيل الطاقة، أدرك أعضاء الفريق أن شبكة الكهرباء لا يمكن أن تصل إطلاقا لهذه المناطق، لأن هذه المجتمعات تنتشر في مناطق شاسعة وفقيرة للغاية بحيث لا تستطيع تحمل مثل هذه البنية التحتية واسعة النطاق. لكنهم خلصوا إلى أن أفريقيا ستتجاوز مرحلة الكهرباء العادية وتقفز إلى مستوى أوروبا وأمريكا الشمالية مباشرة من حيث الاعتماد على الطاقة الشمسية - تماما كما تجاوزت مرحلة خطوط الهاتف الأرضية، وهي نادرة في المناطق الريفية بأفريقيا، واتجهت للهواتف المحمولة. وكان الشيء الذي شجعهم على البدء في هذا المشروع يتمثل في أن العديد من الأفارقة في هذه المجتمعات كانوا متقبلين تماما لفكرة دفع تكاليف الطاقة الشمسية. يقول هامايون، الرئيس التنفيذي لشركة بيبوكس:" إذا ذهبت إلى أحد العملاء وقلت له: أنت تدفع بالفعل ما يتراوح بين خمسة دولارات و20 دولارا شهريا للحصول على الكيروسين والبطاريات، لكن يمكنك بنفس هذا المبلغ أن تحصل على الكهرباء - ستجد أنها عملية بيع سهلة جدا". ويضيف هامايون: "أدركت الحكومات ووكالات التنمية أيضا أن الطاقة الشمسية هي الحل طويل الأمد لهؤلاء العملاء". وقد شجع هذا الفريق على إعادة النظر في مشروعهم الخيري وتحويله إلى مشروع هادف للربح. يقول بيكر بريان، رئيس قسم التكنولوجيا في بيبوكس:" في نهاية المطاف، كان حافزنا هو توسيع نطاق العمل التجاري، ما يعني كسب المال وفرض رسوم على العملاء بدلا من النظر إليهم على أنهم مستفيدون". لكن، ما الهدف من التحول إلى شركة هادفة للربح؟ هذا يعني الاستثمار على المدى الطويل، لأن المشروعات المجانية والصفقات التي تنظمها الجمعيات الخيرية غالبا ما تفشل في إحداث تأثير دائم لأنها تميل إلى أن تقدم خدمات لمرة واحدة، كما أن اعتمادها على أموال المانحين يقيد نطاقها، كما يقول بيكر بريان. وستحتاج الشركة إلى زيادة تمويل المستثمرين حتى تتمكن من تشكيل فريق قادر على تطوير التكنولوجيا لتصل إلى المستوى المطلوب. ومع ذلك، وعلى الرغم مما يحدث على أرض الواقع، فإن جميع من تحدثوا معهم تقريبا حول هذا المشروع "يعتقدون أن ما نفعله محفوف بالمخاطر حقا وغير قابل للتطوير، لأننا نعمل في أفريقيا"، على حد تعبير هامايون. ويضيف أن الجولة الأولى من جمع التمويلات اللازمة كانت صعبة للغاية لأنه لا توجد سابقة حقيقية لإقامة مشروع تجاري تكنولوجي في أفريقيا. وفي النهاية، وجد الفريق مستثمرا اقتنع بالفكرة، وهي شركة "خوسلا إمباكت". كما ظهرت ثلاث شركات أخرى مماثلة تعمل في مجال الطاقة الشمسية في نفس الوقت التي أطلقت فيه شركة بيبوكس. وبدأت شركة "موبيسول" التي تتخذ من برلين مقرا لها في تركيب 85 ألف وحدة لتخزين الطاقة في تنزانيا ورواندا؛ كما توفر شركة "أوف غريد إليكتريك" التي تتخذ من سان فرانسيسكو مقرا لها الطاقة لـ 50 ألف منزل في تنزانيا؛ فيما وفرت شركة "إم-كوبا" الكينية الطاقة لأكثر من 50 ألف منزل في كينيا وأوغندا وتنزانيا. وقد ركزت الجهود حتى الآن على شرق أفريقيا، ولكن لا شك في أن هذه المسألة تحتاج إلى وقت قبل انضمام المزيد من الشركات إلى قائمة الشركات الموجودة بالفعل. ووفقا لتقرير صدر مؤخرا عن البنك الدولي، من المتوقع أن ينمو تخزين الطاقة في الأسواق الناشئة في جميع أنحاء العالم بنسبة 40 في المئة سنويا على مدى العقد القادم. وقد اتضح أن التكنولوجيا نفسها كانت أبسط جزء في مثل هذه العمليات. وفي حالة بيبوكس، يتم تخزين الطاقة الشمسية التي تجمع من لوحة على السطح خلال الليل، فيما يتيح الاتصال عن بعد عبر الجيل الثاني من الشبكات الخلوية إرسال بيانات الموقع الجغرافي والأداء إلى المقر الرئيسي. وتراقب الخوارزميات صحة الوحدات وتسمح للفريق باستبدال البطاريات التي تتضاءل قوتها (في الغالب بعد ثلاث سنوات تقريبا). وبالنسبة للمدفوعات، أدرك الفريق في وقت مبكر أن العملاء في المناطق الريفية لن يكون بمقدورهم شراء وحدة بيبوكس بشكل كامل. لذا فقد اختاروا بدلا من ذلك خطط الدفع الشهري. ويمكن للعملاء أيضا شراء لوازم صممتها بيبوكس لتقليل استخدام الطاقة، بما في ذلك ماكينات الحلاقة والهواتف الذكية والتلفزيونات بشاشات تبلغ 24 بوصة التي تستهلك 11 واط من الطاقة مقارنة مع نموذج غربي يعادل استهلاكه 24 واط. قبل خمسة أشهر، عندما أنشأت بيبوكس مكتبا في رواماغانا، الضاحية التي يعيش فيها مبيراباغابو، كان هو من أوائل المشتركين. ويقول مبيراباغابو، وهو أب لخمسة أطفال، إن التكنولوجيا "غيرت حياته". وعززت الأضواء التي حصلت عليها عائلته شعورهم بالأمن حيال المتسللين المحتملين. ويرى مبيراباغابو أيضا أنه لم يعد بحاجة إلى إشعال الشموع والمصابيح التي ينبعث منها الدخان الذي يضر بصحة أطفاله. وتعني الأضواء بالنسبة لأطفال مبيراباغابو الأكبر سنا أن بإمكانهم القراءة والمذاكرة بالليل، والذهاب إلى الفراش في وقت لاحق. يقول مبيراباغابو:" الآن، هناك الكثير من الوقت للقيام بكل ما نحتاج إليه". ويقول كلود، 13 عاما وأكبر أطفال مبيراباغابو، إنه يحب التلفزيون كثيرا. ورغم انبهار كلود - الذي يرغب في أن يصبح مدرسا عندما يكبر - بمباراة كرة قدم برازيلية شاهدها مؤخرا فإنه يؤكد أن نشرة الأخبار هي برنامجه المفضل. ويقف كلود خجولا ومهذبا ومتمسكا بإجابته غير المتوقعة، حتى عندما سأله صحفي أجنبي إن كان متأكدا أن برامج الرياضة والرسوم المتحركة ليست المفضلة لديه. يقول كلود: "الآن أنا قادر على معرفة من هم الأشخاص الذين يشكلون الحكومة. وأستطيع طرح أسئلة أفضل في المدرسة". يمكنك قراءة الموضوع الأصلي على موقع BBC Future . اضغط هنا لتنزيل تطبيق بي بي سي عربي الخاص بمستخدمي نظام أندرويد تابع أحدث الأخبار من بي بي سي عربي ومن شبكة صحفييها العالمية في تطبيق جديد خاص بمستخدمي نظام #أندرويد. حمل التطبيق الآن! http://bit.ly/2ikGmBK نهاية فيسبوك الرسالة التي بعث بها BBC Arabic
هناك مفاهيم خاطئة حول رائحة الفم الكريهة وكيفية التخلص منها، كما أن هناك أيضا حقائق علمية يمكن الاستفادة منها، كما تقول الصحفية العلمية كلوديا هاموند. قبل عدة سنوات، وبعد أن بدأت أعمل في الإذاعة مباشرة، وصلت إلى غرفة الأخبار لأتلقى تكليفي اليومي. وقد طُلب مني أن أزور عيادة تعالج النفس الكريه (رائحة الفم الكريهة)، حيث أجري لي فحص طبي، وأجريت مقابلة مع الطبيب. في طريقي لتلك العيادة تساءلت عما إذا كان هذا الأمر مجرد حيلة، أو ربما كان زملائي يخفون شيئاً ويخشون أن يخبروني به. لحسن الحظ، سارت الأمور على ما يرام، لكن النفس الكريه أمر شائع، وتحيط به بعض المفاهيم الخاطئة أو الخرافات البعيدة عن الحقائق. المشكلة في هذه الطريقة هي أن النفس في اليدين لا يطلق النفس من آخر جزء في فمك بنفس الطريقة التي تحدث عندما تتكلم. لذا فعندما تتنفس في كفيك ربما لا تستطيع أن تشم رائحة الغازات التي تتولد على مؤخرة اللسان، وهو المكان الرئيسي الذي تصدر منه روائح النفس الكريهة. ولدى الأطباء ثلاث طرق لإختبار النفس الكريه. حيث يمكنهم تحديد الأمر بأنفسهم عن طريق شم أحد الأشياء التالية: نفس المريض على مسافة خمسة سنتيمترات من أنف الطبيب، أو محتوى ملعقة يتم حكها بمؤخرة اللسان، أو خيط تنظيف أسنان غير مغلف بالشمع يُمرر بين الأسنان الخلفية، أو وعاء يحتوي على لعاب المريض ترك في درجة 37 مئوية لخمس دقائق. كما أن هناك بعض أجهزة الرصد الصغيرة التي بإمكانها التقاط غازات معينة يصدرها الفم، لكن الجانب السلبي فيها هو أنها تتعرف على غازات محددة وليس جميع الغازات. وأخيراً هناك طريقة "فصل الغازات طبقاً لألوانها"، والتي بموجبها يجري فصل مزيج معقد من الغازات، وبالتالي قياس كمية الكبريت التي تخرج في الهواء من الفم، لكن هذه الطريقة يلزمها جهاز خاص ليس متوفراً في كثير من عيادات الأطباء. وليس كل من يعتقد أن نفسه كريه يكون نفسه كذلك فعلاً. فهؤلاء قد يسيئون تفسير تحرك من يقفون بقربهم إلى الوراء، أو استدارتهم بعيداً عنهم، بينما لا يكون ذلك عادة هو رد فعل الناس في الحالات الحقيقية لرائحة الفم الكريهة. وقدرت إحدى الدراسات نسبة الأشخاص الذين يصدرون رد فعل كهذا بنحو 27 في المئة فقط ممن يواجهون مثل هذا الموقف. خرافة: إذا كانت رائحة فمك كريهة فأنت تعاني من مرض ما. معظم روائح الفم الكريهة تأتي من مركبات الكبريت المتطايرة، وهي غازات كريهة الرائحة. ويعد كبريتيد الهيدروجين برائحته المميزة التي تشبه رائحة البيض الفاسد أحد هذه الغازات، لكن الأسوأ منه هو مادة تسمى الإيثيل، والتي تشبه رائحة الملفوف الفاسد المتحلل. وهي نفس المركب الذي يجعل بول بعض الناس لاذعاً بعد تناولهم نبات الهليون. هذه المركبات تتكون عندما يلتقي الطعام بالبكتيريا في نتوءات مؤخرة اللسان. لكن الشيء الإيجابي هو أن ذلك من الممكن أن يكون مؤقتاً، كنتيجة لتناول الثوم أو البصل النيئين، أو شرب القهوة، أو تدخين السجائر. لكن في ثلاثة أرباع الحالات، تم التعرف على نوع ما من مشاكل الأسنان والضروس المرتبطة برائحة الفم الكريهة. فربما كان يعاني المرضى من تورم اللثة، أو التهاب الحلق، أو ربما كانوا يشتكون من بثور على سطح اللسان. صحيح أنه في حالات قليلة يكون سبب رائحة الفم الكريهة هو مشكلة في مكان آخر من الجسد، مثل الأذن أو الأنف أو الحلق، أو الكليتين، أو الرئتين، أو الأمعاء، لكن عندما لا يحدث ذلك فمن غير المعتاد أن تكون رائحة الفم الكريهة هي العرض الوحيد لمثل هذه الأمراض. النعناع والقرنفل يساعدان بالطبع، ويخفيان الرائحة لوقت قصير، والعديد من سوائل غسول الفم تحتوي أيضاً على مادة مطهرة. لكن الفكرة هي القضاء على البكتيريا التي تؤدي إلى تكون المركبات ذات الرائحة الكريهة. من الممكن أن يكون ذلك هو الحال أحياناً. لكن هناك بعض الجدل المتعلق باحتواء غسول الفم على الكحول، وبالتالي إمكانية تأثيره على استفحال مشكلة الجفاف بالفم. فالفم الجاف يمكن أن يؤدي إلى زيادة رائحة الفم الكريهة. لكن شرب كمية وافرة من الماء خلال اليوم يساعد على تنظيف الفم من بقايا الطعام، ومنع جفاف الفم. وتعكف مؤسسة كوكراين البريطانية للأبحاث الصحية على تجميع مواد علمية عن وسائل مكافحة رائحة الفم الكريهة. ففي بحثهم عن سوائل غسول الفسم لعام 2008، تبين أن أفضل خمس سوائل هي تلك التي احتوت على مواد مضادة للبكتيريا، مثل الكلوريكسيدين، و كلوريد الالسيتيلبيريدينيوم، وثاني أكسيد الكلور أو الزنك، والتي يمكن أن تخفض مستوى الرائحة الكريهة إلى حد معين. لكن مؤلفي البحث دعوا إلى إجراء المزيد من التجارب. ويؤمل أن يستطيع البحث القادم تقديم معلومات أكثر عن أنواع غسول الفم التي يُنصح باستخدامها. البديل هو أن تحك لسانك بمنظف خاص للسان. هذه الطريقة مازالت أيضاً تحت الاختبار في أحدث بحث تعده مؤسسة كوكراين. وقد ورد في بحثهم الأخير أن هناك تجربتين صغيرتين تجريان لاختبار فعالية هذه الطريقة. وقد أظهرت التجربتان أنهما يمكن أن تحققا النجاح. لكن تأثيرهما قصير الأمد. وقد أكدت التجربتان في الوقت ذاته على مخاطر الإضرار باللسان بالضغط عليه بصورة مبالغ فيها، وأكد البحث على أنه إذا أردت أن تستخدم فرشاة الأسنان لتنظيف اللسان فينبغي أن تكون تلك الفرشاة ناعمة. يوجد في فم كل فرد تجمع متفاوت في نوعه من الميكروبات يتراوح بين 100-200 ميكروب. واتساقاً مع فهمنا للدور الإيجابي الذي تلعبه الميكروبيومات البشرية، وملايين البكتيريا في أجسامنا، فإنه وبدلاً من القضاء على البكتيريا نهائياً في فمنا، يحاول العلماء معرفة كيف يمكن التوفيق بين الإبقاء على البكتيريا النافعة والتخلص من الضارة. ويمكن أن يجري ذلك باستهداف بكتيريا بعينها والقضاء عليها، أو باستخدام مواد تحفز على وجود بكتيريا معينة داخل الفم. وقد أكملت المرحلتان الأولى والثانية من التجارب الخاصة بقتل البكتيريا المسؤولة في الغالب عن تسوس الأسنان. وقد جربت مادة جديدة كمعجون يوضع للمريض داخل العيادة أولا، وفي المرحلة الثانية، يجري اختباره كدهان داخل العيادة أيضا، لكن في هذه المرة يصطحب المرضى معهم إلى البيت بعض الشرائط المشبعة بهذه المادة، والتي يمكن أن يضعوها على أسنانهم كنوع من متابعة العلاج. وهذا النهج يفتح المجال أمام إمكانية استخدام طرق مشابهة في المستقبل للقضاء على البكتيريا المسؤولة عن رائحة الفم الكريهة. ولا يزال الأمر في بدايته، لذلك فإن النصيحة الطبية هي أن تستعمل الفرشاة والخيط الطبي في تنظيف أسنانك بعناية، وأن تشرب كمية وافرة من الماء، وأن تمتنع عن التدخين، وأن تأكل طعاماً متوازناً، وأن تراجع طبيب الأسنان لمعرفة سبب رائحة فمك، خشية أن تكون لديك بدايات مرض ما في اللثة. يمكنك قراءة الموضوع الأصلي على موقع BBC Future .
A "significant" Brexit transitional period needs to be agreed as soon as possible, to stop jobs being moved from the UK to Europe, according to the boss of Goldman Sachs International. Chief executive Richard Gnodde told the BBC he was spending money "every single day" on contingency plans for Brexit. The plans involve taking on more staff in Goldman's European offices to serve EU customers post-Brexit. If a transitional deal was in place he could save that money, Mr Gnodde said. Goldman Sachs employs 6,500 people in the UK. Goldman Sachs' most senior employee outside the United States said the longer he had to wait for the government to clarify its position, the less useful any transition period would ultimately be. "The other way to describe the contingency plan is that we're buying insurance, so I'm spending money every single day to make sure that come March 2019 I'm open for business," said Mr Gnodde. "If I knew today that we would have a significant transition period I could stop spending that (contingency) money because I know I would have time to transition my business. "If they [the government] tell me in February 2019 there will be a transition period - well, I've already spent all that money, it's not much use to me. At that point the transition period doesn't really help - so the sooner we know... that's obviously helpful to us." Goldman's Brexit contingency plans include adding hundreds of staff to its European offices - mainly in Frankfurt and Paris - to ensure it can continue to work with its EU-based customers after the UK leaves the EU. These roles would be filled by both moving people from London as well as hiring locally. Further additions or relocations would be considered over time depending on the final agreement between the EU and the UK. Mr Gnodde said he expected London to remain a very important financial centre whatever the outcome of the Brexit negotiations. "We will maintain a very significant presence in London. But if the rules require us to have more on the continent we will have more on the continent," he added. Like all banks, Goldman Sachs submitted its Brexit plans to the Financial Conduct Authority (FCA) last week. FCA boss Andrew Bailey said banks would need to know the government's position on any transitional arrangements by the end of this year, before contingency plans were put into action. On Thursday, Prime Minister Theresa May chaired the first meeting of the new business council - a rotating forum of business leaders which is set to meet regularly to discuss the government's Brexit plans. According to a Number 10 spokesperson, Mrs May talked about the need to have a transitional period, rather than an abrupt exit from the EU. "On Brexit, the Prime Minister reiterated that the government's overarching goal is for a smooth, orderly exit culminating in a comprehensive free trade deal with the EU, with a period of implementation in order to avoid any cliff-edges," Number 10 said in a statement.
وقع عشرات من منتجي البرامج والأفلام الإباحية خطابا مفتوحا إلى شركة باتريون، التي تملك منصة باسمها على الإنترنت، يرفضون فيه القيود التي فرضتها على إنتاج المواد الإباحية. وعدلت خدمة التمويل الجماعي من قواعدها الأسبوع الماضي، لتحظر صراحة بيع المحتويات الإباحية وتوفير الخدمات الجنسية. وقالت الشركة عند الإعلان عن هذه القيود إنها توضح سياسة قائمة بالفعل. لكن الشركة اتُهمت بخداع بعض أعضاء المنصة، الذين يقولون إن أنشطتهم قانونية. ويقول الخطاب: "نعرف أناسا سيتشردون عن منازلهم، إذا لم ينتجوا موادا إباحية على منصة باتريون، وهؤلاء ليس بالعدد القليل". وأضاف: "موقفكم الغامض من (محتويات البالغين) مقابل (المواد الإباحية) يعطيكم الحرية لممارسة التمييز في أي وقت". وأردف: "وهذا يجعل منتجي المحتوى يعيشون في خوف من هذا التمييز، والذي يؤدي في حد ذاته إلى رقابة ذاتية على وجهات النظر المهمة". وأعلن الرئيس التنفيذي لشركة باتريون إنه سيصدر "ردا كاملا" على الخطاب. وبخلاف أغلب منصات التمويل الجماعي، التي تركز على تقديم منتج أو خدمة منفردة، توفر باتريون لأعضائها طريقة للحصول على رسوم اشتراك شهري مقابل خدمة مستمرة، وتأخذ الشركة حصة من تلك الرسوم. وفي كثير من الحالات، يشمل ذلك توفير مواد صوتية وموسيقى وفيديوهات تدريبية وعروض فنية. لكن في السابع عشر من أكتوبر/ تشرين الأول الجاري، أعرب المدير القانوني للشركة عن قلقه، لأن "عددا قليلا من المنتجين" تورطوا في إنتاج ما وصفه بـ محتوى غير مناسب للبالغين. ونتيجة لذلك، عدلت الشركة، ومقرها سان فرانسيسكو، قواعدها الإرشادية للأعضاء لتقول: "لا يمكنك أن تستخدم منصة باتريون بهدف إنتاج مواد إباحية، مثل الإنفاق على موقع إلكتروني أو تمويل إنتاج أفلام، أو توفير جلسات خاصة عبر كاميرا الإنترنت". وعلى الرغم من أن باتريون قالت إنه لم يطرأ تغيير كبير على سياستها، إلا أن الخطاب أشار إلى مدون، زعم أنه حدث بالفعل "تغيير ملموس بعد فترة طويلة من الاستقرار". وأضاف المدون: "لقد كنتم تساعدوننا على أن نعمل بحرية. نطلب منكم أن تتخذوا موقفا بالنيابة عن العاملين في مجال صناعة الجنس، الذين يستخدمون منصتكم، وجمهورهم، وكل شخص يؤيد حرية التعبير". وقال أحد الأكاديميين إن باتريون ربما ترغب في تجنب مخاطر اقترانها بـ"الاستغلال"، لكن الرقابة تحمل أيضا مخاطرها الخاصة. وأضاف الدكتور بيرني هوغان، من معهد جامعة أوكسفورد للإنترنت: "وبالنسبة لبعض الناس فإن فكرة وجود فارق كبير، بين المواد الإباحية السيئة والأخرى التي يعبر عنها بأنها جيدة، لم يعد ممكنا الدفاع عنها كما كان من قبل". وأردف: "لكن من المعقول أن شركة باتريون تحاول أن تكون محافظة بدرجة أكبر، في وقت تسعى فيه للتوسع. وأنا أتخيل أن هناك حالة استخدام بعينها سببت مشكلة للشركة".
Catalan authorities will not follow orders from the Spanish government if Madrid moves to reassert control over the region, a senior official says. A regional government spokesman told the BBC that the central government was acting against the will of Catalans. Spanish Prime Minister Mariano Rajoy has announced plans to sack the region's government and curtail some of the powers of its parliament. The Catalan parliament will meet on Thursday to decide on its response. The pro-independence leaders could decide to formalise a unilateral declaration of independence, the BBC's Bethany Bell in Barcelona reports. The Spanish Senate is expected to approve the government's measures on Friday along with a proposal for fresh regional elections. The Catalan government, led by President Carles Puigdemont, has refused to halt an independence drive following an outlawed referendum held earlier this month. On Saturday, Mr Rajoy said he was triggering Article 155 of the constitution - an unprecedented move - which allows for direct rule to be imposed in a crisis on any of the country's autonomous regions. But Catalan leaders say they will not accept the plan. Speaking to BBC Radio 4's Today programme, foreign affairs spokesman Raul Romeva said: "How can the European Union live with that situation [if this happens]? "Because what I can tell you is that the people and the institutions in Catalonia will not let this happen." He said the Spanish government needed to recognise that the people of the region had voted for independence. The Catalan government said that of the 43% who took part in the 1 October referendum, 90% were in favour of independence. Unionist parties who won about 40% of the vote at the 2015 Catalan elections boycotted the ballot. Apart from stripping Mr Puigdemont of all his powers, the central government will also seek to take control of Catalonia's police force and its public broadcaster, TV3, reports suggest. Mr Rajoy insisted the measures would not mean Catalan self-government itself was being suspended and that they were intended to remove the people who had taken illegal action. The country's Deputy Prime Minister, Soraya Sáenz de Santamaría, told Spanish radio Onda Cero (in Spanish) that Catalan leaders were "completely not in compliance with the constitution and the statute of autonomy". Once the Senate approves Article 155, Mr Puigdemont will stop receiving a salary and will not be able to carry out his functions, she added. Catalonia's far-left CUP party - a key support for Mr Puigdemont's minority government in the regional parliament - has warned of a campaign of "massive civil disobedience" if Madrid imposes direct rule on the region. Spanish media report that the Catalan leader is planning to present his arguments to a commission of the Spanish Senate on Wednesday, but this has yet to be confirmed. There have been calls by Mr Puigdemont's supporters to declare a snap election before direct rule becomes effective. The EU has refused to back the drive for Catalan independence and said the crisis was for Spain to resolve.
Italian police have opened an investigation after Lazio football fans posted stickers of Holocaust victim Anne Frank wearing the jersey of rivals Roma alongside anti-Semitic slogans. The material was found in an area of Rome's Olympic Stadium occupied by hard-core Lazio fans known as "ultras". Italian President Sergio Mattarella called the case "alarming". Anne Frank became famous for her diary of life as a German Jew in Nazi-occupied Amsterdam in World War Two. Local rivals Lazio and Roma share the stadium, and the "ultras" - known for their racist chants and often violent behaviour - left the stickers and anti-Semitic slogans such as "Roma fans are Jews" during a match on Sunday. The head of Rome's Jewish community, Ruth Dureghello, posted a picture of the stickers on Twitter, and added: "This is not soccer, this is not sport. Anti-Semites out of the stadiums." Questa non è una curva, questo non è calcio, questo non è sport. Fuori gli antisemiti dagli stadi. pic.twitter.com/Q1uJnDQ7Cl End of Twitter post by @dureghello The post was then retweeted by Rome's Mayor Virginia Raggi, and the Italian football association is expected to investigate the case. Sports Minister Luca Lotti said that those responsible would be "identified and punished", adding: "There is no justification. These are instances to be condemned unconditionally." Lazio president Claudio Lotito visited a synagogue in Rome and brought a floral wreath to remember Holocaust victims. "I am here to express our total dissociation towards all xenophobia, racism, anti-Semitism," he was quoted by Italian newspaper La Repubblica (in Italian) as saying. He added that the club would take 200 fans every year to visit the museum on the site of Nazi death camp at Auschwitz, where more than one million people were murdered. Italy's football federation said in a statement that a minute's silence will be held and a passage read from Anne Frank's famous diary before this week's games.
هل تعرف أن "سحب" تخزين المعلومات والملفات على الإنترنت، أو نظم الحوسبة السحابية، لها مكان مادي على الأرض؟ فالصور التي تنشرها على موقع إنستغرام، وأمنيات أعياد الميلاد التي تكتبها على صفحات فيسبوك، وكذلك البرامج التليفزيونية التي تشاهدها عبر شبكة "نتفلكس"، تخزن في مجموعة هائلة من الخوادم تتصل ببعضها في صفوف وأبراج في مخازن عملاقة. وتوجد هذه الخوادم في مراكز بيانات لا يغامر بارتيادها إلا قليلون. لكنني قررت أن أدخل بنفسي هذه المتاهة من المعلومات، في مراكز البيانات بالعاصمة السويدية ستوكهولم، والتي اكتشفت أنها لا تحمل البيانات فحسب، بل إن الحرارة المتولدة عن تشغيل هذه الخوادم تستخدم في تدفئة المنازل في المدينة التي يزيد تعداد سكانها على 900 ألف نسمة. فكيف يعاد تدوير هذه الحرارة؟ وهل ستصبح هذه الطريقة نموذج عمل تجاري جديد في عالم التقنية حول العالم؟ ستلاحظ وأنت تسير بين جنبات مراكز البيانات في ستوكهولم أن الهواء بارد وجاف. وتغطي صفوف أبراج الخوادم آلاف المصابيح التي تومض وتنطفئ طوال الوقت، وقلما تجد أشخاص داخل تلك المراكز. وأينما تنظر في السقف وتحت البلاطات المتحركة ستجد كتلا من الكابلات التي تمر في جميع الاتجاهات. إلا أن أكثر ما يلفت الانتباه في المكان هو الصوت المرتفع، وهذا لأن درجة حرارة أجهزة الكمبيوتر ترتفع بعد فترة من التشغيل، ويتطلب تبريدها الكثير من المراوح حتى تعمل بكفاءة. ولتدرك حجم الحرارة في المكان، تخيل الحرارة الناتجة عن جهاز الكمبيوتر المحمول الخاص بك مضروبة في الحرارة المتولدة عن آلاف من أجهزة الكمبيوتر المتصلة ببعضها في مخزن بأكمله، وهذه الأجهزة تؤدي مهام معقدة وتعمل بلا انقطاع على مدار الساعة. ويعتمد التبريد في الغالب على الماء البارد والكثير من المراوح التي تنتج هواء باردا وتسحب الهواء الدافئ إلى الخارج، ومن المعتاد التخلص من هذه الحرارة كنفايات. لكن الحرارة نوع من الطاقة، ولهذا قررت السويد استغلالها لتدفئة المنازل. وقد دشن المجلس المحلي لمدينة ستوكهولم، بالشراكة مع شركة "فورتام فارم" التي توفر خدمات التدفئة والتبريد بالسويد، وغيرها من الشركات، مشروع "ستوكهولم داتا باركس". وانضم إلى المشروع حتى الآن العديد من مراكز البيانات الكبرى في ستوكهولم، ويستقطب المشروع اهتمام المزيد من الشركات التي تسعى لترسيخ سمعتها في مجال الوعي البيئي، وفي الوقت نفسه، جني الأرباح من نموذج عمل تجاري جديد. وأعلن البرنامج مؤخرا عن عقد شراكات مع مراكز بيانات تديرها كبريات الشركات العالمية مثل شركة "إريكسون"، التي تبني شبكات الهاتف المحمول وسلسلة محلات "إتش أند إم". وتقوم فكرة المشروع، في أغلب المراكز في ستوكهولم، على تغذية مراكز البيانات بالماء البارد عبر مواسير لتبريد الهواء الذي يوجه نحو الخوادم للحفاظ على درجة حرارتها وحمايتها من السخونة المفرطة. ثم يمر الماء الساخن الناتج عن عملية التبريد، عبر المواسير المتجهة إلى الخارج نحو محطات "فورتام"، التي توزعه بدورها لأغراض التدفئة. هذه الفكرة لا تطبق في السويد وحدها، فقد تبنتها مشروعات على نطاق ضيق في بلدان أخرى مثل فنلندا، حيث تستخدم الحرارة الناتجة عن مركز بيانات لتدفئة المنازل في إحدى المدن الصغيرة منذ العام الماضي. كما توجد برامج مماثلة في الولايات المتحدة وكندا وفرنسا. لكن القرار السويدي لتوسيع حجم هذا المشروع ليستخدم في التدفئة على مستوى الدولة بأكملها، يعد قرارا غير مسبوق. وتتطلع مبادرة "ستوكهولم داتا باركس" إلى توليد ما يكفي من الحرارة لتدفئة 2.500 شقة سكنية بحلول عام 2018، وتهدف على المدى البعيد إلى تلبية 10 في المئة من إجمالي احتياجات ستوكهولم من التدفئة بحلول عام 2035. وبحسب مجموعة "داتا سنترز باي سويدن"، التي تدشن مشروعات على غرار "ستوكهولم داتا باركس" في مختلف أنحاء السويد، تتطلب تدفئة 20.000 شقة سكنية حديثة 10 ميغاوات من الطاقة فقط. ويستهلك مركز بيانات فيسبوك على سبيل المثال، 120 ميغاوات. وثمة دوافع عديدة تحفز الشركات على الانضمام للبرنامج في ستوكهولم، على رأسها الربح المادي الذي ستجنيه الشركات من بيع الحرارة المهدرة. كما توفر شركة "فورتام" المياه الباردة التي ستحتاجها الشركات للتبريد مجانا. وبعد دراسة تكاليف المشروع ومزاياه، وجدت شركة "إنتيركسيون"، التي تدعم مراكز بياناتها تطبيقات ألعاب الهاتف المحمول وغيرها من البرامج القائمة على الحوسبة السحابية، أن فرص نجاح المشروع عالية للغاية، ما حدا بها إلى بناء محطة كاملة جديدة لاستعادة الحرارة المهدرة. ويقول ماتس نيلسون هان، رئيس قسم تطوير الأعمال بالشركة: "هذا المشروع لا يهدف للحفاظ على البيئة فحسب". ويوضح بيدر بانك، المدير المنتدب لفرع الشركة في دول الشمال الأوروبي: "نحن نحاول أن نحول هذا المشروع إلى نشاط تجاري ثانوي للشركة". وتتبنى السويد منذ فترة طويلة أفكارا صديقة للبيئة في مجال الطاقة، على شاكلة هذا المشروع. ويُعزي بيورن هوغوسون، مدير شؤون الطقس ببلدية ستوكهولم، ذلك إلى قلة الموارد الطبيعية في السويد. ويقول: "ليس لدينا في السويد أي مصادر للطاقة الأحفورية، فليس لدينا آبار نفط ولا مناجم فحم". واليوم، تضم السويد 2.057 محطة للطاقة الكهرومائية، بحسب المجلس العالمي للطاقة، وتعتمد السويد على هذه المحطات لتوليد 40 في المئة من احتياجاتها من الطاقة، أما النسبة الباقية فيأتي أغلبها من محطات الطاقة النووية، التي تسعى السويد للحد منها تدريجيا، بالإضافة إلى بعض الفحم، الذي تستورده محطة واحدة لتوليد الطاقة من روسيا. وتتجه البلاد للاستغناء عن الفحم على مدار السنوات الخمس القادمة، وربما مع حلول عام 2020، لتصبح خالية تماما من الوقود الأحفوري في عام 2040. كما تكاد السويد تخلو من القمامة، إذ يعيد مواطنوها تدوير ما يزيد على 99 في المئة من النفايات المنزلية ولا يُلقى منها سوى ثلاثة في المئة فقط في مكبات النفايات. وتحرق الدولة نحو 70 في المئة من نفاياتها لتوليد الطاقة، وتستورد القمامة من البلدان المجاورة لتلبية احتياجاتها من الطاقة، إذ أصبحت السويد تعتمد على الطاقة المستمدة من النفايات منذ بداية برنامج حرق القمامة. ورغم ذلك، فإن الدولة التي تنتهج السياسيات الأكثر حفاظا على البيئة والموارد الطبيعية في توليد الطاقة، ليست السويد، بل أيسلندا، التي تستمد 86 في المئة من إجمالي الطاقة التي تستهلكها من مصادر الطاقة المتجددة. وعلى الرغم من أن السويد استطاعت أن تستغني تماما عن الوقود الأحفوري في بعض الأيام، عندما كانت الظروف الجوية مواتية لتوليد الطاقة، فإن جارتها الدنمارك تستغني بانتظام عن الوقود الأحفوري، بفضل طواحين الهواء التي تولد كميات هائلة من الطاقة، إلى درجة أن الدنمارك تبيع فائض الطاقة الآن إلى البلدان المجاورة. فهل من الممكن أن تطبق خطة السويد الطموحة لاسترداد الحرارة المهدرة وإعادة استخدامها، في أماكن أخرى من العالم؟ هذا الأمر ليس مستبعدا، ولكنه يتطلب إجراء بعض التغييرات أولا. فقد نجحت الخطة في السويد لأن الحكومة توفر للمواطنين الماء الساخن اللازم لتدفئة منازلهم. وبدأت ستوكهولم في تطبيق برنامج يسمى "شبكات التدفئة المركزية في الأحياء"، في خمسينيات القرن الماضي، وكانت أغلب البيوت آنذاك تعتمد على الزيت للتدفئة. ثم شرعت شركة "فورتام فارم" في ضخ الماء الساخن عبر مواسير إلى المستشفيات، ومن بعدها المنازل في جميع أنحاء السويد، في أعقاب تفاقم أزمة البترول في سبعينيات القرن الماضي. وتوفر شركة "فورتام" خدمات التدفئة بمقابل مادي لنحو 12.000 مبنى أو 90 في المئة من مدينة ستوكهولم. وكانت الشركة تستخدم الفحم في بادئ الأمر لتوليد الحرارة، ولكنها اليوم أصبحت تعتمد على الوقود الحيوي المستمد من لب الخشب المتبقي من عمليات الإنتاج الضخمة في مجال زراعة الغابات في مختلف أنحاء السويد، ويُنقل الوقود الحيوي إلى ستوكهولم عبر السفن. ولأن الشعب السويدي يعيد تدوير كل شيء، فإنه يعيد استخدام الماء الساخن أيضا بعد تصريفه. ويقول جوناس كوليت، رئيس قسم الشؤون الإعلامية بشركة "فورتام": "كانت المياه الناتجة عن الاستحمام تُنظف وتعالج ثم تُضخ في البحر. وكانت هذه المياه تساعد في تدفئة المياه للأسماك، ولكن الأسماك لا تستفيد منها. ومنذ 30 عاما، اكتشفنا أن هذا إهدار للمياه، فلم لا نعيد استخدام هذه المياه؟" ولهذا، فإذا أرادت مدن أخرى أن تسير على خطى ستوكهولم، فعليها أن تنقل نموذج ستوكهولم بحذافيره بداية من شبكة مواسير الصرف ووصولا إلى نظام توفير الحرارة إلى المواطنين. وهذا النموذج ليس مستحيلا، فقد طبقته بضعة مدن حول العالم، منها الكثير من المدن في كندا ومدينة نيويورك، وجميع أنحاء أيسلندا تقريبا. إلا أنه قد لا يصلح في جميع الحالات، إذ يحذر بو نورمارك، العضو في الأكاديمية السويدية الملكية للعلوم الهندسية ومستشار في مجال شبكات توزيع الكهرباء لعدد كبير من شركات توفير الطاقة الصديقة للبيئة، من أن البرنامج السويدي غير قابل للتوسع إلى ما لا نهاية، إذ سيأتي وقت لن تحتاج فيه الدولة إلى المزيد من مراكز البيانات. ويقول: "يبالغ الناس في تقدير احتياجات الدولة من الطاقة اللازمة للتدفئة، وسيصبح لدينا فائض من الحرارة في وقت من الأوقات. وقد تصدر الدول الكهرباء ولكنها لا يمكن أن تصدر الحرارة اللازمة للتدفئة إلى الدول الأخرى". ويضيف: "نجح هذا النموذج في ستوكهولم لأن المدينة تنمو بوتيرة متسارعة، ولأن توليد الحرارة يدّر أرباحا". وقد أثبتت مراكز البيانات الجديدة لمدينة ستوكهولم جاهزيتها للعمل بنفس السرعة التي تنمو بها المدينة. وأنهت مبادرة "ستوكهولم داتا باركس" أعمال تجهيز البنى التحتية لمراكز البيانات في أربعة مواقع رئيسية للمشروع في ستوكهولم، وترتبط المواقع الأربعة بشبكة توزيع الكهرباء المستمدة من الطاقة النظيفة، ومجهزة بجميع التوصيلات والشبكات التي تتيح للشركات الاتصال بنظام ضخ المياه الباردة وإعادة تدوير الحرارة. ويضم الموقع الأول، الذي اكتمل بالفعل في منطقة كيستا، التي تضاهي "سيلكون فالي" في ولاية كاليفورنيا، مراكز بيانات لشركات مثل "إنتركسيون". وتعتزم المبادرة استكمال أعمالها في موقعين آخرين بحلول عام 2018، وموقع رابع مع حلول عام 2019. وكل ما ستحتاجه الشركات هو بناء مراكز البيانات والاتصال بنظام إعادة تدوير الحرارة. يقول جوهان بورجي، رئيس قسم التسويق لبرنامج تبريد مراكز البيانات واستعادة الحرارة المهدرة منها لدى شركة "فورتام فارم": "نحن نغير اقتصاديات هذا المجال برمته". وفوق ذلك، لفتت مزايا المبادرة أنظار الحكومة الفيدرالية السويدية، التي خفضت هذا العام ضريبة الكهرباء على مراكز البيانات. إذ ترمي السويد إلى أن تكون مقصدا لمراكز البيانات العالمية حتى لا تتجه إلى دولة أخرى في أوروبا. وتعتمد الدول المتقدمة الآن على مراكز البيانات، وسيزداد الطلب على إقامة المزيد منها، التي لولاها لما عملت أجهزتنا بكفاءة، ولظلت معلوماتنا حبيسة الأجهزة. وهذا يعني أننا سنبني أعدادا هائلة من هذه المكتبات التكنولوجية في مختلف أنحاء العالم. وبينما تحافظ مراكز البيانات على حركة المعلومات في العالم الرقمي، ستمدنا أيضا بالطاقة النظيفة، وتعيد تدوير نفاياتها في الدول الاسكندنافية وما بعدها. يمكنك قراءة الموضوع الأصلي على موقع BBC Future . اضغط هنا لتنزيل تطبيق بي بي سي عربي الخاص بمستخدمي نظام أندرويد تابع أحدث الأخبار من بي بي سي عربي ومن شبكة صحفييها العالمية في تطبيق جديد خاص بمستخدمي نظام #أندرويد. حمل التطبيق الآن! http://bit.ly/2ikGmBK نهاية فيسبوك الرسالة التي بعث بها BBC Arabic
No hay muchos líderes en el siglo XXI que hayan vivido en una cueva y trabajado como agricultores antes de afianzarse en el poder en una de las naciones más poderosas del mundo. Hace cinco décadas, cuando el caos de la Revolución Cultural envolvió a Pekín, Xi Jinping, que entonces tenía 15 años, se embarcó en la dura vida rural del interior de China. La región donde Xi trabajaba como agricultor, había sido un bastión de los comunistas durante la guerra civil. Era Yan'an, que se hacía llamar "la tierra santa de la revolución china". Ahora, cuando va a confirmarse el segundo período en el poder de Xi Jinping en el Congreso del Partido Comunista, el presidente está al mando de una superpotencia creciente y confiada, pero es una nación que vigila celosamente lo que se dice de sus líderes. La propia historia de Xi ha sido "limpiada" y el pueblo donde creció ahora se ha convertido en un destino de peregrinaje de los más leales al Partido Comunista. En 1968 Mao decretó que millones de jóvenes se mudaran de las ciudades hacia el campo para aprender de la dura vida de los campesinos. Xi asegura que sí aprendió y que las ideas y las cualidades que lo definen hoy se formaron en ese período de su vida, cuando vivió en una cueva en Liangjiahe. "Cuando llegué a los 15 años, estaba ansioso y confundido. Cuando partí a los 22, tenía firmes objetivos en mi vida y estaba lleno de confianza", declaró. En esa época todos estudiaban el famoso Libro Rojo del presidente Mao. Ahora los pensamientos del presidente Xi se colocan en enormes carteleras publicitarias y hay un museo en su honor. En éste se alaban las buenas obras que hizo por sus compañeros campesinos, pero todos los rasgos de su verdadera personalidad han sido eliminados de su historia, que es tan perfecta que es difícil distinguir qué es real. En sus primeros 5 años en el poder, Xi Jinping ha construido un culto a su personalidad. En el centro está la imagen de un hombre del pueblo, que habla sin pretensiones, que ha hecho fila en una tienda humilde para comprar pan y pagado por su comida. Pero el núcleo del mito que se ha creado alrededor de Xi es su vida exiliado de su familia y hogar, cuando vivió como marginado político en una cueva. Durante su infancia, su padre fue un héroe de la revolución comunista y Xi gozó de la vida privilegiada y protegida de los "principitos comunistas". Un cable de un diplomático estadounidense publicado por Wikileaks en 2009, basado en una discusión con un amigo cercano de Xi, afirma que los primeros 10 años de su vida fueron los más formativos. "Las influencias más permanentes que formaron las opiniones de Xi fueron su pedigrí como 'principito' y la época cuando creció en los recintos residenciales de las familias de la primera generación de revolucionarios del Partido Comunista en Pekín", dice. Pero todo esto se derrumbó en la vorágine que impuso contra la élite del partido un presidente Mao, cada vez más paranoico y vengativo durante los 1960. El padre de Xi primero fue purgado y luego encarcelado, y su familia humillada. Una de sus hermanas murió, quizás en un suicidio. Para cuando cumplió 13 años, la educación formal de Xi llegó a su fin ya que las clases en Pekín fueron suspendidas para que los estudiantes pudieran criticar, golpear e incluso asesinar a sus maestros. Así comenzó la segunda etapa de la vida del adolescente Xi en Pekín: sin padres ni amigos que lo protegieran de las amenazas o detenciones de los Guardias Rojos que se encargaban de administrar la justicia de la Revolución Cultural en las calles. Muchos de la generación de Xi están de acuerdo en que cuando terminó su educación en el colegio aprendieron a sobrevivir con el sentido común, la dureza emocional y la independencia de pensamiento. Xi recordaría después su capacidad para escuchar otros puntos de vista sin tener necesariamente que doblegarse a ellos. "Aprendí a disfrutar cuando se me indicaban mis errores, pero a no dejarme influir por ello. Sólo porque fulano o sultano decía algo, yo no iba a empezar a analizar cada uno de los costos o beneficios. No iba a perder el sueño por ello". La vida rural en la China de los 1960 era muy dura. No había electricidad ni transporte motorizado ni herramientas mecánicas. El adolescente Xi aprendió a transportar estiércol, construir presas y reparar carreteras. Compartió la cama infestada de pulgas en su cueva con otros tres jóvenes. Uno de ellos era el agricultor Lu Housheng, quien me dijo en 2015: "Todo lo que teníamos para comer en esa época era avena, hierbas y bollos cocidos al vapor. Cuando tienes tienes hambre no te importa lo que comes". En la noche, contó Lu, Xi se retiraba a su cueva para leer a luz de una lámpara de queroseno. Lo recuerda como un lector voraz y fumador empedernido. Según Lu, Xi no tenía sentido del humor. No jugaba póker ni se entretenía con otros jóvenes ni buscaba novia. A los 18 se sintió preparado para embarcarse en su carrera política. Se unió a la Liga de la Juventud Comunista y a los 21, a pesar de múltiples rechazos debido al encarcelamiento de su padre y a su familia caída en desgracia, finalmente logró unirse al Partido. "Extremadamente pragmático, realista, con 'los ojos puestos en el premio' desde joven". Así es como lo describe un amigo en el cable diplomático de 2009. A diferencia de muchos jóvenes "que recuperaron el tiempo perdido divirtiéndose", Xi era excepcionalmente ambicioso y enfocado. Después de la Revolución Cultural, "eligió sobrevivir convirtiéndose en más rojo que los rojos". Cuando cumplió 25 años, su padre ya había sido rehabilitado políticamente y enviado a dirigir Guangdong, la vasta provincia vecina de Hong Kong, que se convertiría en el motor del ascenso económico de China. El padre de Xi impulsó la carrera de su hijo con su red de patrocinadores y, según su amigo, Xi rápidamente aprendió a construir su propia red. "Cuidadosamente estableció un plan profesional para aprovechar al máximo sus oportunidades para llegar a los niveles más altos de la jerarquía del Partido". Y agregó: "Primero fue convirtiéndose en oficial del ejército a fines de los 1970 y después, trabajando en una variedad de cargos del liderazgo provincial progresivamente ascendiendo de rango. En su mente tenía la promoción... desde el primer día". Xi se llevó consigo los traumas de su niñez y la soledad de la cueva. Según su amigo, su reserva y la distancia que mantenía contribuyeron al fracaso de su primer matrimonio con la hija de un alto diplomático. La única vez que se vio siendo el centro de atención fue cuando se casó con su actual esposa, una famosa cantante. Durante muchos años el público bromeaba: "¿Quién es Xi Jinping? Es el esposo de Peng Liyuan". Después de haber visto cómo su padre era acosado por Mao, Xi hizo concesiones al poder y se mostró muy cuidadoso para evitar hacer enemigos. Incluso ya entrado en sus 40 o 50 años, siendo un alto líder del Partido, siempre se mostró competente y nunca llamativo. Los tenía a todos absortos. Cuando se convirtió en líder del Partido Comunista en 2012, Xi había sido el candidato de consenso. Pocos dentro o fuera de China adivinaron lo que vendría después: 5 años de choque y asombro político. El 11 de junio de 2015, un hombre de pelo canoso se presentó ante una corte criminal en el norte de China, flanqueado por oficiales que una vez obedecieron sus orígenes. Se trataba de Zhou Yongkang, el funcionario más alto del Partido que era sometido a juicio por corrupción en toda la historia de la China comunista. Durante años este sujeto había sido el hombre más temido de China. Controlaba la policía, los paramilitares, las prisiones y las operaciones de inteligencia. Pero en el año y medio en que desapareció de la vida pública y volvió a aparecer en la corte, el hombre de 72 años había perdido su postura gallarda y el color de su cabello. Ahora era blanco del sistema de seguridad que él mismo había establecido. Cuando Xi Jinping subió al poder en 2012, prometió al público una campaña que "empuñaría una espada contra la corrupción", atrapando tanto a tigres como a moscas. Zhou fue uno de los mayores tigres. "Acepto la sentencia. No apelaré. Me doy cuenta de los crímenes que he cometido y lo que he costado al Partido", declaró. La caída de otro tigre, Bo Xilai, también fue notoria. Tanto él como Zhou estaban acusados de conspirar juntos y, junto con dos altas figuras militares y otro importante político, de "arruinar la unidad del Partido". El juicio de Zhou se llevó a cabo a la mitad del primer período del gobierno de Xi. La campaña de choque y asombro estaba en camino con una serie de juicios de importantes figuras y de propaganda de honradez. Para acompañar la imagen de una nueva cultura política disciplinada y frugal, Xi trataba de evitar banquetes y a veces viajaba en camioneta con colegas en lugar de una flota de limusinas. En los últimos cinco años el mensaje de Xi ha sido: "No se unan al Partido si quieren ganar dinero". Pero su problema era, y todavía es, que esto es precisamente lo que los 90 millones de miembros del Partido esperan cuando se unen a éste. La política del Partido Comunista a menudo ha funcionado con un sobre de billetes, un favor o un patrocinio. Limpiar esto significa no sólo retirar individuos sino redes completas de influencia y toda una cultura. Xi regresó a sus raíces en el pueblo donde vivió en una cueva para codearse con campesinos y se ha esforzado por dejar en claro el contraste de su propia vida y la de una élite corrupta. Pero Xi, de 64 años, siempre ha pertenecido a la élite. En los años previos a que asumiera la presidencia, algunos de sus familiares se hicieron increíblemente ricos, aunque no hay evidencia de que él buscara promover los intereses empresariales de su familia. Zhou Yongkang había sido miembro del Partido durante medio siglo. Escaló la jerarquía de la mayor compañía petrolera china y coronó su carrera con un alto cargo en el partido y el control del sistema de seguridad. Tenía una red formidable de patrocinadores. Cuando lo llevaron a juicio, Xi había disuelto esa red, investigando a todos sus empleados, choferes y cocineros. Se decidió sentenciarlo a cadena perpetua. Pero Zhou no sólo era corrupto. También pertenecía a una facción rival del Partido cuyo poder desafiaba al de Xi. Todos se dieron cuenta entonces de que en la era de Xi si pierdes, pierdes todo. Al encarcelar a cientos de poderosos tigres en las altas filas del Partido y del Ejército, Xi rompió el reglamento que mantenía una paz frágil entre la élite comunista tras la muerte de Mao. China ahora está alerta a las desapariciones repentinas. Como la de Xiao Jianhua, un multimillonario de 45 años con vínculos a las familias más importantes del país que se esfumó de su apartamento de lujo en Hong Kong en enero de 2017. Desde entonces no se le ve y se cree que está en custodia en China territorial, en una advertencia a los demás de que el dinero, las conexiones y un pasaporte canadiense no son suficientes para protegerte del largo brazo de Xi. La purga ha continuado y en los 5 años del régimen de Xi, se ha reforzado la impresión de que la corrupción en el Partido es un problema sistemático y perdurable. Pero todas las investigaciones de corrupción de los últimos años han sido conducidas en secreto. El Partido Comunista chino sigue siendo una organización opaca y aunque se ha comprometido a limpiar los delitos, Xi no ha mostrado ninguna disposición para permitir que la surja la verdad en la corte o en alguna otra plataforma pública. Una y otra vez el partido ha descubierto que el poder corrompe y el poder absoluto corrompe de forma absoluta. Pero Xi está determinado a dirigir él solo la limpieza de camaradas y el encarcelamiento de los tigres. Hubo otro juicio en el que el acusado no era un tigre despiadado del Partido Comunista, sino un abogado apacible. Sus convicciones sonaban similares a los valores socialistas básicos que apoyaba Xi Jinping, pero estaba a punto de ser encarcelado por la audacia de haber actuado sin la aprobación del Partido. Xu Zhiuong, de 40 años, había comenzado su carrera como erudito, pero se convirtió en representante de los perdedores del milagro económico de China, incluidos los trabajadores migrantes y los indigentes. Justo cuando Xi asumió el poder, el abogado estaba ayudando a establecer el Movimiento Nuevos Ciudadanos, cuyo objetivo era unir al pueblo "a través de una identidad cívica común". La acusación en su contra era haber reunido una multitud para perturbar el orden público. En una declaración en la corte señaló que la constitución china prometía a los ciudadanos la libertad de expresión. A pesar de trabajar a favor de las causas más cercanas a Xi Jinping, la rectitud en el servicio público y un mejor trato para los pobres, Xu Zhiyong pasaría en la cárcel el primer período de Xi en el poder. Su sentencia fue decretada el 26 de enero de 2014. Pocas semanas antes, Xi viajó al mausoleo del presidente Mao en la Plaza de Tiananmen en Pekín. Xi hizo tres reverencias frente al sarcófago de vidrio donde descanse el cuerpo de Mao para conmemorar el 120 aniversario de su nacimiento. Al parecer no importa que las políticas de Mao condujeron a una hambruna y muerte de más de 30 millones de chinos. O que la propia familia de Xi haya sido perseguida en la última década de la Revolución Cultural. Con Xi Jinping en el poder, preocuparse por los hechos inconvenientes de la historia o insultar a los héroes y mártires revolucionarios ahora es un delito punible llamado "nihilismo histórico". El retrato de Mao todavía está ubicado en la Plaza de Tiananmen y Xi como hijo de uno de los camaradas revolucionarios de Mao, se ha colocado en la línea directa de sucesión. Ha prometido al público que China será rica y fuerte. Y cree que la unidad y la disciplina bajo el régimen de un solo partido es crucial para lograrlo. La educación de élite de Xi en su infancia, seguida de los terrores de la Revolución Cultural, le enseñaron a temerle a una ciudadanía politizada. Otro capítulo formativo de Xi fue el colapso del comunismo en el bloque soviético. Su análisis fue que Moscú había perdido su sentido de propósito cuando renunció a su historia revolucionaria. En un discurso a sus camaradas del Partido poco después de asumir el poder, advirtió: "Proporcionalmente el Partido Comunista Soviético tenía más miembros de los que tenemos nosotros, pero ninguno de ellos fue suficientemente hombre para levantarse y resistir". La resistencia de Xi ante el poder seductor de los valores liberales ha sido feroz. "Si nuestro pueblo no puede defender los valores morales que se han formado y desarrollado en nuestra tierra, y en lugar de ello repite de forma indiscriminada y ciega los valores morales de Occidente, entonces será necesario cuestionar de forma genuina si perderemos nuestro ethos independiente como país y como pueblo", dijo Xi. Una nación de ciudadanos activos es la pesadilla de Xi. Activistas cristianos, musulmanes, laborales, blogueros, reporteros, feministas y abogados han sido encarcelados por hablar o actuar sobre sus convicciones. En algunos casos, también han sido exhibidos en confesiones televisadas, en las que se retractan de sus creencias y repiten la línea del Partido de que se han convertido en los peones de los enemigos de China en Occidente. Xi desea que sus ciudadanos se identifiquen con "la madre patria, la nación o raza china, la cultura china, y el camino socialista chino". Es lo que llama "cuatro identificaciones" que ha sintetizado en dos consignas clave: "El gran rejuvenecimiento de la nación china y del sueño chino". Estas consignas están en todas partes, desde carteleras sobre las carreteras y estaciones, hasta documentales de televisión y dibujos animados en internet y aplicaciones móviles. Durante siglos los emperadores de China se esforzaron por equilibrar los principios de poder blanco y el poder duro -ellos lo llamaron fuerza y virtud- ejercitando autoridad absoluta sobre los sujetos y a la vez reconociendo su deber de asistencia pública. Al celebrar la historia comunista de China, Xi ha sido cuidadoso al equilibrar la reverencia por el presidente Mao con una deferencia similar al reformista económico que lo sucedió: Deng Xiaoping. Xi habla de marxismo y habla sobre mercados. Pero la esencia de su consigna de "sueño chino" es clara: "el sueño es una nación firme". Cualquiera sueño diferente, como el de Xu Zhiyong con su visión de identidad cívica compartida, es peligroso. El activista fue liberado en julio después de completar una sentencia de cuatro años. Desde entonces no se le ha podido contactar. "No es posible pretender que este es sólo otro gran jugador. Este es el mayor jugador en la historia del mundo", declaró en 2012 el líder de Singapur, Lee Kuan Yew, sobre el ascenso de China. Y al convertirse en líder en 2012, Xi puso los ojos de China en el premio. Para el 100º aniversario de la fundación del Partido Comunista, en 2021, China será "moderadamente próspera". Para el 100º aniversario de la llegada de los comunistas al poder, en 2049, será una nación "totalmente desarrollada, rica y poderosa". China está en camino a convertirse en la economía dominante del mundo. Si se le mide de acuerdo a la "paridad de poder adquisitivo", la economía china pronto será 40% más grande que la de Estados Unidos. Para 2049 podría ser tres veces más grande. Las pasadas cuatro décadas han sido un viaje extraordinario no sólo para China sino para el hombre que la dirige. Xi era sólo un adolescente que vivía en una cueva cuando un presidente de Estados Unidos, Nixon, se reunió con el presidente Mao en 1972. Cuando la puerta de Occidente se abrió unos centímetros una década más tarde, algunos de los "principitos" de la generación de Xi aprovecharon la oportunidad para salir del país. Pero Xi para entonces ya se había trazado un rumbo distinto, y según el recuento de su amigo en el cable de Wikileaks, sabía que fuera del país "no sería especial". Xi se muestra seguro de sí mismo en sus encuentros con extranjeros. Una vez , sobre los que dan lecciones a China en derechos humanos, dijo: "Hay algunos extranjeros que están aburridos, con el estómago lleno, que no tienen nada mejor qué hacer, que nos apuntan con el dedo". "Primero, China no exporta revolución; segundo, China no exporta hambre ni pobreza; tercero, China no llega y te provoca un dolor de cabeza. ¿Qué más se puede decir?". La China que Xi heredó estaba lista para tener una visión más segura de sí misma y él la ha aportado. Desde la construcción de islas en el disputado Mar de China Meridional hasta los nuevos bancos multilaterales y los proyectos de infraestructura de la Iniciativa del Cinturón y Ruta de la Seda, el mandatario ha abandonado la máxima de que China debe ocultar su fortaleza y esperar a que llegue su momento. Xi también ha explotado hábilmente el retiro del presidente Donald Trump de un importante acuerdo comercial y del Acuerdo de Cambio Climático de París y se ha presentado a sí mismo como el estadista del momento para incrementar la influencia de su país en el mundo. "Un torbellino de carisma". Así fue como un documental de televisión reciente describió su política exterior, y para marcar sus primeros cinco años en el poder, una serie paralela representó con gráficos su campaña contra la corrupción. Pero si Xi quiere lograr sus objetivos centenarios, todavía debe enfrentar el verdadero desafío. La fortaleza en la superficie esconde profundos problemas económicos. El crecimiento general se está ralentizando y la deuda está incrementándose. Muchos economistas advierten que se está acabando el tiempo para las reformas que podrían solucionar los problemas de China sin una crisis. Y detrás de la fachada de unidad ideológica están compitiendo muchas ideas sobre el futuro de China. El Partido, sin embargo, ha sobrevivido muchas crisis en la vida de Xi, desde la gran hambruna de Mao, hasta la Revolución Cultural y el aplastamiento del movimiento pro democracia de 1989. Xi dijo una vez: "Una espada se fabrica en una piedra de afilar y un hombre se forja en las dificultades". La China de Xi hasta ahora ha combinado gran riqueza con gran represión. Si continúa encerrando a sus tigres, limpiando a sus camaradas y silenciando a las voces discordantes, otros podrían plantearse las preguntas existenciales. Nunca, desde el presidente Mao, el sueño de grandeza de China ha dependido tanto de un solo hombre.
The UK is seeking to leave the EU Common Agricultural Policy in March 2019, Scotland Office minister Lord Duncan has said. Speaking at a National Farmers Union Scotland conference, he said the UK was pushing to split subsidy payments from any transitional Brexit deal. Lord Duncan said this would mean farmers being paid from a UK pot. Scottish Brexit minister Michael Russell said the move could restrict the sale of farm produce to the EU. UK ministers have said the level of funding to farmers after the UK formally leaves the EU would be guaranteed until 2022. Lord Duncan said: "The secretary of state (Michael Gove) has been very clear that he believes farming and fishing should not be part of any transitional deal. "We need to be able to negotiate that. It's not in our gift solely to say it and get it. We need to negotiate. "What we believe is the earlier we can give to farmers and the fishermen opportunities outside of these common policies which all concerned are restrictive, bureaucratic and indeed unhelpful to the wider industries. "The sooner we can give that the better." The Scottish government said it was concerned that the March 2019 deadline would give Scotland only 18 months to create a new farm subsidy framework. Mr Russell said: "This seems to go completely counter to what the prime minister has been saying and absolutely counter to what the expectation appears to be in Brussels. "I was very surprised to hear it and I think it will require urgent clarification, because as far as I know there's no intention in the negotiations of trying to pick and choose from a transitional deal. "That rather defeats the purpose of it."
Birleşmiş Milletler (BM), yapay zekayla ilgili gelişmeleri ve yaratabileceği tehditleri incelemek için Hollanda'nın Lahey kentinde bir merkez kurdu. İngiltere'de yayınlanan Guardian gazetesinin haberine göre, Yapay Zeka ve Robotlar adıyla kurulan bu merkezde, otonom robotlar konusundaki teknolojik ilerlemelerden kitlesel işsizliğe, olası riskler araştırılacak. Hollanda gazetesi de Telegraaf'a konuşan BM Suç ve Adalet Araştırma Enstitüsü'nden strateji danışmanı Irakli Beridze, "toplumlar gelişmelere hızla adapte olmazsa, bunun istikrarsızlık yaratabileceğini" söyledi. Yapay zekâ bazıları için insanlığın kurtuluş yolu, kimilerine göreyse insan ırkının sonuna giden yolun başlangıcı. Kısa süre önce dünyanın önde gelen 100 robot uzmanı, BM'ye yazdıkları mektupta şu uyarıyı yapıyordu: "Pandora'nın kutusu açıldıktan sonra kapatması zor olur" Tesla'nın kurucusu Elon Musk ve Google'ın satın aldığı yapay zeka şirketi DeepMind'ın kurucusu Mustafa Süleyman'ın da aralarında olduğu imzacılar, öldürme yeteneği olan robotların geliştirilmesinin ve kullanılmasının yasaklanmasını talep ederek, bu robotların yeni bir silahlanma yarışı çıkarabileceğini söylüyordu. Yapay zekanın insanlığı 3. Dünya Savaşı'na kadar götürebileceği tartışılan bu günlerde, istihdam konusunda da teknolojinin bir nimet değil tehdit olabileceği endişesi artıyor. BM tarafından kurulan bu merkez de, robotların farklı iş türlerinin ve çalışanların yerini alması ihtimalini masaya yatıracak. BM Suç ve Adalet Araştırma Enstitüsü'nden Beridze, örgütün sürdürülebilir kalkınma hedefleri doğrultusunda somut projeler hedeflediklerini, "sohbet kulübünden" ibaret olmayacaklarını belirtti. Merkezde sivil toplum kuruluşları, hükümetler, düşünce kuruluşları ve iş dünyasından isimlerden destek alınacak. Dünya Ekonomik Forumu'na göre, önümüzdeki yıllarda işgücü piyasasında 7.1 milyon iş tarihe gömülebilir. PwC araştırma şirketinin raporunda da, yapay zekanın İngiltere'deki işlerin yüzde 30'unu ortadan kaldırabileceği belirtiliyor. Nitekim Almanya'nın en büyük bankası Deutsche Bank'ın CEO'su John Cryan, yapay zekâ ve otomasyon geliştikçe robotların 'abaküs görevi gören' bazı çalışanların yerine geçebileceğini söylemişti. Cryan, "Bankalarımızda mekanik işler yaparak robotlar gibi davranan çalışanlarımız var. Yarın bir gün, insanlar gibi davranan robotlarımız da olabilir" demişti. Kısacası, teknoloji uzmanı Elon Musk'ın uyardığı gibi, "yapay zeka karşımızdaki en büyük varoluşsal tehlike" olabilir. Stephen Hawking'in şu sözleri de akıllarda: "Yapay zeka insanlığın başına gelen en iyi şey de olabilir, en kötü şey de"
Myanmar's military has brutally evicted more than half a million Muslim Rohingya people from the country's northern Rakhine state. The UN human rights office says their homes and villages have been burned down, and their crops and livestock destroyed to stop them coming back. Rohingya who fled to neighbouring Bangladesh say that the security services' "clearance operations" involved mass civilian killings, torture, and child rape. The military denies committing genocide, insisting it has only targeted Rohingya militants. But for those who fear being homeless or worse, the semantics are immaterial. Bangladesh's UN ambassador says more than 600,000 people have crossed the border since late August, joining the 300,000 or so who fled earlier outbreaks of violence. They are starving and exhausted. Many are traumatised, and most have children with them. BBC photographer Salman Saeed took these pictures near the refugee camps in Palongkhali, Kutupalong and Balukhali, in the Cox's Bazar area of Bangladesh. These Rohingya families have been walking for more than a week without food, but have finally arrived in Bangladesh after witnessing atrocities in Myanmar's Rakhine state. They carry their few belongings and blankets on sticks over their shoulders. Thirteen-year-old Mobin walked for 12 days to reach safety. UN experts believe it is "highly likely" that Myanmar's security forces planted landmines along the border in recent weeks, making an arduous journey yet more fraught with danger. The owner of these weary legs waded through mud to reach a refugee camp. International observers say some Rohingya people have walked for up to three weeks before arriving at government-run settlements like Kutupalong. The children have welts on the soles of their feet. Rohingya people are using any available transport to escape Rakhine. Some are trekking to the Naf River, which forms the border, while others are sailing up the coast. Dozens have already died trying to cross into Bangladesh in small, rickety fishing boats. The Dhaka Tribune reports that 28 boats have capsized since 24 August, killing 184 people - mostly women and children. The boats are often overcrowded, and the risk of disaster considerable. Some of those on board are unable to swim. This man, Abu Tabel, arrived in Bangladesh with his few salvaged belongings gathered in sacks and a basket. The caged chicken below was his only companion on the long journey to find a new home. When they reach the camps, the displaced people find - and build - makeshift accommodation along the roads and hillsides around the border town of Cox's Bazaar. The settlements are muddy, wet and overcrowded, with a shortage of clean water and poor sanitation. There are very few toilets. Torrential rain has increased the hardships - and the risk of diseases like cholera. Many of those crossing the border already have relatives in Cox's Bazar, whom they are desperate to find. On 16 October, the Red Cross opened a 60-bed field hospital in Cox's Bazar the size of two football fields. It has three wards, an operating theatre, a maternity ward, and a psychosocial support unit. This young Rohingya boy is comparatively lucky - he has received some medical treatment. Bangladesh has announced plans to build a refugee camp that could ultimately accommodate about 800,000 Rohingya. It would be the largest such settlement in the world. This family was photographed resting and having their first meal in several days. Survivors say starvation had helped drive them from their villages, as food markets in Rakhine state have been shut and aid restricted. Rasida, who is nine months pregnant, is one of thousands of mothers-to-be who have fled - knowing they could give birth any day. The United Nations Population Fund estimates that of the nearly 150,000 Rohingya women of reproductive age (15-49 years), some 24,000 are pregnant and lactating. Some have had no choice but to give birth by the roadside. On 17 October, the United Nations warned that thousands of Rohingya were still stranded near the Myanmar-Bangladesh border. It urged Bangladesh to speed up the vetting of up to 15,000 affected people, and move them inland to safety. Andrej Mahecic, a UN refugee agency spokesman, said it wanted Bangladesh to "urgently admit these refugees fleeing violence and increasingly difficult conditions back home". He added: "Every minute counts, given the fragile conditions they're arriving in." For now, the influx continues. Thousands on thousands, caught in the world's fastest-growing humanitarian crisis. All pictures were shot by Salman Saeed in Cox's Bazar, Bangladesh.
ملګري ملتونه د بشار اسد ځواکونه د سوریې شمال لوېدیځ کې پر خان شیخون د سارین ګاز د برید مسوول بولي. دا ښار د حکومت د مخالفو وسلوالو په لاس کې دی. دا برید د تېر اپرېل پر څلورمه شوی او له امله یې ۸۰ کسان وژل شوي دي. د سوریې د حکومت مخالفان او لوېدیځ قدرتونه- چې په سر کې یې د امریکا متحده ایالتونه دي- وايي، حکومتي ځواکونو په هغه ورځ دغه سیمه بمبار کړه. * سوریه کې جنګېدونکي برتانیا مېشت افغان ځوانان * سوریه کې افغان بندي: د میاشتې په ۶۰۰ ډالر جنګېدم * سوریه کې له ایراني قومندان سره د یوه افغان جنګیالي وژل کېدل د بشار اسد په مشرۍ د سوریې حکومت او لوی ملاتړی یې مسکو دا ادعا ردوي او وايي، دا پېښه داسې پلان شوې وه چې د سوریې حکومت پکې ملامت ښکاره شي. دوی وايي، بم د مخالفو وسلوالو پر داسې مهماتو غورځېدلی چې له کیمیايي وسلو ډک و. د دې پېښې په تړاو د ملګرو ملتونو دا رپوټ دوو ادارو- د کیمیايي وسلو د مخنیوي ادارې او د (جی ای اېم)د ګډې پلټنې میکانیزم- برابر کړی دی. په رپوټ کې په پوره باور او پرېکند ډول د سوریې حکومت د خان شیخون ښار د سارین ګاز د برید مسوول بلل شوی دی. د امریکا هرکلی په ملګرو ملتونو کې د امریکا استازې نېکي هیلي د دې رپوټ هرکلی کوي او په یوه بیان کې وايي، دا رپوټ هغه خبره تاییدوي چې ډېر وخت مخکې امریکا کړې وه. مېرمن هیلي پر روسیه نیوکه کوي: "د خپلواکو رپوټونو سره سره موږ وینو چې ځینې هېوادونه د دې رژیم ملاتړ کوي، دا لار باید همدا اوس پرېښودل شي". مسکو او دمشق تراوسه دې رپوټ ته غبرګون نه دی ښودلی. روسیې د سې شنبې په ورځ د ملګرو ملتونو د امنیت شورا هغه پرېکړه لیک ونه مانه چې له مخې یې په سوریه کې د کیمیاي وسلو د کارولو د پلټنې لپاره د (جي ای اېم) یواځنيو څېړنو ماموریت اوږېده.
The response to this latest chemical "attack" in Syria will provide a measure of just how far the international community has come in struggling with the security crisis in Syria. It also demonstrates the growing calamity in the country where the conflict moves from phase to phase, but shows no sign of ending. Perhaps at the outset it should be established what we know. There seems no doubt that a chemical incident occurred, and there were Syrian government air attacks in the area. The opposition of course has no air force. The West places the blame squarely on the Assad regime. Russia - one of President Assad's few allies - has a different story. It says an air attack hit a weapons dump, thus releasing the chemical agent. All of the Western experts on chemical warfare contacted by the BBC have been highly sceptical about the Russian claim. As yet there has been no clear analysis of samples from the location of the strike or from the victims. More information will undoubtedly become available. Reports of the first significant use of chemical weapons - including Sarin nerve agent - by the Assad regime in 2013, prompted the international community's first purposeful diplomatic intervention in the Syrian War. The Obama administration had marked down the use of chemical arms as "a red line", which, if crossed, would lead to serious consequences for the Assad regime. In the event, President Obama decided to pull back and avoid military action. The US and Russia came together and brokered a deal under which the Assad regime would give up its chemical arsenal under international inspection. The problem of chemical weapons in Syria appeared to have been resolved. But this was not so. Since then there have been sporadic reports of the further use of chemical weapons both by the Assad regime and so-called Islamic State. These have often involved the use of commercial chemicals like chlorine. But this latest use of what looks to be a nerve agent like Sarin, and the frightful images of the attack, have underscored just how little progress has been made. Between the Ghoutta attack in August 2013 to the incident in Idlib province this week, the situation on the ground in Syria has changed dramatically. Then the Assad regime seemed to have only a tenuous grip on power. The policy of the West and its allies was to see Syria's leader - already branded by some as a war criminal - forced from office. There was still a good deal of talk about a credible "democratic" opposition, which, if given sufficient means, could wrest control of much of the country from the Assad regime and IS alike. Fast forward to today. Such hopes proved illusory. The "democratic" opposition proved to have a very limited military capacity. Many of its most capable elements are closely linked to al-Qaeda: the next major problem that is likely to face the West some way down the line. The Assad regime, bolstered by Iranian military assistance and Russian air power, has more than consolidated its position. And the most successful Western-backed elements of the opposition - the coalition of Kurdish and Arab fighters in northern Syria - may be advancing against IS, but its success brings a host of other problems, notably in relations with Turkey, whose troops and proxies already occupy a significant zone inside the country. The saga of the West's response to the use of chemical weapons underscores the improvised and uncertain course of policy towards Syria almost from the outset. President Obama's declaration in 2012 that the use of chemical arms would cross "a red line" and change Washington's "calculus" seemed to go further than many of his advisers had expected. But in the event - when push came to shove in 2013 - there were no punitive air strikes and the chemical disarmament deal seems now incomplete at best. Neither is US policy today any more coherent. The Trump administration has roundly condemned the attacks, but President Trump himself has used the opportunity to condemn his predecessor for "weakness and irresolution" for not making good on his threats when the red line was crossed in 2013. However, back then, Mr Trump seemed to endorse the President's caution. He tweeted on 1 September 2013 that "President Obama's weakness and indecision may have saved us from doing a horrible and very costly (in more ways than money) attack on Syria." Today, the international reaction in the wake of this latest episode is predictable and formulaic. With Russia already providing an alibi for the Syrian regime, it is hard to see what can come out of the UN Security Council's meeting. It has been consistently and fatally divided on Syria since the outset of the crisis. But the chemical attack could still change "the calculus" around Syria to use President Obama's phrase. For one thing, there will be a renewed debate about the whole question of "safe areas" and "no-fly zones" to provide protection to civilians, principally from regime air attack. Indeed the potential for such zones - especially in northern Syria close to the border with Turkey - has increased in the wake of the Turkish Army's entry on to Syrian soil. Such zones though are a vexed question. At some point - however defined or delineated - they require a willingness to take action against aircraft who strike inside them. Russia's air campaign complicates matters and so far has pretty well ruled out their establishment. The chemical attack could change diplomatic calculations as well. The Trump administration's policy on Syria is still unformed. The last major attack in 2013 brought Washington and Moscow together, albeit briefly. So far the Trump administration's much heralded reset with Moscow has proved elusive. Could this latest tragedy - whatever its cause - change that? The Syrian crisis has decidedly entered a new phase - with new threats and new challenges emerging. Peace remains as elusive as ever.
خلصت دراسة علمية حديثة إلى أن الجزء المرتبط بأحلام اليقظة في المخ يمكن أن يسمح لنا بأداء مهام بطريقة تلقائية، فيما يشبه جهاز الطيار الآلي المستخدم في رحلات الطيران. والطيار الآلي، ويسمى أيضا المرشد الآلي، هو جهاز يستخدم لإرشاد الطائرة وغيرها من المركبات، دون الحاجة لمساعدة بشرية. وتنشط مجموعة من مناطق المخ تعرف باسم "شبكة الوضع الافتراضي" أو اختصارا بـ دي إم إن، حينما يكون الشخص في حالة أحلام يقظة أو يفكر في الماضي أو المستقبل. وتوصل باحثون في جامعة كامبريدج البريطانية إلى أن تلك الشبكة تسمح لنا أيضا بأداء مهام بطريقة آلية، إذا ما كنا نؤدي مهمة معتادون عليها، مثل القيادة على طريق مألوف لنا. ويأمل باحثون في أن تساعد تلك النتائج الأشخاص، الذين يعانون من أمراض نفسية. وتوصلت دراسة سابقة إلى أن شبكة الوضع الافتراضي تكون أكثر نشاطا في حالات الاسترخاء، بينما قد تعمل بصورة غير طبيعية في ظروف مثل الإصابة بمرض الزهايمر أو الانفصام في الشخصية. لكن الباحثين لم يحددوا دورها على وجه الدقة. وفي الدراسة المشار إليها، طُلب من 28 متطوعا أن يزاوجوا بين بطاقة مستهدفة مع واحدة أخرى، من بين أربعة بطاقات تظهر أمامهم. واكتشف المشاركون ما إذا كانت البطاقات يفترض أنها متطابقة، من ناحية اللون أو العدد أو الشكل، وذلك عبر المحاولة والخطأ. وجرت مراقبة نشاط المخ لديهم باستخدام ماسح ضوئي. وبينما كان المشاركون يتعلمون القاعدة، أو ما يعرف بمرحلة التحصيل، فإن جزء من المخ يعرف باسم شبكة الاهتمام الظهري تكون أكثر نشاطا. وهي مرتبطة بمعالجة المعلومات التي تتطلب تركيزا. وبمجرد أن عرفوا القاعدة وبدأوا يطبقونها، كانت شبكة الوضع الافتراضي أكثر نشاطا، حيث كانوا يؤدون المهمة على نحو جيد، خصوصا حينما يكون نشاط شبكة الوضع الافتراضي مرتبطا بنشاط في منطقة قرن آمون، وهي جزء من المخ مرتبط بالذاكرة. ويقول المشرف على الدراسة، دينيز فاتانزيفر، إن شبكة الوضع الافتراضي تسمح لنا بتوقع الأشياء التي في طريقها للحدوث، ومن ثم تخفض حاجتنا للتفكير. ويضيف: "إنها أساسا تشبه جهاز الطيار الآلي، الذي يساعدنا في اتخاذ قرارات سريعة، حينما نعلم قواعد البيئة المحيطة". وتابع: "ولذلك، على سبيل المثال، حينما تقود سيارتك صباحا متوجها إلى عملك عبر طريق اعتدت عليه ستنشط شبكة الوضع الافتراضي، ما يمكننا من أداء مهامنا دون الحاجة إلى بذل وقت أو طاقة كبيرة في اتخاذ كل قرار". ويقول الدكتور فاتانزيفر إنه حينما تتغير البيئة المحيطة وتصبح غير متوافقة مع توقعاتنا، فإن أمخاخنا تدخل في "وضع يدوي"، يتجاوز الوضع الآلي أو نشاط شبكة الوضع الافتراضي. ويأمل الباحثون في أن تساعد تلك النتائج الأشخاص، الذين يعانون مشكلات في الصحة النفسية، مثل الإدمان والاكتئاب والوسواس القهري، والذين قد يكون لديهم أنماط من الفكر التلقائي تدفعهم نحو سلوك سيئ متكرر.
Miércoles 6 de septiembre de 1995. Había pasado un año desde el catastrófico Mundial de fútbol para Colombia, en Estados Unidos 94, cuando fue invitado a jugar un amistoso frente a Inglaterra en el mítico estadio de Wembley. Durante los primeros 21 minutos no pasó nada. Hasta que el exmediocampista del Tottenham Hotspur, Jamie Redknapp, pateó al arco que era custodiado por el legendario René Higuita. Entonces Higuita —a quien le decían "El Loco"— se lanzó hacia adelante, arqueó su cuerpo, flexionó sus rodillas hacia atrás y elevó sus pies por encima de la espalda para rechazar el balón. Había nacido El escorpión. La inusual pirueta le dio la vuelta al mundo. Tanto, que el portal de internet footy-boots.com publicó una votación en la que la proeza del portero resultó elegida como "la mejor jugada del siglo XX". "En Wembley o en cualquier estadio no es normal que se hagan estas jugadas. Por eso es la mejor de la historia", dijo Higuita sobre su invención. Sin embargo, la autoría del Escorpión está en el centro de una polémica: esta semana otra leyenda del fútbol, el exdelantero mexicano del Real Madrid, Hugo Sánchez, la reclamó. "El inventor fui yo y el que bautizó ese remate con el nombre de Escorpión fui yo", dijo el cinco veces goleador de la Liga Española durante un programa de la cadena estadounidense ESPN. La declaración llegó después de que se entregara, esta semana, el premio Puskás que da la FIFA mejor gol del año y que este año se adjudicó al delantero del Arsenal Olivier Giroud por una anotación lograda con una técnica similar que había utilizado el portero colombiano en Wembley. "Así que el premio que dieron en el Puskás es de tacón, porque el Escorpión es uno solo", señaló Sánchez. Pero ¿cuándo es que Hugo Sánchez dice haber inventado una las piruetas más celebradas en el fútbol? De acuerdo a su declaración, lo hizo desde joven y especialmente en los entrenamientos cuando era jugador del Real Madrid. "Mi especialidad era la chilena y hacía muchos goles de palomita, pero poco a poco quise hacer cosas distintas. Y comencé a dejar pasar el balón para golpearlo con los taches", dijo el comentarista. Lo cierto es que no hay ninguna evidencia televisiva que apoye la afirmación de Sánchez. O al menos, no de antes de 1995. "Me faltó anotar ese gol en un partido oficial. Pero en Austria, donde jugué (1995-1996), hice la jugada cuando se inauguró el estadio. La gente me aplaudió como si hubiera marcado un gol", aclaró. A pesar de que tanto el portero colombiano como el delantero mexicano reclaman la autoría de la jugada, hay varios antecedentes documentados que podrían poner un manto de duda sobre los derechos de autor. Uno de los precedentes más conocidos es el gol del delantero paraguayo Arsenio Erico —el máximo anotador del fútbol profesional argentino con 295 dianas—, marcado a Boca Juniors el 12 de agosto de 1934. La jugada es narrada por los diarios de la época: Erico, que jugaba para Independiente de Avellaneda, recibe un centro de su compañero De la Mata que le queda perfecto para un impacto de cabeza con la técnica de la palomita, pero calcula mal, el balón le pasa sobrado y en una notoria señal de reflejos, golpea el balón con los tacos de los pies. Gol. Golazo. A esa jugada se la bautizó como El balancín, no El escorpión, y con ese nombre pasó a la historia. Sin embargo, la técnica es la misma. Y ocurrió casi 60 años antes que las maniobras explosivas de otras leyendas del fútbol.
Two rival families will compete for power in Kenya's presidential election, in a relationship that goes back to before independence. The BBC's Dickens Olewe looks at some of the more unusual aspects of the election campaign. Nothing comes close to explaining how close the race for the presidency is than the public plea by opposition leader Raila Odinga to his supporters to hold off having sex until after the election. "8 August will be a historic day and no vote will be left without being cast. Men will sleep outside. When the day comes, no man should sleep with a woman," he was quoted as saying by the Star newspaper. Turnout will be key in this election and it looks like Mr Odinga does not want to take any chances in the battle to defeat President Uhuru Kenyatta. Mr Odinga's sex strike is not the only indulgence that leaders are hoping to restrict. A government body in charge of fighting drug abuse has also called on a ban on alcohol during the week leading up to the poll saying that Kenyans need to be sober on election day. One thing you will spot at opposition rallies is people covered in oranges. Space suits would have been more appropriate because the opposition is called the National Super Alliance, which is delightfully shortened to Nasa and invites comparisons with astronauts who will take Kenya into a new age. But Nasa is an amalgamation of five opposition parties, including the Orange Democratic Movement (ODM), which is the biggest. The orange brand is so strong that when a breakaway party, ODM Kenya, was formed in 2007, its founder, Kalonzo Musyoka, used an orange cut in half as the party's symbol. But it didn't bode well. ODM Kenya performed dismally in the 2007 election. Party officials blamed this on the half orange. They said voters couldn't tell the different between a half and a full orange on the ballot box. They promptly replaced the half orange symbol with an umbrella. The origin of the orange goes back to the 2005 constitutional referendum when the electoral commission chose a banana and an orange to represent the Yes and No sides. Mr Odinga was part of the successful No campaign and the orange symbol stuck. President Kenyatta is contesting the poll under the banner of the Jubilee Party. It is primarily a merger between The National Alliance Party (TNA), which he led, and the United Republican Party (URP) of his deputy, William Ruto. The party is colloquially known as Jubilee, the name was inspired by Kenya's celebration of 50 years of independence in 2013. Its rallying song is "Tano Tena", which is Swahili for "five more years". Nasa is using gospel song "Mambo Yabadilika", meaning "things are changing", reinforcing their change message. The Kenyatta and Odinga families have been competing for power since shortly after Kenya gained independence from Britain in 1963. But this election is probably going to be the last time that Kenya's longest political familial rivalry will be on display. The families started as friends. Raila Odinga's father, Jaramogi Oginga Odinga, was offered a chance to assume power by the British. But he refused, saying that Kenya could not be independent with its leader Jomo Kenyatta in prison. After independence, Mr Oginga Odinga became Jomo Kenyatta's vice-president. But the two fell out in 1966 and this gave birth to the political rivalry which has roped in their Kikuyu (Kenyatta) and Luo (Odinga) ethnic groups. #Fagiawote is, a Swahili hashtag meaning "sweep them all", has been used on Twitter as a rallying call to vote out the current political class. Politicians, especially MPs, are loathed by many Kenyans who feel they live pampered lifestyles and are out of touch. They say some are not in tune with the real issues that affect them and others show contempt towards ordinary people. The only way to get back at politicians is during the election. The clear-out seems to have began in the party primaries held in April where several incumbent politicians lost their seats. One governor was especially targeted by women voters because he had been using sexist language. When a candidate for governor of Machakos county in south-west Kenya made a slip of the tongue it became a national joke. Wavinya Ndeti intended to say a proverb which roughly translates as "water under the bridge", in other words, "let's forget about the past". But she got her words scrambled and instead of saying "yaliyopita si ndwele" said "yaliyo ndwele sipite" which is just meaningless. This really tickled Kenyans. People started competing to change other sayings to make them meaningless. And so The Wavinya Challenge was born. But it didn't end there. Comedian MC Njagi made a song named after the slip-up, making her an object of ridicule. The Jubilee Party took notice and asked MC Njagi to compose a song praising the ruling party. But MC Njagi isn't giving away who he will vote for - as he went on to then make a song in support of Ms Ndeti, who he was originally mocking. In June, the high court ruled, after a successful argument by the opposition, that presidential results announced in the 290 constituencies will be final and should not be subjected to any alterations. This ruling upends the tradition of results being collated at a national tallying centre before they are announced as final. Critics have argued that the national tallying system has been used to rig the election. This change could mean that the winner of the presidential race could be known much faster than before. But it does not mean that it's protected against manipulation. The electoral commission however remains the only body that can make the official announcement about the final election result. More on Kenya's elections:
The Bloodhound supersonic car will run for the first time on 26 October. It is going to conduct a series of "slow speed" trials on the runway at Newquay airport in Cornwall. Engineers want to shake down the vehicle's systems before heading out to South Africa next year to try to break the land speed record. This stands at 763mph (1,228km/h), and Bloodhound's aim is to raise the mark in two stages - by getting first to 800mph and then to 1,000mph. The Newquay trials will not see anything like those speeds. The 9,000ft-long (2,744m) runway at the former RAF base is simply too short to allow Bloodhound to use the full thrust at its disposal. Instead, driver Andy Green will take the car up to about 200mph using just its Eurofighter-Typhoon jet engine. The rocket motor that would ordinarily provide additional power will not even be in the car as its development has yet to be completed. Nonetheless, engineers see the Newquay event as an important opportunity to gain some key early data on a rolling Bloodhound. "It will be a big emotional moment for the team," said chief engineer Mark Chapman. "We've gone from a computer design to an actual thing that will move down the runway. It will be a huge validation for the people who've stood by us all these years; it is happening. And, yes, it will also be a great shop window as we look to attract a bit more money to get us over the last few hurdles." Thursday 26 October will be restricted to the media, VIPs, sponsors, and members of the Bloodhound 1K Club. But the following Saturday will then see a public day of running, with an education day scheduled for the Monday. In between all this publicity activity, Mark Chapman's team will be trying to understand how the air enters the jet intake at slow speed and what that means for managing the power unit's performance. It will also be the first chance to assess all of the electronics built into the car. "Newquay will demonstrate that the cockpit talks to the rest of the car, and the rest of the car talks to the cockpit - and the whole thing then talks to the outside world." And that includes feeding high-definition video from the more than 10 cameras that will be embedded around the vehicle's bodywork. It will be a critical day too for driver Andy Green, because it will be his first experience of the steering feel, throttle and brake action, noise and vibration - things that cannot be truly simulated in a computer. The expectation is that Bloodhound will head to Hakskeen Pan - a dried-out lakebed in Northern Cape, South Africa - in just over a year's time to begin its assault on that initial 800mph target. For this to happen, the next phase of rocket development has to be concluded. The Norwegian aerospace company Nammo will supply the motor and has a basic unit available already. However, the Bloodhound team wants the thrust levels increased slightly, and that requires a period of testing. "We would hope to be starting this programme in the next two-to-three months," said Mr Chapman. "We're fairly confident that we'll have a rocket being tested within six months; and then the fully operational rocket will be within 12 months." October marks the 20th anniversary of Andy Green setting the existing land speed record in a car called Thrust SSC. Two other key figures from that effort in the American Black Rock Desert have returned to work on Bloodhound: Richard Noble, the director of the project; and Ron Ayers, the aerodynamicist. Jonathan.Amos-INTERNET@bbc.co.uk and follow me on Twitter: @BBCAmos
تتمحور النقاشات المتعلقة بالمدارس والتعليم في الدول الغنية حول مواضيع معينة تشمل سياسات الأفضليات، والمواضيع التي ينبغي منحها الأولوية، والتلاميذ الذين يتعين منحهم مساعدات إضافية، والشؤون التي تستحق الأكثر من الإنفاق العام. لكن بالنسبة للأسر في العديد من الدول النامية، تتركز الأسئلة المتعلقة بموضوع التعليم على أمور أكثر أساسية، من قبل: هل هناك إمكانية لتعليم أولادهم بالأساس؟ تشير إحصائيات الأمم المتحدة إلى أن الدول الأفقر في العالم لم تحقق إلا "تقدما يتراوح حول الصفر" فيما يتعلق بالتعامل مع شح مقاعد الدراسة في هذه الدول. وجاء في تقرير نشر في وقت لاحق حول نوعية التعليم في تلك الدول أن "أكثر من 600 مليون تلميذ يداومون في المدارس في الدول الفقيرة لا يكادون يتعلمون أي شيء البتة". وبينما تتفوق الفتيات في كثير من الأحوال على الصبيان في مجال التعليم في الدول الغربية الغنية، تتخلف الفتيات في الكثير من الدول الفقيرة - وخصوصا في الدول الإفريقية جنوبي الصحراء الكبرى - عن أقرانهم، بل وقد يخسرن فرصة التعلم أساسا. في اليوم الذي أعلنته الأمم المتحدة "يوما للفتاة"، نشرت مؤسسة One المعنية بالتنمية تقريرا يشير إلى أصعب الدول التي تحظى فيها الفتيات بفرص التعليم. في عشر دول تشهد صراعات مسلحة، تعد الفتيات كبريات الخاسرات في ما يتعلق بالحصول على مقاعد في المدارس. والدول المعنية دول هشة تعاني فيها الأسر من الفقر والمرض وسوء التغذية والتشريد جراء الحروب والصراعات الداخلية. في هذه الدول، يتوقع من الفتيات الصغيرات أن يعملن عوضا عن التوجه إلى المدارس. كما تتزوج العديد منهن وهن صغيرات السن، وهو ما يقضي على أي أمل بحصولهن على أي قدر من التعليم. وتشير إحصائيات الأمم المتحدة إلى أن عدد الفتيات اللواتي يخسرن فرص التعليم يبلغ ضعف عدد الفتيان في البلدان التي تشهد صراعات داخلية. ويستند ترتيب الأمم المتحدة على العوامل التالية: لم تتوفر أرقام يعتمد عليها بالنسبة لبعض الدول - مثل سوريا - لأجل إدراجها في الإحصاءات. أدناه الدول العشر التي يصعب فيها على الفتيات الحصول على التعليم حسب الترتيب: يذكر أن شح المدرسين يعد مشكلة كبيرة في البلدان الفقيرة. ففي العام الماضي، قالت الأمم المتحدة إنه ينبغي تعيين 69 مليون مدرس إضافي حول العالم بحلول عام 2030 من أجل الوفاء بالوعود الدولية في مجال التعليم. وجاء في التقرير الأممي أن ثمة منافع اقتصادية كبيرة لو واصلت الفتيات تعليمهن. كما أن هناك منافع شخصية كبيرة، والمثال على ذلك القروية الكينية فلورنس تشيبتو التي تعلمت القراءة وهي في سن الستين. تصف غيل سميث، التي تترأس حملة One، الإخفاق في تعليم الفتيات بأنه "أزمة عالمية من شأنها نشر الفقر". وتضيف "ما زالت 130 مليون فتاة يفتقرن إلى التعليم، وهو عدد قد يعادل 130 مليون مهندسة ومدرسة وسياسية وامرأة أعمال يخسرهن العالم".
Bảng 100 vận động viên có thu nhập cao nhất thế giới chỉ có duy nhất một vận động viên nữ, ngôi sao quần vợt Serena Williams Cô xếp hạng 51 với thu nhập 66 triệu USD, thấp hơn thu nhập của Christiano Ronaldo, cầu thủ lương cao nhất thế giới, theo Forbes. Đội tuyển bóng đá nữ của Mỹ giành World Cup năm 2015 chỉ khiến họ được khoản tiền thưởng 2 trệu USD. Còn tuyển nam cũng của giải đấu này được thưởng 35 triệu USD từ trước đó một năm. Đây chỉ là một trong mấy ví dụ về chênh lệch quá lớn trong thu nhập của làng thể thao thế giới, và hiện tượng này đã tồn tại hàng chục năm qua. Tuy nhiên, một khảo sát gần đây cho thấy khoảng cách thu nhập giữa nam và nữ vận động viên đã có sự thu hẹp trong một vài năm gần đây. Theo một nghiên cứu của BBC Sport tháng 6 năm về 68 bộ môn, 83% các môn thể thao hiện nay trao tiền thưởng bằng nhau cho vận động viên nam và nữ. Thu nhập của vận động viên nữ đang trên đà tăng trong 3 năm vừa rồi, và 35/44 môn thể thao trao thưởng bằng tiền mặt đã trao thưởng bình đẳng giữa hai giới. Đây dường như là một tín hiệu vui, đặc biệt khi so sánh với những năm trước - năm 2014 chỉ 70% các môn thể thao đã xóa bỏ khoảng cách thu nhập. Trước đó, vào năm 1973, không có môn thể thao nào vận động viên nữ được trả thu nhập bình đẳng với nam giới. Việt Nam: Bóng đá nữ: Bao giờ mới hết "phận con ghẻ"? Việt Nam: Doanh nhân nữ ‘khó đủ đường’ Phụ nữ VN: Tự lực vượt qua ma tuý "Trong lịch sử, phụ nữ chưa bao giờ có chỗ đứng trong làng thể thao tốt hơn lúc này," Quỹ Phát trển Phụ nữ Liên Hợp Quốc cho biết. Tuy vậy, sự thay đổi vẫn diễn ra quá chậm và để phụ nữ vươn tới mức thu nhập cao trong thể thao sẽ "là một chặng đường dài", các chuyên gia nói. "Chúng ta đang có những tiến triển nhưng ở mức rất chậm," bà Fiona Hathorn, Giám đốc điều hành tổ chức phi lợi nhuận vì quyền phụ nữ 'Women on Boards' cho biết. "Thể thao là một thế giới thống trị bởi nam giới và sự phân biệt trong một số môn thể thao thật đáng gây sốc." Cricket, golf và bóng đá là một trong số những môn thể thao có mức chênh lệch thu nhập lớn nhất, bên cạnh phi tiêu, Bi-a và quần vợt. Thị trường thể thao toàn cầu - trị giá khoảng 145,3 tỷ USD theo PwC - còn rất xa trên con đường bình đẳng giới. "Tôi thật sự không thể nghĩ ra bất kì ngành nào khác có chênh lệch thu nhập lớn như vậy. Tùy vào hoàn cảnh của quốc gia và môn thể thao, một người đàn ông có thể là một tỉ phú trong khi một phụ nữ (trong hoàn cảnh tương tự) thậm chí không có được mức lương tối thiểu," bà Beatrice Frey, Giám đốc chương trình thể thao thuộc Quỹ Phát triển Phụ nữ Liên Hợp Quốc cho biết. Phân biệt giới đang len lỏi vào từng vị trí trong ngành công nghiệp bóng đá chuyên nghiệp trị giá bạc tỉ. Nghiên cứu gần đây của Women on Boards nhấn mạnh rằng đội tuyển nữ Hoa Kỳ không chỉ nhận được tiền thưởng bằng một phần nhỏ so với đội tuyển nam, các nữ cầu thủ bóng đá Mỹ cũng nhận thu nhập ít hơn 4 lần so với các cầu thủ nam trong phiên bản nam của giải đấu, mặc dù đội tuyển nam đã thua trong trận knock-out đầu tiên. Chênh lệch sẽ trở nên càng lớn nếu tính tổng lượng tiền chi ra. Tiền thưởng của cả hai giải đấu đều được quy định bởi một tổ chức, Fifa, với quyết định thưởng 15 triệu USD cho World Cup nữ và 576 triệu USD cho giải đấu nam - cao gấp gần 40 lần. Và trong khi Đội trưởng đội tuyển Anh Wayne Rooney đút túi 400 nghìn USD/tuần, Đội trưởng đội tuyển nữ Steph Houghton chỉ nhận khoảng 1600 USD/tuần, theo Ladbrokes Sports. Chênh lệch thu nhập tương tự cũng xuất hiện trong các môn thể thao chuyên nghiệp khác. Với golf, vận động viên nam của giải Mỹ mở rộng thi đấu để giành khoản tiền thưởng trị giá 1,5 triệu USD, gấp đôi tiền thưởng dành cho giải đấu nữ. Lấy ví dụ từ trường hợp của vận động viên New Zealand Lydia Ko, người được công nhận năm 2015 là vận động viên trẻ nhất trong cả hai giới giành vị trí số 1 trong bộ môn golf chuyên nghiệp. Năm đó, cô bỏ túi ít hơn so với vận động viên xếp hạng 25 nam của giải đấu PGA Tour. Bên cạnh đó, đội tuyển cricket nam nếu chiến thắng cúp thế giới có thể kiếm được gấp 7 lần số tiền thưởng so với đội tuyển nữ. Và khoảng cách thu nhập cũng diễn ra tại hai giải đấu bóng rổ uy tín nhất thế giới - NBA và WNBA. "Vận động viên lương cao nhất tại giải WNBA (giải đấu nữ) kiếm được khoảng 1/5 so với vận động viên lương thấp thất," trong giải NBA. Các chuyên gia cho biết, để đạt được sự bình đẳng thì việc các cơ quan quản lý mỗi môn thể thao phải đề ra mức thưởng ngang bằng là chưa đủ - các nhà tài trợ, bảo trợ thương hiệu, và các điều khoản hợp đồng cũng chính là những yếu tố chính ảnh hưởng tới sự mất cân bằng. Ví dụ trong môn quần vợt, giải Grand Slams - 4 sự kiện quan trọng nhất trong làng quần vợt thế giới - đã bắt đầu trao thưởng bằng nhau cho các tay vợt nam và nữ từ năm 2007, nhưng các vận động viên nam hàng đầu vẫn có thu nhập cao hơn do các hợp đồng tài trợ. Đây là lý do Serena Williams là nữ vận động viên duy nhất có mặt trong top 100 của Forbes. "Top 100 vận động viên này như một câu lạc bộ nam giới", phóng viên thể thao Kurt Badenhausen của Forbes viết khi danh sách được công bố vào tháng 6. "Maria Sharapova không thể trụ vững trong bảng xếp hạng do các hợp đồng bảo trợ thương hiệu của cô giảm. Những hợp đồng đó làm nên 29% tổng thu nhập của top 100 vận động viên, theo Forbes. Ronaldo thu được 58 triệu USD từ tiền lương và thưởng, thêm vào đó là khoàng 35 triệu USD thu nhập từ tài trợ, bảo trợ thương hiệu và việc xuất hiện tại các sự kiện Với VĐV golf Tiger Woods và ngôi sao điền kinh Usain Bolt, tiền tài trợ chiếm tới hơn 90% thu nhập của họ. "Phân biệt giới tính đang lan rộng từ những cấp thấp nhất tới cao nhất trong thể thao," Frey nói. "Tại cấp thấp, phân biệt có thể có nghĩa là con gái không được tham gia vào các môn thể thao theo truyền thống vốn không được công nhận là giành cho nữ, tạo nên sự bất bình đẳng từ nhỏ cho tới tuổi thiếu niên và tới khi tham gia thể thao chuyên nghiệp." Sau đó, sự phân biệt trở thành những cơ hội không bình đẳng trong việc được tài trợ và quảng cáo thương hiệu cá nhân, tới mức phần lớn các vận động viên nữ trên thế giới "không thể đảm bảo cuộc sống bằng nghề thể thao". Và xu hướng này tiếp tục cho tới khi vận động viên về hưu. "Đây là một vấn đề đối với các vận động viên nữ khi từ giã sự nghiệp. Không những họ chưa từng được trả thù lao cao, có lẽ họ còn không có lương hưu, không có nhà, không có sự bảo vệ," Hathorn nói. "Và đó là một vấn đề ảnh hưởng tới nguyện vọng và khát khao của các cô gái: Tại sao họ muốn trở thành vận động viên nếu tương lai của họ sẽ như vậy?" Gốc rễ của vấn đề có lẽ nằm ở chính nguồn gốc của thể thao hiện đại. Các xã hội khác nhau nhìn nhận việc luyện tập thể chất liên quan mật thiết tới "những người đàn ông cơ bắp", trái với suy nghĩ phụ nữ là "phái yếu". Cha đẻ của Đại hội Thể thao Olympics hiện đại, Pierre de Coubertin, miêu tả thể thao nữ là những "hình ảnh thiếu thẩm mỹ" trong mắt con người và cho rằng sự tham gia của nữ giới sẽ làm cuộc thi "thiếu thực tế, mất thú vị" và "không thích đáng" (mặc dù một số vận động viên nữ đã được tham gia sau năm 1900). Phụ nữ chỉ được tham gia các giải đua dài 1500m, vì họ bị coi là không có thể chất phù hợp để tham dự đường đua dài hơn. Về tính đại diện, phải đến Olympics London 2012 mới có quy định bắt buộc mỗi đoàn thể thao phải có ít nhất một vận động viên nữ. Do đó, chênh lệch thu nhập có thể bị ảnh hưởng từ một sự chênh lệch rộng hơn - đó là tỉ lệ tham gia vào thể thao thấp hơn so với nam giới. "Sự tham gia là một vấn đề bắt nguồn từ thời đi học," bà Ruth Holdaway, Giám đốc điều hành tổ chức Women in Sport cho biết. Việc này liên quan tới nhận thức về cơ thể và những suy nghĩ rập khuôn về giới tính mà các em tiếp cận, bà Holdaway nói. Số liệu thống kê từ Quỹ Phát triển Phụ nữ Liên Hợp Quốc cho thấy có tới 49% thiếu niên nữ từ bỏ luyện tập thể thao khi bắt đầu dậy thì, và điều này ảnh hưởng tới việc huấn luyện chuyên nghiệp sau này. Một điều được chấp nhận rộng rãi là sự chênh lệch thu nhập trong thể thao cũng là một sản phẩm của việc thương mại hóa thể thao, với truyền thông là một nguồn tác động lớn. Theo một nghiên cứu của Trung tâm Nghiên cứu về Phụ nữ trong thể thao thuộc đại học Minnesota (Mỹ) năm 2014, chỉ tối đa 4% lượng thông tin về thể thao nữ được các kênh truyền thông đưa tin, trong khi có tới 40% hoạt động thể thao là của phụ nữ. Và với thời gian lên sóng ít ỏi, thông tin thể thao nữ thường bị giới tính hóa, miêu tả hình ảnh các nữ vận động viên trong đời thường, nhấn mạnh vào "sự cuốn hút ngoại hình hơn là khả năng thể thao của họ", giám đốc Trung tâm Tucker Mary Jo Kane cho biết. Vì vậy, nhiều người cho rằng phụ nữ thu nhập ít hơn do ảnh hưởng từ thị trường, vì thể thao nữ "không phổ biến bằng" và "không hay bằng", và hệ quả là lợi tức truyền thông thấp hơn. Đây là một vấn đề tồn đọng, một vòng luẩn quẩn "con gà và quả trứng", các nhà hoạt động vì quyền bình đẳng cho biết - khán giả sẽ không có hứng thú với thể thao nữ nếu thông tin không được phủ sóng trên truyền thông, và truyền thông thì không thể đưa tin vì cho rằng thể thao nữ không đủ gây hứng thú cho khán giả. "Đây không phải một lập luận hợp lý, đầu tiên cần phải đầu tư vào nhiều cấp độ, bao gồm marketing và quảng bá, để thu hút sự chú ý của công chúng, và từ đó tăng lợi nhuận đầu tư," Frey nói. "Khi nào chúng ta quen với việc phụ nữ chơi những môn thể thao như bóng đá hay bóng bầu dục thay vì đàn ông, chúng ta sẽ thấy suy nghĩ chỉ nam giới mới chơi thể thao chỉ còn trong sách vở," Hathorn bổ sung. Rộng hơn, chênh lệch trong thể thao chính là biểu hiện cho sự bất bình đẳng giới, và có thể coi là một dạng phân biệt giới tính. Ví dụ, cầu thủ bóng đá nữ tại các giải đấu quốc tế cho tới gần đây vẫn bị yêu cầu phải chơi trên các sân cỏ nhân tạo, được biết đến với chất lượng kém hơn sân cỏ tự nhiên mà các đội tuyển nam được sử dụng. Và với vấn đề sử dụng ngôn ngữ: "Cúp bóng đá thế giới World Cup được coi là dành cho nam giới, trong khi với giải bóng của nữ giới cần phải thêm cụm "giải bóng đá nữ" để miêu tả", một tài liệu của Liên Hợp Quốc về phụ nữ với thể thao viết. Mặc dù tiến triển chậm, nhưng sự thay đổi vẫn đang diễn ra và cho thấy khoảng cách đang thu hẹp dần. Quần vợt được coi là một ví dụ tốt nhất cho điều này, sau khi cả bốn giải Grand Slam đưa ra mức thưởng tiền giữa vận động viên nam và nữ bằng nhau năm 2007. Trên thực tế, quá trình này đã bắt đầu từ năm 1973 ở giải Mỹ mở rộng, nhờ nhà vô địch thế giới Billie Jean King và các vận động viên nữ khác, đã sáng lập Hiệp hội Quần vợt Nữ nhằm đấu tranh cho bình đẳng giới. Điền kinh cũng đã trở thành một ví dụ đáng kể khi trong 5 năm vừa qua, giải vô địch thế giới cúp Liên đoàn Điền kinh không chuyên Quốc tế (IAAF) đã đưa ra giải thưởng không dựa trên giới tính vận động viên. Các môn thể thao khác cũng cho thấy có sự không phân biệt giới tính trong giải thưởng bao gồm trượt băng, bắn súng, bóng chuyền, lặn, bơi thuyền, lướt sóng và taekwondo, và một số cuộc thi đua xe đạp. Nhu cầu xem các chương trình truyền hình về thể thao nữ cũng tăng, một phần do mạng xã hội giúp làm tăng sự nổi tiếng của các vận động viên mà không phân biệt giới tính. Và bản thân các vận động viên nữ đã đứng lên chống lại phân biệt giới tính. Năm ngoái, 5 trong số những cái tên nổi tiếng nhất trong làng bóng đá nữ của Mỹ đã cùng khiếu nại cơ quan chủ quản, Liên đoàn Bóng đá Mỹ, vì phân biệt thu nhập theo giới, trong khi đội tuyển hockey đã tổ chức tẩy chay một giải đấu quốc tế nhằm đòi được trả công bình đẳng. Nhưng còn rất nhiều việc cần phải làm, các nhóm hoạt động cho biết. Đầu tiên, cần có nhiều phụ nữ nằm ở các vị trí đưa ra quyết định. Một báo cáo của Women on Boards đưa ra một vấn đề trong nhiều ngành nghề, với dưới 30% số ghế trong các ban điều hành được sở hữu bởi những người phụ nữ. Phụ nữ chỉ chiếm 18% trong số tất cả các thành viên điều hành 28 Liên đoàn Thể thao Quốc tế tham gia khảo sát. Trong 129 Ủy ban Olympic Quốc gia, số liệu còn thấp hơn và thậm chí có chiều hướng giảm - phụ nữ chiếm 16,6% trong ban điều hành, hạ từ 17,6% năm 2014. Gốc rễ của vấn đề nằm ở chỗ có phụ nữ gắn bó với thể thao từ khi nhỏ như thế nào, các chuyên gia nói, và các nỗ lực đối chọi với sự phân biệt giới tính trong thu nhập và tham gia thể thao cần được thay đổi từ chính cấp trường. Thể thao không phân biệt giới là một cách đem lại hiệu quả tốt trong việc giúp các nữ sinh quan tâm tới sức khỏe thể chất trong dài hạn và cân nhắc việc trở thành vận động viên chuyên nghiệp. "Tôi ủng hộ việc để trẻ em nam và nữ cùng chơi thể thao với nhau từ cấp tiểu học, vì ở giai đoạn này thể chất của các em không có nhiều điểm khác nhau. Trẻ em cùng chơi thể thao từ khi đi học có thể sẽ tạo nên khác biệt thật sự trong xã hội," Hathorn cho biết. "Nếu chúng ta muốn thu hẹp sự chênh lệch trong dài hạn, chúng ta thật sự cần giúp trẻ em và thiếu niên nữ thay đổi suy nghĩ, hiểu rằng thể thao rất vui và đó là một thứ các em có thể tham gia như các bạn nam," bà Ruth Holdaway nói. Thay đổi hình mẫu cho bảo trợ thương mại và tài trợ cũng là một việc quan trọng trên con đường tiến tới bình đẳng giới trong thể thao. Quảng cáo qua các sự kiện thể thao nữ là một thị trường chưa được khai phá và các chuyên gia tin rằng đây không chỉ là một bước đi thể hiện sự bình đẳng mà còn là một khoản đầu tư có lợi. "Đây không phải vấn đề làm từ thiện, mà là quyết định kinh doanh sáng suốt," Frey cho biết. "Các công ty hiện tại rất quan tâm tới bình đẳng giới, nếu tôi là một công ty tài trợ ví dụ cho giải Ngoại hạng, tôi sẽ tự hỏi mình 'đây có phải hình ảnh mình hướng tới cho công ty?', 'đầu tư cho các anh chàng liệu có gây rủi ro cho thương hiệu của mình?'", Hathorn nói. "Chúng ta có 50% khách hàng là phụ nữ nhưng ta lại đầu tư 99% số tiền của mình để tài trợ cho giải đấu của nam giới, điều này có đúng không?' Rõ ràng là không". Cuối cùng, các chuyên gia đồng tình rằng sự thay đổi văn hóa là cần thiết - phụ nữ không thể bị coi là "vận động viên hạng hai" cũng như việc họ không thể bị coi là công dân hạng hai của xã hội. "Dù Billie Jean King đã đấu tranh cho quyền bình đẳng từ hơn 40 năm trước, cho đến hiện tại chúng ta vẫn chưa thật sự có sự bình đẳng trong thể thao," Hathorn nói. "Chúng ta đang thay đổi, nhưng chúng ta vẫn chưa đến đích." Chương trình 100 Phụ nữ (100 Women) của BBC nói về 100 phụ nữ có ảnh hưởng và truyền cảm hứng trên toàn thế giới mỗi năm. Năm 2017, chúng tôi thách thức họ đối phó với 4 vấn đề lớn nhất mà phụ nữ phải đối mặt hiện nay - những rào cản vô hình, tình trạng thất học của phụ nữ, tấn công nơi công cộng và phân biệt giới tính trong thể thao. Với sự giúp đỡ của các bạn, họ sẽ đưa ra các giải pháp thực tế và chúng tôi muốn các bạn cùng tham gia đóng góp ý tưởng của mình. Hãy liên hệ với chúng tôi qua Facebook, Instagram và Twitter và sử dụng hashtag#100Women Trong danh sách các phụ nữ được vinh danh trên toàn thế giới có các gương mặt từ Việt Nam: các bạn xemtại đây.
Theresa May has done a deal with the DUP which means she stays as UK prime minister. Here's a guide to what's going on. UK Prime Minister Theresa May called a general election, thinking she could increase her power ahead of Brexit talks. But it turned out she didn't do as well as hoped and her party no longer has a majority of members of parliament (MPs). Please enable Javascript to view our results map There are 650 MPs in the House of Commons - so any party getting more than 325 MPs has "a majority" because they are presumed to be able to win votes on all the things they want to do. Theresa May's Conservatives ended short of that total - getting 318 MPs (13 fewer than after the 2015 general election), Labour got 262 MPs (up 30), the Scottish National Party 35 (down 21), the Liberal Democrats got 12 (up 4) and the Democratic Unionists 10 (up 2). The Conservatives are still the biggest party in the House of Commons, and they have now agreed a deal with Northern Ireland party the Democratic Unionist Party (DUP), to have its support in key votes. The Conservatives' 318 MPs and the 10 DUP MPs together make up more than half the MPs in the House of Commons. No. A coalition normally means different parties agreeing on a joint programme and ministers coming from both parties. The Conservatives and the DUP have agreed what is called a "confidence and supply" agreement. This is where the DUP agree to back the Conservatives in key votes - such as a Budget and a confidence motion - but are not tied into supporting them on other measures. Read the full Conservative-DUP agreement. As well as the obvious influence and prestige of being involved with the UK government, there will also be £1bn more spent on Northern Ireland over the next two years than had previously been planned. They have also got agreement on a range of policy priorities - such as keeping the guarantee to increase state pensions by at least 2.5% a year, to maintain defence spending and to maintain agriculture spending in Northern Ireland at the same level for the rest of the current Parliament (which theoretically takes us to June 2022). Read more: Where the money will be spent Basically, they are pro-union (UK, not Europe), pro-Brexit and socially conservative. The party is now the fifth largest in Parliament - its 36% share of the vote in Northern Ireland resulted in 10 MPs being returned to Westminster. It started as a one-man-band, with the Reverend Ian Paisley, a fundamentalist Protestant preacher, at its helm. He founded the party in 1971 in opposition to what he saw as the increasingly liberal approach of the Ulster Unionists - the party of the political establishment since the state was founded, in 1921. The DUP may be less overtly religious than it was in the days when the late Rev Paisley was in charge, but on social issues it is still deeply conservative. It opposes same-sex marriage and is anti-abortion - abortion remains illegal in Northern Ireland, except in specific medical cases. Ruth Davidson, the Conservative leader in Scotland, is gay and plans to marry her partner and had sought a guarantee from Mrs May that any deal would not affect gay rights. Many in Scotland and Wales are also concerned about special financial deals being struck for Northern Ireland. Sinn Fein, the SDLP and Alliance Party have said that a deal between the Conservatives and the DUP at Westminster would be likely to make power-sharing at Stormont more difficult. The former Labour Northern Ireland Secretary Peter Hain said a deal would "jeopardise the neutrality, the non-partisan stance, that a prime minister and a secretary of state must have in relation to Northern Ireland's politics". The UK government says Westminster business should be distinguished from its role in relation to the devolved administration. Theresa May says she hopes that all the parties in Northern Ireland will "come together and reach agreement to re-establish a power-sharing executive" by the 29 June deadline. Theresa May justified calling a snap election on the basis that she wanted a larger majority of MPs, to strengthen her hand in negotiating the terms of the UK's withdrawal from the European Union. Brexit did not appear to have been the key issue in the election, however the fact that she has ended up with fewer MPs means there is now uncertainty over her strategy for the talks to come. Those arguing for a Brexit that maximises trading links - a policy Labour held - are feeling emboldened and claim the result showed voters rejecting Mrs May's vision for Brexit. The DUP, which has long been a Eurosceptic party, broadly shares Mrs May's Brexit strategy and has committed to back her in any votes on Brexit strategy. Read more: What result means for Brexit Former Chancellor George Osborne, a man sacked by Theresa May when she became prime minister, has described her as a "dead woman walking". She had to jettison her two closest advisers to appease critics in the Conservative Party and had to agree to a more collegiate form of cabinet government. She is weakened, but at the moment it seems that there is little appetite among Conservative MPs for either another general election - given Jeremy Corbyn's rise during the one just finished - or a leadership contest to replace Mrs May. There is also, at the moment, little sign of agreement on who could be parachuted in to replace her in a "coronation". Theresa May has got through the initial risk period, notably telling her backbench MPs "I got us into this mess, I'll get us out of it". The delayed Queen's Speech took place on Wednesday 21 June and the key vote on it is to take place on Thursday. The deal with the DUP means Mrs May is likely to win that vote - if she had lost it would be the equivalent of a vote of no confidence. Although they did not get the most MPs, and got 40% of votes compared with 42.4% for the Conservatives, Jeremy Corbyn's Labour Party and its supporters have been celebrating their election performance. The reason for this is the way their support surged during the campaign, from below 30% in many opinion polls to 40%. Written off beforehand by many inside and outside his party, Mr Corbyn took everything thrown at him and has emerged as a man now firmly in charge of his party and, unlike before the election, being seen by non-supporters as having a realistic chance of becoming prime minister. At the moment Theresa May and the Conservatives show no sign of wanting to risk incurring the wrath of voters by calling another election. Once bitten, twice shy and all that. Labour's Jeremy Corbyn is the candidate seen as on the rise, so why risk letting him build on the gains Labour made in this election? However you can't argue with the fundamentals, and the truth is that the Conservatives do not have a majority in Parliament, and Labour can't put together a coalition to secure a majority either. The aim appears to be to govern now for a full Parliament with DUP backing - but past precedent - 1974 when there were two elections in the year - would suggest that may be difficult to achieve. Do you have an unanswered question about the political situation? Let us know. Use this form to ask your question: If you are reading this page on the BBC News app, you will need to visit the mobile version of the BBC website to submit your question on this topic.
Dos de los mayores sitios de comercio de la "internet oscura" han sido cerrados como resultado de una investigación conjunta de la policía de Estados Unidos y Europa, anunció este jueves la Oficina Europea de Policía (Europol). Los sitios AlphaBay y Hansa han sido relacionados con el tráfico de productos ilícitos como drogas, armas, programas informáticos malignos y datos robados. Las estimaciones más conservadoras calculan que en AlphaBay se hicieron transacciones por US$1.000 millones. Según Europol, en AlphaBay había más de 250.000 registros de drogas ilegales como heroína, además de fentanilo que es un opioide 50 veces más poderoso que la heroína y químicos tóxicos. Las autoridades han dicho que esta es una de las mayores operaciones de la historia en contra de los criminales de la internet oscura y creen que conducirá a cientos de nuevas investigaciones. Por su parte, Jeff Sessions, fiscal general de Estados Unidos, se dirigió a los criminales que delinquen en la internet oscura. "No se pueden esconder", dijo. "Los vamos a encontrar". AlphaBay había estado fuera de servicio desde principios de julio, lo que había alimentado las sospechas entre sus usuarios de que se estaba desarrollando una investigación. Luego del cierre de AlphaBay, las autoridades registraron que el tráfico de Hansa se multiplicó por ocho, lo que junto a otras investigaciones, permitió establecer que los usuarios de AlphaBay estaban migrando a Hansa para cometer crímenes ahí. Alexandre Cazes, canadiense de 26 años y presunto administrador de AlphaBay, había sido arrestado el 5 de julio en Tailandia y le fueron incautados millones de dólares en activos, tres propiedades y cuatro autos Lamborghini. Luego Cazes fue hallado muerto en su celda en una cárcel de Bangkok, las autoridades dijeron que aparentemente se suicidó. "Lo que las autoridades realmente quieren es comenzar a poner una gran cantidad de personas tras las rejas". El impacto de esta operación solo se verá durante el próximo año o más, cuando las autoridades le hagan seguimiento a las "muchas nuevas pistas" que dicen haber encontrado como resultado de infiltrar y dar de baja estas dos enormes redes. Mientras que la clausura de estos sitios es una gran logro, el Departamento de Justicia de Estados Unidos y Europol han reconocido que otros servicios simplemente aparecerán para reemplazarlos. Después de todo, el cierre Silk Road en 2013, otro mercado de la internet oscura, fue seguido por AlphaBay, que resultó siendo más grande, más lucrativo y, al parecer, más peligroso. Lo que las autoridades realmente quieren es comenzar a poner una gran cantidad de personas tras las rejas. Esta acción altamente coordinada solo dio como resultado un puñado de arrestos y un sospecho clave aparentemente se suicidó siete días después de haber sido puesto en custodia. Es un comienzo, pero está claro que servicios tan grandes como estos requieren una red grande e intricada de criminales, y a eso es a los que las autoridades están apuntando. La internet oscura, que inglés se conoce como dark web, se refiere a los sitios que están por debajo de la superficie que normalmente navegamos en la red. Entre ellos están los que se ocultan deliberadamente de los buscadores o aquellos que requieren programas y configuraciones especiales para poder ingresar. En muchos casos, la conexión a estos sitios es anónima y encriptada, lo cual dificulta que las autoridades les hagan seguimiento. Por esta razón, los sitios de la internet oscura suelen asociarse con actos criminales como tráfico de droga o pornografía infantil, aunque también son útiles para proteger a informantes o brindar accesos a redes sociales en países donde están prohibidas.
An agreement has been reached which will see the Democratic Unionist Party back Theresa May's minority government. The deal, which comes two weeks after the election resulted in a hung Parliament, will see the 10 DUP MPs back the Tories in key Commons votes. There will be £1bn extra for Northern Ireland over the next two years. DUP leader Arlene Foster said the "wide-ranging" pact was "good for Northern Ireland and the UK" but one critic said it was a "straight bung". Labour leader Jeremy Corbyn said the deal was "clearly not in the national interest", and Sinn Fein's Gerry Adams said it enabled a "Tory Brexit which threatens the Good Friday Agreement". It has prompted calls for matching public investment in Wales and Scotland. A three page document outlining the terms of the agreement has been published in full. The DUP said it would apply for the lifetime of the Parliament, scheduled to last five years, but would also be reviewed at the end of the current session in two years' time. There will be £1.5bn in funding - consisting of £1bn of new money and £500m of previously announced funds - to be spent over the next two years on infrastructure, health and education in Northern Ireland, money Mrs Foster said was needed to address the challenges from Northern Ireland's "unique history". As part of the deal, the military covenant will be implemented in full in Northern Ireland, meaning more focus on the treatment of military veterans, while the triple lock guarantee of at least a 2.5% rise in the state pension each year, and winter fuel payments, will be maintained throughout the UK. Other key points of the agreement include: Mrs May shook hands with DUP leader Arlene Foster as she and other senior party figures arrived at Downing Street on Monday to finalise the pact. The two leaders then watched as Conservative chief whip Gavin Williamson and his DUP counterpart Jeffrey Donaldson signed the documents in No 10. Speaking outside Downing Street, Mrs Foster said the agreement would bring stability to the UK government as it embarked on the Brexit process, "This agreement will operate to deliver a stable government in the United Kingdom's national interest at this vital time," she said. Analysis by BBC political editor Laura Kuenssberg The Tories now face a bumpy day of criticism, about how the DUP have been bought off - £100m for each of their ten votes in Parliament. The other devolved nations will cry foul. Some Tories too are deeply uncomfortable about the association with the DUP brand of unionism. And if the cuts are to be eased in Northern Ireland, what about other parts of the country? But the money that's been found down the back of the Number 10 sofa for Northern Ireland may be worth it for Theresa May as the price of holding power, for now. She now has her majority, whatever the cost, and a dividend could be the conclusion of a deal to get power sharing at Stormont up and running too. Read Laura's blog in full Welcoming the additional funding for Northern Ireland, she said it would benefit all communities. "Following our discussions the Conservative Party has recognised the case for higher funding in Northern Ireland, given our unique history and indeed circumstances over recent decades." The UK prime minister said the pact was a "very good one" for the UK as a whole. "We share many values in terms of wanting to see prosperity across the UK, the value of the union, the important bond between the different parts of the UK," Mrs May said. "We very much want to see that protected and enhanced First Secretary of State Damian Green, a close ally of Mrs May's, said he hoped the extra money would help revive devolved government in Northern Ireland. "The money that is attached to this agreement is actually less than the money attached to the original Stormont agreement in 2014," he told the BBC. "We know Northern Ireland has particular needs, because of its history and difficulties. "There are parts of the Northern Ireland infrastructure that needs particular help and that has been recognised on a continuing basis." The BBC's political editor Laura Kuenssberg said most of the money being allocated to Northern Ireland would go to specific projects rather than general spending, meaning it would not necessarily impact on the Barnett formula which determines overall expenditure across the nations of the UK. She said DUP sources pointed to the creation of a "coordination committee", suggesting this would give them a direct line in to government discussions and that this may prove particularly influential over the Brexit negotiations. Northern Ireland has been without a devolved government since March and parties have until Thursday to find agreement. The cash will go to the Northern Ireland executive if the devolved institutions are restored by the deadline of 29 June. Under the so-called "confidence and supply" arrangement, the DUP will line up behind the government in key votes, such as on the Queen's Speech and Budgets, as well as Brexit and security matters, which are likely to dominate most of the current Parliament. On other legislation, the DUP's support is not necessarily guaranteed - although the Northern Ireland party is expected to back the majority of the government's programme for the next two years after many of its more controversial policies were dropped. The support of the DUP will give Mrs May an effective working majority of 13, given that Sinn Fein do not take up their seven seats and Speaker John Bercow and his three deputies - two of whom are Labour MPs - do not take part in votes. Several senior Tories had advised her to govern without any formal agreement with the DUP, arguing the unionist party would not be prepared to bring Mrs May down and run the risk of triggering a fresh election given their longstanding hostility to Jeremy Corbyn and other senior Labour figures. Former PM Sir John Major warned that a formal association with the DUP could undermine attempts to restore power-sharing government in Northern Ireland while some MPs said the DUP's socially conservative stance on issues such as gay marriage and abortion could damage the party in the longer term. Welsh First Minister Carwyn Jones suggested Mrs May was "throwing money at Northern Ireland while ignoring the rest of the UK", in what he called "cash for votes". "Today's deal represents a straight bung to keep a weak prime minister and a faltering government in office," the Labour politician said. Mr Corbyn said public service cuts should be stopped "right across the UK, not just in Northern Ireland". He demanded to know where the extra money for Northern Ireland was coming from, and whether other parts of the UK would get a similar cash injection. "This Tory-DUP deal is clearly not in the national interest but in May's party's interest to help her cling to power," he added. Mr Adams, the president of Sinn Fein, said: "The Tory government has slashed more than £1bn from the block grant over the last seven years. "The allocation of additional funds could help to ease the enormous pressure on our public services. "The devil is in the detail." On the plan to implement the military covenant in Northern Ireland, Mr Adams added: "Sinn Fein will resolutely oppose any attempt to give preferential treatment to British forces, either in terms of legacy or the provision of public services." In the Commons, MPs from other parties lined up to criticise the new arrangements, with the SNP's Pete Wishart saying it was a "pathetic grubby little deal" and accusing the Tories and DUP of "pork barrel politics". But Nigel Dodds, the DUP's Westminster leader, said his party could publish details of its correspondence with Labour and the SNP at the time of previous elections. "Some of the faux outrage we have heard is hypocrisy of the highest order," he said. Mr Dodds said the extra investment would be "for every section of the community in Northern Ireland".
මියන්මාර රෝහින්ග්‍යා සරණාගතයන්ට තර්ජනය කිරීම සම්බන්ධයෙන් අත්අඩංගුවට ගෙන සිටි අක්මීමන දයාරතන හිමියන් ඇප මත නිදහස් කරන මෙන් ගල්කිස්ස මහේස්ත්‍රාත් අධිකරණය අද (ඔක් 10) නියෝග කළේය. එක්සත් ජාතීන්ගේ භාරයේ ගල්කිස්සේ නවාතැන් ලද රෝහින්ග්‍යා සරණාගතයන්ට එරෙහිව දියත් කෙරුණු විරෝධතාවට නායකත්වය දුන් බවට එල්ල වූ චෝදනා මත අක්මීමන දයාරතන හිමියන් පොලිසිය විසින් අත්අඩංගුවට ගනු ලැබුවේ පසුගිය 02 වෙනිදාය. අක්මීමන දයාරතන හිමියන් වෙනුවෙන් ඉදිරිපත් කරන ලද ඇප අයදුම්පත පිළිගත් අධිකරණය රුපියල් 500,000 බැගින් වූ පුද්ගල ඇප තුනක් මත එහිමියන් ඇප මත නිදහස් කිරීමට තීන්දු කර තිබේ. එහිදී ඇප ලබා දීම සම්බන්ධයෙන් නීතිපති දෙපාර්තමේන්තුව විරෝධය පළ කළ බව කී අක්මීමන දයාරතන හිමියන් වෙනුවෙන් පෙනී සිටි නීතිඥ අතුල එස් රණගල, "නීතිපති දෙපාර්තමේන්තුව මේ කාරණයට හිටි හැටියේ මැදිහත් වෙලා විශාල ආන්දෝලනයක් ඇති කරලා මේක ජාත්‍යන්තර ප්‍රශ්නයක් වශයෙන් ගෙන යන්න උත්සාහ දරුවා" යනුවෙන් බීබීසී සිංහල සේවය වෙත අදහස් දක්වමින් සඳහන් කළේය. එමෙන්ම එම තත්ත්වය පොලිසිය යොදා ගනිමින් ආණ්ඩුව අපහසුතාවට පත් කිරීමේ සැලසුමක් විය හැකි බවට ද නීතිඥවරයා සැක පළ කරයි. "ආණ්ඩුව අපහසුතාවට පත් කරන්න මේ පොලිසියටම තොප්පියක් දාලා ඒ අයම යම් සංවිධානයක් විසින් මෙහෙයවනවද කියන සැකය තියෙනවා" යනුවෙන් ඔහු වැඩිදුරටත් පැවසීය. සබැඳි යොමු:
"I really shop when the pound falls in value," says American Jian DeLeon. The 31-year-old editorial director at online US fashion website Highsnobiety is unsurprisingly passionate about clothes. He says his favourite luxury brands are now substantially cheaper in London. "Like anything from Comme Des Garcons. I got a jacket last time I was there for 40% less than I would have paid here," he says. Before June last year, when the UK voted to leave the EU, he rarely went shopping on his regular work trips to the UK. "The littlest things from a pint at the pub to a short Uber ride were murder on my bank account because of the exchange rate." Now that some brands are significantly cheaper, he spends about $350 (£274; 310 euros) each time he comes, but thinks the favourable exchange rate means he saves around $100. "It's easier for me to splurge and sometimes I do it too much for my own good," he confesses. Mr DeLeon isn't the only one indulging. Just over a year on from the EU referendum, the pound is still around 16% lower against the dollar. The weakness has lured over a flock of international tourists hungry for high-end brands at relatively bargain prices. Payments firm WorldPay says non-UK consumers' card spending at department stores rose by a fifth in the first three months of the year, while spending on electrical goods rose 22.7%. US shoppers like Mr DeLeon have been amongst the biggest spenders, splashing out an extra 21.5% on their cards during the same period, it said. "The extreme currency fluctuations encourages shoppers to buy more," says Honor Strachan, principal retail analyst at GlobalData. "They're getting more for their money." But how do companies manage this kind of discrepancy; with precisely the same product priced significantly differently depending on where in the world it is bought? After all a boom in revenues in one market, can seriously dent demand in the markets international shoppers are coming from. Many of the world's most famous brands — such as Burberry and Apple — simply raised their UK prices to try and make sure what they sold cost broadly the same across their international markets. But luxury footwear brand Crockett & Jones, which has 12 stores worldwide across locations including London, Paris and New York as well as global wholesale partners, says it has deliberately left prices unchanged. "The last thing we want to do is abuse our customer confidence and raise prices in the UK. "We certainly don't increase our prices at a whim to take advantage of said currency fluctuations," says James Fox, export sales director at the firm. Mr Fox believes that in the long term it's best to keep pricing simple. "We strive to have a level playing field as and where we can. "We offer sterling, euro and dollar price lists, which gives our customers piece of mind that they are buying in their own currency at a level price to the potential competitors within their market." He says generally any discrepancies tend to average out across currencies, and that re-pricing is only possible "once or twice a year" due to the upheaval it causes for the business overall. So is he concerned that the firm could be losing out financially? "We are fortunate to be in a position that we have a few very strong 'Brexit proof' markets which underpin the company when the UK is trying its best to screw up international trade," says Mr Fox. By selling both through its own stores and through wholesalers the firm's risk is already spread out, he adds. Crockett & Jones is not the only retailer which has kept prices steady. Ray Clacher, executive vice-president at Trinity - owner of premium brands Gieves & Hawkes, Kent & Curwen and Cerruti 1881 - says non-EU tourists using either the US dollar or a currency that trades in line with the dollar, have driven up sales at its London stores. Nonetheless, these sales are still just a small percentage of Trinity's total revenue. "We certainly have not adjusted our retail prices to reflect the influx of tourism, in fact, quite the opposite as we want to encourage more UK [sales]," he says. However, he admits this strategy could change if costs continue to rise. "If inflation continues to rise and sterling continues to struggle against the euro and dollar, we will have no choice but to pass on the cost to our customers - but not at present," says Mr Clacher. More from the BBC's series taking an international perspective on trade: The apples that need shading from the sun How the 'better burger' is taking over the world What it takes to get Beyonce on a world tour The country losing out in the breakfast juice battle Why a $1.6bn car plant has been left to decay Read more global trade series here. But it is also important not to be too greedy. Many US retailers that have come to the UK have simply swapped their dollar signs on their US price tags for pounds - betting that British consumers will be willing to pay a premium for their goods. Banana Republic is one such example. After eight years in the UK, it announced last year it would close all eight of its stores. The decision followed six consecutive quarters of falling sales. "They thought that because they were a big brand, they could demand higher prices. But UK consumers "are savvier than that," says Ms Strachan. Yet for retailers doing a straight currency conversion from their local currency to the country where they are selling their goods also doesn't necessarily work. "Asos made a big thing about launching local websites with a straight currency conversion and it didn't work - local pricing didn't fit in line with competitors. "Brands need to look at who else is operating in that space, the wealth of consumers there, and what they're willing to pay, and then price accordingly using localised pricing structures," says Ms Strachan. Many firms, particularly larger brands such as Hermes also use currency hedging to protect themselves. This involves working with a bank to buy currency at the current rate to protect themselves against adverse future volatility. In the end, though Ms Strachan says a company's ability to cope with currency volatility comes down to how much people want to buy what they sell. "If they still want it customers will buy it," she says.
دعت بعض النجمات في بي بي سي في رسالة موجهة للإدارة إلى "التحرك الآن" من أجل معالجة الفجوة بين الجنسين في الرواتب. ومن ضمن المقدمات المشهورات اللواتي وقعن الرسالة كلير بولدين، وفيكتوريا ديربيشاير، وإيميلي ميتليس ووجهنها إلى المدير العام لبي بي سي، توني هول. وحثت المقدمات مدير بي بي سي على "تصحيح" الفجوة في الرواتب بين الجنسين، قائلات إن الفجوة معروفة "منذ سنوات". وكشفت بي بي سي هذا الأسبوع عن رواتب نجوم ونجمات بي بي سي الذين يتقاضون أكثر من 150000 جنيه إسترليني. ونشرت بي بي سي، الأربعاء الماضي، التقرير السنوي لتفاصيل رواتب نجومها الكبار إذ أوضحت أن ثلثي رواتب نجومها الذين يتقاضون أكثر من 150000 هم من الرجال، إذ جاء كريس إيفانز في المرتبة الأولى بحصوله على ما بين 2.2 مليون و2.25 مليون جنيه استرليني سنويا. بالصور: نساء مبدعات عربيات تغلبن على مصاعب الهجرة وجاءت مقدمة بي بي سي كلوديا وينكلمان في المرتبة الأولى كأعلى النساء أجرا بحصولها على ما بين 450000 و500000 جنيه أسترليني. في حين جاءت أليكس جونز من البرنامج التلفزيوني "وان شو" في المرتبة الثانية بتقاضيها ما بين 400000 و450000 جنيه أسترليني. تمييز وتضمنت قائمة الموقعات على الرسالة سو باركر من بي بي سي للرياضة والمذيعة في راديو بي بي سي 4 ميشيل حسين وسارة مونْتِيغيو ومقدمة تلفزيون بي بي سي فيونا بروس ومقدمة برنامج وان شو. وغردت المقدمة جين غارفي من البرنامج الإذاعي "ساعة للنساء" في بي بي سي 4 التي نظمت حملة التوقيع قائلة إن :"نجمات بي بي سي بدأن التمرد". وقالت الموقعات على الرسالة إنهن "مستعدات للاجتماع" بمدير بي بي سي لضمان أن "الأجيال المستقبلية للنساء لا يواجهن هذا النوع من التمييز". وأضافت الموقعات أن تقرير بي بي سي أظهر أن "ما كنا نشك فيه منذ سنين عديدة وهو أن النساء العاملات في بي بي سي يتقاضين رواتب أقل مقابل نفس العمل، وهذه الآن حقيقة". ومضت الموقعات إلى القول بأن التفاوت في الأجور لا يزال "يتجاوز قائمة" من يتقاضون أكثر من 150000 جنيه إسترليني والتي تشمل مجالات الإنتاج، والهندسة، والإعلام الإقليمي والمحلي. وجاء في الرسالة "مقارنة بين العديد من النساء والرجال، فإننا نحصل على تعويضات جيدة جدا ونعد أنفسنا محظوظات. لكن نحن نعيش في عصر المساواة، وبي بي سي منظمة تفخر بقيمها". وقالت الرسالة مخاطبة مدير بي بي سي ، هول، "قلتم بأنكم ستحلون تفاوت الأجور بين الجنسين بحلول عام 2020، لكن بي بي سي عرفت التفاوت في الأجور منذ سنوات، ونريد جميعا أن نسجل موقفنا بضرورة التحرك الآن". وكان المدير العام لبي بي سي قال الأسبوع الماضي "ينبغي القيام بالمزيد من العمل" بينما قال مدير الإذاعة والتربية في بي بي سي، جيمس بورنيل، إن المقدمين الرجال يمكن أن يواجهوا تخفيضات في الرواتب.
China's Communist Party will unveil its next generation of elite leaders when it meets starting on 18 October for a congress that is held every five years. Except for President Xi Jinping and Premier Li Keqiang, five of the seven members of the party's top body, the Politburo Standing Committee (PSC), are expected to retire later this year. Given the opaque nature of Chinese politics, it is tricky to say who will fill the vacancies - though it is certain that they will likely be those close to Mr Xi. The BBC takes a look at the men widely expected to take over the reins of China's ruling party. Chen Min'er, 56, was appointed Chongqing municipality party chief on 15 July, replacing Sun Zhengcai who is being investigated for corruption. He spent his early political life working in his native Zhejiang province, where he developed close ties with Mr Xi while working under him from 2002 to 2007 in his tenure at the province's propaganda department. Describing him as Mr Xi's "trusted confidant", Hong Kong newspaper South China Morning Post noted that his promotion "cemented his credentials as a contender to join the upper echelon of the party" at the congress. Before becoming the head of Guangdong, an economically strong province in southern China, Hu Chunhua worked in Tibet, Hebei and Inner Mongolia in various capacities. He also became the first secretary of the Communist Youth League, the party's youth wing, in 2006. Mr Hu, 54, was elevated to the Politburo in 2012, becoming one of the youngest members of the 25-member grouping which ranks just below the PSC. Known as "little Hu", the Guangdong boss is reportedly backed by former Chinese leader, Hu Jintao. He is part of the so-called "sixth generation" of leaders born in the 1960s and, along with Chen Min'er, is regarded as a potential successor to Mr Xi, independent Hong Kong media report. Li Zhanshu is the director of the General Office of the Communist Party's Central Committee and, as the top presidential aide, handles Mr Xi's daily activities. The 67-year-old often accompanies Mr Xi on domestic and foreign tours, the latest being the Chinese leader's state visit to Russia in July. Mr Li is said to be a skilled administrator, having held regional posts in Hebei and Shaanxi province. He was elevated to the Politburo in 2012. He is also said to be Mr Xi's most powerful ally after anti-corruption chief Wang Qishan, and has been a close friend of the president since the early 1980s. Wang Huning is the Director of the Central Policy Research Office and, like Li Zhanshu, is part of Mr Xi's entourage during overseas visits. The 61-year-old former Fudan University scholar has extensive policymaking experience, having advised former presidents Jiang Zemin and Hu Jintao. Said to be Mr Xi's top foreign policy aide, he has been labelled "China's Kissinger" by South Korean daily The Hankyoreh. Independent Hong Kong daily Ming Pao says that Mr Wang has a good chance of joining the PSC as he is close to Xi, although it adds: "He is a low-key person and it is said that he is not interested in getting promoted." Wang Yang is currently one of four vice-premiers in the existing government and is a two-term Politburo member. The veteran politician was previously the party chief of Guangdong province from 2007 to 2012, and is a key figure behind Mr Xi's ambitious Belt and Road Initiative. Like Hu Chunhua, Mr Wang comes from the "Youth League faction" of the party, and is seen as one of the top contestants for a PSC seat, Hong Kong media note. There are also growing indications that Mr Wang could replace Li Keqiang as the premier, in what would be a break from the two-term tradition for China's top leaders. Mr Han is currently a member of the political bureau of the party's high-ranking Central Committee, and served as the mayor and deputy party secretary of Shanghai previously. Some believe he may replace Wang Qishan as the head of the powerful anti-corruption body the Central Commission for Discipline Inspection. If he is promoted, it would "prove that persistence pays off, with the 63-year-old not even counted among potential dark horses a decade ago when political analysts were compiling lists of rising political stars on the mainland", the South China Morning Post says. Shanghai has been the launch pad for several former leaders, including Mr Xi, who served as the city's party chief before joining the PSC in 2007. All these men may be jostling for limited spaces - a number of media sources report that Mr Xi may cut down the size of the PSC from the current seven members to five. BBC Monitoring reports and analyses news from TV, radio, web and print media around the world. You can follow BBC Monitoring on Twitter and Facebook.
It is 45 years since Clive Sullivan led the nation to Rugby League World Cup victory. On the day the 2017 tournament kicks off, BBC News looks at how the first black player to captain a national British sporting team helped break down barriers. When the 18-year-old Welsh winger joined Hull FC in 1961, there were very few black men in prominent sporting positions. But scoring a hat-trick in a trial game with the team certainly put Sullivan on the map and he signed a contract the following day. So began a career that 11 years later, in 1972, would see him raise the Rugby League World Cup trophy as Great Britain captain - the last occasion the trophy was won by any nation other than Australia or New Zealand. "Sullivan's appointment [as captain] was extraordinary for the time," said Martin Polley, director of the International Centre for Sports History and Culture at De Montfort University. "A few professional football teams had black players by this time, like Clyde Best at West Ham. "But the England football team were six years away from even picking a black player for the senior team. "There were some exceptions in boxing and cricket, but not many had made it through." James Oddy, author of a new biography on Sullivan, described him as a "pioneer in the social history of British sport". "Clive did a lot for how society judged black athletes, he blazed a trail. "One of his heroes was Muhammad Ali and perhaps that meant he was more aware than you might have thought about his role. "Above all, he was a true professional." Yet Sullivan's success did not bring national attention. After the team won the World Cup in France, it was a low-key return. With £50 in his pocket for winning the tournament - about £600 in today's money - he went back to work at an aircraft factory in Brough, though he did take the trophy in for workmates to see. "When Clive came home with the team there were no reporters waiting at the airport to greet them," remembered his wife, Rosalyn Sullivan. "They slipped back into normal lives." The team's return was something of a "damp squib", according to Mr Oddy. But the absence of the red-carpet treatment might be down to the fact most rugby league players at the time were "just ordinary working men". They played professionally on a part-time basis and worked alongside training and playing. Sullivan himself worked in several factories, a building society and managed a sports trophy shop. His impact on the sport, however, would be lasting - breaking down barriers in rugby league and in his adopted city of Hull where he had an impact on the "colour thing", Mrs Sullivan said. She said when racism was directed at the young couple, they dismissed it as ignorance and "the way of the world". "Comments were made behind our backs but Clive dealt with it in his own way. "He was very comfortable in his own skin and was very proud of being black and being Welsh. "He [made] people understand he was just a person like anyone else. He was very humble." Johnny Whitely, who made more than 400 appearances for Hull FC, credits Sullivan with unifying a city split by the river and its two rugby league sides. "He would have been a modern sporting superstar, I am sure of it," he said. "Being black he would also perhaps have had that much publicity as a role model too, as he had such a gentlemanly attitude in life." Sullivan, who played with distinction for both Hull FC and Hull KR, also had an influence on the next generation of black rugby league players. Henderson Gill, who played rugby league for Wigan and Great Britain during the 1980s, described Sullivan as the "son of Hull". "Clive was one of the guys that paved the way for players like me. He was one of my heroes." During Sullivan's 20-year career, a growing number of black role models also started to feature in other sports, including John Conteh and Neville Mead in boxing, Sonia Lannaman and Tessa Sanderson in athletics, and numerous football players at West Bromwich Albion, said Prof Polley. "On the down side, there was also more blatant racism - manifested most obviously in terrace chants and banana-throwing at some football grounds," he added. Of course discrimination has long been part of sporting life, said Dr Katy Sian, lecturer in sociology at the University of York. During Sullivan's career, perhaps the most high-profile stand against discrimination was staged by the US athletes Tommie Smith and John Carlos with their "Black Power" salute at the medal ceremony for the men's 200m at the 1968 Mexico Olympics. "It is often said that politics and sport shouldn't be mixed," Dr Sian said, but examples such as this "show us the politicised nature of sport". "This form of resistance continues today, for example NFL players campaigning to "take a knee". "[But] outshining in a sport can be another key way to disrupt the wider politics of racism, by bringing into question ideas about nation, identity and belonging. "Think of Mo Farah, Usain Bolt and Muhammad Ali - that is incredibly inspiring for people of colour to see sports players rising to the top." Sullivan was not a household name in the way his successors have become. But he was not entirely ignored by the establishment. He was appointed MBE for services to rugby league and even featured on the high-rating TV series This is Your Life after the 1972 World Cup victory. In 1980, he won the Challenge Cup with Hull KR, then again with Hull FC in 1982, finally retiring in 1985 to take over a social club with his wife. But within months he was diagnosed with liver cancer and he died in October the same year, aged 42. At his funeral, crowds lined the streets outside Hull Minster and thousands of pounds were raised for cancer research in his name, Mr Oddy said. In his honour, the main road into Hull from the west was named Clive Sullivan Way and the sign bearing his name is still one of the first things visitors see on the approach to the city. "I don't think he appreciated how good he was. People liked him as a person not just a rugby player," his wife said. "I'm sad he did so much and yet never really made a really good living from the game - it was all done for love."
The suspension of Sepanta Niknam, an Iranian Zoroastrian councillor suspended on religious grounds, has polarised opinion among senior officials of the Islamic Republic and led to a campaign on social media calling for him to be reinstated. #Sepanta_Niknam has been used more than 8,100 times on Twitter since the decision by a senior court ruling Niknam could not take his seat in Yazd, a Muslim majority city, despite winning election earlier this year. Niknam is one of approximately 25,000 Zoroastrians living in Iran, a predominantly Shia Muslim country of 80 million residents, while Yazd is home to Iran's second-largest Zoroastrian community, after Tehran. Some critics of his suspension pointed out the Iranian constitution recognises Zoroastrianism as a legal faith and allows Iranian Zoroastrians, Jews, Christians, Assyrians, Chaldeans and Armenians to each elect one MP to the national parliament. You may also like: Niknam was elected, with more than 21,000 votes, for a second successive term in May as one of the 11 members of the Yazd City Council. A complaint was lodged by a losing conservative candidate in September on the grounds of Niknam's religion, arguing it was not in keeping with Iran's constitution for a member of a religious minority to make decisions on behalf of the whole population of a majority-Muslim city. Iran's Administrative Court suspended Mr Niknam and refereed the matter to the Guardian Council, the country's powerful election watchdog, who agreed with the suspension. One Guardian Council cleric told reporters the verdict was "definite". However, Ali Larijani, the speaker of Iran's parliament, said Mr Niknam's suspension was "illegal," promising to pursue the case. Esfandiar Ekhtiari, a Zoroastrian MP, said the decision could "set a precedent", affecting "all future elections". In a video widely shared on social media, Gholamali Sefid, chairman of the Yazd City Council, said he would not "execute this decision," and "if this verdict becomes permanent, someone else must replace me to uphold it." Venus Ameri, a fellow member of the Council, posted a photo on Instagram of her colleague's empty chair during an official session, adding: "The empty seat of 21,717 votes in today's session of the city council." Mehdi Hajati, a member of the Shiraz City Council, posted a video on Twitter of his speech in defence of Mr Niknam, saying the court ruling "if allowed to stand, will be a mockery of Iran's constitutional and ordinary laws, and will imperil any election in the future." Mehdi Moghaddari, a councillor from Isfahan, also raised his concern on Twitter. "I believe I should do to others as I would have them do to me," he tweeted. A number of users pointed to stark differences in the treatment of religious minorities in other parts of the world, with some citing London Mayor Sadiq Khan. Sadegh Zibakalam, a well-known university lecturer and reformist commentator, tweeted: "A faithful Muslim is the mayor of London while in Yazd, Sepanta Niknam has been expelled from the city council because he is a Zoroastrian. They are non-religious while we are worshippers of God." A letter to Speaker Larijani, signed by four MPs representing the province of Yazd, was also shared by users. In it, the MPs argued against "any discrimination and inequality against Iranians from every creed, race or religion". One user questioned whether religious minorities should refrain from defending their country in war on religious grounds: "What does it mean for a Zoroastrian to defend their majority Muslim country?" Mohammad Ali Abtahi, a reformist cleric and former vice-president, shared a photo on Instagram of a gathering of several high-profile clerics - including former President Mohammad Khatami- saying all those in the meeting had expressed "serious regret" over Mr Niknam's suspension. "The Islamic Republic's constitution is clear in recognising the rights of religious minorities," he added. Reacting to his suspension, Mr Niknam said he was the "real winner" and had "become more popular and better-known". "I hope those in charge look at the broader picture and genuinely respect the public's vote, as they claim to," he added. Despite this, Mr Niknam remains suspended.
A spoof government notice hit social media as soon as President Robert Mugabe announced he had set up a new ministry responsible for Cyber Security, Threat Detection and Mitigation. Zimbabweans reacted with customary humour to the letter, which faked the signature and letterhead of the newly appointed cyber minister - Patrick Chinamasa - and instructed all WhatsApp group members to register with the ministry by November. The letter was signed "By The Cyber Powers Vested In Me". But the jokes have since subsided, and Zimbabweans are now considering what the new ministry will mean for their civil liberties - especially freedom of speech. Zimbabwe's government has been uneasy about social media after pastor Evan Mawararire spearheaded the #ThisFlag movement last year. Using platforms like Twitter and Facebook it organised a stay-at-home demonstration, the biggest anti-government protest in a decade. President Robert Mugabe's spokesperson, George Charamba, says Mr Mugabe came up with the idea of a new ministry to deal with an "emerging threat to the state... a threat founded on abuse and unlawful conduct". Social media is possibly the primary platform Zimbabweans use to communicate and receive news. It is thriving despite restrictive laws governing freedom of expression. Over the last 16 years, internet usage in the country has grown from 0.3% penetration to 46%, data from the International Telecommunications Union (ITU) shows. Several TV stations and online publications, some operating from the diaspora, use the internet to disseminate news out of the reach of the government. When petrol stations ran out of fuel last month, there were dramatic scenes of long queues at supermarket as Zimbabweans stocked up, anticipating food shortages. Worried by these events, the government blamed social media messages for spreading panic. "Social media was abused to create a sense of panic, thereby creating some sort of destabilising in the economy," says Mr Charamba. The new cyber security minister, Mr Chinamasa, agrees. He commented at the time, before his appointment, that "the cause basically was social media". "It means it's a security issue," he adds. "It is also a political agenda, a regime change agenda. We are going to look at what exactly happened with a view to take corrective measures in the security arena." But others say the government's stance is a threat to civil liberties. One communications rights group, the Zimbabwe chapter of the Media Institute for Southern Africa (Misa), says this new scrutiny of social media goes against the spirit of the constitution and freedom of expression. "These unfortunate threats have resulted in self-censorship by [individuals] when engaging on topical issues affecting the country," it said in a statement. It also criticises censorship of Zimbabwe's media, "who have on occasion been chastised for incorporating citizen opinion as expressed online in their reportage". Going a step further, Zimbabwe's opposition Movement for Democratic Change (MDC) says the government's new cyber threat ministry is a means for government to spy on its people. MDC leader Morgan Tsvangirai also believes that the ministry has been created to curb free speech in time for the 2018 polls. "Mugabe... will do whatever it takes to control and muzzle social media in order to suppress public discontent against his regime," he said. "However the good news is that the regime has no capacity to suppress the use of social media." Many Zimbabweans have reacted wryly to the news of the creation of a cyber minister, referring to Mr Chinamasa as the "Minister of WhatsApp". When you go from Minister of Finance to national whatsapp admin. pic.twitter.com/9gfyBBNw82 End of Twitter post by @CynicHarare Now who did this 😂😂😂, Zimbos have no chill.#Zimbabwe's new minister of Cyber Security, Threat Detection and Mitigation. pic.twitter.com/AhpKB1Do9o End of Twitter post by @ReaganMashavave Some say the ridicule shows a lack of understanding about the global threat of cyber crime. 2/2 Cyber crime is real in #Zimbabwe so Govt has to protect Critical Information Infrastructures. End of Twitter post by @Letty_Mabhena Others see a link between the government's scrutiny of online communication and the forthcoming elections. #Zimbabwe's new Ministry of Cyber Security, Threat Detection and Mitigation is an ominous sign for internet freedom as elections approach. pic.twitter.com/SftvqgH8JM End of Twitter post by @DougColtart Zimbabwe already has several pieces of legislation which rights groups say curb freedom of expression. Zimbabwe Lawyers for Human Rights says that since 2010, it has assisted more than 100 people arrested under a law which makes it a jailable offence to "insult the president" and "undermine his authority". Ordinary people have been arrested and charged for calling the 93-year-old leader "old", "a donkey" and even for accusing him of ruining the country. The Zimbabwean government has said new legislation will not stifle freedom of expression and will protect the public from new threats such as revenge pornography and cyber attacks. Presidential spokesperson Mr Charamba says Zimbabwe will look closely at how other nations have dealt with the threat of cybercrime - including Russia, China, and South Korea "who have faced similar challenges". While several countries around the world have anti-cyber crime departments and agencies, Zimbabwe is among the first to create an entire ministry. Meanwhile on social media, ominous warnings have begun circulating. One is from a "Mr Chaipa", urging Zimbabweans only to share content on social media that they would be able to defend in court. Mr Chaipa said it was easy for the government to monitor online messages, and gave a list of online activities that could be classified as criminal offences. "In the coming months a lot of people will be arrested and used as examples to deter people from 'abusing' social media towards the elections," he warns. "Don't be made an example."
The claim: Nicola Sturgeon told her party conference that the Scottish government's commitment to early years education and childcare was "unmatched anywhere else in the UK" as she fleshed out plans to expand childcare provision. Reality Check verdict: Overall, Scotland's planned childcare provision would be the most generous in the UK, as it plans to offer 1,140 hours a year, regardless of whether parents are in work. However, a pilot scheme under way in Wales is better for working parents as it offers 1,440 hours a year. When Nicola Sturgeon took to the stage at the SNP conference, she said she was committed to giving children in Scotland "the best possible start in life". She confirmed that the Scottish government would increase its offer of free childcare from 16 hours a week to 30 hours for three- and four-year-olds, as well as vulnerable two-year-olds, by 2020. And she pledged to double investment in early years education and childcare, from £420m to £840m a year, by the end of the current parliament. "This is a commitment unmatched anywhere else in the UK," she said. "And it's the best investment we can make in Scotland's future." The first minister's office confirmed that what she meant was that the universality of care offered to children north of the border would be better than that provided in England, Wales and Northern Ireland. Reality Check has looked into the claims. Parents of three- and four-year-olds and vulnerable two-year-olds in Scotland are currently offered 600 hours of free childcare a year. It works out at roughly 16 hours a week over 38 weeks of the year but families can choose to spread the hours over a longer period. The Scottish government wants to increase annual childcare provision to 1,140 hours by 2020. Funded childcare is currently offered to all families in Scotland - regardless of the employment status of their parents. That is where Nicola Sturgeon's plans differ from those in practice across the rest of the UK. All families in England are currently offered 570 free hours a year. However, where both parents (or one in single-parent families) work more than 16 hours a week, they are entitled to 1,140 hours a year. In Wales, a pilot scheme is under way where working families in seven authorities are offered 1,440 hours of childcare a year. That works out at 30 hours a week over 48 weeks. As in England, it is available only to families where both parents (or one in a single-parent family) work more than 16 hours a week. Every child in Wales is eligible for 10 hours of early years education a week, from the term after their third birthday. That is incorporated into the 30 free hours in the pilot areas. Families in Northern Ireland can access between 12.5 and 22.5 hours of funded pre-school education a week over 38 weeks for all three- and four-year-olds. One of the key actions of the NI executive's draft programme for government was to "extend responsive, high-quality provision in early childhood education and care" for families with young children. However, Northern Ireland has been without an executive for 10 months, following a row between the DUP and Sinn Fein. The parties are in discussions to restore the government. Read more from Reality Check Follow us on Twitter
1. باستخدامكم bbcarabic.com تصبحون ملزمين أمام القانون بهذه الشروط، والتي سيبدأ تطبيقها فور استخدامكم لـ bbcarabic.com. في حال عدم موافقتكم على أن تكونوا ملزمين قانونيا بالشروط التالية، يرجي عدم استخدام/تصفح bbcarabic.com. 2. يمكن لـ BBC تغيير هذه الشروط بالتنويه عنها على الانترنت. يرجى مراجعة هذه الشروط بانتظام لضمان معرفتكم لأي تغيرات قد تجريها BBC. استمرار استخدامكم لـ bbcarabic.com بعد نشر التغييرات يعني أنكم توافقون على أن تكونوا ملزمين أمام القانون بهذه الشروط بعد تحديثها و/ أو تعديلها. 3. لا يسمح لكم بنسخ محتوى bbcarabic.com أو إعادة نشره أو تحميله أو بثه أو نشره أو إتاحته للجماهير أو استخدام محتواه بأي صورة أخرى بخلاف الاستخدام الشخصي غير التجاري. يجب عدم تعديل أو تغيير أو إنتاج أعمال مبنية عن محتوى bbcarabic.com إلا إذا كان ذلك لاستخدامكم الشخصي غير التجاري. أي استخدام آخر لمحتوى bbcarabic.com يستلزم وجود تصريح كتابي مسبق من BBC. 4. يجب استخدام bbcarabic.com لأغراض يصرح بها القانون وبأسلوب لا يتعدى على حقوق أي فرد في استخدام أو الاستمتاع بمحتوى bbcarabic.com أو يحد من هذه الحقوق أو يمنعها. السلوك غير المسموح به يشمل التحرش بأي فرد أو إيذاءه ونشر المحتوى المسيء أو البذيء أو المخل بالتدفق الطبيعي للحوار في bbcarabic.com. 5. محتوى bbcarabic.com بما في ذلك المعلومات والأسماء والصور والشعارات الخاصة بـ BBC أو BBC Worldwide أو المتعلقة بهذا المحتوى متوفرة على أساس تقديمها "وفقا لما هي عليه" أو "وفقا لتوافرها" بدون أي تمثيل أو تقديم أي ضمانات (سواء كان القانون ينص عليها أو يتضمنها)، وذلك في حدود ما يسمح به القانون، بما في ذلك الضمانات المفهومة ضمنا مثل النوعية الجيدة وملاءمة الغرض وعدم التعدي والأمن والدقة. 6. لن تكون BBC أو BBC Worldwide Limited مسؤولة عن أي نوع من أنواع الخسائر أو الأضرار التالية (سواء كانت هذه الخسائر متوقعة أو يمكن توقعها أو معلومة أو غير ذلك): (أ) فقد البيانات - (ب) فقد العائدات أو الأرباح المتوقعة - (ج) خسارة الأعمال - (د) فقدان الفرص - (هـ) الإضرار بالسمعة - (و) خسائر الطرف الثالث - (ي) أي أضرار غير مباشرة قد تنجم عن استخدام bbcarabic.com. 7. لا تضمن BBC عدم انقطاع الخدمات المتضمنة في bbcarabic.com أو خلوها من الخطأ أو أن العيوب سيتم إصلاحها أو خلو شبكة تقديم خدمة الانترنت (server) من الفيروسات. 8. تخضع الأسماء والصور والشعارات التي تدل على BBC و BBC Worldwide و/أو أي طرف ثالث لحقوق النشر وحقوق التصميم والعلامات التجارية للـ BBC أو BBC Worldwide و/أو أي طرف ثالث. لا يجب فهم أي مما تتضمنه هذه الشروط على أنه يخولكم استخدام العلامة التجارية أو حقوق التصميم أو حقوق النشر الخاصة بـ BBC و BBC Worldwide Limited أو أي طرف ثالث. 9. عندما تدعون لتقديم مساهمات إلى bbcarabic.com (بما في ذلك النصوص والصور والرسوم التوضيحية والتسجيلات المصورة أو الصوتية) فإنكم توافقون، عبر تقديم مساهماتكم، على منح BBC الحق الدائم غير الملزم بدفع قيمة حقوق النشر والتصريح لـ BBC بمنح ونسخ وتعديل وترجمة وتوزيع وأداء وعرض مساهماتكم وإنتاجها للجمهور في شتى بقاع العالم أو دمج مساهماتكم في أعمال أخرى في أي وسيلة إعلامية معروفة الآن أو يتم تطويرها لاحقا طوال المدة الكاملة لأي حقوق قد توجد لمساهماتكم ووفقا لقيود الخصوصية الموضحة في Privacy Policy الخاصة بـ BBC. إذا كنتم لا تعتزمون منح BBC الحقوق الموضحة أعلاه، يرجي عدم إرسال مسهماتكم إلى bbcarabic.com. 10. إلحاقا بالفقرة التاسعة، فإنكم تقرون بأنكم: 10؛1 تضمنون أن مساهماتكم: 10؛1؛1 من إنتاجكم الأصلي وأن لديكم الحق لإتاحتها لـ BBC لجميع الأغراض الموضحة أعلاه. 10؛1؛2 ليست مسيئة 10؛1؛3 لا تخرق أية قوانين 10؛2 تعفي BBC من أي رسوم قانونية وأي تعويضات وأي مصاريف قد تتعرض لها BBC نتيجة لخرقكم للضمان السابق. 10؛3 التخلي عن أي حقوق أخلاقية إزاء مساهماتكم فيما يتعلق بتقديمها ونشرها على bbcarabic.com والأغراض الموضحة أعلاه. قواعد bbcarabic.com 11. توافقون على استخدام bbcarabic.com ، بما في ذلك الرسائل وفقا للقواعد التالية، وهذه القواعد تنطبق على جميع مواقع وخدامات BBC، ولكن يرجى مراجعة قواعد كل موقع لاحتمال وجود بعض الاختلافات. يجب أن تكون مساهماتكم مهذبة ولا تخدش الذوق العام. يجب عدم انتهاج سلوك مسيء أو مثير للقلق: يجب أن تكون مساهماتكم بناءة ومهذبة، ولا يجب أن يكون الهدف منها إثارة المتاعب. يجب ألا تحتوي مساهماتكم على محتوى غير قانوني: لا تُقبل أي مساهمات غير قانونية أو مسيئة أو تحوي تهديدا أو مؤذية أو ذات مغزى جنسي أو تسيء إلى عرق من الأعراق أو أن تكون غير مقبولة بأي صورة أخرى. إذا استخدم أكثر من login بغرض إزعاج المستخدمين الآخرين ومضايقتهم، قد تتخذ إجراءات ضد اشتراككم. كن صبورا: يشارك مستخدمون من شتى الأعمار والقدرات في bbcarabic.com لا يسمح بإرسال رسائل لا ضرورة لها أو مواد لا صلة لها بموضوع النقاش: لا نسمح بتقديم المساهمة ذاتها أكثر من مرة واحدة. يرجى عدم إعادة تقديم مساهمتكم في أكثر من مناقشة واحدة وعدم تقديم مشاركات تبتعد عن الموضوع في المناقشات محددة الموضوع. يمنع انتحال شخصيات الآخرين لا يجب استخدام usernames مسيئة أو نابية لا يجب أن تشير إلى عناوين مواقع أخرى إلا إذا سمح بذلك. إذا كنتم تعرفون موقعا له أهمية في المناقشة، يرجى إبلاغ المسؤول في الموقع. ننصح بألا تكشفوا النقاب عن أي معلومات شخصية خاصة بكم أو غيركم (مثل أرقام الهاتف، عنوان المنزل أو عنوان البريد الالكتروني). كما يجب عدم إرسال أي عنوان بريدي. إذا كان لديكم عنوان مفيد تريدون مشاركته مع الآخرين، يرجى إبلاغ المسؤولين في الموقع عن طريق contact us وهم سيعلنون عنه إذا رأوه مجديا. لا يسمح لكم بتقديم أي معلومات مسيئة للسمعة أو غير قانونية بأي صورة من الصور إلى bbcarabic.com ، ويشمل ذلك النصوص والصور والبرامج والتسجيلات المصورة أو الصوتية. يمنع تماما تقديم أي مواد تهدف إلى ارتكاب أو التحريض على أعمال غير قانونية. يجب عدم انتهاك حقوق الطرف الثالث أو التعدي عليها، وتشمل هذه الحقوق حقوق النشر والعلامة التجارية والأسرار المهنية والخصوصية والدعاية وحقوق الملكية. الآراء المنشورة في bbcarabic.com هي آراء المشاركين ولا تعبر بالضرورة عن رأي BBC. يرجى الحصول على موافقة أي من الوالدين أو الوصي قبل مشاركتكم في أي من مناقشات bbcarabic.com. لا يجب نشر أي معلومات شخصية عن نفسك أو عن الآخرين (مثل رقم الهاتف أو عنوان المنزل أو عنوان البريد الالكتروني). إذا أخفقتم في الالتزام بقواعد المشاركة في bbcarabic.com ، سيتم إرسال رسالة بالبريد إلكتروني إليكم عن سبب عدم نشر مشاركتكم. ستشمل الرسالة أيضا تحذيرا بأن الاستمرار في خرق القواعد قد ينجم عنه اتخاذ اجراء ضد الـ account الخاص بكم. تشمل هذه الإجراءات إخضاع الـ account للمتابعة أو الإيقاف المؤقت أو الدائم لإمكانية مشاركتكم في bbcarabic.com . إذا أرسلتم مشاركات مسيئة أو غير لائقة وإذا اعتبرت BBC مثل هذا السلوك خطيرا أو متكررا، فإن لـ BBC الحق في استخدام المعلومات المتوافرة لديها عنكم لمنع أي تعديات لاحقة. وقد يشمل ذلك إبلاغ أي طرف ثالث مثل جهة العمل أو المدرسة أو مزود خدمات البريد الالكتروني عن الأمر. تحتفظ BBC بالحق في إلغاء أو حذف أي مساهمة أو اتخاذ إجراءات ضد أي account في أي وقت لأي سبب. 12. في حالة وجود تضارب بين هذه الشروط وأي شروط أخرى على bbcarabic.com، سيتم العمل بالشروط الأحدث تاريخا. 13. إذا تقرر عدم قانونية أي من هذه الشروط أو ثبت عدم قانونيتها أو عدم إمكانية تطبيقها بسبب قوانين أي دولة، سيتم حذف الفقرات غير القانونية و ستبقى الفقرات الأخرى سارية المفعول. 14. يتم تفسير هذه الشروط وفقا لشروط قانون انجلترا وويلز. شروط وبنود الاستخدام استخدام ناقل اخبار البي بي سي لعرض المواد المنشورة على موقع بي بي سي يعني موافقتك على الشروط التالية: برامج بي بي سي 1. الترخيص 1-1 تمنحك بي بي سي حقا غير حصري لاستخدام برامج الكمبيوتر والهاتف المحمول التي نعرضها على مواقعنا بهدف نقل مواد بي بي سي. 1-2 تحتفظ بي بي سي بكافة حقوق الملكية الفكرية لهذه البرامج، وكافة المواد المنشورة التي تظل جميعها ملكا لبي بي سي. 2- استخدام برامج بي بي سي 2-2 تتم الاستفادة هذه البرامج بغرض الاستخدام الشخصي، وليس التجاري. 2-3 لا يمكنك نسخ او تعديل او اعادة نشر او اضافة اي شيء الى المواد التي تقدمها بي بي سي، ولا يمكنك مزج محتوى المواد المقدمة من بي بي سي مع اي مواد اخرى. 2-4 لا يمكنك نسخ او توزيع او تعديل هذه البرامج او تغيير في مكوناتها باي صورة. مسؤولية الاستخدام 3-1يقوم المستخدم بتنزيل هذه الاداة والموضوعات على مسؤوليته الخاصة. 3-2 تهتم بي بي سي بالا تتضمن الاداة او الموضوعات المتاحة على موقعها اي اخطاء او او معلومات غير دقيقة او فيروسات، لكن لا تضمن البي بي سي عدم حدوث ذلك. 3-3لا تتحمل البي بي سي مسؤولية اي خسارة او اضرار نتيجة استخدام ناقل اخبار البي بي سي ونشر تقاريرها، او مرتبطة بهذا الاستخدام. 3-4 ننصحك باستخدام كافة الاحتياطات لحماية جهاز الكمبيوتر الخاص بك من اي فيروسات. 3-5 من حق البي بي سي وقف استخدام هذه الاداة او تغيير الموضوعات المنشورة على موقعها او منع عرضها اذا انتهك اي مستخدم شروط وبنود الاستخدام.
ولې د بي بي سي په دغې ویبپاڼې کې اعلانونه خپروئ؟ د خپل ژورنالیزم د ملاتړپه خاطراود بي بي سي د بودیجې برابرونکو وګړوچې د ټلویزیون څخه دکاراخیستولپاره فیس ورکوي دبار دکمولوپه خاطر،بي بي سي، دحکومت د لارښونوسره سم، منلې ده چې نړیواله څانګه باید په خپلوځینوخپرونوکې محدود تجارتي فعالیت وکړي.په اوسني وخت کې دیوشمیرژبوپه ویبپاڼوکې اعلانونه خپریږي او د برلین په محلي اف ایم کې هم شته دي. زه په بریتانیا کې یم خو د بي بي سي په ویبپاڼوکې اعلانونه لیدلاې شم. ولې داسې ده؟ موږ زیارباسوچې یواځې له بریتانیا نه بهرخلک زموږ اعلانونه ولیداې شي، اوددې لپار د پرمختللې تکنالوجي څخه کاراخلو. خو، که تاسو په بریتانیا کې دننه دبي بي سي ویبپاڼې ګورئ او پکې اعلانونه وینئ، نولطفا هرڅومره ژر چې کولاې شئ موږ ته د بریښنالیک له لارې خبر راکړئ. د اعلانونوپه اړه د پوښتنو په هکله بي بي سي سره څرنګه تماس نیولاې شم؟ د بي بي سي د اعلانونو په اړه نور معلومات پدې لاندینیو پتوکې موندلاې شئ: pashtoonline@bbc.co.uk آیا بي بي سي سره د اعلانونو خپرولوکې دلچسپي لرئ؟ د نورو معلوماتولپاره دا ځاې کیکاګئ( په انګریزي) موږ څرنګه تصمیم نیسوچې زموږ پر ویبپاڼو کوم اعلانونه ووینئ؟ د نورو معلوماتولپاره دا ځاې کییکاګئ:(په انګریزي)
Everyone knows that too much sun is bad for them, but it's not just people who need to worry about sunburn. Too much heat is becoming a big problem for South African apple farmers. "If just 10% of the fruit in your package has sunburn, it automatically becomes a third-grade fruit," says Andre Cloete, Managing Director of Klein Ezeljacht farm, "you can send it to the pack house, but you won't get any money for it." Typically this fruit ends up being juiced, the least profitable result for a farmer. Mr Cloete estimates that about a fifth of his traditional red apples have been downgraded this year due to sunburn, while for his green granny apples it's much higher at 60%. There's nothing wrong with the taste of these apples. In fact, a sunburnt apple typically tastes sweeter because the sun increases the sugar, and gives the fruit a stronger flavour. The problem is the apples' appearance. In the same way that supermarkets often reject wonky vegetables on aesthetics alone, the apples' unappealing appearance means they are unlikely to sell and are therefore rejected by wholesalers. To solve the issue, Mr Cloete has invested in extra netting and irrigation, but it's not cheap. He estimates protecting the fruit properly can increase costs by as much as half. Nonetheless, he believes it's a price worth paying particularly because he expects climate change to exacerbate the issue. "Sunburn is a big problem and it'll become a bigger problem in future so you have to adapt and you have to choose varieties more suitable to the conditions so you get less sunburn," he says. He says it's a particular concern for farmers in the Elgin Valley area, which is one of the country's largest apple producing regions. Like most South African farmers, Mr Cloete sends about half of the apples he produces overseas. Apples have long been one of the country's top agricultural exports, and fruit from local orchards is exported to over a hundred countries including the United Kingdom, Saudi Arabia and Germany. Africa's largest apple exporter Tru-Cape currently sends its fruit to 104 countries, but is mainly focused on South East Asian countries such as Malaysia, Singapore and Taiwan, as well as the Middle East. But meeting the often very exacting requirements of overseas buyers can be tough. "Most customers buy with their eyes first," he says. In Africa, he says that buyers want a "green coloured golden delicious rather than a yellow-coloured one". In contrast, in China and the Far East they prefer a bigger, red full coloured fruit which crucially has to be blemish free. The different markets also have different size requirements. "In general, the Chinese market demands larger fruit," he says. This of course increases the costs of transporting them, meaning if they're subsequently rejected on arrival it can be an expensive mistake. "It's a high risk market, if the quality is not right," he says. Nonetheless, Mr Pienaar says the firm is now exploring "ad hoc opportunities" in the country. "It can be a very lucrative market if you get the quality and timing right. We are cautiously optimistic about developing trade once export protocols are in place." This kind of expansion into new markets is crucial for the firm which currently sells around half of its produce to local markets. More stories from the BBC's global trade series looking at trade from an international perspective: How the 'better burger' is taking over the world What it takes to get Beyonce on a world tour The country losing out in the breakfast juice battle Why a $1.6bn car plant has been left to decay 'You don't have to be a squillionaire to buy art' How Scottish salmon conquered the world Read more global trade series here. The fall in the price of oil - which has more than halved over the past three years - has made such sales tougher because countries simply have less cash to pay for it, says Mr Pienaar. But economic factors which are harder to mitigate against are also impacting South African exports. The weakness South Africa's rand currency against the US dollar has helped the apple industry by making their produce comparative cheaper to many overseas buyers. But now the rand is strengthening, reversing this advantage. Mr Pienaar says that as well as putting pressure on the amount of profit farmers are able to make, it also makes it tougher for them to reinvest. "We need to get used to the uncertainty, it may be the new norm going forward," he says. It's not just economic factors making it tough for apple farmers. The majority of South Africa's apples are cultivated in the country's Western Cape province, which is currently in the grip of a drought. Professor Wiehann Steyn, crop production manger at fruit industry body Hortgro says this kind of drought is expected to become more frequent with "serious implications" for fruit farmers. "Young trees grow less and mature trees carry fewer and smaller fruit. Fruit quality is also reduced," he says. It's a fear echoed by conservation organisation The World Wildlife Fund, which says climate change could also lead to outbreaks of pests and diseases. "The increasingly strict non-tariff barriers to exporting apples, including checking the health of export fruits could represent a significant risk to the industry," it warned in a recent report. Yet, despite the economic and climatic challenges, the South African industry has been performing well over the past few years. Between 2006 and 2014, production rocketed by a healthy 41% thanks largely to technology developments which helped improve the number of apples produced by a each tree. Farmers have also started to trial newer varieties of apples which are more suited to changing, and warmer, conditions - an experiment which has helped boost the number of apples produced per tree. The report concludes that while climate change will add an element of uncertainty, projected increases in local and global demand will mean, "future apple production in South Africa is expected to grow gradually and keep its position as an important export product". Mr Cloete says he is also optimistic about the future. "You have to farm smarter, and you have to adapt for it… we can definitely overcome the obstacles that we're facing now."
So it's come down to money. Who would have thought it? After five rounds of negotiations on Brexit, the EU remains insistent: there will be no discussions with the UK on a transition period, or on future relations, until financial commitments have been clarified. So what exactly is it about the money that is proving so difficult to resolve? It comes down to the detail (or lack of it) contained in Theresa May's carefully crafted speech in Florence. Overall, the speech was greeted across the EU with a considerable sense of relief. It suggested that progress was at least possible at a time when some countries were beginning to fear the worst. The prime minister opened the door for the UK to contribute roughly €20bn (£17.9bn) to the EU budget in 2019 and 2020, so that no-one else would be out of pocket. And - crucially - she went on to say that "the UK will honour commitments we have made during the period of our membership". But EU negotiators - under clear instructions from the member states - want to know exactly what that means in practice. Looming large in the background is something called the Reste à Liquider (RAL) - EU money that has already been committed to projects in the long-term budget but has not yet been spent. The RAL is currently running at an eye-watering €239bn, which could mean a UK share of more than €30bn. Much of it is due to be spent on big infrastructure or development projects that have been delayed. There are also pensions and contingent liabilities, such as loans to other countries, to consider. The EU isn't asking for a figure to be agreed - but for a guarantee within the negotiating process, probably in writing, that "honouring commitments" means "all commitments." The UK position, on the other hand, is that the prime minister made a substantial gesture in her Florence speech, and it is in no position to move further unless it gets something in return. "They are using time pressure to get more money out of us," the Brexit Secretary David Davis told the House of Commons this week. "Bluntly, that is what's going on." It sounds like deadlock, but that's not necessarily the case. Three more rounds of negotiation have been suggested between this week's summit and another one in December. The hope is that a way will be found to move forward, even if it takes a moment of crisis to get there. "The EU27 don't believe the UK is too far off 'sufficient progress'," says Mujtaba Rahman, the managing director for Europe at the political consultancy Eurasia Group. "They want Mrs May to be able to leave Brussels with a win that will enable her to strike a deal by December." That's why both sides have said they want to accelerate the negotiating process, and prepare for discussions about the future. If the language of the current draft of the summit's conclusions doesn't change much, the EU27 will agree to begin internal discussions about a transition period and the nature of a future relationship. They won't talk directly to the UK about these issues until December at the earliest. And only then if "sufficient progress" has been made on all the "divorce" arrangements, including money. It doesn't sound like much. But it's a start, and it is seen in Brussels as a carrot for the UK negotiating team. So what might the EU be likely to decide in internal discussions over the coming weeks? For EU officials involved in the negotiating process one thing about transition is clear: the more you keep things the same, the easier it will be to agree. That's why the internal deliberations among the 27 on transition could be concluded very quickly. They will probably offer to prolong all existing EU rules and regulations (the body of law known as 'the acquis') - or, to put it another way - to extend the status quo. That means that after Brexit - for "about two years" (ie for the length of a transition period) - the UK would be outside the EU's political institutions, but inside its economic arrangements. It also means the UK would have to accept EU budget payments, EU regulations and the jurisdiction of the European Court of Justice. To put it in the formal language of the European Council's Article 50 negotiating guidelines: "Should a time-limited prolongation of Union acquis be considered, this would require existing Union regulatory, budgetary, supervisory, judiciary and enforcement instruments and structures to apply." The details of what that means are difficult for some Brexit supporters in the UK to stomach. But the prime minister, in her Florence speech, has already accepted that the framework for any transition (she prefers to call it an implementation period) would be "the existing structure of EU rules and regulations". Problems would arise, however, if the UK tried to argue for exemptions or exceptions. Take, for example, one idea that has been floated (forgive the pun): leaving the Common Fisheries Policy at the same time as the UK leaves the EU in March 2019. That doesn't really tally with the kind of transition that EU officials have in mind. Once you start unpicking the offer, all sorts of complications begin to arise. So it's not quite take it or leave it. But it's not far off. There are other potential problems with a transition period that will need to be resolved. What, for example, does it mean for trade agreements with third countries, when it makes a difference whether products (or parts of products) are manufactured in the single market or not? But agreeing upon the terms of a transition will be much easier for the EU27 than agreeing on the outline of a final deal - on everything from trade to security. The 27 member states are a little more nervous about those discussions because differences of opinion are bound to emerge between them. Many countries have obviously been thinking hard about this already. One internal German government paper has been reported here. But there is another issue that overshadows debate about Brexit in capitals across the EU - what exactly is it that the UK wants? Every change of emphasis in London adds to the confusion. As Finland's Secretary of State for Foreign Affairs, Samuli Virtanen, put it this week: "It seems that at the moment the EU 27 is more unanimous than the UK 1. And that is one of the main problems here." But it all rests on finding a compromise on money. And that really has to happen before the end of this year. Otherwise time is going to start running out. Read more from Reality Check Follow us on Twitter
The Brexit Secretary, David Davis, has suggested that Parliament might not get a vote on a Brexit deal until after March 2019. It's prompted criticism from some MPs, who are worried their votes will be meaningless because by that point, the UK will have already left the EU. Also significant is Mr Davis' claim that the European Parliament might have to wait to have its say too. According to Article 50 of the Lisbon Treaty, which the UK triggered seven months ago, the withdrawal agreement must be passed by a majority of members of the European Parliament. Even if a deal was done at "the 11th hour" as Mr Davis suggested when giving evidence to the Commons Brexit committee, it would be too late for MEPs to debate it and vote it through. So the upshot of a last-minute deal could be no deal at all. The Brexit department later clarified that Mr Davis was talking about "hypothetical scenarios" and ministers are working to reach an agreement in "good time" before March 2019. It's not entirely clear what "deal" Mr Davis was referring to. The European Union has broken down the negotiations into two parts. The first focuses on the issues associated with withdrawal, such as the rights of EU citizens, the Northern Irish border and the UK's financial obligations. The second covers what our future relationship might look like, including areas such as trade, scientific research and consumer rights. The British government says it's not possible to separate the two parts, because in many respects, they're intrinsically linked. If the "deal" that Mr Davis was talking about this morning encompasses both, it must be ratified on or before 29 March 2019, which means an agreement would need to be reached in time for that. The future relationship part could be ratified after the deadline, but only if part one is rubber-stamped before the deadline. The EU's chief negotiator, Michel Barnier, is hopeful of reaching a withdrawal agreement by autumn 2018 and the Brexit department said that was their aim as well. Technically it is possible to extend the Article 50 period, currently fixed at two years, if there's unanimous agreement from the 27 remaining member states. But that option would be a hard sell. Read more from Reality Check Follow us on Twitter
Mesmo com a possibilidade de ser impedido de concorrer por uma eventual condenação em segunda instância, Luiz Inácio Lula da Silva veste figurino de candidato. Nas suas caravanas, a disputa de 2018 já começou. Mineiro da cidade de Mariana, o jornalista e escritor Fernando Morais está acompanhando a jornada petista por seu Estado natal. Costuma viajar no mesmo ônibus do ex-presidente - um dos dois que compõem a caravana. Eleitor e entusiasta, prepara um livro biográfico sobre ele. Segundo o autor, a trama se estende dos anos 1980 até o fim da "novela" em torno da possível candidatura do petista em 2018. O livro terminará ou com o Lula candidato, ou com o Lula impedido de concorrer pela Justiça. Mas para o ex-presidente a questão parece já estar resolvida. "Eu vou disputar as eleições e vou ganhar", disse ele na noite de quarta-feira, em cima de um palco e diante de cerca de 7 mil pessoas na cidade de Araçuaí (MG), no Vale do Jequitinhonha. "E eu quero te dizer Armando (Jardim Paixão, prefeito de Araçuaí pelo PT): se prepare, porque eu sei que você já doou o terreno para o Ifet (Instituto Federal Tecnológico). E nesse terreno vai ter uma universidade aqui em Araçuaí", prometeu. Esta tem sido a tônica da viagem de Lula por Minas: carros de som com jingles (um deles repetia "É Lula de novo, com a força do povo"), bandeiras do PT e camisetas com a hashtag #Lula2018. Outros elementos mais óbvios da campanha, porém, não estão presentes. Não há cartazes com o número 13 do PT, e ele não pede votos diretamente (do tipo "vote em mim"). Isso é para evitar que a caravana seja caracterizada como propanda eleitoral antecipada. Pela legislação, é proibido pedir votos diretamente antes do período eleitoral, que começa só no segundo semestre de 2018 - quem infringir essa regra pode ser multado. Segundo o especialista em direito eleitoral Alberto Luis Rollo, na pré-campanha é permitido exaltar das qualidades do candidato e até fazer promessas, desde que não estejam vinculadas a pedidos de voto ou números da legenda. "O candidato pode dizer: 'se eu me tornar presidente' ou 'se eu me tornar governador', desde que não peça votos", explica. Antes de 2015, quando foi aprovada a lei Lei 13.165/2015, as regras de pré-campanha eram um pouco mais rígidas. "Existia uma hipocrisia, todo mundo era candidato, mas a propaganda era velada. A lei então criou a figura do pré-candidato", afirma o especialista. As últimas pesquisas de intenção de voto trazem Lula à frente da disputa para as eleições do ano que vem. No último levantamento do Instituto Datafolha, por exemplo, ele aparece com 35%, ante 17% do militar da reserva e deputado Jair Bolsonaro (PSC-RJ). Por outro lado, o petista corre o risco de ficar de fora da disputa caso o Tribunal Regional Federal (TRF) da 4ª Região, em Porto Alegre, confirme a sentença proferida pelo juiz Sergio Moro, responsável pela operação Lava Jato na primeira instância, em Curitiba. Ele se tornaria inelegível, de acordo com a Lei da Ficha Limpa. Mas no Vale do Jequitinhonha e em outras regiões de Minas onde Lula faz sua caravana, a Lava Jato parece um problema distante. "Estejam preparados. Na verdade, não são vocês que vão votar em mim, sou eu que vou votar em vocês", disse o ex-presidente. "Eu tô dizendo uma coisa para eles saberem. Eu vou fazer um referendo revogatório. Eu vou pedir autorização para o povo brasileiro para a gente desfazer todas as bandalheiras que eles fizeram contra o Brasil", acrescentou, em referência às medidas do governo Michel Temer (PMDB) - e em mais uma proposta para um futuro mandato. Lula faz campanha no Vale do Jequitinhonha pelo menos desde 1992. Em 2002, foi a Itinga como candidato a presidente, onde prometeu a construção de uma ponte ligando os dois lados da cidade. Lá, conheceu as gêmeas Raíssa e Rayanne Chaves, então com quatro anos de idade. As duas continuam morando em Itinga. "A gente correu por debaixo da corda até ele", relembra Raíssa. O então candidato pegou as duas crianças no colo. Nesta nova passagem de Lula, Raíssa e Rayanne estão com 18 anos. Foram convidadas pela equipe do ex-presidente para assistir ao breve discurso na praça da cidade e tirar fotos com ele. As gêmeas também já são mães - trouxeram os filhos Arlindo Miguel (um ano e sete meses) e Lorena (dois anos). As crianças estavam paramentadas com botons do PT. Novamente, o material não trazia o número 13. Lula chega a correr riscos em alguns momentos de sua caravana. Em Itinga, por exemplo, não havia alambrado para separar o petista da multidão. O petista anda acompanhado por agentes do Gabinete de Segurança Institucional (GSI) da Presidência da República, a que tem direito por ter exercido o cargo. No evento em Itinga, o Gabinete Militar do governo de Minas Gerais, hoje chefiado por Fernando Pimentel (PT), também enviou uma equipe. Embora Lula continue um forte candidato no país como um todo, os votos no PT despencaram nas últimas eleições na região do Jequitinhonha. O candidato do partido à Prefeitura de Itinga recebeu só 1,8% dos votos em 2016, e o do PSDB foi eleito em primeiro turno. A legenda não conseguir eleger nenhum vereador na cidade. Com colaboração de Letícia Mori, da BBC Brasil em São Paulo.
In our series of letters from African journalists, Yousra Elbagir looks at why the #MeToo hashtag was not widely used in Sudan, even though there are many cases of harassment. For a second time this year, a Sudanese diplomat in the US has dodged charges of sexual harassment. In the latest case, Hassan Salih - who works at the Sudanese mission to the United Nations - is alleged to have groped a woman's breasts and bottom in a Manhattan bar. After trying to run from officers, he was handcuffed and interrogated at the nearest police station. He was later released without charge after claiming diplomatic immunity, police sources said. More than 6,000 miles (10,000km) away in his hometown Khartoum - Sudan's capital - an investigation committee gathered to examine the incident. A foreign ministry spokesman had told the Sudan Tribune that "any accusations of violations of the code of professional conduct" were taken seriously. A letter to the committee from the head of the UN mission in New York said Mr Salih had been required to get close to the 23-year-old woman for purposes of "information gathering", a local newspaper reported. The explanation triggered outrage and ridicule from Sudanese social media users, some calling the country's mission to the UN "the adultery mission" and Mr Salih "the groping spy". Mr Salih has not commented on the allegations. Yousra Elbagir: "Sudan's rape culture is preserved by silence and stigma" The justification of the diplomat's alleged behaviour is symptomatic of a wider issue of sexual harassment by figures of authority in Sudan. Like the alleged secret abuses by the now-disgraced Hollywood producer Harvey Weinstein, Sudan's rape culture is preserved by silence and stigma. The Muslim nation's conservative society has meant that topics of a sexual nature remain deeply taboo. Many victims of sexual violence and harassment feel that discussing matters with authorities only makes them vulnerable to further violation, a fair assumption to make considering Sudanese police's penchant for sexual intimidation. In 2013, academic Hadia Hasaballah compiled a report with the anonymous testimonies of Sudanese women sexually assaulted and even raped by police forces. With accounts from food vendors to office workers, their stories cover the most heinous kinds of sexual violence to subtle forms of intimidation. One woman, from the country's southern Nuba Mountains, said she was raped by four different soldiers in one night. Another said that a police officer would sit close to her and make her say the word "sex" over and over. While their cases seem different, the deep sense of humiliation they felt was the same. The goal of the report was to break the barrier of silence and open the floor to a wider debate on the issue of oppressive public order laws which leave women vulnerable to harassment by the authorities. Ms Hasaballah told me that she initially had 54 interviewees for her report - elderly women, young women and even some young men. But - despite guarantees of anonymity - most dropped out until she was left with only 18 accounts to publish. In her opinion, the issue has only worsened and is now concentrated in Sudan's universities - where supporters of the governing party have senior positions and untouchable authority. A former student recently came to her with a plea for help. One of the senior members of a government university was harassing her to have sex with him. While she was applying for a master's degree, he would call her in and out of his office. More about #MeToo: He started ringing her at odd hours and when she did not answer, her application would be delayed. His sexual advances became more explicit. She eventually withdrew her application from the university. He was a married man with children her age. Yet she became the one carrying the shame. A close male friend she confided in had told her: "You probably gave him the opportunity." She told me that her experience was shared by many of her peers and that, ultimately, they are unprotected. Who do they complain to when these figures of authority can easily turn around and do the same thing? How can they complain when the mere mention of the word sex can be seen as an invite? The stigma of sex in Sudanese society has meant that a fear of an embarrassing "loss of virtue" often overrides the solidarity of shared experiences. While the #MeToo campaign has united women across the globe, the hashtag has not been much used by Sudanese women. Local online initiatives encouraging young women to come forward with their experiences have not gained much momentum. For many women in the country the topic remains shrouded in shame. And as predators appear to get off the hook scot-free, the barrier of silence will remain unbroken. More Letters from Africa: Follow us on Twitter @BBCAfrica, on Facebook at BBC Africa and on Instagram at bbcafrica.
යුධ සමයේ අතුරුදහන් වූ සිය ඥාතීන් සොයා දෙන මෙන් ඉල්ලමින් උතුරේ පවත්වන අඛණ්ඩ විරෝධතාවට දැන් දින 220කට වැඩිය. කිලිනොච්චිය හා මුලතිව් ප්‍රදේශවල සිය සැමියන්ගේ හෝ දරුවන්ගේ ඡායාරූප අතැතිව දිවා රෑ නොබලා ඔවුහු විරෝධතාවයේ යෙදෙමින් සිටිති. "මගේ මල්ලි 2008 දී මන්නාරමේදී අතුරුදහන් වුනා. අක්කගේ පුතා 2009 මැයි මාසේ හමුදාවට භාර දුන්නා. මගේ මහත්තයා 2009 ජනවාරි මාසේ අතුරුදහන්වුනා, තාම ඒ ගැන තොරතුරක් නැහැ." විරෝධතාවයේ යෙදී සිටින එස්. පරමේශ්වරී සිය පවුලේ ඥාතීන් ගැන බීබීසි වෙත පැවසුවේ එලෙසයි. කිලිනොච්චි නගර මධ්‍යයේ A9 මාර්ගය අසල දැනට මාස 7කට වැඩි කාලයක් පරමේශ්වරී හා සියයකට ආසන්න පිරිසක් දිවා රෑ නොබලා විරෝධතාවයේ නියැලෙමින් සිටිති. ඔවුන් පැදුරු එළා එම ස්ථානයේ නිදමින් නිහඬ විරෝධතාවයේ යෙදෙන අතර තම පුත්‍රයා සොයන එක් පියෙකු හැර එහි සිටින අනිකුත් සියලු දෙනාම පාහේ තම පුරුෂයන් සොයන බිරින්දෑවරුන් හෝ පුතුන් සොයන මවුවරුන් වෙති. පරමේශ්වරී මෙන්ම මෙහි සිටින සියලු දෙනාම තවමත් අතුරුදහන්වූ සිය ඥාතීන් ආණ්ඩුව විසින් යම් රහසිගත ස්ථානයක රඳවා තබනු ලැබ ඇති බව විශ්වාස කරති. "එයාල තවමත් රහසිගත කඳවුරුවල ඉන්නවා කියලා අපි හිතනවා" පරමේශ්වරී පැවසුවාය. "මේ පොට්ටුව තියාගෙන මැරි මැරී ජීවත්වෙන්නේ එයාල ඉන්නවා කියල හිතාගෙන. ජනාධිපතිතුමාගෙන් ආණ්ඩුවෙන් කිසිම විසඳුමක් නැහැ" යනුවෙන් ඇය හැඬූ කඳුළින් පැවසුවාය. දරුවන් දෙදෙනකු සමග දිවිගෙවන ඇය පසුගිය වසර 8ක කාලයම වෙන්කළේ අතුරුදහන්වූ තම ඥාතීන් සොයාගැනීම වෙනුවෙනි. "ආණ්ඩුව අපිට කියන්න ඕනේ ඒගොල්ලන්ට මොනවාද උනේ කියලා" ඇය සඳහන් කළාය. තවත් මවක් බීබීසී සිංහල සේවය සමග අදහස් පළකරමින් පැවසුවේ හමුදාවට බාරදුන් තම දරුවා ගැන වගකීම ආණ්ඩුව සතු බවය. "මගේ පුතා එල්ටීටීඊ එකේ. යුද්ධෙ ඉවරවෙලා හමුදාවට භාර දුන්නා අදටත් තොරතුරක් නැහැ. වැරදි කළා නම් උසාවියට දාල දඬුවම් දෙන්න ඕන, මෙහෙම අතුරුදහන් කරන්න පුළුවන්ද? " ඇය ප්‍රශ්න කරන්නීය. වසර 15කට පමණ පෙර විභාගයකට කොළඹ ගොස් සිටියදී අසාධාරණ ලෙස දින 17ක් පොලිස් අත්අඩංගුවේ රඳවා සිටීම නිසා ඇතිවූ සිත් තැවුලෙන් තම පුතු එල්ටීටීඊ සංවිධානයට බැඳුණු බවත් යුද්ධය අවසන්වූ පසු ඕමන්තේ මුර පොළේදී තම පුත්‍රයා හමුදාවට භාරවුණු බවත් ඇය පැවසුවාය. මෙම අතුරුදහන් වූවන්ගේ ඥාතීන් සමග ආණ්ඩුව සාකච්ඡා ගණනාවක් පවත්වා තිබෙන අතර ඒ කිසිවකුත් සාර්ථක වී නැත. ඔවුන් කිසිදු රහසිගත කඳවුරක රඳවා නොමැති බවත් යුද සමයේ ඔවුන් මියයන්නට හෝ විදේශගතවන්නට ඇති බව ආණ්ඩුවේ නියෝජිතයන් මෙම මව්පියන්ට පවසා තිබෙන අතර එය පිළිගැනීමට ඔවුන් සුදානම් නැත. මෑතදී උතුරේ කළ සංචාරයේදීත් ජනාධිපති මෛත්‍රිපාල සිරිසේන ඔවුන් මුණ ගැසී කෙටි සාකච්ඡාවක යෙදුනු අතර එහිදී ඔහු අවධාරණය කළේ අදාළ පුද්ගලයින් ආණ්ඩුව විසින් කිසිදු රහසිගත කඳවුරක රඳවනු ලැබ නැති බවය. "රහසිගත කඳවුරු නැහැ. ඕනෑම තැනක රහසිගත කඳවුරක් තිබේ නම් කියන්න. ආරක්ෂාව දෙන්නම්, ගිහිල්ල හොයල බලන්න" ජනපති ඔවුන් හමුවේ කියා සිටියේය. අතුරුදහන්වුවන්ට සිදුවුයේ කුමක්දැයි සෙවීමට ආණ්ඩුව අතුරුදහන්වුවන්ගේ කාර්යාලයක් ද පිහිටුවීමට පියවර ගෙන ඇත. අතුරුදහන්වූවන්ගේ පවුල් එකතුවේ සභාපති බ්‍රිටෝ ප්‍රනාන්දු පැවසුවේ 1971, 1989 මෙන්ම 2009 යුධ සමයේ අතුරුදහන්වුවන්ට කුමක් සිදුවුයේදැයි පිළිතුරු ලබාදීමට සමාජය අපොහොසත්වී ඇති බවය. "යුග 3ක, 71, 89, යුද්ධය, දකුණ, උතුර, සිංහල, දෙමළ, මුස්ලිම් අම්මලා තමන්ගේ දරුවෝ ගැන මිනිස්සු ගැන අහන සරල ප්‍රශ්නයක් තිබෙනවා සමාජයෙන්, මගේ දරුවට මොකද වුණේ ? ඉන්නවද ? මැරුණද ? මැරුවද ? මැරුවනම් ඇයි ? මැරුවනම් කොහෙද වැළලුවේ ?" "මේ ප්‍රශ්නවලට මේ සමාජයට උත්තරදී ගන්න බැරුව ඉන්නවා" යැයි ඔහු පැවසීය.
BBC Mundo incluye regularmente vínculos, enlaces o marcadores a páginas de otros sitios, ya sea de sitios externos sobre los que la BBC no tiene control, o de otros servicios de la BBC por fuera de BBC Mundo. El principio para sugerir estas páginas externas es complementar la oferta informativa y así darles más opciones a nuestros lectores. Deben ser editorialmente relevantes al contenido donde están incluidas, y aptas para la audiencia. Las páginas externas son seleccionadas y evaluadas al publicar cada nota. Sin embargo, la BBC no se hace responsable por el contenido de las mismas, dado que: Algunos de los vínculos externos sugeridos pueden llevar a sitios que ofrezcan servicios comerciales, como compras por Internet. La inclusión de un vínculo, enlace o marcador a un sitio externo desde una página de la BBC nunca debe entenderse como una adhesión a ese sitio, a sus responsables o a los productos o servicios que ofrezca. Para más información, consulte la página en inglés http://www.bbc.co.uk/home/links/
පසුගිය මාස කිහිපය තුළ ශ්‍රී ලංකා ක්‍රිකට් කණ්ඩායම සිම්බාබ්වේ සහ බංග්ලාදේශය වැනි කණ්ඩායම්වලට පරාජය වීමත් සමග ක්‍රිකට් ක්‍රීඩාව මුහුණ දී සිටින අර්බුදය පිළිබඳව ප්‍රබල ලෙස අවධානය යොමුවෙමින් පවතී. ශ්‍රී ලංකා ක්‍රිකට් ඉතිහාසයේ ප්‍රථම වතාවට සිම්බාබ්වේ කණ්ඩායමට තරගාවලියක් පරාජය වීමෙන් අනතුරුව ඇන්ජලෝ මැතිව්ස් කණ්ඩායමේ නායකත්වයෙන් ඉල්ලා අස් වූ අතර, ඉන් අනතුරුව ටෙස්ට් කණ්ඩායමේ නායකත්වයට දිනේෂ් චන්දිමාල් සහ එක් දින හා විස්සයි විස්ස කණ්ඩායමේ නායකත්වයට උපුල් තරංග පත්කෙරිණි. කණ්ඩායමේ දක්ෂතා පිරිහීමත් සමග ක්‍රීඩකයන්ගේ කළමනාකරුවන් දක්වා ද ක්‍රිකට් පිළිබඳ සංවාදය පුළුල් විය. විශේෂයෙන්ම ක්‍රීඩකයන් දස දෙනෙකුගේ පමණ කළමනාකරු ලෙසින් ක්‍රියාකරන චාලි ඔස්ටින් සහ ඔහුගේ ව්‍යාපාරික සහකරුවන් යැයි ඇතැම් මාධ්‍ය විසින් හඳුන්වා දෙන ලද මහේල ජයවර්ධන සහ කුමාර් සංගක්කාර කණ්ඩායම තේරීමට "ඇඟිලි ගසන" බවට චෝදනා එල්ලවෙමින් තිබේ. පසුගිය අඟහරුවාදා බීබීසී සිංහල සේවය සමග විශේෂ සාකච්ඡාවකට එක් වූ මහේල ජයවර්ධන එම චෝදනා ප්‍රතික්ෂේප කළේය. මේ අතර කළමනාකරුවන්, අතීත ක්‍රියාකාරකම්, ප්‍රහාරයට ලක් වූ පාකිස්තාන සංචාරය සහ 2011 ලෝක කුසලානය ඇතුළු කරුණු සම්බන්ධයෙන් ලොව පුරා කීර්ති නාමයක් උසුලන ශ්‍රී ලංකා කණ්ඩායමේ හිටපු නායකයන් දෙදෙනෙකු අතර වාග් සංග්‍රාමයක් ඇවිලී තිබේ. 1996 දී ශ්‍රී ලංකාවට ලෝක කුසලානය දිනා දුන් කණ්ඩායමේ නායක, අමාත්‍ය අර්ජුන රණතුංග සහ 2011 දී ලෝක කුසලාන අවසාන මහා තරගය දක්වා කණ්ඩායම මෙහෙය වූ කුමාර් සංගක්කාර ඒ දෙදෙනාය. විශේෂයෙන්ම ආරක්ෂාව සම්බන්ධයෙන් ගැටලු පවතින බවට කණ්ඩායමේ සාමාජිකයන් මතු කළ විරෝධය නොතකා 2009 දී කණ්ඩායම පාකිස්තානයේ සංචාරයක යෙදවීම හේතුවෙන් ලහෝර් නුවරදී ත්‍රස්‌ත ප්‍රහාරයකට මුහුණ දුන් බවට කුමාර් සංගක්කාර, බදාදා (ජුලි 12) ප්‍රබල චෝදනාවක් එල්ල කළේය. කුමාර් සංගක්කාර ඒ බව සඳහන් කර තිබෙන්නේ ලන්ඩන් නුවර සිට ස්කයිප් තාක්ෂණය ඔස්සේ කොළඹ සිටින මාධ්‍යවේදීන් පිරිසක් අමතමිනි. "මං හිතන්නේ අපිව මැරෙන්නම කියල වගේ අපිව යැවුවේ. තාම මගේ ඇඟේ වෙඩි වැදුණු යකඩ කුඩු තියෙනවා. අපි බලන්න ඕන හරි වගකීමෙන් කළා ද කියල," යනුවෙන් ඔහු සඳහන් කළ බව මාධ්‍ය වාර්තාවල දැක්වේ. "ඒ ගැන පරීක්ෂණයක් කරන්න කාලේ හරි. අපි ඒවා ගැනත් බලන්න ඕනේ," යනුවෙන් ද ඔහු පැවසීය. කුමාර් සංගක්කාර ගේ එම ප්‍රකාශය පිළිබඳව ඛනිජ තෙල් සම්පත් සංවර්ධන අමාත්‍ය අර්ජුන රණතුංග දැඩි ප්‍රතිචාරයක් දක්වා තිබේ. ලහෝර් නුවරදී ශ්‍රී ලංකා කණ්ඩායමට එල්ල වූ ප්‍රහාරය පිළිබඳ පූර්ණ පරීක්ෂණයක් පැවැත්විය යුතුය යන්න තමන්ගේ ද ස්ථාවරය බව අමාත්‍ය අර්ජුන රණතුංග පවසයි. බ්‍රහස්පතින්දා මාධ්‍යවේදීන් පිරිසක් සමග එසේ ප්‍රතිචාරය පළ කළ අමාත්‍යවරයා, එම සංචාරය අවස්ථාවේ ශ්‍රී ලංකා ක්‍රිකට් ආයතනයේ නිසි බලධාරියා ලෙස කටයුතු කළේ එවක ක්‍රීඩා අමාත්‍යාංශයේ ලේකම්වරයා බව ද සඳහන් කළේය. "ඒ අවස්ථාවේ ශ්‍රී ලංකා ක්‍රිකට් ආයතනයේ නිසි බලධාරියා ලෙස සිටියේ ලියනගම. ඊට මාස කිහිපයකට පෙර මම ආසියානු ක්‍රිකට් කවුන්සිලයේ සභාපති. අපි ආසියානු තරගාලිය පකිස්ථානයේ පැවැත්වුවේ. එය ඉතාමත් හොඳට තිබුණා. ඊට පස්සේ අයිපීඑල් තරගාවලියට යන්න ඕන කියලා චාලි ඔස්ටින්ගේ කණ්ඩායම ඇවිත් මට කිව්වා. එතැනදී මම කිව්වේ රට පාවලා දීලා එයට මට අත්සන් කරන්න බැහැ කියලා. ඊට පස්සේ ගාමිණී ලොකුගේ හිටපු ක්‍රීඩා ඇමැතිවරයා මාව ක්‍රිකට් පාලක මණ්ඩලයෙන් අයින් කළා. ඊට පස්සේ තමයි පකිස්ථාන සංචාරය තිබ්බේ. එහිදී තමයි ශ්‍රී ලංකා ක්‍රිකට් කණ්ඩායම අනතුරට පත් වුණේ. මං හිතන්නේ ඒ ගැන පරීක්ෂණයක් පැවැත්විය යුතුයි," යනුවෙන් අමාත්‍ය අර්ජුන රණතුංග මාධ්‍යවේදීන් හමුවේ සඳහන් කළේය. පාකිස්තාන බලධාරීන්ගේ ඉල්ලීම ප්‍රකාර එම සංචාරය සංවිධානය කළ බව බීබීසී සිංහල සේවය කළ විමසීමකදී සඳහන් කළ එවක ක්‍රීඩා අමාත්‍යවරයා වූ ගාමිණී ලොකුගේ මන්ත්‍රීවරයා, ශ්‍රී ලංකා ක්‍රීඩකයන්ට නිසි ආරක්ෂාව සපයන බවට පාකිස්තානය සහතික වූ බව ද කියා සිටියේය. අදාළ සංචාරයට ප්‍රථම ශ්‍රී ලංකා කණ්ඩායම ආසියානු කුසලානය සඳහා පාකිස්තානයේ සංචාරය කළ බව අමාත්‍ය අර්ජුන රණතුංග පෙන්වා දී තිබේ. "ඒ ගොල්ලෝ දැක්කා මම ඉන්න කාලේ කොච්චර ආරක්ෂාවක් තිබුණද කියලා. මම වෙනම පුද්ගලයෙක්ව යැව්වා ඒ ආරක්ෂාව බලන්න. ඊළඟට මම තවත් දෙයක් කියනවා. ඉන්දියාවේ අයිපීඑල් තරගාවලිය යනකොට ඕනතරම් බෝම්බ යනවා. එතැනදී අපේ එක ක්‍රීඩකයෙක්වත් කියලා තියෙනවද බෝම්බ යනවා, අයිපීඑල් ඕනේ නැහැ කියලා," යනුවෙන් ද අමාත්‍යවරයා ප්‍රශ්න කරයි. 1996 ලෝක කුසලානය අවස්ථාවේ ශ්‍රී ලංකාවේ ආරක්ෂක වාතාවරණය පිළිබඳව ගැටලු මතු වූ විට පාකිස්තානය ශ්‍රී ලංකාවේ සංචාරය කළ බව අමතක කළ නොහැකි බව ද ඔහුගේ අදහසය. ක්‍රීඩකයන්ගේ කළමනාකරුවන් පිළිබඳව අදහස් දැක් වූ අමාත්‍ය රණතුංග, "අද රටේ ක්‍රිකට් වැටිලා. ඒ ගැන ඔය ක්‍රීඩකයෝ කථා කරන්නේ නැහැ. නමුත් රට ඉඳන් තමන්ගේ මැනේජර් බේර ගන්න කථා කරනවා. මම නම් කියන්නේ ඒජන්තවරුන් සම්බන්ධයෙන් නීති පැනවිය යුතුයි. එක් ඒජන්තවරයකුට ක්‍රීඩකයෝ දෙන්නෙක් නැත්නම් තුන්දෙනෙක් කියලා නීතියක් ගෙන ආ යුතුයි," යනුවෙන් ද සඳහන් කළේය. මේ අතර බදාදා ස්කයිප් සාකච්ඡාවකට එක්වූ කුමාර් සංගක්කාර ද ක්‍රීඩක කළමනාකරුවන් ලියාපදිංචි කිරීමේ ක්‍රමවේදයක් තිබිය යුතු බව පෙන්වා දී තිබේ. කෘෂිකර්මාන්තය සම්බන්ධ ව්‍යාපාරයකට අදාළව තමන් චාලි ඔස්ටින්ගේ හවුල්කරුවෙකු වනු හැරුනුකොට ඔහු සමග වෙනත් ව්‍යාපාරික සම්බන්ධතාවක් නැතැයි කුමාර් සංගක්කාර එම සාකච්ඡාවේදී අවධාරණය කළ බව ඊට එක්වූ සන්ඩේ ටයිම්ස් පුවත්පතේ ක්‍රීඩා සංස්කාරක චම්පික ප්‍රනාන්දු බීබීසී සිංහල සේවයට පැවසීය. කෙසේවෙතත්, පාකිස්තාන සංචාරය පිළිබඳව පරීක්ෂා කළ යුතු අතරම 2011 ලෝක කුසලාන ක්‍රිකට් තරගාවලියේ අවසන් තරගයේදී සිදු වූයේ කුමක්ද යන්න සොයා බැලීම සඳහා විධිමත් පරීක්ෂණයක් පවත්වන ලෙස අර්ජුන රණතුංග අමාත්‍යවරයා ඉල්ලා සිටී. "මම කියන්නේ 2011 ලෝක කුසලානයේදී ශ්‍රී ලංකාවට මොකද වුණේ කියලා පරීක්ෂණයක් කරන්න. ක්‍රීඩා ඇමැතිවරු කරන්න ඕන ඕවා," ඔහු වැඩිදුරටත් පැවසීය. ඉන්දියාවට එරෙහිව පැවති අවසාන මහා තරගයේ දී සංගක්කාරගේ නායකත්වයෙන් තරග වැදුණු ශ්‍රී ලංකා කණ්ඩායමේ ක්‍රීඩකයන් සිව් දෙනෙකුම වෙනස් කිරීම පිළිබඳව ක්‍රීඩා විචාරකයෝ ඒ අවස්ථාවේ විමතිය පළ කළහ.
Nicaragua has signed the Paris climate agreement, meaning that the US and Syria are the only two countries not to be giving the accord their support. The deal unites the world's nations in tackling climate change. Nicaragua refused to sign it last year, arguing that it did not go far enough to tackle the problem. In June President Donald Trump said the US would withdraw from the deal, but the rules of the agreement state that this cannot be done until 2020. The president said it was part of his "solemn duty to protect America" and he would seek a new deal that would not disadvantage US businesses. Scientists point out that work to implement the Paris accord must be stepped up if it is to have any chance of success. The agreement commits the US and 187 other countries to keeping rising global temperatures "well below" 2C above pre-industrial levels and "endeavour to limit" them even more, to 1.5C. Nicaraguan President Daniel Ortega indicated last week that he would sign the accord. "It is time for Nicaragua to sign the Paris Agreement," Mr Ortega said on the official July 19 website. "Scientists from more developed countries, scientists working at Nasa, European scientists, everyone agrees that we must stop the process that is leading to the destruction of the planet," he said. Mr Ortega's government had previously argued that the accord did not put sufficient onus on wealthy countries to tackle climate change and was not ambitious enough in its objectives. Nicaragua has no oil and vigorously pursues green energy policies - more than 50% of its electricity is produced by geothermic, wind, solar, biomass and wave power. It is a country that is believed to be especially at risk from climate change. The World Bank described the central American country as "a renewable energy paradise" in 2013. President Trump has argued that the Paris agreement would hobble, disadvantage and impoverish the US, to the benefit of other nations. He claimed in June that the accord would cost the US 6.5 million jobs and $3tn (£2.2tn) in lost GDP - while rival economies like China and India were treated more favourably. However, the US more recently has hinted that it may shift its position on withdrawing from the deal. Historically, the US, Europe, and China account for almost half of the world's carbon emissions. Syria is thought not to have signed the deal because it has been preoccupied by its civil war.
A Revolução Industrial na Grã-Bretanha contou com uma enorme quantidade de mão de obra infantil: até 15% dos trabalhadores fabris eram crianças. Jornadas de 16 horas eram comuns até para quem tinha seis anos de idade. Ao longo do século 19, uma série de leis ("Factory Acts") tentou regulamentar as condições de trabalho dentro das fábricas, limitando especialmente o trabalho infantil. Parece incrível sob a perspectiva de hoje, mas houve oposição a essas leis. Não era função do Estado, diziam, mexer com a produção. E mais especificamente, não era justificável limitar legalmente um contrato já acordado entre as duas partes - no caso, o empresário e o trabalhador mirim. De repente esse debate parece mais moderno, por dois motivos. Primeiro, porque ainda tem quem veja o mercado como um fenômeno natural, orgânico - e esquece o óbvio. Sem leis para proteger a propriedade e sem a infraestrutura necessária (o quarto fator de produção depois de capital, trabalho e terra), o mercado não existiria. O Estado cria o mercado e, portanto, tem direito de estabelecer suas normas. Segundo, porque a ideia de um contrato totalmente "livre" entre empregador e empregado é uma concepção tão ingênua que para acreditar nela você tem que ser ou um idiota ou um economista. Não é um encontro de forças iguais. O trabalhador tem que vender o seu trabalho ou corre o risco de passar fome. Ele é de longe o mais fraco dos dois lados em uma relação em que a coerção faz parte. Acredito, como sempre dentro da insignificância da minha opinião, que essas observações são pertinentes no contexto dos esforços do governo Temer em mudar as leis trabalhistas (e também sugiro que a palavra "reforma" seja abolida jornalisticamente nessas situações. É uma palavra que traz em si uma conotação de melhorias - algo muito discutível neste caso, especialmente quando mudanças importantes são propostas por um governo não eleito pelo voto direto). Não há dúvida de que a tecnologia e as práticas atuais mudam a relação entre capital e mão de obra, abrindo espaço para um debate sobre a relevância de todas as leis. Mas há um perigo claro nas mudanças que visam a retirada do Estado - aquelas, por exemplo, em que o patrão e o funcionário podem "livremente" concordar em abrir mão de um direito legal. Fica óbvio, na grande maioria dos casos, quem vai sair perdendo. O desequilíbrio das forças, especialmente numa época de desemprego, aponta num sentido só: uma economia em que a posição do funcionário fica menos estável. A "flexibilização" do emprego implica insegurança - o funcionário não sabe quantas horas vai trabalhar e, portanto, o quanto vai receber. No curto prazo, isso parece vantajoso do ponto de vista do empregador. Mas logo, logo este se depara com um problema - quem vai comprar o que ele produz? Tentei abordar esse assunto dois meses atrás, pois avanços tecnológicos já estão eliminando empregos e ameaçando o consumo. Um trabalhador que ganha menos e que não tem garantias salariais obviamente se sente menos confiante para consumir. No longo prazo, quase ninguém ganha em uma economia presa numa corrida para reduzir salários. A história mundial recente mostra que o crédito só consegue tapar o buraco por um tempo limitado. Chega um momento em que a conta não fecha. A resposta europeia a essa situação - a austeridade - tem sido muito malsucedida e repleta de consequências políticas perigosas. Será que o Brasil realmente quer traçar o mesmo caminho? Por aqui, temos um problema adicional. Porque mesmo se a flexibilização de trabalho e a liberação geral da terceirização criarem mais empregos, a tendência é que estes sejam muito mal pagos, elevando daí a desigualdade num país onde ela já é grave. Isso gera consequências nas ruas, aumentando a insegurança - e aí os defensores do "Estado mínimo" correrão para pedir mais gastos públicos com as forças da ordem e repressão. *Tim Vickery é colunista da BBC Brasil e formado em História e Política pela Universidade de Warwick.
د بریتانیا د پخواني لومړي وزیر وینسټن چرچل نیم څکول شوی سیګرېټ د امریکا بوسټن ښار کې په ۱۲ زره ډالرو وپلورل شو. چرچل د دغه ۴ انچه (۱۰ سانتيمتره) اوږد سیګرېټ نیمه برخه د ۱۹۴۷ کال مې میاشتې پر ۱۱مه د فرانسې پاریس لوبورجیه پر هوايي ډګر څکولی و. سیګرېټ د چارشنبې په شپه د امریکا بوسټن ښار کې بولۍ ته وړاندې شو او مشتري یې د فلوریډا ایالت د پالم بیچ ښار د لرغونتوکو یو راغونډوونکی کس و، چې نوم یې ونه ښودل شو. د چرچل د کمپاین موټر په دوه میلیون پونډه ډونلډ ټرمپ ته د سعودي ۸۳ ور کړې ډالۍ دا نیم څکول شوی سیګرېټ د الان تورنر په نوم یوه پخواني بریتانیايي پیلوټ ساتلی و چې پاریس ته او له پاریسه ددغه سیګرېټ د لېږدولو مسؤولیت یې هم درلود. پر سیګرېټ د بریتانیايي مشر نوم هم لیکل شوی او پیلوټ پرې خپل یادښت هم لیکلی دی. پیلوټ وايي ''له چرچل پخواني فرانسوي پوځيان راتاو وو او خبرې یې ورسره کولې.'' دی وايي زیاتوي ''الوتکې ته له ختلو وروسته یې سیګرېټ دانۍ کې سیګرېټ وغورځاوه. پاتې سیګرېټ مې راواخیست او په یوه کڅوړه کې مې له خرابېدو وژغوره.'' په ۲۰۱۵ کال، د چرچل څکولي سیګرېټ بېخ د لندن ښار په یوه بولۍ کې په ۲۰۰۰ پونډه پلورل شوی و. ۲۰۱۶ کال کې د وېنسټن چرچل د کمپاین موټر په دوه میلیونه پوڼده وپلورل شو. دغه موټر چرچل په ۱۹۴۰ کال کې د خپل کمپاین لپاره کاراوه چې اوس د لندن په یوه لیلام کې په ۲۳۲٫۵۲۰ پونډه وپلورل شو.
Ulster Unionist leader Robin Swann says any new legislation on the Irish language would lead to further division in society in Northern Ireland. Mr Swann was addressing his first UUP conference since taking over from Mike Nesbitt as leader. The North Antrim MLA denied lurching to the right over the Irish language. He insisted the UUP's position has not changed since 1998. Mr Swann told his supporters that the party has no issue with those who cherish the Irish language. However, he insisted it is not scaremongering to be concerned about the impact of an Irish language act. He said that if one is passed, people would no longer be reliant on flags or painted kerbstones - instead they would know whose territory they were in by looking at the road signs. It's understood that differences over the shape of future legislation regarding the Irish language and other cultural matters are central to the stalemate in the talks between the DUP and Sinn Féin. So far as those talks are concerned, the UUP leader expressed annoyance that progress is - in his view - being held up because Sinn Féin "is being swung by the tail by a TD who has no mandate in Northern Ireland" - a reference to Gerry Adams. Mr Swann did not mention the DUP by name during his conference speech. However, he did tell his supporters that "there's only so many Spotlight specials people can take before they look for an alternative". Mr Swann also talked about what he referred to as the relationship between "political unionism" and paramilitaries. He said his party would not provide political cover for any group to be "community workers by day and extortionists or political bullies by night - loyalist or republican". He said the UUP would not "trade our principles for possible cheap electoral gain by buying votes, while turning a blind eye or ignoring unacceptable practices which continue to cause sheer misery" within local communities. The UUP lost six seats in the Northern Ireland Assembly election in March, followed by May's general election in which its two MPs were unseated. Not for the first time there are questions over its survival. For decades it had been Northern Ireland's biggest political party. Mr Swann became UUP leader after the resignation of Mike Nesbitt following the party's poor showing in the assembly election. He has ruled out a merger with the increasingly dominant Democratic Unionist Party. He has previously blamed a polarised electorate and a reduction in the overall number of MLAs from 108 to 90 for his party's struggles.
Vài ngày trước khi diễn ra Đại hội Đảng Cộng sản Trung Quốc lần thứ 19, tin cho hay Trung Quốc sắp sửa đổi điều lệ của Đảng Cộng sản và có thể sẽ bổ sung 'tư tưởng chính trị' của Chủ tịch Tập Cận Bình vào các văn kiện then chốt của Đảng. Một hội nghị của Ban chấp hành Trung ương Đảng Cộng sản khóa 18 nhóm họp từ ngày 11-14/10/2017 tại Bắc Kinh hôm thứ Bảy đã thông qua một dự thảo sửa đổi điều lệ của đảng này vốn đã được thông báo từ trước và sẽ trình lên Đại hội lần thứ 19, dự kiến nhóm từ hôm 18/10 để 'phê chuẩn', theo hãng tin Reuters. Thông cáo do Đảng Cộng sản loan báo và được truyền thông nhà nước đăng tải đề cập tới tinh thần của nhà lãnh đạo của Đảng Cộng sản và Nhà nước Trung Quốc, ông Tập Cận Bình qua một loạt các diễn văn, phát biểu quan trọng của ông được cho là đã có 'các tân khái niệm và tư tưởng mới' cũng như các 'tư tưởng chiến lược' có tính mới về quản lý, lãnh đạo nhà nước. Nghe ý kiến của TS. Vũ Cao Phan Vụ Đồng Tâm và điểm tin tuần thứ II của tháng 10/2017 Chính trị TQ: Dàn sao đang lên trước Đại hội 19 Liệu ông Tập Cận Bình có nhiệm kỳ thứ ba? Một phóng viên của BBC Tiếng Trung cho hay dường như đây là một chỉ dấu, nhưng cần chờ khẳng định tại Đại hội bắt đầu vào hôm thứ Tư tới đây, về việc các 'tư tưởng chính trị' của ông Tập Cận Bình sẽ được 'bổ sung' vào điều lệ đảng và các văn kiện khác về đường lối, cũng như tuyên huấn, tuyên truyền. Truyền thông Trung Quốc cuối tuần này cũng cho hay một thông báo sau khi bế mạc Hội nghị Trung ương 7 khóa 18 của đảng cho biết Đảng Cộng sản đã khai trừ đảng của một nguyên lãnh đạo bộ tư pháp. Thông báo hôm thứ Bảy đưa chi tiết nói bà Ngô Ái Ái, nguyên Bộ trưởng Tư pháp và một số quan chức khác đã bị khai trừ khỏi đảng vì tham nhũng, vẫn theo Reuteurs. Hôm 15/10, một nhà phân tích chính trị và bang giao quốc tế từ Việt Nam nêu quan điểm với BBC cho rằng 'tư tưởng' của ông Tập chắc chắn sẽ được đưa vào Đại hội 19 của Đảng Cộng sản Trung Quốc. "Về tư tưởng của Tập Cận Bình, tôi nghĩ chắc chắn sẽ được đưa vào Đại hội 19 này, vì đưa vào trong Đại hội nên nó sẽ được chính thức hóa trong Chính cương và Điều lệ của Đảng Cộng sản Trung Quốc," Tiến sỹ Vũ Cao Phan, nguyên Phó Chủ tịch kiêm Tổng thư ký Hội hữu nghị Việt - Trung nói. "Điều đó là tất nhiên rồi, bởi vì ta thấy rằng là ngay trong 'nhiệm kỳ đầu tiên', ông Tập Cận Bình đã xác nhận là 'hạt nhân lãnh đạo', điều đó Giang Trạch Dân chỉ được xác nhận ở nhiệm kỳ thứ hai và Hồ Cẩm Đào không được gọi đến. Tức là vị trí của Tập Cận Bình đã được đặt lên rất cao!" Về bản chất của điều được cho là 'tư tưởng Tập Cận Bình', Tiến sỹ Vũ Cao Phan nêu nhận định: "Cái mà gọi là 'tư tưởng Tập Cận Bình' là gì tôi nghĩ là Đại hội đảng 19 của Trung Quốc sẽ thảo luận và sẽ đưa ra một định nghĩa rõ ràng, nhưng tư tưởng Tập Cận Bình đã được nói đến như trong cuốn sách của một giáo sư, Học viện Quốc phòng Trung Quốc, được công bố đồng thời ở Anh và ở Trung Quốc. "Cho thấy đó là tư tưởng vĩ đại phục hưng nước Trung Hoa, muốn nói rằng Tập Cận Bình là người tạo nên thời đại thứ ba từ khi nước Cộng hòa Nhân dân Trung Hoa được thành lập. Mao Trạch Đông là người lập quốc, Đặng Tiểu Bình là người thực hiện cuộc cải cách vĩ đại, còn Tập Cận Bình là người phục hưng nước Trung Hoa. "Nếu nói theo quan điểm ông Đặng Tiểu Bình đã nói là thời kỳ ấy là 'giấu mình chờ thời', thì đến thời kỳ của Tập Cận Bình chuyện đó không còn nữa, nước Trung Quốc bước ra vũ đài của thế giới, cho thế giới thấy là ai và Tập Cận Bình là người đại diện." 'Được dân hoan nghênh, ủng hộ' Vincent Ni nói về chống tham nhũng của CT Tập Cận Bình TQ 'kiên trì phát triển quan hệ' với VN Ông Tập nay là 'hạt nhân' của Đảng Cộng sản TQ Tiến sỹ Vũ Cao Phan bác bỏ quan điểm cho rằng Tập Cận Bình là một lãnh đạo theo phong cách 'bạo chúa' hay độc tài, trái lại ông nêu quan điểm cho rằng có thông tin nói ở Trung Quốc công việc chống tham nhũng của ông Tập Cận Bình được nhân dân Trung Quốc hoan nghênh và ủng hộ 'nhiều nhất', nhà nghiên cứu nói: "Gần đây tôi nghe được rất nhiều người bạn của tôi đi Trung Quốc về nói rằng nhân dân Trung Quốc rất hoan nghênh và một trong những vấn đề mà Tập Cận Bình được ủng hộ nhiều nhất đó là vấn đề chống tham nhũng. "Và thực ra ông đã làm được và làm thật... Tôi không nghĩ và hoàn toàn không đúng nếu coi Tập Cận Bình là 'bạo chúa' và những biện pháp mà ông đối xử với những kẻ tham nhũng vẫn còn có những điều ta có thể thấy là nhẹ tay. "Nhẹ tay có thể bởi rất nhiều nguyên nhân, có thể bởi nguyên nhân là những lợi ích của các phe nhóm thỏa thuận với nhau điều này, điều khác, điều đó chắc chắn là có... Và một điều nữa cũng nói là cuộc chống tham nhũng của Trung Quốc được nhân dân rất hoan nghênh," TS Cao Phan nói với BBC. Hôm thứ Sáu, trong một chương trình trực tuyến trên kênh Facebook Live của BBC Tiếng Việt, nhà báo Vincent Ni, thành viên ban biên tập của BBC Tiếng Trung, cũng chia sẻ với khán giả và độc giả của BBC Việt ngữ về đánh giá cuộc chiến chống tham nhũng của Chủ tịch Tập, ông nói: "Từ lâu nhiều người cho rằng trong Đảng Cộng sản có vấn đề tham nhũng, do đó một trong những mục tiêu cao nhất của ông Tập Cận Bình là làm trong sạch đảng, trong sạch bộ máy. Những nhà chỉ trích, đăc biệt là giới bất đồng ở hải ngoại thường cho rằng các chiến dịch chống tham nhũng của ông Tập có mục đích chính trị, nhằm loại bỏ những kẻ thù chính trị của ông. "Thế nhưng nếu bạn đến Trung Quốc và nói chuyện với mọi người dân, thì họ rất hài lòng và hạnh phúc về việc chống tham những, bởi vì trước đây ngay ở cấp độ đô thị, thành phố, để sửa nhà, sửa cửa, người dân phải có hầu bao đỏ lót tay cho các quan chức, nhưng bây giờ không ai dám nhận phong bì như thế nữa. "Cho nên điều quan trọng là người ta không quan tâm đến cái gì là thực chất bên trong chiến dịch chống tham nhũng, mà người dân chỉ quan tâm đến làm sao cho cuộc sống của họ được dễ dàng hơn mà thôi," nhà báo Vincent Ni nói với BBC hôm 13/10. Được biết, theo một tập san về Nghiên cứu Xây dựng Đảng của Trung Quốc năm nay, một số thành tố chính trong tư tưởng Tập Cận Bình có thể tìm thấy trong nguyên lý ưu tiên xây dựng "5 trong một" với các chính sách tích hợp trong gói lý luận được gọi là bốn đại diện. Nội dung của '5 trong một' là 'phát triển hài hòa giữa kinh tế, chính trị, văn hóa, xã hội và sinh thái', còn các chính sách thúc đẩy mục tiêu này được tích hợp và tổng kết trong Lý luận "Bốn toàn diện" bao gồm việc 'xây dựng xã hội khá giả toàn diện, cải cách sâu sắc toàn diện, quản lý đất nước bằng pháp luật toàn diện và quản lý đảng nghiêm khắc toàn diện'. Nếu được bổ sung đưa vào các văn kiện then chốt sửa đổi của đảng Trung Quốc, Tập Cận Bình sẽ là lãnh tụ đầu tiên sau hàng chục năm qua được nêu trong các văn kiện chính thức của Trung Quốc như một lãnh đạo có 'tư tưởng' của Đảng, trước đó, các văn kiện, tài liệu lý luận và tuyên truyền của Trung Quốc chỉ nêu 'tư tưởng Mao Trạch Đông' và 'lý luận Đặng Tiểu Bình'.
قال وزير الداخلية السعودي الأمير عبدالعزيز بن سعود بن نايف، إن رفع الحظر عن قيادة المرأة السعودية للسيارة سوف يقلل عدد حوادث السيارات في المملكة. ولم يقدم المسؤول السعودي دليلا يدعم هذا الرأى، لكنه قال في تغريدات على صفحة الوزارة على تويتر إن "قيادة المرأة السيارة سيحول السلامة المروروية إلى ممارسة تربوية". وتعاني السعودية من ارتفاع نسب حوادث السيارات وتعد من أكثر البلدان تسجيلا للوفيات بسبب الحوادث، والتي تصل إلى 20 حالة وفاة يوميا. وكان الملك سلمان بن عبدالعزيز، قد أصدر قرارا برفع حظر قيادة المرأة السعودية للسيارات وسيدخل حيز التنفيذ في يونيو/ حزيران العام المقبل. وأضاف وزير الداخلية السعودي في تغريداته، الخميس" قيادة المرأة للسيارة سيُحول سلامة المرور إلى ممارسة تربوية تؤدي للحد من الخسائر البشرية والاقتصادية الناجمة عن الحوادث". وتابع "رجال الأمن جاهزون لتطبيق أحكام نظام المرور على الذكور والإناث، واتخاذ كل ما من شأنه الحفاظ على أمن المجتمع وسلامته". ويوجد في المملكة حوالي 10 مليون سيدة سعودية ومقيمة يحق لهن قيادة السيارة. وتشير الإحصاءات إلى أن زيادة أعداد السيارات على الطرق تؤدي حتما إلى ارتفاع في حوادث السيارات. ربع قرن من نضال المرأة السعودية لنيل حق قيادة السيارة: محطات رئيسية ففي الولایات المتحدة، علی سبیل المثال، ارتفعت أعداد السیارات بنسبة 3.6 في المائة بین عامي 2014 و 2016، مما تسبب في زيادة حوادث الطرق 13.6 في المائة في نفس الوقت. ومع ذلك، فإن القرار يمكن أن يقلل عدد السيارات على الطرق في السعودية، نظرا للاستغناء عن حوالي 800 ألف سائق أجنبي يتم استخدامهم حاليا لقيادة سيارات النساء. وقوبل السماح للمرأة السعودية بقيادة السيارة بارتياح وترحيب من ناشطات وكذلك من المجتمع الدولي. ووصفته الناشطة سحر ناصيف بأنه "انتصار عظيم"، بينما قال الأمين العام للأمم المتحدة أنطونيو غوتيريس "إنها خطوة مهمة في الاتجاه الصحيح". وقال منصور التركى المتحدث باسم وزارة الداخلية إنه سيتم السماح للنساء بالقيادة من سن 18 عاما. ومع ذلك، لا تزال هناك تفاصيل حول مشروع قانون يسمح للمرأة بالقيادة، وهناك مخاوف من أن تواجه المرأة ضوابط أكثر تشددا من الرجل. وبعد إعلان الملك سلمان، بدأت كبرى شركات تصنيع السيارات في العالم توجيه الإعلانات عن السيارات مباشرة إلى النساء السعوديات. من بين الشركات التي تستخدم تويتر لإعلاناتها فولكس فاغن الألمانية وفورد الأمريكية ونيسان اليابانية.
The Chinese Communist party voted this week to enshrine President Xi Jinping's ideology into its constitution, elevating him to the same level as founder Mao Zedong. "Xi Jinping Thought", according to Mr Xi himself, is the belief that it is time for "socialism with Chinese characteristics for a new era". But that sounds similar to Mr Deng's "socialism with Chinese characteristics". So just what are those Chinese characteristics, and while it might be unfair to compare them as they are operating in different times - is what President Xi has achieved so far comparable to Deng Xiaoping's accomplishments for the economy? When Deng Xiaoping launched China's "reform and open up" programme in 1979, China's gross domestic product (GDP) was:
If the ceasefire brokered by Russia and Turkey holds, it will be welcomed by most people in Syria - but the odds seem stacked against it. Several previous ceasefires have collapsed, and new clashes have already broken out in several parts of the country amidst sharp differences in interpretation of the latest agreement by the Syrian opposition and the regime of Syrian President Bashar al-Assad. But not all past ceasefire attempts have failed. And this time dramatic shifts in Turkish policy towards the Syrian conflict may alter everything. Political investment by major external powers is clearly critical for any ceasefire deal to succeed. The "cessation of hostilities" that was brokered by the US and Russia in February 2016 produced a major drop in levels of violence in all regime- and opposition-held areas for some two months. Its eventual collapse was likely, but not inevitable. Other, more localized ceasefires were mediated by Iran in the city of Homs in May 2014 and January 2015 and by Iran and Turkey in the large towns of Zabadani, Foah and Kefraya in September 2015. These were flawed and highly coercive arrangements that had to be renegotiated repeatedly, but they allowed the evacuation of fighters and wounded and some supply of humanitarian assistance. Russia and Turkey appear sufficiently invested politically to make the latest ceasefire work. But in seeking to encompass all parts of Syria not under Islamic State control, they are hostage to the two parties that have the least stake in a general truce: the Assad regime and Jabhat Fateh al-Sham, formerly known as Jabhat al-Nusra until ending its formal affiliation to Al-Qaeda last July. Their gradual military escalation and counter-escalation was the principal reason for the ultimate collapse of the February cessation of hostilities agreement. Already, the Assad regime has claimed that the latest ceasefire does not include Jabhat Fateh al-Sham. But opposition spokesmen say the opposite: that only areas under IS control are excluded. The regime has lost no time since the ceasefire went into effect to mount fresh air strikes on areas north of the city of Hama known to be strongholds of Jabhat Fateh al-Sham. The latter organisation has been striving for much of 2016 to become the dominant opposition force in the northwest of the country, and so there is a real risk that it will use the resumption of fighting as a means of splitting or radicalizing other rebel groups and bringing them under its fold. Russia has sought to contain this issue by isolating Jabhat Fateh al-Sham from the rest of the armed opposition. Its announcement that the Islamist Ahrar al-Sham rebel movement, which it had previously designated as a terrorist jihadi group, had signed up to the ceasefire is a measure of how determined it is to make the agreement hold. But the critical factor is the shift in Turkey's policy on Syria. Previously, other armed opposition groups would have abandoned the ceasefire if Jabhat Fateh al-Sham came under attack. Their dependence on its combat expertise and planning and command skills and the extensive intermingling of opposition fighters and areas of control in northwest Syria meant that they could not afford to stand by while it was targeted. But with Turkey now coordinating closely with Russia and pushing for a ceasefire, the opposition can no longer afford not to stand by. Turkish policy has been evolving at a quickening pace. The decision to lean on the opposition to allow thousands of its fighters to abandon the effort to lift the regime siege of eastern Aleppo in order to spearhead a Turkish-backed push against Kurdish-held areas to the north last August ensured the fall of one of the most important opposition strongholds in Syria four months later. Remaining opposition forces in the northwest have significant stockpiles of weapons and ammunition, but are wholly dependent on Turkey for further military resupply and for the flow of trade and international humanitarian assistance. Turkey has not abandoned the opposition completely, but it is clearly working to a new set of policy assumptions and objectives in Syria. That these include a strategic decision to abandon the effort to force Assad from power is already plain. Talk of setting up a safe zone in northern Syria has never been credible, despite considerable bluster. Moscow insiders claim Turkish President Recep Tayyip Erdogan is also abandoning his categorical rejection of significant Kurdish autonomy in northern Syria, so long as he can block the same thing in Turkey. With President-Elect Donald Trump about to take office in the US, there is little reason for Turkey to expect to counter-balance Russian policy proposals on Syria. These calculations prompted Turkey to accept the fate of Aleppo - which it had long presented as a "red line" that the Assad regime should not cross - and then to broker a ceasefire with Russia immediately after its fall. The alacrity with which the main political and military opposition groupings have announced their support for the latest ceasefire is the surest measure of the extent of the shift in Turkey's policy and of its determination to enforce compliance, whatever the provocations from the government side. The real question, then, is not whether the latest ceasefire will hold, but how far Turkey will go in making the Syrian opposition accept what comes next, should the peace talks jointly sponsored by Russia and Turkey take place within the next month as officially scheduled. Indeed, even if the ceasefire fails or if the talks are unsuccessful - or not held at all - Turkish policy towards Syria is set on a new path. For the Syrian opposition, in particular, what comes next is more of a threat than a challenge.
A British team is developing a car that will be capable of reaching 1,000mph (1,610km/h). Powered by a rocket bolted to a Eurofighter-Typhoon jet engine, the vehicle will first mount an assault on the world land speed record (763mph; 1,228km/h). Bloodhound should start running on Hakskeen Pan in Northern Cape, South Africa, in 2017. It's been an interesting start to the New Year, with various bits of the car being tested as we slowly get Bloodhound SSC ready to run. We've still got a long way to go, but it's terrific to see systems being assembled for final installation in the most advanced straight-line racing car ever. Last month, a small number of the team went down to Newquay Aerohub to test the jet engine's fuel system (you can watch the latest BHTV video of the test here). Sounds like an easy task - surely all we need to do is check that we can pump the fuel into the Rolls-Royce EJ200 jet engine quickly enough? Unfortunately, it's not that simple and we have to check a lot more than just maximum flow rate. For example, the fuel has to be pumped into the engine under 2g acceleration. When I throttle back at 1,000mph, the car will slow down at 3g, and we want to keep the engine running to help it cool down after the car comes to a stop. Heat management is going to be a significant part of getting to 1,000mph safely (I'll talk more about that another time). Part of the problem is that jet engines create a lot of heat: the "turbine inlet temperature" inside the jet is over 1,500C at full power (hotter than molten lava in a volcano). The jet engine sits directly below the base of the fin (with your name on it? If not, click here). The fin is aluminium, so we want to avoid excess heat, which could weaken the structure. Giving the jet engine a couple of minutes to cool down at idle power, after a supersonic run, will help to control the heat build-up in the rear of the car. To replicate the effects of g for the fuel test, the team built a rig to tilt the whole fuel system to 60 degrees nose-up (to simulate 2g acceleration) and 70 degrees nose down (simulating 3g deceleration). Under all loads, fuel is pumped from the main fuel tank by a high-volume aircraft pump (rescued from a scrap ex-RAF Tornado). This pump runs on three-phase alternating current (AC) generated through the EJ200's "aircraft mounted accessory drive", or AMAD (more of which later). The main fuel tank (400 litres) is constantly "topped up" by two auxiliary tanks (100 litres each) after engine start, so that the main tank is still full when I let the brakes off a few minutes after start. The transfer pumps are smaller than the main AC pump (they come from the same scrap Tornado) and run on direct current (DC) from the car's 24V DC power system. We need to test both the main tank AC pump and the DC transfer pumps. There's more. The EJ200 is a very high-performance jet engine (it's one of the things that makes the RAF's Typhoon aircraft a world-beater), but at full power it still uses a fair bit of fuel. I can't tell you exactly how much, as Rolls-Royce doesn't publish that kind of information, but Wikipedia suggests a figure of 47 grammes/kilo-Newton/second. This figure is fairly useless, so let's develop it a bit. If it takes 47g of fuel to produce one kN of thrust for one second, then at the max power of 90kN, the jet will use 90 x 47g (=4,230g, or 4.23kg) of fuel per second. Jet fuel is only about 80% of the density of water, so 4.23kg equals about 5.3 litres of fuel per second at full power - that's enough to empty a standard household bucket in under 2 seconds. Like I said, it's quite a lot of fuel. Fortunately, Bloodhound will get from a standing start to 1,000 mph in less than 1 minute, so the 400 litres in the main tank is more than enough to get the job done. The problem with pumping five litres/second of fuel out of the tank is that you've got to replace it with something, otherwise the tank collapses. Each fuel tank has an air vent, which allows air into the tank to replace the fuel. This vent system needs to work at high acceleration and deceleration, and not leak! Finally, the World Land Speed Record requires two runs in opposite directions within one hour. This is not that difficult to achieve, provided you design the car to do the turn-round servicing fairly quickly between the runs. This includes a quick refuel (ideally less than 10 minutes), so we need to check this as well. For the test programme, we replaced one of the access panels with a clear plastic window, which I found fascinating. I've been lucky enough to spend a career flying supersonic jet fighters, but I've never seen the fuel in the tanks before. You can watch the tank filling up in this short video clip. So how did the fuel system get on? Overall, really well. There are just a few small changes that will make the system more reliable. For example, the DC transfer pumps are slightly more powerful than we expected, producing an over-pressure (about half a Bar) in the main tank. To avoid any risk of damaging the tank over time, we will fit a simple return fuel line, balancing up the pressures. The air vent pipe also turned out to be slightly too narrow, causing a small dip in air pressure at maximum flow rate. A small increase in the size of the air breather will ensure good air flow (and fuel flow) throughout the run. Success - the fuel system is pretty much ready to go. All we need to do now is connect the jet engine and fire it up! OK, it's not quite that simple. The cockpit controls need to be connected and tested, which is an ongoing process. We also need to be able to spin the jet engine to get it going. The jet's "starter motor" is a high-speed air turbine (a mere 57,700 revs/minute), which connects to the engine's AMAD gearbox that I mentioned earlier. As I write, the AMAD gearbox and starter motor are being connected up and tested on the car. As well as providing a jet engine start capability, spinning up the AMAD also drives the AC generator (the power supply to the AC fuel pump), the DC generator (DC power for the whole car), and the hydraulic pump (hydraulic power for the airbrakes and winglets). Spinning up a gearbox may not look like much, but we get to test a whole lot of car systems when we do, so it's an exciting moment for us. Then it really will be time for me to jump in and fire it up. Can't wait. While we are getting ready to run the car for the first time, we're producing a series of short videos called Anatomy of the Car. Each episode looks at a different bit of Bloodhound SSC, starting at the front and working back. The first episode is, predictably, called The Nose, and some of the numbers in the video are quite surprising. At maximum speed, the aerodynamic load peaks at a calculated 138,000 Pascals (= Newtons/sq metre). That's the equivalent load to two fully-grown elephants… and that's just for the nose cone. Still, the structure is very strong, so I'm not worried by this. I'm more concerned about the calculated figure for aerodynamic heating, which suggests a possible maximum of 134C - which would soften the carbon fibre nose cone - which is sitting under two large elephants. In reality, the nose should not get anywhere near that temperature, as conduction through the structure, and convection through the air, will remove a lot of the heat (I hope). I suspect that Anatomy of the car is likely to show up a lot of other big (and possibly scary) numbers as it works back along the car. It's easy to see why we need over 500 data sensors on a car that's hoping to travel at over 1,000mph. The Bloodhound Education Team is still working hard to share the excitement of our 1,000mph "Engineering Adventure" with the largest possible audience. They had a great time last week at the Bett Show in London, telling a huge number of young people about the car, and letting them have a go at their own rocket cars as part of the "Race for the Line" campaign. It clearly had an impact, as the students voted Bloodhound best stand at the show. Well done the Education Team. While it's winter here in the UK, it's the height of summer in South Africa, which is also peak rainy season in the Northern Cape (they get convective rain - thunderstorms, etc. - in the summer and virtually no rain in the winter). We were delighted to see a lot of rain falling around our Hakskeen Pan track last month, flooding a large area, which helps to improve the consistency and smoothness of the track surface each time it floods. Thanks to our friends at DMC (and their most excellent satellite photos), we can see that the summer heat is already drying the track out, with the "wet patch" now limited to the northern end, along the main tarmac road. This also illustrates how valuable satellite overviews are for us. The view from the road (which is the only easy way to get to the track) is all water, giving the impression that the whole pan is flooded. From the overhead view, it's a very different story. The world's best straight-line race track is getting ready for Bloodhound SSC.
නිල වාර්තාවලට අනුව විදෙස් රටවල සේවය කරන ශ්‍රී ලාංකික ශ්‍රමිකයන් සංඛ්‍යාව ලක්ෂ 15 ආසන්නය. ඒ අතරින් වැඩි පිරිසක් මැදපෙරදිග කලාපයේ විවිධ ක්ෂේත්‍ර තුළ සේවයේ නිරත වී සිටිති. එමෙන්ම දකුණු කොරියාව, ඊශ්‍රායලය, සයිප්‍රසය, මැලේසියාව, හොංකොං සහ ජපානය වැනි වෙනත් රටවල ද ශ්‍රී ලාංකික ශ්‍රමිකයන් සේවයේ නිරතව සිටින බව විදේශ සේවා නියුක්ති කාර්යාංශය පෙන්වා දෙයි. මේ අතර සැලකිය යුතු ශ්‍රී ලාංකිකයන් පිරිසක් වලංගු වීසා කාල සීමාව ඉකුත්වීමෙන් හෝ තම නීත්‍යනුකූල සේවා ස්ථානයෙන් පැන ගොස් නීති විරෝධී ලෙස සේවය කරන බවට කරුණු වාර්තා ඇතැයි විදේශ රැකියා අමාත්‍යංශය පවසයි. විදේශ සේවා නියුක්ති කාර්යාංශයේ ක්‍රියාකාරී අධ්‍යක්ෂ නීතිඥ උපුල් දේශප්‍රිය බීබීසී සිංහල සේවය වෙත අදහස් දක්වමින් කියා සිටියේ එවැනි පුද්ගලයන් නිසා රටේ කීර්ති නාමයට හානි සිදු වන බවය. "නීති විරෝධී ලෙස කරන රැකියා සම්බන්ධයෙන් අපේ රටේ කීර්ති නාමයට විශාල හානියක් සිදු වෙලා තිබෙනවා" යනුවෙන් කී ඔහු එවැනි තත්ත්වයක් යටතේ දකුණු කොරියාවෙන් ශ්‍රී ලංකාව වෙත ලැබෙන රැකියා කෝටා ප්‍රමාණය මේ වසරේ දී අඩු වී ඇති බව සඳහන් කළේය. ශ්‍රී ලාංකික ශ්‍රමිකයන් 25,000 අධික පිරිසක් දකුණු කොරියාවට යවා ඇති බවත් ඉන් 5,000 වැඩි සංඛ්‍යාවක් වීසා බලපත්‍ර නොමැතිව නීති විරෝධී ලෙස රැකියා කරන බවත් නීතිඥ උපුල් දේශප්‍රිය පැවසීය. "ඊශ්‍රායලයේත් මේ තත්ත්වය උදා වෙලා තිබෙනවා. මේකෙන් වෙන්නේ අනාගතයේ යන්න ඉන්න අයට දෙන කෝටා ප්‍රමාණය ඒ රටවලින් අපට අඩු කරලා තිබෙනවා" එවැනි තත්ත්වයක් යටතේ නීති විරෝධී ලෙස විදේශ රටවල රැඳී සිටින ශ්‍රී ලාංකික ශ්‍රමිකයන් සම්බන්ධයෙන් රජය කිසිදු වගකීමක් ගනු නොලබන බව විදේශ රැකියා අමාත්‍යංශය අවධාරණය කරයි. "වීසා බලපත්‍ර නොමැතිව සේවයේ නිරත වීම එම රටවල නීති රීති උල්ලංඝනය කිරීමක් වන අතර එය, දඩ මුදල් ගෙවීම සහ සිරගත කිරීමට ද හේතුවන වරදක් වේ" යනුවෙන් විදේශ රැකියා අමාත්‍යංශය නිකුත් කළ නිවේදනයක දැක්වේ. තම ඥාතියෙකු හෝ හිතවතෙකු එසේ නීති විරෝධී ලෙස සේවයේ නිරත වන්නේ නම් ඔහු හෝ ඇය ඒ සම්බන්ධයෙන් දැනුවත් කරන ලෙස විදේශ රැකියා අමාත්‍යංශය ශ්‍රී ලාංකිකයන්ගෙන් ඉල්ලා සිටී. "තම වලංගු වීසා කාලය අවසන් වීමෙන් පසුව තවදුරටත් සේවය කිරීමට අවශ්‍ය නම් එය නීත්‍යනුකූල ලෙස සිදු කර ගන්නා මෙන් ඔවුන් දැනුවත් කරන ලෙස ද ඉල්ලා සිටී" යනුවෙන් ඉහත කී නිවේදනයේ වැඩිදුරටත් දැක්වේ. ඔබ මැදපෙරදිග කලාපයේ හෝ විදෙස් රටක සිටින්නෙක්ද ? ඔබේ අත්දැකීම් හා අදහස් බීබීසී වෙත දන්වන්න. දුරකතන : +44 (0) 20 36144039 + 44 (0)20 36140556 + 44 (0)20 36140555 + 44 (0)20 36140554 + 44(0) 20 36140551 + 44(0) 20 36140552 Facebook (ෆේස්බුක්) : පිවිසෙන්න ඊමේල් : sinhala@bbc.co.uk සබැඳි යොමු:
Las autoridades de Estados Unidos presentaron este jueves los ocho prototipos del muro que el presidente Donald Trump quiere construir en la frontera con México. Instalados al este del cruce fronterizo de Otay Mesa en San Diego, California, la mayoría de modelos están compuestos por bloques de hormigón y acero, y miden algo más de nueve metros de altura. Según las pautas de licitación, los muros -que le costaron al gobierno entre US$400.000 y US$500.000 cada uno- deben evitar poder ser trepados y ser resistentes a golpes de herramientas como mazos o sopletes. Cada prototipo será sometido a una serie de pruebas durante las próximas semanas para evaluar su resistencia antes de decidir sobre su construcción final entre los dos países. La frontera que separa México y Estados Unidos se extiende por más de 3.000 kilómetros, si bien hay áreas en las que ya existen muros o vallas. El evento en el que las autoridades fronterizas presentaron oficialmente los ocho prototipos estaba destinado a escenificar que los controvertidos planes de construcción del muro siguen adelante con firmeza. Sin embargo, persisten las dudas sobre su financiamiento, que debe ser aprobado por el Congreso. Los prototipos fueron construidos con US$20 millones de fondos federales, pero Trump ya le pidió US$1.500 millones para iniciar la construcción del muro definitivo. Ronald Vitiello, representante de la Agencia de Aduanas y Protección de la Frontera (CBP, por sus siglas en inglés), recalcó que el objetivo del futuro muro es garantizar la seguridad de los ciudadanos estadounidenses. Sobre este tema, Mario Villarreal, jefe de división de la Patrulla Fronteriza, le dijo a la BBC que el muro será sólo una parte de todo un sistema de seguridad. "Una cosa que resultó de lo más llamativo fue que no hubiera manifestantes ni ningún acto de protesta en los alrededores", dijo desde el lugar Beatriz Díez, corresponsal de BBC Mundo. Donde sí hay un malestar general es del otro lado de la frontera, en Tijuana. "El paisaje desde el lado mexicano es desolador", contó Díez. Juana Rodríguez, una mujer de 48 años que desde su vivienda puede ver la parte superior de los prototipos, le dijo a BBC Mundo que mirar esta construcción le produce "tristeza y coraje". "No entiendo cómo se puede malgastar así el dinero, con tanta pobreza y necesidad como hay en el mundo", opinó. El desperdicio de dinero es una de las críticas constantes que se oyen en Tijuana. Para José Ávila, la idea del muro es "un ejemplo del racismo de las políticas de Donald Trump". "No todos somos delincuentes, no todos los mexicanos somos malos. Además, quien quiera cruzar la frontera lo hará por muchos muros que pongan", añadió. De todas formas, el proceso que queda por delante para construir el muro es largo. Y los habitantes de Tijuana dicen que, aunque le prestarán atención, seguirán adelante con su día a día.
أبصر النور في 25 أكتوبر/تشرين الأول 2017، حزب تركي جديد تقوده امرأة بعد أشهر من المداولات والتخمينات عن اسم الحزب موعد الإعلان عن ذلك. النائبة السابقة عن حزب الحركة القومية اليميني ميرال أكشينار التي تقود هذا الحزب لجأت إلى هذه الخطوة بعد أن باءت بالفشل كل مساعيها في عقد مؤتمر لحزب الحركة القومية وانتخاب زعيم جديد له بدلا من الزعيم الحالي الطاعن في السن دولت بهتشلي. ونشب الخلاف بين أكشينار وبهتشلي بعد أعلن الاخير لعام الماضي عن تأييده لتحويل النظام السياسي في تركيا إلى النظام الرئاسي والوقوف إلى جانب الزعيم التركي القوي رجب طيب أردوغان. وتولت أكشينار منصب وزيرة الداخلية عام 1996 وشاركت في تأسيس حزب العدالة والتنمية الحاكم، إلا أنها تركت الحزب قائلة إنه مجرد امتداد لحزب الرفاه الاسلامي بزعامة نجم الدين اربكان كما قالت وقتها، وانضمت إلى حزب الحركة القومية لاحقا. وبسبب معارضتها لنهج زعيم الحزب في تأييد أردوغان تم طردها من الحزب عام 2016. وقالت أكشينار التي تلقب بالمرأة الحديدية عند الإعلان عن تأسيس الحزب الذي يحمل اسم "حزب الخير" إن تركيا ستكون بخير في ظل حزبها مضيفة "إن تركيا وشعبها تعبا. والدولة تآكلت وانعدم النظام ولا حل سوى بتغيير كل المناخ السياسي". وكان من بين الأعضاء المؤسسين للحزب الجديد أربعة من نواب حزب الحركة القومية ونائب عن حزب الشعب الجمهوري المعارض. ورغم أن أغلب الأعضاء المؤسسين للحزب لهم تاريخ طويل في حزب الحركة القومية إلا الحزب يطمح الى أن يمثل خط يمين الوسط القومي ونيل أصوات القوميين والديمقراطيين. ولم يتمكن الحزب من استئجار صالة أو فندق في العاصمة أنقرة مخافة أن ينظر إلى ذلك وكأنه تأييد لموقف الحزب من قبل أصحاب الصالة أو الفندق مما اضطر مؤسسيه إلى عقد مؤتمر الإعلان عن تأسيس الحزب في مركز "ناظم حكمت" الثقافي التابع لحزب الشعب الجمهوري المعارض. وردت أكشينار على الهتافات التي تعالت قائلة: ميرال رئيسة الوزراء، "إن الحزب ومؤسسوه وأصدقاؤها يلحون عليها بأن تترشح لمنصب رئيس الجمهورية في الانتخابات المقبلة عام 2019". ويرى المراقبون أن أكشينار تمثل تحديا جديا لأردوغان لأنها تستمد شعبيتها من نفس قاعدته الشعبية، وهي فئة الناخبين المحافظين والمؤيدين لقطاع الأعمال والمتدينين والقوميين. كما أن معارضتها الشديدة لاعتماد النظام الرئاسي في البلاد أكسبتها المزيد من الشعبية حتى داخل أوساط حزب اردوغان المعارضين للنظام الرئاسي. وبعكس زعيم حزب الشعب الجمهوري كمال كليجدار اوغلو الذي فشل في الوصول إلى فئات الناخبين من خارج دائرة النخب المتعلمة في المدن، فإن أكشينار قادرة على اختراق القاعدة الشعبية لأردوغان. أردوغان يعيد بناء تركيا على أسس جديدة ولدت أكشينار عام 1956 لأبوين هاجرا من سالونيك في اليونان وأنخرطت في العمل السياسي مبكرا. وتحمل شهادة الدكتوراة في التاريخ لكنها تركت العمل الأكاديمي عندما فازت بمقعد في البرلمان عام 1994 عن حزب الطريق الصحيح. وبعدها بسنوات قليلة تولت منصب وزيرة الداخلية في حكومة نجم الدين اربكان عام 1996 إلى أن تدخل الجيش واطاح بالحكومة في انقلاب ناعم 1997 عبر إصدار إنذار نهائي ضد حكومة أربكان. وقفت اكشينار ضد تدخل الجيش في الحياة السياسية وتحدت أحد الجنرالات الذي هددها بأن يصلبها على السياج الحديدي الواقع أمام مجلس الوزراء. وتؤكد أكشينار على أهمية سيادة القانون وصيانة المؤسسات واتباع الأصول والإجراءات القانونية. وأوضحت أن أردوغان يرى العالم بلونين فقط هما إما أبيض أو أسود، "أما أنا فلا أنظر إلى سيادة القانون بمنظار الخطأ أو الصواب، أنا اؤمن بسيادته". وانتقدت موقف أردوغان من المرأة وقالت إنه يريد "ان نبقى داخل المنزل". وعادت أكشينار إلى البرلمان عام 2007 بعد عشر سنوات من الغياب عن أروقته لكن هذه المرة على قوائم حزب الحركة القومية المتطرف الذي ارتبط اسمه في سبعينيات القرن الماضي بمنظمة "الذئات الرمادية" القومية المتطرفة التي ارتكبت العديد من الجرائم ضد النشطاء الاكراد واليساريين في البلاد. وعارضت أكشينار مفاوضات السلام التي أجرتها الحكومة مع حزب العمال الكردستاني قبل سنوات قليلة وقالت إن القانون التركي فيه ما يكفي من ضمانات لصيانة حقوق الأقليات في البلاد وحاجاتها. لكنها انتقدت اعتقال النواب الأكراد وزجهم في السجن ووصفت ذلك بأنها محاولة من قبل أردوغان لترهيب الأكراد ولذلك "زج بالنواب الأكراد في السجون قبل الاستفتاء على النظام الرئاسي" حسبما قالت. وتعرضت هي نفسها لحملة شرسة من قبل الاعلام الموالي لأردوغان تناولت حياتها الشخصية منذ أبريل/نيسان من العام الماضي، كما تلقت تهديدات بالقتل ووصفت ذلك بأنها محاولة لإرهابها. وقالت: "إن هذه الحملة المنسقة منذ أبريل 2016 تهدف إلى إرغامي على التراجع لكنهم فشلوا في ذلك".
Нанимая людей на работу, продвигая их по службе, подбирая себе команду, следует выбирать самых толковых, верно? Не торопитесь с ответом. Интеллект – одна из тех характеристик, где существует некий минимальный уровень, необходимый для того, чтобы тебя считали умным. Однако избыток интеллекта иногда может быть недостатком куда более серьезным, чем его нехватка. К примеру, руководители корпорации Enron, оказавшейся в начале 2000-х в центре грандиозного скандала, в нашумевшем документальном фильме 2005 года, основанном на бестселлере 2003 года, считались "самыми смышлеными ребятами в бизнесе". Давайте вспомним, что из этого получилось. Эта американская компания, специализировавшаяся на продаже электроэнергии, предложила своим самым талантливым сотрудникам возглавить некоторые из наиболее прибыльных подразделений компании, практически не контролируя их деятельность. Несмотря на весь свой интеллект, молодые руководители оказались высокомерными, самоуверенными, да еще и с комплексами; они ввязались в финансовую авантюру, пошли на неоправданный риск и потеряли миллиарды долларов. В 2001 году компания прекратила свое существование. Разумеется, большое значение имеет работа, для выполнения которой вы нанимаете людей. Говоря об исследователях, аналитиках и программистах, благоразумно набирать только самых толковых, но этих ребят можно запереть в комнате, и пускай они делают свое дело, потому что все они работают сами по себе. Если им недостает эмоциональной отзывчивости или навыков межличностного общения, любой ущерб, который они могут нанести, будет ограниченным. Но нужны ли в действительности самые умные менеджеры? Проблема с по-настоящему умными людьми заключается в том, что они часто думают, что знают больше, чем все остальные. Возможно, часто так и есть. Но это никак не помогает, когда они пытаются уговорить других купить то, что они продают, сделать то, что они считают правильным. Например, однажды в моем тренинге участвовала женщина из высшего руководящего звена, которая всегда, казалось, на шаг опережала всех остальных в ее группе. По крайней мере, так она думала. Одной из самых больших проблем, с которыми она столкнулась, была необходимость признать, что другие руководители не обязательно видят мир так же, как и она. Это означало, что ей приходилось тратить время на то, чтобы сначала убедить их, если она хотела получить поддержку продвигаемых ею проектов. Когда знаешь правильный ответ, часто невозможно поверить, что все остальные могут не видеть то же самое и просто вынуждены подчиняться. К сожалению, организации так не работают. Особенно это касается работы с коллегами, когда у вас нет прямой власти над ними и единственный способ получить желаемую поддержку – это убедить их. Навязывание своего "более правильного" решения просто не сработает. Ирония таких ситуаций заключается в том, что иногда самый талантливый человек может стать одним из самых неэффективных менеджеров. Это можно увидеть, например, в спорте, где закончившие играть суперзвезды часто испытывают трудности, пытаясь стать главным тренером или генеральным менеджером клуба – а все потому, что теперь им приходится руководить простыми смертными, которые не обладают врожденным талантом такого же уровня. Уэйн Гретцки, легенда канадского спорта, закончил карьеру хоккеиста, имея на счету больше забитых шайб, чем кто-либо другой в истории профессионального хоккея. Перейдя после этого на тренерскую работу, она оказался удивительно неэффективен. То же самое можно сказать и о Майкле Джордане, вероятно, величайшем баскетболисте в истории, которому никогда так и не удалось возглавить успешную баскетбольную команду – ни в роли генерального менеджера, ни в качестве президента или владельца. Аналогичного результата следует ждать, если группу золотых медалистов выпустить на рынок с тем, что они считают лучшим продуктом. Я помню свой разговор с менеджерами из сингапурской компании Creative Technology Inc сразу после того, как Apple выпустила iPod. У Creative был гораздо более продвинутый в технологическом отношении MP3-плеер, но клиенты, к полному разочарованию менеджеров Creative, предпочли iPod. В Creative просто не могли понять, почему клиенты настолько неразумны! Однако оказывается, что лучшие технологии не всегда побеждают, подобно тому, как это не всегда удается самым умным людям. Тезис "больше – не значит лучше" касается и интеллектуальных ресурсов мозга. К примеру, правильно ли будет сокращать время, требуемое техникам из службы поддержки на то, чтобы помочь клиентам, обратившимся за помощью по телефону? Что происходит с качеством совета или с тем, как клиент воспринимает значение совета, если на передний план выдвигается, казалось бы, такой важный фактор, как оптимизация скорости поддержки клиента? Интересно, что американский обувной интернет-магазин Zappos премирует сотрудников, уделяющих больше времени клиентам, которые обращаются за консультацией. Для Zappos работа с клиентами по телефону важнее любого показателя, поскольку именно она, по мнению компании, может отрицательно сказаться на рентабельности. Когда сотрудники мотивированы заканчивать разговор с клиентом как можно быстрее, избитая фраза "интересы покупателя превыше всего" становится не более чем пустым, циничным лозунгом, который ничего не значит для торгового персонала. И давайте не будем забывать о побочном эффекте, который сопровождает подобную практику. Люди, которые действительно считают работу с клиентом важной, будут искать вакансии в другом месте. Сотрудники, которым предписано поменьше тратить времени на разговоры с покупателями, действительно могут успешно выполнять эту задачу для своей компании. В конечном итоге вы получаете желаемое (экономию времени), но теряете в удовлетворенности клиентов - из-за собственной несгибаемой уверенности в том, что больше - лучше, чем меньше. Можете назвать это блестящим воплощением ошибочной концепции. Стремление к большему вполне может считаться определяющим для нашего времени, но у этой не знающей сомнений убежденности есть и оборотная сторона. Управлять людьми и коллективами, опираясь при этом на самых умных и самых талантливых, – один из тех подходов, которые выглядят намного лучше в теории, чем на практике. Об авторе. Сидни Финкельштейн – профессор, декан факультета управления в школе бизнеса Так в Дартмуте (США), автор 16 книг. Оригинал этой статьи на английском языке можно прочитать на сайте BBC Capital.
The fighting in Syria is entering its seventh year, with no real end in sight. What began as calls for change on the streets swiftly became a multi-national battleground, which has left more than 300,000 people dead and millions displaced. Here are six decisive phases which have shaped the course of the conflict to date: There were almost 18 months between the outbreak of peaceful protests in February 2011 and the point - in July 2012 - that Syria was declared by the Red Cross to be in a state of civil war. Over this period, the international narrative shifted from one that framed events within the context of the Arab Spring's search for accountability and reform to one of a protracted military conflict. The Syrian opposition that emerged in this period reflected, and continues to reflect, a broad movement and not a cohesive force. The government resorted to increasingly violent crackdowns, prompting the establishment of a growing number of armed opposition groups. The Free Syrian Army (FSA) began to form in the summer of 2011, while the key Islamist and jihadist groups such as Ahrar al-Sham and al-Nusra Front were formed in late 2011 and early 2012, respectively. While the West hesitated over which groups to support, a chaotic influx of funds ensued from regional powers and individual donors in the Gulf and the Syrian diaspora. US President Barack Obama had declared in 2012 that the US would punish any use of chemical weapons by the Syrian government. But when the government was reported to have launched a chemical attack in the Ghouta agricultural belt outside Damascus in August 2013, the US did not intervene and instead accepted an offer from Russia to get Syria to dispose of its chemical weapons. The Obama administration continued to insist that the deal with Moscow was a better outcome. But on the ground it served to embolden President Bashar al-Assad and his Russian and Iranian allies, as it appeared to legitimise the use of non-chemical weapons. These events shattered any hopes the opposition and its regional backers had of direct US military intervention. They would also undermine potential US leverage in peace negotiations, as the government and its international backers henceforth operated with little fear of US sanction. Following President Obama's decision not to enforce his red line on chemical weapons, Western support for the "moderate" armed groups was eclipsed by the support of Islamist groups by regional powers Qatar, Saudi Arabia and Turkey. Even prior to this, some FSA groups had begun adopting a more religious image in order to attract Gulf funding, while some fighters had defected to better-equipped Islamist rivals. Jihadist groups skilfully sought to exploit the weakness of other groups to increase their power and influence within the rebel movement, sometimes targeting FSA units. Paradoxically, by 2015 this made moderate groups increasingly reliant upon jihadist groups on the battlefield. The growth of radical groups was further facilitated by the government's battlefield alliances with Hezbollah and other Shia militias, which reinforced the sectarian narrative of Sunni jihadists. IS entered the Syrian conflict by setting up al-Nusra Front, before announcing a merger with the group in 2013 that was rejected by al-Qaeda. The Syrian government's focus on military efforts against the moderate opposition groups afforded IS room for manoeuvre. In June 2014, IS announced the formation of its so-called "caliphate", encompassing areas of Syria and Iraq. Defeating IS would soon become the priority in Iraq and Syria for Western powers, leading the West to subordinate the peace process in Syria to an "IS first" policy imperative. In September 2014, the start of air strikes on IS positions in Syria demonstrated that the West was willing to intervene directly to counter the jihadist group, but not to protect civilians in opposition-held areas from the government's barrel-bombs. This fuelled a deep sense of betrayal within the Syrian opposition and communicated the prioritisation of a military solution to one of the products of the conflict over the search for a peace settlement that would tackle its drivers. Following a string of rebel victories in early 2015 - most notably in Idlib - President Assad was forced to admit that manpower shortages had made ceding territory necessary. Russia calculated that the Syrian government required direct material support to guarantee its survival. In September 2015, Russian President Vladimir Putin ordered the deployment of Russian forces to Syria. The intervention surprised the international community and immediately tipped the military balance in the government's favour. Moscow declared its intervention to be aimed at listed terror groups such as IS and al-Nusra Front, but it overwhelmingly targeted more moderate groups, including those receiving US support. Russia has subsequently become the main arbiter in international peace talks, effectively sidelining the UN and making the US a junior partner in the process. The Russian intervention has also upped the ante for any form of future Western intervention, as this would bring a real threat of direct combat with Russian forces. The recapture of rebel-held eastern Aleppo by the government and government-aligned forces in December 2016 was the most significant victory for President Assad in the conflict to date. The loss of Aleppo appears to illustrate that the rebels' hopes of overthrowing the Assad regime militarily are at an end. But the government also lacks the capacity to control the whole of the country, meaning that victory will prove a relative term in Syria. Internationally, events in Aleppo cemented Russia's role as the main external actor in the Syrian conflict. They also resulted in Turkey replacing the US as the key interlocutor with Russia in the last days of the Obama presidency. With the US and its Western allies having ceded the initiative, it now appears Western marginalisation in Syria could leave Russia and Iran to negotiate with Turkey an eventual settlement to the war. Tim Eaton is a research fellow with Chatham House's Middle East and North Africa Programme. He manages its Syria and its Neighbours Policy Initiative and is a co-author of the Chatham House report Western Policy Towards Syria: Applying Lessons Learned. Follow him on Twitter.
تیز رفتار کار کا لطف قدرے جداگانہ ہے۔ اگر سپیڈومیٹر 1600 کلومیٹر فی گھنٹہ تک پہنچ جائے تو رفتار کا جنون اپنے نقطۂ عروج پر ہوگا۔ دنیا کی سب سے تیز رفتار کار ’بلڈ ہاؤنڈ سپرسونک‘ کی رفتار کے بارے میں کہا جا رہا ہے کہ یہ 1600 کلومیٹر فی گھنٹہ ہوگی۔ برطانوی انجنیئروں کی ایک ٹیم اس کار کو جلد ہی سڑک پر لانے کے لیے تیار ہے۔ عام طور پر تیز رفتار گاڑیوں کے ذکر پر ہماری آنکھوں کے سامنے کسی نوجوان کا چہرہ سامنے آ جاتا ہے۔ لیکن اگر ہم یہ کہیں کہ دنیا کی تیزترین کار بنانے کے پس پشت ایک 85 سالہ شخص کا ذہن ہے تو ایک پل کے لیے آپ کو یقین نہیں آئے گا۔ ٭ یو ٹیوب سے سیکھ کر طیارہ بنانے والا مکینک 85 سالہ رون ایئرس ایک راکٹ سائنسدان ہیں۔ انھوں نے ’بلڈ ہاؤنڈ سپرسونک‘ کار کا ڈیزائن تیار کیا ہے۔ اسے تیار کرنے میں رون کو تین سال کا وقت لگا۔ رون کہتے ہیں: ’مجھے حدیں توڑنا پسند ہے۔ میری عمر کے کسی فرد کو عام طور پر ایسا موقع نہیں ملتا ہے۔‘ رون کو بچپن سے ہی ایروڈائنیمکس اور انجینئرنگ میں دلچسپی تھی۔ انھوں نے بتایا: ’میں اکثر سپٹ فائر اور ہریکین فائٹر طیاروں کو آسمان میں پرواز کرتے ہوئے دیکھتا تھا جنھیں دیکھنے کے بعد کسی کی دلچسپی انجینئرنگ اور رفتار میں بڑھ جاتی ہے۔‘ آج کل رون بلڈ ہاؤنڈ کار میں اس بات کی یقین دہانی کرنے میں مشغول ہیں کہ وہ اتنی رفتار نہ حاصل کرلے کہ قابو سے باہر ہو جائے۔ اس ریکارڈ رفتار کے ساتھ زمین پر کار چلانے میں اس کا قابو سے باہر ہونے کا خطرہ رہتا ہے۔ سنہ 1996 میں ایک امریکی ڈرائیور کریگ بریڈلو نے 670 میل فی گھنٹہ کی رفتار سے کار چلائی تو وہ اس پر اپنا کنٹرول کھو بیٹھے۔ اس خطرے کو کم کرنے کے لیے رون نے بلڈ ہاؤنڈ کے ڈیزائن پر اچھی خاصی محنت کی ہے۔ انھوں نے گاڑی کے ڈھانچے کو اس طرح تیار کیا ہے کہ وہ ریکارڈ رفتار بھی حاصل کرے اور محفوظ بھی رہے۔ انھوں نے کہا: ’سنہ 1950 کے دوران جب میں ایک ٹرینی تھا، اس وقت 1600 کلومیٹر فی گھنٹے کی رفتار سے طیارے بھی پرواز نہیں کرتے تھے۔ میرے خیال سے یہ ابھی تک کی سب سے زیادہ رفتار ہے جسے زمین پر حاصل کیا جا سکتا ہے۔‘ ’بلڈ ہاؤنڈ‘ کار فی الحال نیویارک ہوائی اڈے پر ہے جہاں اس کی کم رفتار پر آزمائش جاری ہے۔ کار بنانے والی ٹیم سنہ 2019 تک رفتار کا ایک نیا ریکارڈ قائم کرنے کی تیاریوں میں مصروف ہے۔ فی الحال سب سے زیادہ رفتار کا ریکارڈ 1228 کلومیٹر فی گھنٹہ ہے جبکہ بلڈ ہاؤنڈ کی رفتار دو مراحل میں 1247 کلومیٹر فی گھنٹہ اور 1609 کلومیٹر فی گھنٹہ تک پہنچنے کی امید کی جا رہی ہے۔
A 17-year-old has died after his car came off the A82 near Spean Bridge in the Highlands. Police Scotland said Kyle Bruce, who lived locally, was the only occupant of the blue Audi A3 which left the road between Letterfinlay and Invergloy, on Wednesday morning. He was pronounced dead at the scene. No other vehicles were involved. Police Scotland appealed for witnesses to get in touch. The road was closed for more than six hours. Sgt Alan Henderson said: ""Our thoughts at this difficult time are with the family and friends of those who have lost their loved one in yesterday's collision. "The road was closed to allow for an investigation to take place and I would like to thank the public for their patience while we conducted these necessary enquiries at the scene. "Our investigation is ongoing and I am appealing for anyone who saw the collision or saw the vehicle prior to the collision to contact us." Drivers faced a 154 mile (248km)diversion while investigation work took place.
If you were trying to recruit a celebrity to give your ambitious young music tech company a higher profile, it is hard to imagine a much better choice than Pharrell Williams, best known for his hit song Happy. So all credit to Roland Lamb - founder of Roli - for his coup in persuading the artist to appear with him on stage last night at the Hackney Empire and riff for 40 minutes about creativity. I first came across Roli four years ago under a railway arch in east London, where a small team was working away on an innovative new musical instrument called the Seaboard, a sort of spongy-keyed piano. Although it cost about £8,000, the Seaboard was a success, with endorsements from the likes of Stevie Wonder helping the marketing. Since then, Roli has expanded into much more affordable music technology products such as Blocks, a modular system that combines a physical interface with an app to encourage you to get creative.
15 Temmuz darbe girişimi sonrası çıkarılan bir OHAL kararnamesi ile kapatılan Zaman gazetesinin eski yönetici ve yazarlarına yönelik davada 22'si tutuklu 31 sanığın yargılanmasına başlandı. Dava kapsamında yaklaşık 14 aydır tutuklu bulunan gazetenin yazarlarından Mümtazer Türköne ve Şahin Alpay ile Ali Bulaç ilk kez hakim karşısına çıkarıldı. Duruşmada savunmasını yapan yazar Ali Bulaç, "darbeci katil örgütü lanetliyorum" diyerek şunları söyledi: "Bence Gülen hareketi cemaatken iyiydi. Güzel hizmetlere imza atıyordu. Zaman içinde kötüye dönüştü. FETÖ oldu. Onu övenler, destek verenler suç ortakları değil, iyi vasıflarına hizmetlerine teveccüh gösterdiler, destek verdiler. Bir keresinde Cumhurbaşkanı şöyle sitem etmişti; 'Ne istediniz de vermedik?' doğru her istediklerini alabiliyorlardı. Çünkü istedikleri iyi şeylerdi. Fakat cemaat Allah rızasına dönük hizmet yolunda dev adımlar atarken güç zehirlenmesine uğradı. Hormonal büyüme onlarda kibre yol açtı. Her istediğimizi yaparız, yaptırırız vahmine kapıldı" Doğan Haber Ajansı'nın duruşmadaki ifadelerine yer verdiği Bulaç, 17 - 25 Aralık operasyonları sürecinde de AKP'yi yolsuzluk yapmakla suçlamadığını, AKP iktidarında algı mühendisliği yapmadığını da ifade etti. Zaman Gazetesi eski yazarı Şahin Alpay, Doğan Haber Ajansı'nda yayımlanan mahkeme savunmasında, Gülen hareketi ile ilgili hayalkırıklığının darbe girişimi ile başladığını söyledi: "İtiraf edeyim ki o güne kadar hareketin gayrimeşru işlere karışan bir karanlık yüzü olduğunun bilincinde değildim. Gülen hareketi mensuplarının şu veya bu ölçüde 15 Temmuz darbe girişimine karışmış olduklarına dair emareler bütün yazarlık hayatım boyunca sivil yönetimi savunmuş, askeri darbelere askeri vesayete karşı yazmış ve konuşmuş bir liberal demokrat olarak beni şok etti ve derin bir yanılmışlık duygusuna boğdu" Zaman gazetesinde yazı yazdığı için pişmanlık duyduğunu ifade eden Alpay, yaşını gerekçe göstererek tahliyesini tale petti. Silivri Ceza İnfaz Kurumları Kampusü'nün karşısında bulunan binada 13. Ağır Ceza Mahkemesi'nce görülen duruşmada 22 tutuklu sanık ile 5 tutuksuz sanık da hazır bulundu. İddianamede toplam 31 şüpheli hakkında, "Darbeye teşebbüs" suçundan 3'er kez ağırlaştırılmış müebbet hapis cezası, "silahlı terör örgütüne üye olma" suçundan da ayrı ayrı 7,5 yıldan 15'er yıla kadar hapis cezasına çarptırılması talep ediliyor. CHP İstanbul Milletvekili Sezgin Tanrıkulu, HDP Diyarbakır Milletvekili Altan Tan ile aralarında yabancı gözlemcilerin de bulunduğu kişiler duruşmaya izleyici olarak katılıyor.
Russia has vetoed a UN Security Council resolution extending the mandate of the only official mission investigating the use of chemical weapons in Syria. The Joint Investigative Mechanism (JIM) was set up in 2015 to identify perpetrators of chemical attacks. It is due to report later this week on a deadly nerve agent attack on the town of Khan Sheikhoun in April. Russia has rejected a separate report from UN human rights investigators blaming the Syrian government. The JIM's mandate expires next month and Russia had been pushing to postpone a vote on its extension until after the report on Khan Sheikhoun was considered. But Russia could not get enough support and instead used its veto to block adoption. Russia, along with the UK, China, France and the US, have veto powers at the Security Council. It is the ninth time Russia has blocked action against its ally Syria, something rights group Amnesty called "a green light for war crimes". The US Ambassador to the UN, Nikki Haley, was also scathing, accusing Russia of siding with "dictators and terrorists". But Russian ambassador Vasily Nebenzia accused the US and others of trying to embarrass Russia. "What is taking place today is not very pleasant, it stinks in fact," he said, adding that Russia was prepared to discuss the JIM after the report's publication. The JIM, which involves the UN and the Organisation for the Prohibition of Chemical Weapons, is the only formal means of investigating chemical weapons attacks in Syria. At its founding it was hoped it could help lead to prosecutions. The attack on Khan Sheikhoun in April left more than 80 people dead and prompted the US to launch missile strikes on a Syrian airbase. Last month a UN Human Rights Council inquiry concluded a Syrian air force jet was responsible, dismissing statements from Russia that the jet had dropped conventional munitions that struck a rebel chemical weapons depot. Syrian President Bashar al-Assad has said the incident in Khan Sheikhoun was a "fabrication". He has insisted Syria destroyed its chemical stockpiles under a deal brokered after another deadly attack near Damascus in 2013 although this year the US defence secretary said there was "no doubt" it had retained some.
Kenya's opposition leader Raila Odinga announced that he was pulling out of the presidential election re-run set for 26 October in a media briefing surrounded by sullen and resigned faces. This was in stark contrast to the wide grins and jubilation that had greeted him after the Supreme Court annulled President Uhuru Kenyatta's victory in the August poll. The court's decision was a high-point for a career politician who many analysts had started to write off. The decision to withdraw from the election however is a typical move from a man who has been nicknamed the enigma. From his schooling to detention after the 1982 coup attempt against retired President Daniel arap Moi, Raila Amolo Odinga, 72, has remained a mysterious figure in many ways. A son of Kenya's first Vice-President, Jaramogi Oginga Odinga, this year's unsuccessful bid for the presidency was his fourth and most likely his last. Mr Odinga evokes mixed emotions in Kenya - he is loved and loathed in equal measure. No politician divides opinion like him. To his supporters, he is a democrat who has sacrificed a lot in his fight against dictatorship but others see him as a scheming and selfish person, who will do anything to gain power. Former Vice-President Michael Kijana Wamalwa once described Mr Odinga's supporters as suffering from "Railamania" and those who hated him as suffering from "Railaphobia". His strongest following is among his Luo community in the south-western region of Nyanza, where he was born and went to school. They have given him several nicknames over the years, including Tinga (tractor), Agwambo (act of god) and Baba (father). After qualifying as a mechanical engineer in the former East Germany, Mr Odinga had a short stint as a lecturer at the University of Nairobi. A wealthy man by Kenyan standards, he has interests in liquid gas cylinder manufacturer, the East Africa Spectre, and ethanol production through the Kisumu Molasses Plan. He also has interests in the importation and distribution of petroleum. Mr Odinga's first attempt at the presidency was in 1997, when he performed dismally, coming third. He stayed out of the presidential race in 2002, backing Mwai Kibaki to trounce Uhuru Kenyatta in elections that saw the Kanu party lose power for the first time since independence in 1963. Mr Odinga and his supporters believe that he was robbed of victory in 2007 when he ran on the Orange Democratic Movement (ODM) ticket, this time against Mr Kibaki. It was that election that deteriorated into nationwide ethnic violence, which left 1,300 Kenyans dead and more than 600,000 displaced. More on Kenya's elections: Mr Odinga became prime minister under a power-sharing deal to end the post-election violence. His struggle against one-party dictatorship saw him detained twice (from 1982 to 1988 and 1989 to 1991) and he holds the record for being Kenya's longest-serving detainee. He was initially imprisoned for trying to stage a coup in 1982, which propelled him on to the national stage. While he denied his involvement in the coup at the time, he conceded in Enigma, a book authored by Nigerian Babafemi Badejo in 2006, that he had played a central role in it. He also holds the record as the Kenyan politician who has changed political allegiances the most times. Each time he has moved, Mr Odinga has fashioned himself as a reformist. In the August election, he ran on behalf of the National Super Alliance (Nasa), which includes all of Kenya's main opposition groups. It is a big achievement that he has convinced other political heavyweights to sacrifice their own ambitions to support him in what is likely to be his final stab at the presidency. He had promised that, if elected, he would serve only one term in office. The astute politician that he is, Mr Odinga has been using allegory and riddles to tell his supporters how the electoral commission denied him of victory. He has referred to Mr Kenyatta as a "computer generated leader" to push his point that the commission's system were allegedly compromised to steal the election. He says that his decision to withdraw from the race was based on the commission's refusal to make changes to its systems and to fire the officials he blames for bungling the election. The commission however says that Mr Odinga's name will be on the ballot unless he fills in and submits a form which the opposition leader has said he will not do. His move to withdraw from the election has so far not alienated his supporters. They back his slogan that "no reforms, no election." And Mr Odinga has called for massive protests on election day. In Kenya's ethnic based politics Mr Odinga enjoys the backing of key communities - the Luo (to which he belongs), Luhya and Kamba. He has managed to get supporters of Musalia Mudavadi, who ran for the election in 2013, but now backs him, to boost his numbers and avoid splitting the opposition vote. Kalonzo Musyoka was once again Mr Odinga's running mate. Oranges and bananas Mr Odinga's move to change parties has been driven by his willingness to form alliances, even at one time entering into a coalition with former President Daniel Moi, under whom he had been detained. But he has stayed with the same core party, Orange Democratic Movement (ODM), since 2005. The party got its name from a referendum campaign Mr Odinga led against a proposed constitution in 2005. The nays were denoted by an orange while supporters were given a banana symbol. Mr Odinga's more creative supporters still adorn themselves with bunches of oranges. But alliances are not always easy and he broke up with former President Kibaki after the 2002 election because Mr Kibaki reneged on a pre-election power-sharing deal. An astute politician and avid campaigner who is known to move crowds using parables and football commentary, Mr Odinga represented Lang'ata constituency in the capital, Nairobi, uninterrupted for 20 years. And he refused to accept that he had lost again on 8 August to Uhuru Kenyatta, the same man who beat him in the 2013 election and is the son of Kenya's first President, Jomo Kenyatta. Mr Odinga's father, Jaramogi Oginga Odinga, served as Jomo Kenyatta's vice-president but the pair fell out and Mr Odinga quit in 1966, sparking a political rivalry that is yet to be settled.
